
 
 
 
 Produced by Al Haines
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE ATHENIAN CONSTITUTION
 
 
 by
 
 Aristotle
 
 
 Translated by Sir Frederic G. Kenyon
 
 
 
 
 Part 1
 
 ...[They were tried] by a court empanelled from among the noble
 families, and sworn upon the sacrifices. The part of accuser was taken
 by Myron. They were found guilty of the sacrilege, and their bodies
 were cast out of their graves and their race banished for evermore. In
 view of this expiation, Epimenides the Cretan performed a purification
 of the city.
 
 
 
 Part 2
 
 After this event there was contention for a long time between the upper
 classes and the populace. Not only was the constitution at this time
 oligarchical in every respect, but the poorer classes, men, women, and
 children, were the serfs of the rich. They were known as Pelatae and
 also as Hectemori, because they cultivated the lands of the rich at the
 rent thus indicated. The whole country was in the hands of a few
 persons, and if the tenants failed to pay their rent they were liable
 to be haled into slavery, and their children with them. All loans
 secured upon the debtor's person, a custom which prevailed until the
 time of Solon, who was the first to appear as the champion of the
 people. But the hardest and bitterest part of the constitution in the
 eyes of the masses was their state of serfdom.  Not but what they were
 also discontented with every other feature of their lot; for, to speak
 generally, they had no part nor share in anything.
 
 
 
 Part 3
 
 Now the ancient constitution, as it existed before the time of Draco,
 was organized as follows. The magistrates were elected according to
 qualifications of birth and wealth. At first they governed for life,
 but subsequently for terms of ten years. The first magistrates, both in
 date and in importance, were the King, the Polemarch, and the Archon.
 The earliest of these offices was that of the King, which existed from
 ancestral antiquity. To this was added, secondly, the office of
 Polemarch, on account of some of the kings proving feeble in war; for
 it was on this account that Ion was invited to accept the post on an
 occasion of pressing need. The last of the three offices was that of
 the Archon, which most authorities state to have come into existence in
 the time of Medon.  Others assign it to the time of Acastus, and adduce
 as proof the fact that the nine Archons swear to execute their oaths
 'as in the days of Acastus,' which seems to suggest that it was in his
 time that the descendants of Codrus retired from the kingship in return
 for the prerogatives conferred upon the Archon. Whichever way it may
 be, the difference in date is small; but that it was the last of these
 magistracies to be created is shown by the fact that the Archon has no
 part in the ancestral sacrifices, as the King and the Polemarch have,
 but exclusively in those of later origin. So it is only at a
 comparatively late date that the office of Archon has become of great
 importance, through the dignity conferred by these later additions. The
 Thesmothetae were many years afterwards, when these offices had already
 become annual, with the object that they might publicly record all
 legal decisions, and act as guardians of them with a view to
 determining the issues between litigants. Accordingly their office,
 alone of those which have been mentioned, was never of more than annual
 duration.
 
 Such, then, is the relative chronological precedence of these offices.
 At that time the nine Archons did not all live together.  The King
 occupied the building now known as the Boculium, near the Prytaneum, as
 may be seen from the fact that even to the present day the marriage of
 the King's wife to Dionysus takes place there. The Archon lived in the
 Prytaneum, the Polemarch in the Epilyceum. The latter building was
 formerly called the Polemarcheum, but after Epilycus, during his term
 of office as Polemarch, had rebuilt it and fitted it up, it was called
 the Epilyceum. The Thesmothetae occupied the Thesmotheteum. In the time
 of Solon, however, they all came together into the Thesmotheteum. They
 had power to decide cases finally on their own authority, not, as now,
 merely to hold a preliminary hearing. Such then was the arrangement of
 the magistracies. The Council of Areopagus had as its constitutionally
 assigned duty the protection of the laws; but in point of fact it
 administered the greater and most important part of the government of
 the state, and inflicted personal punishments and fines summarily upon
 all who misbehaved themselves. This was the natural consequence of the
 facts that the Archons were elected under qualifications of birth and
 wealth, and that the Areopagus was composed of those who had served as
 Archons; for which latter reason the membership of the Areopagus is the
 only office which has continued to be a life-magistracy to the present
 day.
 
 
 
 Part 4
 
 Such was, in outline, the first constitution, but not very long after
 the events above recorded, in the archonship of Aristaichmus, Draco
 enacted his ordinances. Now his constitution had the following form.
 The franchise was given to all who could furnish themselves with a
 military equipment. The nine Archons and the Treasurers were elected by
 this body from persons possessing an unencumbered property of not less
 than ten minas, the less important officials from those who could
 furnish themselves with a military equipment, and the generals
 [Strategi] and commanders of the cavalry [Hipparchi] from those who
 could show an unencumbered property of not less than a hundred minas,
 and had children born in lawful wedlock over ten years of age. These
 officers were required to hold to bail the Prytanes, the Strategi, and
 the Hipparchi of the preceding year until their accounts had been
 audited, taking four securities of the same class as that to which the
 Strategi and the Hipparchi belonged. There was also to be a Council,
 consisting of four hundred and one members, elected by lot from among
 those who possessed the franchise. Both for this and for the other
 magistracies the lot was cast among those who were over thirty years of
 age; and no one might hold office twice until every one else had had
 his turn, after which they were to cast the lot afresh. If any member
 of the Council failed to attend when there was a sitting of the Council
 or of the Assembly, he paid a fine, to the amount of three drachmas if
 he was a Pentacosiomedimnus, two if he was a Knight, and One if he was
 a Zeugites. The Council of Areopagus was guardian of the laws, and kept
 watch over the magistrates to see that they executed their offices in
 accordance with the laws. Any person who felt himself wronged might lay
 an information before the Council of Areopagus, on declaring what law
 was broken by the wrong done to him. But, as has been said before,
 loans were secured upon the persons of the debtors, and the land was in
 the hands of a few.
 
 
 
 Part 5
 
 Since such, then, was the organization of the constitution, and the
 many were in slavery to the few, the people rose against the upper
 class. The strife was keen, and for a long time the two parties were
 ranged in hostile camps against one another, till at last, by common
 consent, they appointed Solon to be mediator and Archon, and committed
 the whole constitution to his hands. The immediate occasion of his
 appointment was his poem, which begins with the words:
 
   I behold, and within my heart deep sadness has claimed its place,
   As I mark the oldest home of the ancient Ionian race
   Slain by the sword.
 
 
 In this poem he fights and disputes on behalf of each party in turn
 against the other, and finally he advises them to come to terms and put
 an end to the quarrel existing between them. By birth and reputation
 Solon was one of the foremost men of the day, but in wealth and
 position he was of the middle class, as is generally agreed, and is,
 indeed, established by his own evidence in these poems, where he
 exhorts the wealthy not to be grasping.
 
   But ye who have store of good, who are sated and overflow,
   Restrain your swelling soul, and still it and keep it low:
   Let the heart that is great within you be trained a lowlier way;
   Ye shall not have all at your will, and we will not for ever obey.
 
 Indeed, he constantly fastens the blame of the conflict on the rich;
 and accordingly at the beginning of the poem he says that he fears 'the
 love of wealth and an overweening mind', evidently meaning that it was
 through these that the quarrel arose.
 
 
 
 Part 6
 
 As soon as he was at the head of affairs, Solon liberated the people
 once and for all, by prohibiting all loans on the security of the
 debtor's person: and in addition he made laws by which he cancelled all
 debts, public and private. This measure is commonly called the
 Seisachtheia [= removal of burdens], since thereby the people had their
 loads removed from them. In connexion with it some persons try to
 traduce the character of Solon. It so happened that, when he was about
 to enact the Seisachtheia, he communicated his intention to some
 members of the upper class, whereupon, as the partisans of the popular
 party say, his friends stole a march on him; while those who wish to
 attack his character maintain that he too had a share in the fraud
 himself. For these persons borrowed money and bought up a large amount
 of land, and so when, a short time afterwards, all debts were
 cancelled, they became wealthy; and this, they say, was the origin of
 the families which were afterwards looked on as having been wealthy
 from primeval times. However, the story of the popular party is by far
 the most probable. A man who was so moderate and public-spirited in all
 his other actions, that when it was within his power to put his
 fellow-citizens beneath his feet and establish himself as tyrant, he
 preferred instead to incur the hostility of both parties by placing his
 honour and the general welfare above his personal aggrandisement, is
 not likely to have consented to defile his hands by such a petty and
 palpable fraud. That he had this absolute power is, in the first place,
 indicated by the desperate condition the country; moreover, he mentions
 it himself repeatedly in his poems, and it is universally admitted. We
 are therefore bound to consider this accusation to be false.
 
 
 
 Part 7
 
 Next Solon drew up a constitution and enacted new laws; and the
 ordinances of Draco ceased to be used, with the exception of those
 relating to murder. The laws were inscribed on the wooden stands, and
 set up in the King's Porch, and all swore to obey them; and the nine
 Archons made oath upon the stone, declaring that they would dedicate a
 golden statue if they should transgress any of them. This is the origin
 of the oath to that effect which they take to the present day. Solon
 ratified his laws for a hundred years; and the following was the
 fashion in which he organized the constitution. He divided the
 population according to property into four classes, just as it had been
 divided before, namely, Pentacosiomedimni, Knights, Zeugitae, and
 Thetes. The various magistracies, namely, the nine Archons, the
 Treasurers, the Commissioners for Public Contracts (Poletae), the
 Eleven, and Clerks (Colacretae), he assigned to the Pentacosiomedimni,
 the Knights, and the Zeugitae, giving offices to each class in
 proportion to the value of their rateable property. To who ranked among
 the Thetes he gave nothing but a place in the Assembly and in the
 juries. A man had to rank as a Pentacosiomedimnus if he made, from his
 own land, five hundred measures, whether liquid or solid. Those ranked
 as Knights who made three hundred measures, or, as some say, those who
 were able to maintain a horse. In support of the latter definition they
 adduce the name of the class, which may be supposed to be derived from
 this fact, and also some votive offerings of early times; for in the
 Acropolis there is a votive offering, a statue of Diphilus, bearing
 this inscription:
 
   The son of Diphilus, Athenion hight,
   Raised from the Thetes and become a knight,
   Did to the gods this sculptured charger bring,
   For his promotion a thank-offering.
 
 And a horse stands in evidence beside the man, implying that this was
 what was meant by belonging to the rank of Knight. At the same time it
 seems reasonable to suppose that this class, like the
 Pentacosiomedimni, was defined by the possession of an income of a
 certain number of measures. Those ranked as Zeugitae who made two
 hundred measures, liquid or solid; and the rest ranked as Thetes, and
 were not eligible for any office. Hence it is that even at the present
 day, when a candidate for any office is asked to what class he belongs,
 no one would think of saying that he belonged to the Thetes.
 
 
 
 Part 8
 
 The elections to the various offices Solon enacted should be by lot,
 out of candidates selected by each of the tribes. Each tribe selected
 ten candidates for the nine archonships, and among these the lot was
 cast. Hence it is still the custom for each tribe to choose ten
 candidates by lot, and then the lot is again cast among these. A proof
 that Solon regulated the elections to office according to the property
 classes may be found in the law still in force with regard to the
 Treasurers, which enacts that they shall be chosen from the
 Pentacosiomedimni. Such was Solon's legislation with respect to the
 nine Archons; whereas in early times the Council of Areopagus summoned
 suitable persons according to its own judgement and appointed them for
 the year to the several offices. There were four tribes, as before, and
 four tribe-kings. Each tribe was divided into three Trittyes [=Thirds],
 with twelve Naucraries in each; and the Naucraries had officers of
 their own, called Naucrari, whose duty it was to superintend the
 current receipts and expenditure. Hence, among the laws of Solon now
 obsolete, it is repeatedly written that the Naucrari are to receive and
 to spend out of the Naucraric fund.  Solon also appointed a Council of
 four hundred, a hundred from each tribe; but he assigned to the Council
 of the Areopagus the duty of superintending the laws, acting as before
 as the guardian of the constitution in general. It kept watch over the
 affairs of the state in most of the more important matters, and
 corrected offenders, with full powers to inflict either fines or
 personal punishment. The money received in fines it brought up into the
 Acropolis, without assigning the reason for the mulct. It also tried
 those who conspired for the overthrow of the state, Solon having
 enacted a process of impeachment to deal with such offenders. Further,
 since he saw the state often engaged in internal disputes, while many
 of the citizens from sheer indifference accepted whatever might turn
 up, he made a law with express reference to such persons, enacting that
 any one who, in a time [Transcriber's note: of?] civil factions, did
 not take up arms with either party, should lose his rights as a citizen
 and cease to have any part in the state.
 
 
 
 Part 9
 
 Such, then, was his legislation concerning the magistracies. There are
 three points in the constitution of Solon which appear to be its most
 democratic features: first and most important, the prohibition of loans
 on the security of the debtor's person; secondly, the right of every
 person who so willed to claim redress on behalf of any one to whom
 wrong was being done; thirdly, the institution of the appeal to the
 jurycourts; and it is to this last, they say, that the masses have owed
 their strength most of all, since, when the democracy is master of the
 voting-power, it is master of the constitution.  Moreover, since the
 laws were not drawn up in simple and explicit terms (but like the one
 concerning inheritances and wards of state), disputes inevitably
 occurred, and the courts had to decide in every matter, whether public
 or private. Some persons in fact believe that Solon deliberately made
 the laws indefinite, in order that the final decision might be in the
 hands of the people. This, however, is not probable, and the reason no
 doubt was that it is impossible to attain ideal perfection when framing
 a law in general terms; for we must judge of his intentions, not from
 the actual results in the present day, but from the general tenor of
 the rest of his legislation.
 
 
 
 Part 10
 
 These seem to be the democratic features of his laws; but in addition,
 before the period of his legislation, he carried through his abolition
 of debts, and after it his increase in the standards of weights and
 measures, and of the currency. During his administration the measures
 were made larger than those of Pheidon, and the mina, which previously
 had a standard of seventy drachmas, was raised to the full hundred. The
 standard coin in earlier times was the two-drachma piece. He also made
 weights corresponding with the coinage, sixty-three minas going to the
 talent; and the odd three minas were distributed among the staters and
 the other values.
 
 
 
 Part 11
 
 When he had completed his organization of the constitution in the
 manner that has been described, he found himself beset by people coming
 to him and harassing him concerning his laws, criticizing here and
 questioning there, till, as he wished neither to alter what he had
 decided on nor yet to be an object of ill will to every one by
 remaining in Athens, he set off on a journey to Egypt, with the
 combined objects of trade and travel, giving out that he should not
 return for ten years. He considered that there was no call for him to
 expound the laws personally, but that every one should obey them just
 as they were written. Moreover, his position at this time was
 unpleasant. Many members of the upper class had been estranged from him
 on account of his abolition of debts, and both parties were alienated
 through their disappointment at the condition of things which he had
 created. The mass of the people had expected him to make a complete
 redistribution of all property, and the upper class hoped he would
 restore everything to its former position, or, at any rate, make but a
 small change. Solon, however, had resisted both classes. He might have
 made himself a despot by attaching himself to whichever party he chose,
 but he preferred, though at the cost of incurring the enmity of both,
 to be the saviour of his country and the ideal lawgiver.
 
 
 
 Part 12
 
 The truth of this view of Solon's policy is established alike by common
 consent, and by the mention he has himself made of the matter in his
 poems. Thus:
 
   I gave to the mass of the people such rank as befitted their need,
   I took not away their honour, and I granted naught to their greed;
   While those who were rich in power, who in wealth were glorious
       and great,
   I bethought me that naught should befall them unworthy their
       splendour and state;
   So I stood with my shield outstretched, and both were safe in
       its sight,
   And I would not that either should triumph, when the triumph was
       not with right.
 
 
 Again he declares how the mass of the people ought to be treated:
 
   But thus will the people best the voice of their leaders obey,
   When neither too slack is the rein, nor violence holdeth the sway;
   For indulgence breedeth a child, the presumption that spurns control,
   When riches too great are poured upon men of unbalanced soul.
 
 And again elsewhere he speaks about the persons who wished to
 redistribute the land:
 
   So they came in search of plunder, and their cravings knew no bound,
   Every one among them deeming endless wealth would here be found.
   And that I with glozing smoothness hid a cruel mind within.
   Fondly then and vainly dreamt they; now they raise an angry din,
   And they glare askance in anger, and the light within their eyes
   Burns with hostile flames upon me. Yet therein no justice lies.
   All I promised, fully wrought I with the gods at hand to cheer,
   Naught beyond in folly ventured. Never to my soul was dear
   With a tyrant's force to govern, nor to see the good and base
   Side by side in equal portion share the rich home of our race.
 
 
 Once more he speaks of the abolition of debts and of those who before
 were in servitude, but were released owing to the Seisachtheia:
 
   Of all the aims for which I summoned forth
   The people, was there one I compassed not?
   Thou, when slow time brings justice in its train,
   O mighty mother of the Olympian gods,
   Dark Earth, thou best canst witness, from whose breast
   I swept the pillars broadcast planted there,
   And made thee free, who hadst been slave of yore.
   And many a man whom fraud or law had sold
   For from his god-built land, an outcast slave,
   I brought again to Athens; yea, and some,
   Exiles from home through debt's oppressive load,
   Speaking no more the dear ATHENIAN tongue,
   But wandering far and wide, I brought again;
 
   And those that here in vilest slavery
   Crouched 'neath a master's frown, I set them free.
   Thus might and right were yoked in harmony,
   Since by the force of law I won my ends
   And kept my promise. Equal laws I gave
   To evil and to good, with even hand
   Drawing straight justice for the lot of each.
   But had another held the goad as
   One in whose heart was guile and greediness,
   He had not kept the people back from strife.
   For had I granted, now what pleased the one,
   Then what their foes devised in counterpoise,
   Of many a man this state had been bereft.
   Therefore I showed my might on every side,
   Turning at bay like wolf among the hounds.
 
 
 And again he reviles both parties for their grumblings in the times
 that followed:
 
   Nay, if one must lay blame where blame is due,
   Wer't not for me, the people ne'er had set
   Their eyes upon these blessings e'en in dreams:
   While greater men, the men of wealthier life,
   Should praise me and should court me as their friend.
 
 For had any other man, he says, received this exalted post,
 
   He had not kept the people back, nor ceased
   Til he had robbed the richness of the milk.
   But I stood forth a landmark in the midst,
   And barred the foes from battle.
 
 
 
 Part 13
 
 Such then, were Solon's reasons for his departure from the country.
 After his retirement the city was still torn by divisions.  For four
 years, indeed, they lived in peace; but in the fifth year after Solon's
 government they were unable to elect an Archon on account of their
 dissensions, and again four years later they elected no Archon for the
 same reason. Subsequently, after a similar period had elapsed, Damasias
 was elected Archon; and he governed for two years and two months, until
 he was forcibly expelled from his office. After this, it was agreed, as
 a compromise, to elect ten Archons, five from the Eupatridae, three
 from the Agroeci, and two from the Demiurgi, and they ruled for the
 year following Damasias.  It is clear from this that the Archon was at
 the time the magistrate who possessed the greatest power, since it is
 always in connexion with this office that conflicts are seen to arise.
 But altogether they were in a continual state of internal disorder.
 Some found the cause and justification of their discontent in the
 abolition of debts, because thereby they had been reduced to poverty;
 others were dissatisfied with the political constitution, because it
 had undergone a revolutionary change; while with others the motive was
 found in personal rivalries among themselves. The parties at this time
 were three in number. First there was the party of the Shore, led by
 Megacles the son of Alcmeon, which was considered to aim at a moderate
 form of government; then there were the men of the Plain, who desired
 an oligarchy and were led by Lycurgus; and thirdly there were the men
 of the Highlands, at the head of whom was Pisistratus, who was looked
 on as an extreme democrat. This latter party was reinforced by those
 who had been deprived of the debts due to them, from motives of
 poverty, and by those who were not of pure descent, from motives of
 personal apprehension. A proof of this is seen in the fact that after
 the tyranny was overthrown a revision was made of the citizen-roll, on
 the ground that many persons were partaking in the franchise without
 having a right to it. The names given to the respective parties were
 derived from the districts in which they held their lands.
 
 
 
 Part 14
 
 Pisistratus had the reputation of being an extreme democrat, and he
 also had distinguished himself greatly in the war with Megara.  Taking
 advantage of this, he wounded himself, and by representing that his
 injuries had been inflicted on him by his political rivals, he
 persuaded the people, through a motion proposed by Aristion, to grant
 him a bodyguard. After he had got these 'club-bearers', as they were
 called, he made an attack with them on the people and seized the
 Acropolis. This happened in the archonship of Comeas, thirty-one years
 after the legislation of Solon. It is related that, when Pisistratus
 asked for his bodyguard, Solon opposed the request, and declared that
 in so doing he proved himself wiser than half the people and braver
 than the rest,--wiser than those who did not see that Pisistratus
 designed to make himself tyrant, and braver than those who saw it and
 kept silence. But when all his words availed nothing he carried forth
 his armour and set it up in front of his house, saying that he had
 helped his country so far as lay in his power (he was already a very
 old man), and that he called on all others to do the same. Solon's
 exhortations, however, proved fruitless, and Pisistratus assumed the
 sovereignty. His administration was more like a constitutional
 government than the rule of a tyrant; but before his power was firmly
 established, the adherents of Megacles and Lycurgus made a coalition
 and drove him out. This took place in the archonship of Hegesias, five
 years after the first establishment of his rule. Eleven years later
 Megacles, being in difficulties in a party struggle, again opened
 negotiations with Pisistratus, proposing that the latter should marry
 his daughter; and on these terms he brought him back to Athens, by a
 very primitive and simple-minded device. He first spread abroad a
 rumour that Athens was bringing back Pisistratus, and then, having
 found a woman of great stature and beauty, named Phye (according to
 Herodotus, of the deme of Paeania, but as others say a Thracian
 flower-seller of the deme of Collytus), he dressed her in a garb
 resembling that of the goddess and brought her into the city with
 Pisistratus. The latter drove in on a chariot with the woman beside
 him, and the inhabitants of the city, struck with awe, received him
 with adoration.
 
 
 
 Part 15
 
 In this manner did his first return take place. He did not, however,
 hold his power long, for about six years after his return he was again
 expelled. He refused to treat the daughter of Megacles as his wife, and
 being afraid, in consequence, of a combination of the two opposing
 parties, he retired from the country. First he led a colony to a place
 called Rhaicelus, in the region of the Thermaic gulf; and thence he
 passed to the country in the neighbourhood of Mt. Pangaeus. Here he
 acquired wealth and hired mercenaries; and not till ten years had
 elapsed did he return to Eretria and make an attempt to recover the
 government by force. In this he had the assistance of many allies,
 notably the Thebans and Lygdamis of Naxos, and also the Knights who
 held the supreme power in the constitution of Eretria. After his
 victory in the battle at Pallene he captured Athens, and when he had
 disarmed the people he at last had his tyranny securely established,
 and was able to take Naxos and set up Lygdamis as ruler there. He
 effected the disarmament of the people in the following manner. He
 ordered a parade in full armour in the Theseum, and began to make a
 speech to the people. He spoke for a short time, until the people
 called out that they could not hear him, whereupon he bade them come up
 to the entrance of the Acropolis, in order that his voice might be
 better heard. Then, while he continued to speak to them at great
 length, men whom he had appointed for the purpose collected the arms
 and locked them up in the chambers of the Theseum hard by, and came and
 made a signal to him that it was done. Pisistratus accordingly, when he
 had finished the rest of what he had to say, told the people also what
 had happened to their arms; adding that they were not to be surprised
 or alarmed, but go home and attend to their private affairs, while he
 would himself for the future manage all the business of the state.
 
 
 
 Part 16
 
 Such was the origin and such the vicissitudes of the tyranny of
 Pisistratus. His administration was temperate, as has been said before,
 and more like constitutional government than a tyranny. Not only was he
 in every respect humane and mild and ready to forgive those who
 offended, but, in addition, he advanced money to the poorer people to
 help them in their labours, so that they might make their living by
 agriculture. In this he had two objects, first that they might not
 spend their time in the city but might be scattered over all the face
 of the country, and secondly that, being moderately well off and
 occupied with their own business, they might have neither the wish nor
 the time to attend to public affairs. At the same time his revenues
 were increased by the thorough cultivation of the country, since he
 imposed a tax of one tenth on all the produce.  For the same reasons he
 instituted the local justices, and often made expeditions in person
 into the country to inspect it and to settle disputes between
 individuals, that they might not come into the city and neglect their
 farms. It was in one of these progresses that, as the story goes,
 Pisistratus had his adventure with the man of Hymettus, who was
 cultivating the spot afterwards known as 'Tax-free Farm'. He saw a man
 digging and working at a very stony piece of ground, and being
 surprised he sent his attendant to ask what he got out of this plot of
 land. 'Aches and pains', said the man; 'and that's what Pisistratus
 ought to have his tenth of'. The man spoke without knowing who his
 questioner was; but Pisistratus was so pleased with his frank speech and
 his industry that he granted him exemption from all taxes. And so in
 matters in general he burdened the people as little as possible with
 his government, but always cultivated peace and kept them in all
 quietness. Hence the tyranny of Pisistratus was often spoken of
 proverbially as 'the age of gold'; for when his sons succeeded him the
 government became much harsher. But most important of all in this
 respect was his popular and kindly disposition. In all things he was
 accustomed to observe the laws, without giving himself any exceptional
 privileges. Once he was summoned on a charge of homicide before the
 Areopagus, and he appeared in person to make his defence; but the
 prosecutor was afraid to present himself and abandoned the case. For
 these reasons he held power long, and whenever he was expelled he
 regained his position easily. The majority alike of the upper class and
 of the people were in his favour; the former he won by his social
 intercourse with them, the latter by the assistance which he gave to
 their private purses, and his nature fitted him to win the hearts of
 both. Moreover, the laws in reference to tyrants at that time in force
 at Athens were very mild, especially the one which applies more
 particularly to the establishment of a tyranny. The law ran as follows:
 'These are the ancestral statutes of the ATHENIANs; if any persons
 shall make an attempt to establish a tyranny, or if any person shall
 join in setting up a tyranny, he shall lose his civic rights, both
 himself and his whole house.'
 
 
 
 Part 17
 
 Thus did Pisistratus grow old in the possession of power, and he died a
 natural death in the archonship of Philoneos, three and thirty years
 from the time at which he first established himself as tyrant, during
 nineteen of which he was in possession of power; the rest he spent in
 exile. It is evident from this that the story is mere gossip which
 states that Pisistratus was the youthful favourite of Solon and
 commanded in the war against Megara for the recovery of Salamis. It
 will not harmonize with their respective ages, as any one may see who
 will reckon up the years of the life of each of them, and the dates at
 which they died. After the death of Pisistratus his sons took up the
 government, and conducted it on the same system. He had two sons by his
 first and legitimate wife, Hippias and Hipparchus, and two by his
 Argive consort, Iophon and Hegesistratus, who was surnamed Thessalus.
 For Pisistratus took a wife from Argos, Timonassa, the daughter of a
 man of Argos, named Gorgilus; she had previously been the wife of
 Archinus of Ambracia, one of the descendants of Cypselus. This was the
 origin of his friendship with the Argives, on account of which a
 thousand of them were brought over by Hegesistratus and fought on his
 side in the battle at Pallene.  Some authorities say that this marriage
 took place after his first expulsion from Athens, others while he was
 in possession of the government.
 
 
 
 Part 18
 
 Hippias and Hipparchus assumed the control of affairs on grounds alike
 of standing and of age; but Hippias, as being also naturally of a
 statesmanlike and shrewd disposition, was really the head of the
 government. Hipparchus was youthful in disposition, amorous, and fond
 of literature (it was he who invited to Athens Anacreon, Simonides, and
 the other poets), while Thessalus was much junior in age, and was
 violent and headstrong in his behaviour. It was from his character that
 all the evils arose which befell the house. He became enamoured of
 Harmodius, and, since he failed to win his affection, he lost all
 restraint upon his passion, and in addition to other exhibitions of
 rage he finally prevented the sister of Harmodius from taking the part
 of a basket-bearer in the Panathenaic procession, alleging as his
 reason that Harmodius was a person of loose life. Thereupon, in a
 frenzy of wrath, Harmodius and Aristogeiton did their celebrated deed,
 in conjunction with a number of confederates. But while they were lying
 in wait for Hippias in the Acropolis at the time of the Panathenaea
 (Hippias, at this moment, was awaiting the arrival of the procession,
 while Hipparchus was organizing its dispatch) they saw one of the
 persons privy to the plot talking familiarly with him. Thinking that he
 was betraying them, and desiring to do something before they were
 arrested, they rushed down and made their attempt without waiting for
 the rest of their confederates. They succeeded in killing Hipparchus
 near the Leocoreum while he was engaged in arranging the procession,
 but ruined the design as a whole; of the two leaders, Harmodius was
 killed on the spot by the guards, while Aristogeiton was arrested, and
 perished later after suffering long tortures. While under the torture
 he accused many persons who belonged by birth to the most distinguished
 families and were also personal friends of the tyrants. At first the
 government could find no clue to the conspiracy; for the current story,
 that Hippias made all who were taking part in the procession leave
 their arms, and then detected those who were carrying secret daggers,
 cannot be true, since at that time they did not bear arms in the
 processions, this being a custom instituted at a later period by the
 democracy. According to the story of the popular party, Aristogeiton
 accused the friends of the tyrants with the deliberate intention that
 the latter might commit an impious act, and at the same time weaken
 themselves, by putting to death innocent men who were their own
 friends; others say that he told no falsehood, but was betraying the
 actual accomplices. At last, when for all his efforts he could not
 obtain release by death, he promised to give further information
 against a number of other persons; and, having induced Hippias to give
 him his hand to confirm his word, as soon as he had hold of it he
 reviled him for giving his hand to the murderer of his brother, till
 Hippias, in a frenzy of rage, lost control of himself and snatched out
 his dagger and dispatched him.
 
 
 
 Part 19
 
 After this event the tyranny became much harsher. In consequence of his
 vengeance for his brother, and of the execution and banishment of a
 large number of persons, Hippias became a distrusted and an embittered
 man. About three years after the death of Hipparchus, finding his
 position in the city insecure, he set about fortifying Munichia, with
 the intention of establishing himself there.  While he was still
 engaged on this work, however, he was expelled by Cleomenes, king of
 Lacedaemon, in consequence of the Spartans being continually incited by
 oracles to overthrow the tyranny.  These oracles were obtained in the
 following way. The Athenian exiles, headed by the Alcmeonidae, could
 not by their own power effect their return, but failed continually in
 their attempts. Among their other failures, they fortified a post in
 Attica, Lipsydrium, above Mt. Parnes, and were there joined by some
 partisans from the city; but they were besieged by the tyrants and
 reduced to surrender. After this disaster the following became a
 popular drinking song:
 
   Ah! Lipsydrium, faithless friend!
   Lo, what heroes to death didst send,
   Nobly born and great in deed!
   Well did they prove themselves at need
   Of noble sires a noble seed.
 
 
 Having failed, then, in every other method, they took the contract for
 rebuilding the temple at Delphi, thereby obtaining ample funds, which
 they employed to secure the help of the Lacedaemonians. All this time
 the Pythia kept continually enjoining on the Lacedaemonians who came to
 consult the oracle, that they must free Athens; till finally she
 succeeded in impelling the Spartans to that step, although the house of
 Pisistratus was connected with them by ties of hospitality.  The
 resolution of the Lacedaemonians was, however, at least equally due to
 the friendship which had been formed between the house of Pisistratus
 and Argos. Accordingly they first sent Anchimolus by sea at the head of
 an army; but he was defeated and killed, through the arrival of Cineas
 of Thessaly to support the sons of Pisistratus with a force of a
 thousand horsemen. Then, being roused to anger by this disaster, they
 sent their king, Cleomenes, by land at the head of a larger force; and
 he, after defeating the Thessalian cavalry when they attempted to
 intercept his march into Attica, shut up Hippias within what was known
 as the Pelargic wall and blockaded him there with the assistance of the
 Athenians. While he was sitting down before the place, it so happened
 that the sons of the Pisistratidae were captured in an attempt to slip
 out; upon which the tyrants capitulated on condition of the safety of
 their children, and surrendered the Acropolis to the Athenians, five
 days being first allowed them to remove their effects. This took place
 in the archonship of Harpactides, after they had held the tyranny for
 about seventeen years since their father's death, or in all, including
 the period of their father's rule, for nine-and-forty years.
 
 
 
 Part 20
 
 After the overthrow of the tyranny, the rival leaders in the state were
 Isagoras son of Tisander, a partisan of the tyrants, and Cleisthenes,
 who belonged to the family of the Alcmeonidae.  Cleisthenes, being
 beaten in the political clubs, called in the people by giving the
 franchise to the masses. Thereupon Isagoras, finding himself left
 inferior in power, invited Cleomenes, who was united to him by ties of
 hospitality, to return to Athens, and persuaded him to 'drive out the
 pollution', a plea derived from the fact that the Alcmeonidae were
 suppposed to be under the curse of pollution. On this Cleisthenes
 retired from the country, and Cleomenes, entering Attica with a small
 force, expelled, as polluted, seven hundred Athenian families. Having
 effected this, he next attempted to dissolve the Council, and to set up
 Isagoras and three hundred of his partisans as the supreme power in the
 state. The Council, however, resisted, the populace flocked together,
 and Cleomenes and Isagoras, with their adherents, took refuge in the
 Acropolis. Here the people sat down and besieged them for two days; and
 on the third they agreed to let Cleomenes and all his followers depart,
 while they summoned Cleisthenes and the other exiles back to Athens.
 When the people had thus obtained the command of affairs, Cleisthenes
 was their chief and popular leader. And this was natural; for the
 Alcmeonidae were perhaps the chief cause of the expulsion of the
 tyrants, and for the greater part of their rule were at perpetual war
 with them. But even earlier than the attempts of the Alcmeonidae, one
 Cedon made an attack on the tyrants; when there came another popular
 drinking song, addressed to him:
 
   Pour a health yet again, boy, to Cedon; forget not this duty to do,
   If a health is an honour befitting the name of a good man and true.
 
 
 
 Part 21
 
 The people, therefore, had good reason to place confidence in
 Cleisthenes. Accordingly, now that he was the popular leader, three
 years after the expulsion of the tyrants, in the archonship of
 Isagoras, his first step was to distribute the whole population into
 ten tribes in place of the existing four, with the object of
 intermixing the members of the different tribes, and so securing that
 more persons might have a share in the franchise. From this arose the
 saying 'Do not look at the tribes', addressed to those who wished to
 scrutinize the lists of the old families. Next he made the Council to
 consist of five hundred members instead of four hundred, each tribe now
 contributing fifty, whereas formerly each had sent a hundred. The
 reason why he did not organize the people into twelve tribes was that
 he might not have to use the existing division into trittyes; for the
 four tribes had twelve trittyes, so that he would not have achieved his
 object of redistributing the population in fresh combinations. Further,
 he divided the country into thirty groups of demes, ten from the
 districts about the city, ten from the coast, and ten from the
 interior. These he called trittyes; and he assigned three of them by
 lot to each tribe, in such a way that each should have one portion in
 each of these three localities. All who lived in any given deme he
 declared fellow-demesmen, to the end that the new citizens might not be
 exposed by the habitual use of family names, but that men might be
 officially described by the names of their demes; and accordingly it is
 by the names of their demes that the Athenians speak of one another. He
 also instituted Demarchs, who had the same duties as the previously
 existing Naucrari,--the demes being made to take the place of the
 naucraries. He gave names to the demes, some from the localities to
 which they belonged, some from the persons who founded them, since some
 of the areas no longer corresponded to localities possessing names. On
 the other hand he allowed every one to retain his family and clan and
 religious rites according to ancestral custom. The names given to the
 tribes were the ten which the Pythia appointed out of the hundred
 selected national heroes.
 
 
 
 Part 22
 
 By these reforms the constitution became much more democratic than that
 of Solon. The laws of Solon had been obliterated by disuse during the
 period of the tyranny, while Cleisthenes substituted new ones with the
 object of securing the goodwill of the masses. Among these was the law
 concerning ostracism. Four years after the establishment of this system,
 in the archonship of Hermocreon, they first imposed upon the Council of
 Five Hundred the oath which they take to the present day.  Next they
 began to elect the generals by tribes, one from each tribe, while the
 Polemarch was the commander of the whole army.  Then, eleven years
 later, in the archonship of Phaenippus they won the battle of Marathon;
 and two years after this victory, when the people had now gained
 self-confidence, they for the first time made use of the law of
 ostracism. This had originally been passed as a precaution against men
 in high office, because Pisistratus took advantage of his position as a
 popular leader and general to make himself tyrant; and the first person
 ostracized was one of his relatives, Hipparchus son of Charmus, of the
 deme of Collytus, the very person on whose account especially
 Cleisthenes had enacted the law, as he wished to get rid of him.
 Hitherto, however, he had escaped; for the Athenians, with the usual
 leniency of the democracy, allowed all the partisans of the tyrants,
 who had not joined in their evil deeds in the time of the troubles to
 remain in the city; and the chief and leader of these was Hipparchus.
 Then in the very next year, in the archonship of Telesinus, they for
 the first time since the tyranny elected, tribe by tribe, the nine
 Archons by lot out of the five hundred candidates selected by the
 demes, all the earlier ones having been elected by vote; and in the
 same year Megacles son of Hippocrates, of the deme of Alopece, was
 ostracized.  Thus for three years they continued to ostracize the
 friends of the tyrants, on whose account the law had been passed; but
 in the following year they began to remove others as well, including
 any one who seemed to be more powerful than was expedient. The first
 person unconnected with the tyrants who was ostracized was Xanthippus
 son of Ariphron. Two years later, in the archonship of Nicodemus, the
 mines of Maroneia were discovered, and the state made a profit of a
 hundred talents from the working of them. Some persons advised the
 people to make a distribution of the money among themselves, but this
 was prevented by Themistocles. He refused to say on what he proposed to
 spend the money, but he bade them lend it to the hundred richest men in
 Athens, one talent to each, and then, if the manner in which it was
 employed pleased the people, the expenditure should be charged to the
 state, but otherwise the state should receive the sum back from those
 to whom it was lent. On these terms he received the money and with it
 he had a hundred triremes built, each of the hundred individuals
 building one; and it was with these ships that they fought the battle
 of Salamis against the barbarians. About this time Aristides the son of
 Lysimachus was ostracized. Three years later, however, in the
 archonship of Hypsichides, all the ostracized persons were recalled, on
 account of the advance of the army of Xerxes; and it was laid down for
 the future that persons under sentence of ostracism must live between
 Geraestus and Scyllaeum, on pain of losing their civic rights
 irrevocably.
 
 
 
 Part 23
 
 So far, then, had the city progressed by this time, growing gradually
 with the growth of the democracy; but after the Persian wars the
 Council of Areopagus once more developed strength and assumed the
 control of the state. It did not acquire this supremacy by virtue of
 any formal decree, but because it had been the cause of the battle of
 Salamis being fought. When the generals were utterly at a loss how to
 meet the crisis and made proclamation that every one should see to his
 own safety, the Areopagus provided a donation of money, distributing
 eight drachmas to each member of the ships' crews, and so prevailed on
 them to go on board. On these grounds people bowed to its prestige; and
 during this period Athens was well administered. At this time they
 devoted themselves to the prosecution of the war and were in high
 repute among the Greeks, so that the command by sea was conferred upon
 them, in spite of the opposition of the Lacedaemonians. The leaders of
 the people during this period were Aristides, of Lysimachus, and
 Themistocles, son of Lysimachus, and Themistocles, son of Neocles, of
 whom the latter appeared to devote himself to the conduct of war, while
 the former had the reputation of being a clever statesman and the most
 upright man of his time. Accordingly the one was usually employed as
 general, the other as political adviser. The rebuilding of the
 fortifications they conducted in combination, although they were
 political opponents; but it was Aristides who, seizing the opportunity
 afforded by the discredit brought upon the Lacedaemonians by Pausanias,
 guided the public policy in the matter of the defection of the Ionian
 states from the alliance with Sparta. It follows that it was he who
 made the first assessment of tribute from the various allied states,
 two years after the battle of Salamis, in the archonship of
 Timosthenes; and it was he who took the oath of offensive and defensive
 alliance with the Ionians, on which occasion they cast the masses of
 iron into the sea.
 
 
 
 Part 24
 
 After this, seeing the state growing in confidence and much wealth
 accumulated, he advised the people to lay hold of the leadership of the
 league, and to quit the country districts and settle in the city. He
 pointed out to them that all would be able to gain a living there, some
 by service in the army, others in the garrisons, others by taking a
 part in public affairs; and in this way they would secure the
 leadership. This advice was taken; and when the people had assumed the
 supreme control they proceeded to treat their allies in a more
 imperious fashion, with the exception of the Chians, Lesbians, and
 Samians. These they maintained to protect their empire, leaving their
 constitutions untouched, and allowing them to retain whatever dominion
 they then possessed. They also secured an ample maintenance for the
 mass of the population in the way which Aristides had pointed out to
 them. Out of the proceeds of the tributes and the taxes and the
 contributions of the allies more than twenty thousand persons were
 maintained. There were 6,000 jurymen, 1,600 bowmen, 1,200 Knights, 500
 members of the Council, 500 guards of the dockyards, besides fifty
 guards in the Acropolis. There were some 700 magistrates at home, and
 some 700 abroad. Further, when they subsequently went to war, there
 were in addition 2,500 heavy-armed troops, twenty guard-ships, and
 other ships which collected the tributes, with crews amounting to 2,000
 men, selected by lot; and besides these there were the persons
 maintained at the Prytaneum, and orphans, and gaolers, since all these
 were supported by the state.
 
 
 
 Part 25
 
 Such was the way in which the people earned their livelihood. The
 supremacy of the Areopagus lasted for about seventeen years after the
 Persian wars, although gradually declining. But as the strength of the
 masses increased, Ephialtes, son of Sophonides, a man with a reputation
 for incorruptibility and public virtue, who had become the leader of
 the people, made an attack upon that Council. First of all he ruined
 many of its members by bringing actions against them with reference to
 their administration. Then, in the archonship of Conon, he stripped the
 Council of all the acquired prerogatives from which it derived its
 guardianship of the constitution, and assigned some of them to the
 Council of Five Hundred, and others to the Assembly and the law-courts.
 In this revolution he was assisted by Themistocles, who was himself a
 member of the Areopagus, but was expecting to be tried before it on a
 charge of treasonable dealings with Persia. This made him anxious that
 it should be overthrown, and accordingly he warned Ephialtes that the
 Council intended to arrest him, while at the same time he informed the
 Areopagites that he would reveal to them certain persons who were
 conspiring to subvert the constitution. He then conducted the
 representatives delegated by the Council to the residence of Ephialtes,
 promising to show them the conspirators who assembled there, and
 proceeded to converse with them in an earnest manner. Ephialtes, seeing
 this, was seized with alarm and took refuge in suppliant guise at the
 altar. Every one was astounded at the occurrence, and presently, when
 the Council of Five Hundred met, Ephialtes and Themistocles together
 proceeded to denounce the Areopagus to them. This they repeated in
 similar fashion in the Assembly, until they succeeded in depriving it
 of its power. Not long afterwards, however, Ephialtes was assassinated
 by Aristodicus of Tanagra. In this way was the Council of Areopagus
 deprived of its guardianship of the state.
 
 
 
 Part 26
 
 After this revolution the administration of the state became more and
 more lax, in consequence of the eager rivalry of candidates for popular
 favour. During this period the moderate party, as it happened, had no
 real chief, their leader being Cimon son of Miltiades, who was a
 comparatively young man, and had been late in entering public life; and
 at the same time the general populace suffered great losses by war. The
 soldiers for active service were selected at that time from the roll of
 citizens, and as the generals were men of no military experience, who
 owed their position solely to their family standing, it continually
 happened that some two or three thousand of the troops perished on an
 expedition; and in this way the best men alike of the lower and the
 upper classes were exhausted.  Consequently in most matters of
 administration less heed was paid to the laws than had formerly been
 the case. No alteration, however, was made in the method of election of
 the nine Archons, except that five years after the death of Ephialtes
 it was decided that the candidates to be submitted to the lot for that
 office might be selected from the Zeugitae as well as from the higher
 classes. The first Archon from that class was Mnesitheides. Up to this
 time all the Archons had been taken from the Pentacosiomedimni and
 Knights, while the Zeugitae were confined to the ordinary magistracies,
 save where an evasion of the law was overlooked. Four years later, in
 the archonship of Lysicrates, thirty 'local justices', as they as they
 were called, were re-established; and two years afterwards, in the
 archonship of Antidotus, consequence of the great increase in the
 number of citizens, it was resolved, on the motion of Pericles, that no
 one should be admitted to the franchise who was not of citizen birth by
 both parents.
 
 
 
 Part 27
 
 After this Pericles came forward as popular leader, having first
 distinguished himself while still a young man by prosecuting Cimon on
 the audit of his official accounts as general. Under his auspices the
 constitution became still more democratic. He took away some of the
 privileges of the Areopagus, and, above all, he turned the policy of
 the state in the direction of sea power, which caused the masses to
 acquire confidence in themselves and consequently to take the conduct
 of affairs more and more into their own hands. Moreover, forty-eight
 years after the battle of Salamis, in the archonship of Pythodorus, the
 Peloponnesian war broke out, during which the populace was shut up in
 the city and became accustomed to gain its livelihood by military
 service, and so, partly voluntarily and partly involuntarily,
 determined to assume the administration of the state itself. Pericles
 was also the first to institute pay for service in the law-courts, as a
 bid for popular favour to counterbalance the wealth of Cimon. The
 latter, having private possessions on a regal scale, not only performed
 the regular public services magnificently, but also maintained a large
 number of his fellow-demesmen. Any member of the deme of Laciadae could
 go every day to Cimon's house and there receive a reasonable provision;
 while his estate was guarded by no fences, so that any one who liked
 might help himself to the fruit from it. Pericles' private property was
 quite unequal to this magnificence and accordingly he took the advice
 of Damonides of Oia (who was commonly supposed to be the person who
 prompted Pericles in most of his measures, and was therefore
 subsequently ostracized), which was that, as he was beaten in the
 matter of private possessions, he should make gifts to the people from
 their own property; and accordingly he instituted pay for the members
 of the juries. Some critics accuse him of thereby causing a
 deterioration in the character of the juries, since it was always the
 common people who put themselves forward for selection as jurors,
 rather than the men of better position. Moreover, bribery came into
 existence after this, the first person to introduce it being Anytus,
 after his command at Pylos.  He was prosecuted by certain individuals
 on account of his loss of Pylos, but escaped by bribing the jury.
 
 
 
 Part 28
 
 So long, however, as Pericles was leader of the people, things went
 tolerably well with the state; but when he was dead there was a great
 change for the worse. Then for the first time did the people choose a
 leader who was of no reputation among men of good standing, whereas up
 to this time such men had always been found as leaders of the
 democracy. The first leader of the people, in the very beginning of
 things, was Solon, and the second was Pisistratus, both of them men of
 birth and position. After the overthrow of the tyrants there was
 Cleisthenes, a member of the house of the Alcmeonidae; and he had no
 rival opposed to him after the expulsion of the party of Isagoras.
 After this Xanthippus was the leader of the people, and Miltiades of
 the upper class. Then came Themistocles and Aristides, and after them
 Ephialtes as leader of the people, and Cimon son of Miltiades of the
 wealthier class. Pericles followed as leader of the people, and
 Thucydides, who was connected by marriage with Cimon, of the
 opposition. After the death of Pericles, Nicias, who subsequently fell
 in Sicily, appeared as leader of the aristocracy, and Cleon son of
 Cleaenetus of the people. The latter seems, more than any one else, to
 have been the cause of the corruption of the democracy by his wild
 undertakings; and he was the first to use unseemly shouting and coarse
 abuse on the Bema, and to harangue the people with his cloak girt up
 short about him, whereas all his predecessors had spoken decently and
 in order. These were succeeded by Theramenes son of Hagnon as leader of
 the one party, and the lyre-maker Cleophon of the people. It was
 Cleophon who first granted the two-obol donation for the theatrical
 performances, and for some time it continued to be given; but then
 Callicrates of Paeania ousted him by promising to add a third obol to
 the sum. Both of these persons were subsequently condemned to death;
 for the people, even if they are deceived for a time, in the end
 generally come to detest those who have beguiled them into any unworthy
 action. After Cleophon the popular leadership was occupied successively
 by the men who chose to talk the biggest and pander the most to the
 tastes of the majority, with their eyes fixed only on the interests of
 the moment. The best statesmen at Athens, after those of early times,
 seem to have been Nicias, Thucydides, and Theramenes. As to Nicias and
 Thucydides, nearly every one agrees that they were not merely men of
 birth and character, but also statesmen, and that they ruled the state
 with paternal care. On the merits of Theramenes opinion is divided,
 because it so happened that in his time public affairs were in a very
 stormy state. But those who give their opinion deliberately find him,
 not, as his critics falsely assert, overthrowing every kind of
 constitution, but supporting every kind so long as it did not
 transgress laws; thus showing that he was able, as every good citizen
 should be, to live under any form of constitution, while he refused to
 countenance illegality and was its constant enemy.
 
 
 
 Part 29
 
 So long as the fortune of the war continued even, the Athenians
 preserved the democracy; but after the disaster in Sicily, when the
 Lacedaemonians had gained the upper hand through their alliance with
 the king of Persia, they were compelled to abolish the democracy and
 establish in its place the constitution of the Four Hundred. The speech
 recommending this course before the vote was made by Melobius, and the
 motion was proposed by Pythodorus of Anaphlystus; but the real argument
 which persuaded the majority was the belief that the king of Persia was
 more likely to form an alliance with them if the constitution were on
 an oligarchical basis. The motion of Pythodorus was to the following
 effect. The popular Assembly was to elect twenty persons, over forty
 years of age, who, in conjunction with the existing ten members of the
 Committee of Public Safety, after taking an oath that they would frame
 such measures as they thought best for the state, should then prepare
 proposals for the public safety. In addition, any other person might
 make proposals, so that of all the schemes before them the people might
 choose the best.  Cleitophon concurred with the motion of Pythodorus,
 but moved that the committee should also investigate the ancient laws
 enacted by Cleisthenes when he created the democracy, in order that
 they might have these too before them and so be in a position to decide
 wisely; his suggestion being that the constitution of Cleisthenes was
 not really democratic, but closely akin to that of Solon. When the
 committee was elected, their first proposal was that the Prytanes
 should be compelled to put to the vote any motion that was offered on
 behalf of the public safety. Next they abolished all indictments for
 illegal proposals, all impeachments and pubic prosecutions, in order
 that every Athenian should be free to give his counsel on the
 situation, if he chose; and they decreed that if any person imposed a
 fine on any other for his acts in this respect, or prosecuted him or
 summoned him before the courts, he should, on an information being laid
 against him, be summarily arrested and brought before the generals, who
 should deliver him to the Eleven to be put to death.  After these
 preliminary measures, they drew up the constitution in the following
 manner. The revenues of the state were not to be spent on any purpose
 except the war. All magistrates should serve without remuneration for
 the period of the war, except the nine Archons and the Prytanes for the
 time being, who should each receive three obols a day. The whole of the
 rest of the administration was to be committed, for the period of the
 war, to those Athenians who were most capable of serving the state
 personally or pecuniarily, to the number of not less than five
 thousand. This body was to have full powers, to the extent even of
 making treaties with whomsoever they willed; and ten representatives,
 over forty years of age, were to be elected from each tribe to draw up
 the list of the Five Thousand, after taking an oath on a full and
 perfect sacrifice.
 
 
 
 Part 30
 
 These were the recommendations of the committee; and when they had been
 ratified the Five Thousand elected from their own number a hundred
 commissioners to draw up the constitution. They, on their appointment,
 drew up and produced the following recommendations. There should be a
 Council, holding office for a year, consisting of men over thirty years
 of age, serving without pay. To this body should belong the Generals,
 the nine Archons, the Amphictyonic Registrar (Hieromnemon), the
 Taxiarchs, the Hipparchs, the Phylarch, the commanders of garrisons,
 the Treasurers of Athena and the other gods, ten in number, the
 Hellenic Treasurers (Hellenotamiae), the Treasurers of the other
 non-sacred moneys, to the number of twenty, the ten Commissioners of
 Sacrifices (Hieropoei), and the ten Superintendents of the mysteries.
 All these were to be appointed by the Council from a larger number of
 selected candidates, chosen from its members for the time being. The
 other offices were all to be filled by lot, and not from the members of
 the Council. The Hellenic Treasurers who actually administered the
 funds should not sit with the Council. As regards the future, four
 Councils were to be created, of men of the age already mentioned, and
 one of these was to be chosen by lot to take office at once, while the
 others were to receive it in turn, in the order decided by the lot. For
 this purpose the hundred commissioners were to distribute themselves
 and all the rest as equally as possible into four parts, and cast lots
 for precedence, and the selected body should hold office for a year.
 They were to administer that office as seemed to them best, both with
 reference to the safe custody and due expenditure of the finances, and
 generally with regard to all other matters to the best of their
 ability. If they desired to take a larger number of persons into
 counsel, each member might call in one assistant of his own choice,
 subject to the same qualification of age. The Council was to sit once
 every five days, unless there was any special need for more frequent
 sittings. The casting of the lot for the Council was to be held by the
 nine Archons; votes on divisions were to be counted by five tellers
 chosen by lot from the members of the Council, and of these one was to
 be selected by lot every day to act as president. These five persons
 were to cast lots for precedence between the parties wishing to appear
 before the Council, giving the first place to sacred matters, the
 second to heralds, the third to embassies, and the fourth to all other
 subjects; but matters concerning the war might be dealt with, on the
 motion of the generals, whenever there was need, without balloting.
 Any member of the Council who did not enter the Council-house at the
 time named should be fined a drachma for each day, unless he was away
 on leave of absence from the Council.
 
 
 
 Part 31
 
 Such was the constitution which they drew up for the time to come, but
 for the immediate present they devised the following scheme. There
 should be a Council of Four Hundred, as in the ancient constitution,
 forty from each tribe, chosen out of candidates of more than thirty
 years of age, selected by the members of the tribes. This Council
 should appoint the magistrates and draw up the form of oath which they
 were to take; and in all that concerned the laws, in the examination of
 official accounts, and in other matters generally, they might act
 according to their discretion. They must, however, observe the laws
 that might be enacted with reference to the constitution of the state,
 and had no power to alter them nor to pass others. The generals should
 be provisionally elected from the whole body of the Five Thousand, but
 so soon as the Council came into existence it was to hold an
 examination of military equipments, and thereon elect ten persons,
 together with a secretary, and the persons thus elected should hold
 office during the coming year with full powers, and should have the
 right, whenever they desired it, of joining in the deliberations of the
 Council. The Five thousand was also to elect a single Hipparch and ten
 Phylarchs; but for the future the Council was to elect these officers
 according to the regulations above laid down. No office, except those
 of member of the Council and of general, might be held more than once,
 either by the first occupants or by their successors. With reference to
 the future distribution of the Four Hundred into the four successive
 sections, the hundred commissioners must divide them whenever the time
 comes for the citizens to join in the Council along with the rest.
 
 
 
 Part 32
 
 The hundred commissioners appointed by the Five Thousand drew up the
 constitution as just stated; and after it had been ratified by the
 people, under the presidency of Aristomachus, the existing Council,
 that of the year of Callias, was dissolved before it had completed its
 term of office. It was dissolved on the fourteenth day of the month
 Thargelion, and the Four Hundred entered into office on the
 twenty-first; whereas the regular Council, elected by lot, ought to
 have entered into office on the fourteenth of Scirophorion. Thus was
 the oligarchy established, in the archonship of Callias, just about a
 hundred years after the expulsion of the tyrants. The chief promoters
 of the revolution were Pisander, Antiphon, and Theramenes, all of them
 men of good birth and with high reputations for ability and judgement.
 When, however, this constitution had been established, the Five
 Thousand were only nominally selected, and the Four Hundred, together
 with the ten officers on whom full powers had been conferred, occupied
 the Council-house and really administered the government. They began by
 sending ambassadors to the Lacedaemonians proposing a cessation of the
 war on the basis of the existing position; but as the Lacedaemonians
 refused to listen to them unless they would also abandon the command of
 the sea, they broke off the negotiations.
 
 
 
 Part 33
 
 For about four months the constitution of the Four Hundred lasted, and
 Mnasilochus held office as Archon of their nomination for two months of
 the year of Theopompus, who was Archon for the remaining ten. On the
 loss of the naval battle of Eretria, however, and the revolt of the
 whole of Euboea except Oreum, the indignation of the people was greater
 than at any of the earlier disasters, since they drew far more supplies
 at this time from Euboea than from Attica itself. Accordingly they
 deposed the Four Hundred and committed the management of affairs to the
 Five Thousand, consisting of persons possessing a military equipment.
 At the same time they voted that pay should not be given for any public
 office. The persons chiefly responsible for the revolution were
 Aristocrates and Theramenes, who disapproved of the action of the Four
 Hundred in retaining the direction of affairs entirely in their own
 hands, and referring nothing to the Five Thousand. During this period
 the constitution of the state seems to have been admirable, since it
 was a time of war and the franchise was in the hands of those who
 possessed a military equipment.
 
 
 
 Part 34
 
 The people, however, in a very short time deprived the Five Thousand of
 their monopoly of the government. Then, six years after the overthrow
 of the Four Hundred, in the archonship of Callias of Angele, the battle
 of Arginusae took place, of which the results were, first, that the ten
 generals who had gained the victory were all condemned by a single
 decision, owing to the people being led astray by persons who aroused
 their indignation; though, as a matter of fact, some of the generals
 had actually taken no part in the battle, and others were themselves
 picked up by other vessels. Secondly, when the Lacedaemonians proposed
 to evacuate Decelea and make peace on the basis of the existing
 position, although some of the Athenians supported this proposal, the
 majority refused to listen to them. In this they were led astray by
 Cleophon, who appeared in the Assembly drunk and wearing his
 breastplate, and prevented peace being made, declaring that he would
 never accept peace unless the Lacedaemonians abandoned their claims on
 all the cities allied with them. They mismanaged their opportunity
 then, and in a very short time they learnt their mistake. The next
 year, in the archonship of Alexias, they suffered the disaster of
 Aegospotami, the consequence of which was that Lysander became master
 of the city, and set up the Thirty as its governors. He did so in the
 following manner. One of the terms of peace stipulated that the state
 should be governed according to 'the ancient constitution'. Accordingly
 the popular party tried to preserve the democracy, while that part of
 the upper class which belonged to the political clubs, together with
 the exiles who had returned since the peace, aimed at an oligarchy, and
 those who were not members of any club, though in other respects they
 considered themselves as good as any other citizens, were anxious to
 restore the ancient constitution. The latter class included Archinus,
 Anytus, Cleitophon, Phormisius, and many others, but their most
 prominent leader was Theramenes. Lysander, however, threw his influence
 on the side of the oligarchical party, and the popular Assembly was
 compelled by sheer intimidation to pass a vote establishing the
 oligarchy. The motion to this effect was proposed by Dracontides of
 Aphidna.
 
 
 
 Part 35
 
 In this way were the Thirty established in power, in the archonship of
 Pythodorus. As soon, however, as they were masters of the city, they
 ignored all the resolutions which had been passed relating to the
 organization of the constitution, but after appointing a Council of
 Five Hundred and the other magistrates out of a thousand selected
 candidates, and associating with themselves ten Archons in Piraeus,
 eleven superintendents of the prison, and three hundred 'lash-bearers'
 as attendants, with the help of these they kept the city under their
 own control. At first, indeed, they behaved with moderation towards the
 citizens and pretended to administer the state according to the ancient
 constitution. In pursuance of this policy they took down from the hill
 of Areopagus the laws of Ephialtes and Archestratus relating to the
 Areopagite Council; they also repealed such of the statutes of Solon as
 were obscure, and abolished the supreme power of the law-courts. In
 this they claimed to be restoring the constitution and freeing it from
 obscurities; as, for instance, by making the testator free once for all
 to leave his property as he pleased, and abolishing the existing
 limitations in cases of insanity, old age, and undue female influence,
 in order that no opening might be left for professional accusers. In
 other matters also their conduct was similar. At first, then, they
 acted on these lines, and they destroyed the professional accusers and
 those mischievous and evil-minded persons who, to the great detriment
 of the democracy, had attached themselves to it in order to curry
 favour with it. With all of this the city was much pleased, and thought
 that the Thirty were doing it with the best of motives. But so soon as
 they had got a firmer hold on the city, they spared no class of
 citizens, but put to death any persons who were eminent for wealth or
 birth or character. Herein they aimed at removing all whom they had
 reason to fear, while they also wished to lay hands on their
 possessions; and in a short time they put to death not less than
 fifteen hundred persons.
 
 
 
 Part 36
 
 Theramenes, however, seeing the city thus falling into ruin, was
 displeased with their proceedings, and counselled them to cease such
 unprincipled conduct and let the better classes have a share in the
 government. At first they resisted his advice, but when his proposals
 came to be known abroad, and the masses began to associate themselves
 with him, they were seized with alarm lest he should make himself the
 leader of the people and destroy their despotic power.  Accordingly
 they drew up a list of three thousand citizens, to whom they announced
 that they would give a share in the constitution.  Theramenes, however,
 criticized this scheme also, first on the ground that, while proposing
 to give all respectable citizens a share in the constitution, they were
 actually giving it only to three thousand persons, as though all merit
 were confined within that number; and secondly because they were doing
 two inconsistent things, since they made the government rest on the
 basis of force, and yet made the governors inferior in strength to the
 governed.  However, they took no notice of his criticisms, and for a
 long time put off the publication of the list of the Three Thousand and
 kept to themselves the names of those who had been placed upon it; and
 every time they did decide to publish it they proceeded to strike out
 some of those who had been included in it, and insert others who had
 been omitted.
 
 
 
 Part 37
 
 Now when winter had set in, Thrasybulus and the exiles occupied Phyle,
 and the force which the Thirty led out to attack them met with a
 reverse. Thereupon the Thirty decided to disarm the bulk of the
 population and to get rid of Theramenes; which they did in the
 following way. They introduced two laws into the Council, which they
 commanded it to pass; the first of them gave the Thirty absolute power
 to put to death any citizen who was not included in the list of the
 Three Thousand, while the second disqualified all persons from
 participation in the franchise who should have assisted in the
 demolition of the fort of Eetioneia, or have acted in any way against
 the Four Hundred who had organized the previous oligarchy.  Theramenes
 had done both, and accordingly, when these laws were ratified, he
 became excluded from the franchise and the Thirty had full power to put
 him to death. Theramenes having been thus removed, they disarmed all
 the people except the Three Thousand, and in every respect showed a
 great advance in cruelty and crime. They also sent ambassadors to
 Lacedaemonian to blacken the character of Theramenes and to ask for
 help; and the Lacedaemonians, in answer to their appeal, sent Callibius
 as military governor with about seven hundred troops, who came and
 occupied the Acropolis.
 
 
 
 Part 38
 
 These events were followed by the occupation of Munichia by the exiles
 from Phyle, and their victory over the Thirty and their partisans.
 After the fight the party of the city retreated, and next day they held
 a meeting in the marketplace and deposed the Thirty, and elected ten
 citizens with full powers to bring the war to a termination. When,
 however, the Ten had taken over the government they did nothing towards
 the object for which they were elected, but sent envoys to
 Lacedaemonian to ask for help and to borrow money.  Further, finding
 that the citizens who possessed the franchise were displeased at their
 proceedings, they were afraid lest they should be deposed, and
 consequently, in order to strike terror into them (in which design they
 succeeded), they arrested Demaretus, one of the most eminent citizens,
 and put him to death. This gave them a firm hold on the government, and
 they also had the support of Callibius and his Peloponnesians, together
 with several of the Knights; for some of the members of this class were
 the most zealous among the citizens to prevent the return of the exiles
 from Phyle. When, however, the party in Piraeus and Munichia began to
 gain the upper hand in the war, through the defection of the whole
 populace to them, the party in the city deposed the original Ten, and
 elected another Ten, consisting of men of the highest repute. Under
 their administration, and with their active and zealous cooperation,
 the treaty of reconciliation was made and the populace returned to the
 city. The most prominent members of this board were Rhinon of Paeania
 and Phayllus of Acherdus, who, even before the arrival of Pausanias,
 opened negotiations with the party in Piraeus, and after his arrival
 seconded his efforts to bring about the return of the exiles. For it
 was Pausanias, the king of the Lacedaemonians, who brought the peace
 and reconciliation to a fulfillment, in conjunction with the ten
 commissioners of arbitration who arrived later from Lacedaemonian, at
 his own earnest request. Rhinon and his colleagues received a vote of
 thanks for the goodwill shown by them to the people, and though they
 received their charge under an oligarchy and handed in their accounts
 under a democracy, no one, either of the party that had stayed in the
 city or of the exiles that had returned from the Piraeus, brought any
 complaint against them. On the contrary, Rhinon was immediately elected
 general on account of his conduct in this office.
 
 
 
 Part 39
 
 This reconciliation was effected in the archonship of Eucleides, on the
 following terms. All persons who, having remained in the city during
 the troubles, were now anxious to leave it, were to be free to settle
 at Eleusis, retaining their civil rights and possessing full and
 independent powers of self-government, and with the free enjoyment of
 their own personal property. The temple at Eleusis should be common
 ground for both parties, and should be under the superintendence of the
 Ceryces, and the Eumolpidae, according to primitive custom. The
 settlers at Eleusis should not be allowed to enter Athens, nor the
 people of Athens to enter Eleusis, except at the season of the
 mysteries, when both parties should be free from these restrictions.
 The secessionists should pay their share to the fund for the common
 defence out of their revenues, just like all the other Athenians. If
 any of the seceding party wished to take a house in Eleusis, the people
 would help them to obtain the consent of the owner; but if they could
 not come to terms, they should appoint three valuers on either side,
 and the owner should receive whatever price they should appoint.  Of
 the inhabitants of Eleusis, those whom the secessionists wished to
 remain should be allowed to do so. The list of those who desired to
 secede should be made up within ten days after the taking of the oaths
 in the case of persons already in the country, and their actual
 departure should take place within twenty days; persons at present out
 of the country should have the same terms allowed to them after their
 return. No one who settled at Eleusis should be capable of holding any
 office in Athens until he should again register himself on the roll as
 a resident in the city. Trials for homicide, including all cases in
 which one party had either killed or wounded another, should be
 conducted according to ancestral practice. There should be a general
 amnesty concerning past events towards all persons except the Thirty,
 the Ten, the Eleven, and the magistrates in Piraeus; and these too
 should be included if they should submit their accounts in the usual
 way. Such accounts should be given by the magistrates in Piraeus before
 a court of citizens rated in Piraeus, and by the magistrates in the
 city before a court of those rated in the city.  On these terms those
 who wished to do so might secede. Each party was to repay separately
 the money which it had borrowed for the war.
 
 
 
 Part 40
 
 When the reconciliation had taken place on these terms, those who had
 fought on the side of the Thirty felt considerable apprehensions, and a
 large number intended to secede. But as they put off entering their
 names till the last moment, as people will do, Archinus, observing
 their numbers, and being anxious to retain them as citizens, cut off
 the remaining days during which the list should have remained open; and
 in this way many persons were compelled to remain, though they did so
 very unwillingly until they recovered confidence. This is one point in
 which Archinus appears to have acted in a most statesmanlike manner,
 and another was his subsequent prosecution of Thrasybulus on the charge
 of illegality, for a motion by which he proposed to confer the
 franchise on all who had taken part in the return from Piraeus,
 although some of them were notoriously slaves. And yet a third such
 action was when one of the returned exiles began to violate the
 amnesty, whereupon Archinus haled him to the Council and persuaded them
 to execute him without trial, telling them that now they would have to
 show whether they wished to preserve the democracy and abide by the
 oaths they had taken; for if they let this man escape they would
 encourage others to imitate him, while if they executed him they would
 make an example for all to learn by. And this was exactly what
 happened; for after this man had been put to death no one ever again
 broke the amnesty. On the contrary, the Athenians seem, both in public
 and in private, to have behaved in the most unprecedentedly admirable
 and public-spirited way with reference to the preceding troubles. Not
 only did they blot out all memory of former offences, but they even
 repaid to the Lacedaemonians out of the public purse the money which
 the Thirty had borrowed for the war, although the treaty required each
 party, the party of the city and the party of Piraeus, to pay its own
 debts separately. This they did because they thought it was a necessary
 first step in the direction of restoring harmony; but in other states,
 so far from the democratic parties making advances from their own
 possessions, they are rather in the habit of making a general
 redistribution of the land. A final reconciliation was made with the
 secessionists at Eleusis two years after the secession, in the
 archonship of Xenaenetus.
 
 
 
 Part 41
 
 This, however, took place at a later date; at the time of which we are
 speaking the people, having secured the control of the state,
 established the constitution which exists at the present day.
 Pythodorus was Archon at the time, but the democracy seems to have
 assumed the supreme power with perfect justice, since it had effected
 its own return by its own exertions. This was the eleventh change which
 had taken place in the constitution of Athens. The first modification
 of the primaeval condition of things was when Ion and his companions
 brought the people together into a community, for then the people was
 first divided into the four tribes, and the tribe-kings were created.
 Next, and first after this, having now some semblance of a
 constitution, was that which took place in the reign of Theseus,
 consisting in a slight deviation from absolute monarchy. After this
 came the constitution formed under Draco, when the first code of laws
 was drawn up. The third was that which followed the civil war, in the
 time of Solon; from this the democracy took its rise. The fourth was
 the tyranny of Pisistratus; the fifth the constitution of Cleisthenes,
 after the overthrow of the tyrants, of a more democratic character than
 that of Solon. The sixth was that which followed on the Persian wars,
 when the Council of Areopagus had the direction of the state. The
 seventh, succeeding this, was the constitution which Aristides sketched
 out, and which Ephialtes brought to completion by overthrowing the
 Areopagite Council; under this the nation, misled by the demagogues,
 made the most serious mistakes in the interest of its maritime empire.
 The eighth was the establishment of the Four Hundred, followed by the
 ninth, the restored democracy. The tenth was the tyranny of the Thirty
 and the Ten. The eleventh was that which followed the return from Phyle
 and Piraeus; and this has continued from that day to this, with
 continual accretions of power to the masses. The democracy has made
 itself master of everything and administers everything by its votes in
 the Assembly and by the law-courts, in which it holds the supreme
 power.  Even the jurisdiction of the Council has passed into the hands
 of the people at large; and this appears to be a judicious change,
 since small bodies are more open to corruption, whether by actual money
 or influence, than large ones. At first they refused to allow payment
 for attendance at the Assembly; but the result was that people did not
 attend. Consequently, after the Prytanes had tried many devices in vain
 in order to induce the populace to come and ratify the votes,
 Agyrrhius, in the first instance, made a provision of one obol a day,
 which Heracleides of Clazomenae, nicknamed 'the king', increased to two
 obols, and Agyrrhius again to three.
 
 
 
 Part 42
 
 The present state of the constitution is as follows. The franchise is
 open to all who are of citizen birth by both parents. They are enrolled
 among the demesmen at the age of eighteen. On the occasion of their
 enrollment the demesmen give their votes on oath, first whether the
 candidates appear to be of the age prescribed by the law (if not, they
 are dismissed back into the ranks of the boys), and secondly whether
 the candidate is free born and of such parentage as the laws require.
 Then if they decide that he is not a free man, he appeals to the
 law-courts, and the demesmen appoint five of their own number to act as
 accusers; if the court decides that he has no right to be enrolled, he
 is sold by the state as a slave, but if he wins his case he has a right
 to be enrolled among the demesmen without further question. After this
 the Council examines those who have been enrolled, and if it comes to
 the conclusion that any of them is less than eighteen years of age, it
 fines the demesmen who enrolled him. When the youths (Ephebi) have
 passed this examination, their fathers meet by their tribes, and
 appoint on oath three of their fellow tribesmen, over forty years of
 age, who, in their opinion, are the best and most suitable persons to
 have charge of the youths; and of these the Assembly elects one from
 each tribe as guardian, together with a director, chosen from the
 general body of Athenians, to control the while. Under the charge of
 these persons the youths first of all make the circuit of the temples;
 then they proceed to Piraeus, and some of them garrison Munichia and
 some the south shore. The Assembly also elects two trainers, with
 subordinate instructors, who teach them to fight in heavy armour, to
 use the bow and javelin, and to discharge a catapult. The guardians
 receive from the state a drachma apiece for their keep, and the youths
 four obols apiece. Each guardian receives the allowance for all the
 members of his tribe and buys the necessary provisions for the common
 stock (they mess together by tribes), and generally superintends
 everything. In this way they spend the first year. The next year, after
 giving a public display of their military evolutions, on the occasion
 when the Assembly meets in the theatre, they receive a shield and spear
 from the state; after which they patrol the country and spend their
 time in the forts. For these two years they are on garrison duty, and
 wear the military cloak, and during this time they are exempt from all
 taxes. They also can neither bring an action at law, nor have one
 brought against them, in order that they may have no excuse for
 requiring leave of absence; though exception is made in cases of
 actions concerning inheritances and wards of state, or of any
 sacrificial ceremony connected with the family. When the two years have
 elapsed they thereupon take their position among the other citizens.
 Such is the manner of the enrollment of the citizens and the training
 of the youths.
 
 
 
 Part 43
 
 All the magistrates that are concerned with the ordinary routine of
 administration are elected by lot, except the Military Treasurer, the
 Commissioners of the Theoric fund, and the Superintendent of Springs.
 These are elected by vote, and hold office from one Panathenaic
 festival to the next. All military officers are also elected by vote.
 
  The Council of Five Hundred is elected by lot, fifty from each
 tribe. Each tribe holds the office of Prytanes in turn, the order being
 determined by lot; the first four serve for thirty-six days each, the
 last six for thirty-five, since the reckoning is by lunar years. The
 Prytanes for the time being, in the first place, mess together in the
 Tholus, and receive a sum of money from the state for their
 maintenance; and, secondly, they convene the meetings of the Council
 and the Assembly. The Council they convene every day, unless it is a
 holiday, the Assembly four times in each prytany. It is also their duty
 to draw up the programme of the business of the Council and to decide
 what subjects are to be dealt with on each particular day, and where the
 sitting is to be held. They also draw up the programme for the meetings
 of the Assembly. One of these in each prytany is called the 'sovereign'
 Assembly; in this the people have to ratify the continuance of the
 magistrates in office, if they are performing their duties properly,
 and to consider the supply of corn and the defence of the country. On
 this day, too, impeachments are introduced by those who wish to do so,
 the lists of property confiscated by the state are read, and also
 applications for inheritances and wards of state, so that nothing may
 pass unclaimed without the cognizance of any person concerned. In the
 sixth prytany, in addition to the business already stated, the question
 is put to the vote whether it is desirable to hold a vote of ostracism
 or not; and complaints against professional accusers, whether Athenian
 or aliens domiciled in Athens, are received, to the number of not more
 than three of either class, together with cases in which an individual
 has made some promise to the people and has not performed it. Another
 Assembly in each prytany is assigned to the hearing of petitions, and
 at this meeting any one is free, on depositing the petitioner's
 olive-branch, to speak to the people concerning any matter, public or
 private. The two remaining meetings are devoted to all other subjects,
 and the laws require them to deal with three questions connected with
 religion, three connected with heralds and embassies, and three on
 secular subjects. Sometimes questions are brought forward without a
 preliminary vote of the Assembly to take them into consideration.
 
 Heralds and envoys appear first before the Prytanes, and the bearers of
 dispatches also deliver them to the same officials.
 
 
 
 Part 44
 
 There is a single President of the Prytanes, elected by lot, who
 presides for a night and a day; he may not hold the office for more
 than that time, nor may the same individual hold it twice. He keeps the
 keys of the sanctuaries in which the treasures and public records of
 the state are preserved, and also the public seal; and he is bound to
 remain in the Tholus, together with one-third of the Prytanes, named by
 himself. Whenever the Prytanes convene a meeting of the Council or
 Assembly, he appoints by lot nine Proedri, one from each tribe except
 that which holds the office of Prytanes for the time being; and out of
 these nine he similarly appoints one as President, and hands over the
 programme for the meeting to them. They take it and see to the
 preservation of order, put forward the various subjects which are to be
 considered, decide the results of the votings, and direct the
 proceedings generally. They also have power to dismiss the meeting. No
 one may act as President more than once in the year, but he may be a
 Proedrus once in each prytany.
 
 Elections to the offices of General and Hipparch and all other military
 commands are held in the Assembly, in such manner as the people decide;
 they are held after the sixth prytany by the first board of Prytanes in
 whose term of office the omens are favourable.  There has, however, to
 be a preliminary consideration by the Council in this case also.
 
 
 
 Part 45
 
 In former times the Council had full powers to inflict fines and
 imprisonment and death; but when it had consigned Lysimachus to the
 executioner, and he was sitting in the immediate expectation of death,
 Eumelides of Alopece rescued him from its hands, maintaining that no
 citizen ought to be put to death except on the decision of a court of
 law. Accordingly a trial was held in a law-court, and Lysimachus was
 acquitted, receiving henceforth the nickname of 'the man from the
 drum-head'; and the people deprived the Council thenceforward of the
 power to inflict death or imprisonment or fine, passing a law that if
 the Council condemn any person for an offence or inflict a fine, the
 Thesmothetae shall bring the sentence or fine before the law-court, and
 the decision of the jurors shall be the final judgement in the matter.
 
 The Council passes judgement on nearly all magistrates, especially
 those who have the control of money; its judgement, however, is not
 final, but is subject to an appeal to the lawcourts. Private
 individuals, also, may lay an information against any magistrate they
 please for not obeying the laws, but here too there is an appeal to the
 law-courts if the Council declare the charge proved. The Council also
 examines those who are to be its members for the ensuing year, and
 likewise the nine Archons. Formerly the Council had full power to
 reject candidates for office as unsuitable, but now they have an appeal
 to the law-courts. In all these matters, therefore, the Council has no
 final jurisdiction. It takes, however, preliminary cognizance of all
 matters brought before the Assembly, and the Assembly cannot vote on
 any question unless it has first been considered by the Council and
 placed on the programme by the Prytanes; since a person who carries a
 motion in the Assembly is liable to an action for illegal proposal on
 these grounds.
 
 
 
 Part 46
 
 The Council also superintends the triremes that are already in
 existence, with their tackle and sheds, and builds new triremes or
 quadriremes, whichever the Assembly votes, with tackle and sheds to
 match. The Assembly appoints master-builders for the ships by vote; and
 if they do not hand them over completed to the next Council, the old
 Council cannot receive the customary donation--that being normally
 given to it during its successor's term of office. For the building of
 the triremes it appoints ten commissioners, chosen from its own
 members. The Council also inspects all public buildings, and if it is
 of opinion that the state is being defrauded, it reports the culprit to
 the Assembly, and on condemnation hands him over to the law-courts.
 
 
 
 Part 47
 
 The Council also co-operates with other magistrates in most of their
 duties. First there are the treasurers of Athena, ten in number,
 elected by lot, one from each tribe. According to the law of
 Solon--which is still in force--they must be Pentacosiomedimni, but in
 point of fact the person on whom the lot falls holds the office even
 though he be quite a poor man. These officers take over charge of the
 statue of Athena, the figures of Victory, and all the other ornaments
 of the temple, together with the money, in the presence of the Council.
 Then there are the Commissioners for Public Contracts (Poletae), ten in
 number, one chosen by lot from each tribe, who farm out the public
 contracts. They lease the mines and taxes, in conjunction with the
 Military Treasurer and the Commissioners of the Theoric fund, in the
 presence of the Council, and grant, to the persons indicated by the
 vote of the Council, the mines which are let out by the state,
 including both the workable ones, which are let for three years, and
 those which are let under special agreements years. They also sell, in
 the presence of the Council, the property of those who have gone into
 exile from the court of the Areopagus, and of others whose goods have
 been confiscated, and the nine Archons ratify the contracts. They also
 hand over to the Council lists of the taxes which are farmed out for
 the year, entering on whitened tablets the name of the lessee and the
 amount paid. They make separate lists, first of those who have to pay
 their instalments in each prytany, on ten several tablets, next of
 those who pay thrice in the year, with a separate tablet for each
 instalment, and finally of those who pay in the ninth prytany. They
 also draw up a list of farms and dwellings which have been confiscated
 and sold by order of the courts; for these too come within their
 province. In the case of dwellings the value must be paid up in five
 years, and in that of farms, in ten. The instalments are paid in the
 ninth prytany. Further, the King-archon brings before the Council the
 leases of the sacred enclosures, written on whitened tablets. These too
 are leased for ten years, and the instalments are paid in the prytany;
 consequently it is in this prytany that the greatest amount of money is
 collected. The tablets containing the lists of the instalments are
 carried into the Council, and the public clerk takes charge of them.
 Whenever a payment of instalments is to be made he takes from the
 pigeon-holes the precise list of the sums which are to be paid and
 struck off on that day, and delivers it to the Receivers-General.  The
 rest are kept apart, in order that no sum may be struck off before it
 is paid.
 
 
 
 Part 48
 
 There are ten Receivers-General (Apodectae), elected by lot, one from
 each tribe. These officers receive the tablets, and strike off the
 instalments as they are paid, in the presence of the Council in the
 Council-chamber, and give the tablets back to the public clerk. If any
 one fails to pay his instalment, a note is made of it on the tablet;
 and he is bound to pay double the amount of the deficiency, or, in
 default, to be imprisoned. The Council has full power by the laws to
 exact these payments and to inflict this imprisonment. They receive all
 the instalments, therefore, on one day, and portion the money out among
 the magistrates; and on the next day they bring up the report of the
 apportionment, written on a wooden notice-board, and read it out in the
 Council-chamber, after which they ask publicly in the Council whether
 any one knows of any malpractice in reference to the apportionment, on
 the part of either a magistrate or a private individual, and if any one
 is charged with malpractice they take a vote on it.
 
 The Council also elects ten Auditors (Logistae) by lot from its own
 members, to audit the accounts of the magistrates for each prytany.
 They also elect one Examiner of Accounts (Euthunus) by lot from each
 tribe, with two assessors (Paredri) for each examiner, whose duty it is
 to sit at the ordinary market hours, each opposite the statue of the
 eponymous hero of his tribe; and if any one wishes to prefer a charge,
 on either public or private grounds, against any magistrate who has
 passed his audit before the law-courts, within three days of his having
 so passed, he enters on a whitened tablet his own name and that of the
 magistrate prosecuted, together with the malpractice that is alleged
 against him. He also appends his claim for a penalty of such amount as
 seems to him fitting, and gives in the record to the Examiner. The
 latter takes it, and if after reading it he considers it proved he
 hands it over, if a private case, to the local justices who introduce
 cases for the tribe concerned, while if it is a public case he enters
 it on the register of the Thesmothetae. Then, if the Thesmothetae
 accept it, they bring the accounts of this magistrate once more before
 the law-court, and the decision of the jury stands as the final
 judgement.
 
 
 
 Part 49
 
 The Council also inspects the horses belonging to the state. If a man
 who has a good horse is found to keep it in bad condition, he is
 mulcted in his allowance of corn; while those which cannot keep up or
 which shy and will not stand steady, it brands with a wheel on the jaw,
 and the horse so marked is disqualified for service. It also inspects
 those who appear to be fit for service as scouts, and any one whom it
 rejects is deprived of his horse. It also examines the infantry who
 serve among the cavalry, and any one whom it rejects ceases to receive
 his pay. The roll of the cavalry is drawn up by the Commissioners of
 Enrolment (Catalogeis), ten in number, elected by the Assembly by open
 vote. They hand over to the Hipparchs and Phylarchs the list of those
 whom they have enrolled, and these officers take it and bring it up
 before the Council, and there open the sealed tablet containing the
 names of the cavalry. If any of those who have been on the roll
 previously make affidavit that they are physically incapable of cavalry
 service, they strike them out; then they call up the persons newly
 enrolled, and if any one makes affidavit that he is either physically
 or pecuniarily incapable of cavalry service they dismiss him, but if no
 such affidavit is made the Council vote whether the individual in
 question is suitable for the purpose or not. If they vote in the
 affirmative his name is entered on the tablet; if not, he is dismissed
 with the others.
 
 Formerly the Council used to decide on the plans for public buildings
 and the contract for making the robe of Athena; but now this work is
 done by a jury in the law-courts appointed by lot, since the Council
 was considered to have shown favouritism in its decisions. The Council
 also shares with the Military Treasurer the superintendence of the
 manufacture of the images of Victory and the prizes at the Panathenaic
 festival.
 
 The Council also examines infirm paupers; for there is a law which
 provides that persons possessing less than three minas, who are so
 crippled as to be unable to do any work, are, after examination by the
 Council, to receive two obols a day from the state for their support. A
 treasurer is appointed by lot to attend to them.
 
 The Council also, speaking broadly, cooperates in most of the duties of
 all the other magistrates; and this ends the list of the functions of
 that body.
 
 Part 50
 
 There are ten Commissioners for Repairs of Temples, elected by lot, who
 receive a sum of thirty minas from the Receivers-General, and therewith
 carry out the most necessary repairs in the temples.
 
 There are also ten City Commissioners (Astynomi), of whom five hold
 office in Piraeus and five in the city. Their duty is to see that
 female flute- and harp- and lute-players are not hired at more than two
 drachmas, and if more than one person is anxious to hire the same girl,
 they cast lots and hire her out to the person to whom the lot falls.
 They also provide that no collector of sewage shall shoot any of his
 sewage within ten stradia of the walls; they prevent people from
 blocking up the streets by building, or stretching barriers across
 them, or making drain-pipes in mid-air with a discharge into the
 street, or having doors which open outwards; they also remove the
 corpses of those who die in the streets, for which purpose they have a
 body of state slaves assigned to them.
 
 
 
 Part 51
 
 Market Commissioners (Agoranomi) are elected by lot, five for Piraeus,
 five for the city. Their statutory duty is to see that all articles
 offered for sale in the market are pure and unadulterated.
 
 Commissioners of Weights and Measures (Metronomi) are elected by lot,
 five for the city, and five for Piraeus. They see that sellers use fair
 weights and measures.
 
 Formerly there were ten Corn Commissioners (Sitophylaces), elected by
 lot, five for Piraeus, and five for the city; but now there are twenty
 for the city and fifteen for Piraeus. Their duties are, first, to see
 that the unprepared corn in the market is offered for sale at
 reasonable prices, and secondly, to see that the millers sell barley
 meal at a price proportionate to that of barley, and that the bakers
 sell their loaves at a price proportionate to that of wheat, and of
 such weight as the Commissioners may appoint; for the law requires them
 to fix the standard weight.
 
 There are ten Superintendents of the Mart, elected by lot, whose duty
 is to superintend the Mart, and to compel merchants to bring up into
 the city two-thirds of the corn which is brought by sea to the Corn
 Mart.
 
 
 
 Part 52
 
 The Eleven also are appointed by lot to take care of the prisoners in
 the state gaol. Thieves, kidnappers, and pickpockets are brought to
 them, and if they plead guilty they are executed, but if they deny the
 charge the Eleven bring the case before the law-courts; if the
 prisoners are acquitted, they release them, but if not, they then
 execute them. They also bring up before the law-courts the list of
 farms and houses claimed as state-property; and if it is decided that
 they are so, they deliver them to the Commissioners for Public
 Contracts. The Eleven also bring up informations laid against
 magistrates alleged to be disqualified; this function comes within
 their province, but some such cases are brought up by the Thesmothetae.
 
 There are also five Introducers of Cases (Eisagogeis), elected by lot,
 one for each pair of tribes, who bring up the 'monthly' cases to the
 law-courts. 'Monthly' cases are these: refusal to pay up a dowry where
 a party is bound to do so, refusal to pay interest on money borrowed at
 12 per cent., or where a man desirous of setting up business in the
 market has borrowed from another man capital to start with; also cases
 of slander, cases arising out of friendly loans or partnerships, and
 cases concerned with slaves, cattle, and the office of trierarch, or
 with banks. These are brought up as 'monthly' cases and are introduced
 by these officers; but the Receivers-General perform the same function
 in cases for or against the farmers of taxes. Those in which the sum
 concerned is not more than ten drachmas they can decide summarily, but
 all above that amount they bring into the law-courts as 'monthly' cases.
 
 
 
 Part 53
 
 The Forty are also elected by lot, four from each tribe, before whom
 suitors bring all other cases. Formerly they were thirty in number, and
 they went on circuit through the demes to hear causes; but after the
 oligarchy of the Thirty they were increased to forty. They have full
 powers to decide cases in which the amount at issue does not exceed ten
 drachmas, but anything beyond that value they hand over to the
 Arbitrators. The Arbitrators take up the case, and, if they cannot
 bring the parties to an agreement, they give a decision. If their
 decision satisfies both parties, and they abide by it, the case is at
 an end; but if either of the parties appeals to the law-courts, the
 Arbitrators enclose the evidence, the pleadings, and the laws quoted in
 the case in two urns, those of the plaintiff in the one, and those of
 the defendant in the other. These they seal up and, having attached to
 them the decision of the arbitrator, written out on a tablet, place
 them in the custody of the four justices whose function it is to
 introduce cases on behalf of the tribe of the defendant. These officers
 take them and bring up the case before the law-court, to a jury of two
 hundred and one members in cases up to the value of a thousand
 drachmas, or to one of four hundred and one in cases above that value.
 No laws or pleadings or evidence may be used except those which were
 adduced before the Arbitrator, and have been enclosed in the urns.
 
 The Arbitrators are persons in the sixtieth year of their age; this
 appears from the schedule of the Archons and the Eponymi. There are two
 classes of Eponymi, the ten who give their names to the tribes, and the
 forty-two of the years of service. The youths, on being enrolled among
 the citizens, were formerly registered upon whitened tablets, and the
 names were appended of the Archon in whose year they were enrolled, and
 of the Eponymus who had been in course in the preceding year; at the
 present day they are written on a bronze pillar, which stands in front
 of the Council-chamber, near the Eponymi of the tribes. Then the Forty
 take the last of the Eponymi of the years of service, and assign the
 arbitrations to the persons belonging to that year, casting lots to
 determine which arbitrations each shall undertake; and every one is
 compelled to carry through the arbitrations which the lot assigns to
 him. The law enacts that any one who does not serve as Arbitrator when
 he has arrived at the necessary age shall lose his civil rights, unless
 he happens to be holding some other office during that year, or to be
 out of the country. These are the only persons who escape the duty. Any
 one who suffers injustice at the hands of the Arbitrator may appeal to
 the whole board of Arbitrators, and if they find the magistrate guilty,
 the law enacts that he shall lose his civil rights. The persons thus
 condemned have, however, in their turn an appeal. The Eponymi are also
 used in reference to military expeditions; when the men of military age
 are despatched on service, a notice is put up stating that the men from
 such-and-such an Archon and Eponymus to such-and-such another Archon
 and Eponymus are to go on the expedition.
 
 
 
 Part 54
 
 The following magistrates also are elected by lot: Five Commissioners
 of Roads (Hodopoei), who, with an assigned body of public slaves, are
 required to keep the roads in order: and ten Auditors, with ten
 assistants, to whom all persons who have held any office must give in
 their accounts. These are the only officers who audit the accounts of
 those who are subject to examination, and who bring them up for
 examination before the law-courts. If they detect any magistrate in
 embezzlement, the jury condemn him for theft, and he is obliged to
 repay tenfold the sum he is declared to have misappropriated. If they
 charge a magistrate with accepting bribes and the jury convict him,
 they fine him for corruption, and this sum too is repaid tenfold. Or if
 they convict him of unfair dealing, he is fined on that charge, and the
 sum assessed is paid without increase, if payment is made before the
 ninth prytany, but otherwise it is doubled. A tenfold fine is not
 doubled.
 
 The Clerk of the prytany, as he is called, is also elected by lot.  He
 has the charge of all public documents, and keeps the resolutions which
 are passed by the Assembly, and checks the transcripts of all other
 official papers and attends at the sessions of the Council.  Formerly
 he was elected by open vote, and the most distinguished and trustworthy
 persons were elected to the post, as is known from the fact that the
 name of this officer is appended on the pillars recording treaties of
 alliance and grants of consulship and citizenship. Now, however, he is
 elected by lot. There is, in addition, a Clerk of the Laws, elected by
 lot, who attends at the sessions of the Council; and he too checks the
 transcript of all the laws. The Assembly also elects by open vote a
 clerk to read documents to it and to the Council; but he has no other
 duty except that of reading aloud.
 
 The Assembly also elects by lot the Commissioners of Public Worship
 (Hieropoei) known as the Commissioners for Sacrifices, who offer the
 sacrifices appointed by oracle, and, in conjunction with the seers,
 take the auspices whenever there is occasion. It also elects by lot ten
 others, known as Annual Commissioners, who offer certain sacrifices and
 administer all the quadrennial festivals except the Panathenaea. There
 are the following quadrennial festivals: first that of Delos (where
 there is also a sexennial festival), secondly the Brauronia, thirdly
 the Heracleia, fourthly the Eleusinia, and fifthly the Panathenaea; and
 no two of these are celebrated in the same place. To these the
 Hephaestia has now been added, in the archonship of Cephisophon.
 
 An Archon is also elected by lot for Salamis, and a Demarch for
 Piraeus. These officers celebrate the Dionysia in these two places, and
 appoint Choregi. In Salamis, moreover, the name of the Archon is
 publicly recorded.
 
 
 
 Part 55
 
 All the foregoing magistrates are elected by lot, and their powers are
 those which have been stated. To pass on to the nine Archons, as they
 are called, the manner of their appointment from the earliest times has
 been described already. At the present day six Thesmothetae are elected
 by lot, together with their clerk, and in addition to these an Archon,
 a King, and a Polemarch. One is elected from each tribe. They are
 examined first of all by the Council of Five Hundred, with the
 exception of the clerk. The latter is examined only in the lawcourt,
 like other magistrates (for all magistrates, whether elected by lot or
 by open vote, are examined before entering on their offices); but the
 nine Archons are examined both in the Council and again in the
 law-court. Formerly no one could hold the office if the Council
 rejected him, but now there is an appeal to the law-court, which is the
 final authority in the matter of the examination. When they are
 examined, they are asked, first, 'Who is your father, and of what deme?
 who is your father's father? who is your mother? who is your mother's
 father, and of what deme?' Then the candidate is asked whether he
 possesses an ancestral Apollo and a household Zeus, and where their
 sanctuaries are; next if he possesses a family tomb, and where; then if
 he treats his parents well, and pays his taxes, and has served on the
 required military expeditions. When the examiner has put these
 questions, he proceeds, 'Call the witnesses to these facts'; and when
 the candidate has produced his witnesses, he next asks, 'Does any one
 wish to make any accusation against this man?' If an accuser appears,
 he gives the parties an opportunity of making their accusation and
 defence, and then puts it to the Council to pass the candidate or not,
 and to the law-court to give the final vote. If no one wishes to make
 an accusation, he proceeds at once to the vote. Formerly a single
 individual gave the vote, but now all the members are obliged to vote
 on the candidates, so that if any unprincipled candidate has managed to
 get rid of his accusers, it may still be possible for him to be
 disqualified before the law-court. When the examination has been thus
 completed, they proceed to the stone on which are the pieces of the
 victims, and on which the Arbitrators take oath before declaring their
 decisions, and witnesses swear to their testimony. On this stone the
 Archons stand, and swear to execute their office uprightly and
 according to the laws, and not to receive presents in respect of the
 performance of their duties, or, if they do, to dedicate a golden
 statue. When they have taken this oath they proceed to the Acropolis,
 and there they repeat it; after this they enter upon their office.
 
 
 
 Part 56
 
 The Archon, the King, and the Polemarch have each two assessors,
 nominated by themselves. These officers are examined in the lawcourt
 before they begin to act, and give in accounts on each occasion of
 their acting.
 
 As soon as the Archon enters office, he begins by issuing a
 proclamation that whatever any one possessed before he entered into
 office, that he shall possess and hold until the end of his term. Next
 he assigns Choregi to the tragic poets, choosing three of the richest
 persons out of the whole body of Athenians. Formerly he used also to
 assign five Choregi to the comic poets, but now the tribes provide the
 Choregi for them. Then he receives the Choregi who have been appointed
 by the tribes for the men's and boys' choruses and the comic poets at
 the Dionysia, and for the men's and boys' choruses at the Thargelia (at
 the Dionysia there is a chorus for each tribe, but at the Thargelia one
 between two tribes, each tribe bearing its share in providing it); he
 transacts the exchanges of properties for them, and reports any excuses
 that are tendered, if any one says that he has already borne this
 burden, or that he is exempt because he has borne a similar burden and
 the period of his exemption has not yet expired, or that he is not of
 the required age; since the Choregus of a boys' chorus must be over
 forty years of age. He also appoints Choregi for the festival at Delos,
 and a chief of the mission for the thirty-oar boat which conveys the
 youths thither. He also superintends sacred processions, both that in
 honour of Asclepius, when the initiated keep house, and that of the
 great Dionysia--the latter in conjunction with the Superintendents of
 that festival. These officers, ten in number, were formerly elected by
 open vote in the Assembly, and used to provide for the expenses of the
 procession out of their private means; but now one is elected by lot
 from each tribe, and the state contributes a hundred minas for the
 expenses. The Archon also superintends the procession at the Thargelia,
 and that in honour of Zeus the Saviour. He also manages the contests at
 the Dionysia and the Thargelia.
 
 These, then, are the festivals which he superintends. The suits and
 indictments which come before him, and which he, after a preliminary
 inquiry, brings up before the lawcourts, are as follows.  Injury to
 parents (for bringing these actions the prosecutor cannot suffer any
 penalty); injury to orphans (these actions lie against their
 guardians); injury to a ward of state (these lie against their
 guardians or their husbands), injury to an orphan's estate (these too
 lie against the guardians); mental derangement, where a party charges
 another with destroying his own property through unsoundness of mind;
 for appointment of liquidators, where a party refuses to divide
 property in which others have a share; for constituting a wardship; for
 determining between rival claims to a wardship; for granting inspection
 of property to which another party lays claim; for appointing oneself
 as guardian; and for determining disputes as to inheritances and wards
 of state. The Archon also has the care of orphans and wards of state,
 and of women who, on the death of their husbands, declare themselves to
 be with child; and he has power to inflict a fine on those who offend
 against the persons under his charge, or to bring the case before the
 law-courts. He also leases the houses of orphans and wards of state
 until they reach the age of fourteen, and takes mortgages on them; and
 if the guardians fail to provide the necessary food for the children
 under their charge, he exacts it from them. Such are the duties of the
 Archon.
 
 
 
 Part 57
 
 The King in the first place superintends the mysteries, in conjunction
 with the Superintendents of Mysteries. The latter are elected in the
 Assembly by open vote, two from the general body of Athenians, one from
 the Eumolpidae, and one from the Ceryces. Next, he superintends the
 Lenaean Dionysia, which consists of a procession and a contest. The
 procession is ordered by the King and the Superintendents in
 conjunction; but the contest is managed by the King alone. He also
 manages all the contests of the torch-race; and to speak broadly, he
 administers all the ancestral sacrifices.  Indictments for impiety come
 before him, or any disputes between parties concerning priestly rites;
 and he also determines all controversies concerning sacred rites for
 the ancient families and the priests. All actions for homicide come
 before him, and it is he that makes the proclamation requiring polluted
 persons to keep away from sacred ceremonies. Actions for homicide and
 wounding are heard, if the homicide or wounding be willful, in the
 Areopagus; so also in cases of killing by poison, and of arson. These
 are the only cases heard by that Council. Cases of unintentional
 homicide, or of intent to kill, or of killing a slave or a resident
 alien or a foreigner, are heard by the court of Palladium. When the
 homicide is acknowledged, but legal justification is pleaded, as when a
 man takes an adulterer in the act, or kills another by mistake in
 battle, or in an athletic contest, the prisoner is tried in the court
 of Delphinium. If a man who is in banishment for a homicide which
 admits of reconciliation incurs a further charge of killing or
 wounding, he is tried in Phreatto, and he makes his defence from a boat
 moored near the shore. All these cases, except those which are heard in
 the Areopagus, are tried by the Ephetae on whom the lot falls. The King
 introduces them, and the hearing is held within sacred precincts and in
 the open air.  Whenever the King hears a case he takes off his crown.
 The person who is charged with homicide is at all other times excluded
 from the temples, nor is it even lawful for him to enter the
 market-place; but on the occasion of his trial he enters the temple and
 makes his defence. If the actual offender is unknown, the writ runs
 against 'the doer of the deed'. The King and the tribe-kings also hear
 the cases in which the guilt rests on inanimate objects and the lower
 animal.
 
 
 
 Part 58
 
 The Polemarch performs the sacrifices to Artemis the huntress and to
 Enyalius, and arranges the contest at the funeral of those who have
 fallen in war, and makes offerings to the memory of Harmodius and
 Aristogeiton. Only private actions come before him, namely those in
 which resident aliens, both ordinary and privileged, and agents of
 foreign states are concerned. It is his duty to receive these cases and
 divide them into ten groups, and assign to each tribe the group which
 comes to it by lot; after which the magistrates who introduce cases for
 the tribe hand them over to the Arbitrators. The Polemarch, however,
 brings up in person cases in which an alien is charged with deserting
 his patron or neglecting to provide himself with one, and also of
 inheritances and wards of state where aliens are concerned; and in
 fact, generally, whatever the Archon does for citizens, the Polemarch
 does for aliens.
 
 
 
 Part 59
 
 The Thesmothetae in the first place have the power of prescribing on
 what days the lawcourts are to sit, and next of assigning them to the
 several magistrates; for the latter must follow the arrangement which
 the Thesmothetae assign. Moreover they introduce impeachments before
 the Assembly, and bring up all votes for removal from office,
 challenges of a magistrate's conduct before the Assembly, indictments
 for illegal proposals, or for proposing a law which is contrary to the
 interests of the state, complaints against Proedri or their president
 for their conduct in office, and the accounts presented by the
 generals. All indictments also come before them in which a deposit has
 to be made by the prosecutor, namely, indictments for concealment of
 foreign origin, for corrupt evasion of foreign origin (when a man
 escapes the disqualification by bribery), for blackmailing accusations,
 bribery, false entry of another as a state debtor, false testimony to
 the service of a summons, conspiracy to enter a man as a state debtor,
 corrupt removal from the list of debtors, and adultery. They also bring
 up the examinations of all magistrates, and the rejections by the demes
 and the condemnations by the Council. Moreover they bring up certain
 private suits in cases of merchandise and mines, or where a slave has
 slandered a free man. It is they also who cast lots to assign the
 courts to the various magistrates, whether for private or public cases.
 They ratify commercial treaties, and bring up the cases which arise out
 of such treaties; and they also bring up cases of perjury from the
 Areopagus. The casting of lots for the jurors is conducted by all the
 nine Archons, with the clerk to the Thesmothetae as the tenth, each
 performing the duty for his own tribe. Such are the duties of the nine
 Archons.
 
 
 
 Part 60
 
 There are also ten Commissioners of Games (Athlothetae), elected by
 lot, one from each tribe. These officers, after passing an examination,
 serve for four years; and they manage the Panathenaic procession, the
 contest in music and that in gymnastic, and the horse-race; they also
 provide the robe of Athena and, in conjunction with the Council, the
 vases, and they present the oil to the athletes.  This oil is collected
 from the sacred olives. The Archon requisitions it from the owners of
 the farms on which the sacred olives grow, at the rate of
 three-quarters of a pint from each plant. Formerly the state used to
 sell the fruit itself, and if any one dug up or broke down one of the
 sacred olives, he was tried by the Council of Areopagus, and if he was
 condemned, the penalty was death. Since, however, the oil has been paid
 by the owner of the farm, the procedure has lapsed, though the law
 remains; and the oil is a state charge upon the property instead of
 being taken from the individual plants. When, then, the Archon has
 collected the oil for his year of office, he hands it over to the
 Treasurers to preserve in the Acropolis, and he may not take his seat
 in the Areopagus until he has paid over to the Treasurers the full
 amount. The Treasurers keep it in the Acropolis until the Panathenaea,
 when they measure it out to the Commissioners of Games, and they again
 to the victorious competitors. The prizes for the victors in the
 musical contest consist of silver and gold, for the victors in manly
 vigour, of shields, and for the victors in the gymnastic contest and
 the horse-race, of oil.
 
 
 
 Part 61
 
 All officers connected with military service are elected by open vote.
 In the first place, ten Generals (Strategi), who were formerly elected
 one from each tribe, but now are chosen from the whole mass of
 citizens. Their duties are assigned to them by open vote; one is
 appointed to command the heavy infantry, and leads them if they go out
 to war; one to the defence of the country, who remains on the
 defensive, and fights if there is war within the borders of the
 country; two to Piraeus, one of whom is assigned to Munichia, and one
 to the south shore, and these have charge of the defence of the
 Piraeus; and one to superintend the symmories, who nominates the
 trierarchs arranges exchanges of properties for them, and brings up
 actions to decide on rival claims in connexion with them.  The rest are
 dispatched to whatever business may be on hand at the moment. The
 appointment of these officers is submitted for confirmation in each
 prytany, when the question is put whether they are considered to be
 doing their duty. If any officer is rejected on this vote, he is tried
 in the lawcourt, and if he is found guilty the people decide what
 punishment or fine shall be inflicted on him; but if he is acquitted he
 resumes his office. The Generals have full power, when on active
 service, to arrest any one for insubordination, or to cashier him
 publicly, or to inflict a fine; the latter is, however, unusual.
 
 There are also ten Taxiarchs, one from each tribe, elected by open
 vote; and each commands his own tribesmen and appoints captains of
 companies (Lochagi). There are also two Hipparchs, elected by open vote
 from the whole mass of the citizens, who command the cavalry, each
 taking five tribes. They have the same powers as the Generals have in
 respect of the infantry, and their appointments are also subject to
 confirmation. There are also ten Phylarchs, elected by open vote, one
 from each tribe, to command the cavalry, as the Taxiarchs do the
 infantry. There is also a Hipparch for Lemnos, elected by open vote,
 who has charge of the cavalry in Lemnos. There is also a treasurer of
 the Paralus, and another of the Ammonias, similarly elected.
 
 
 
 Part 62
 
 Of the magistrates elected by lot, in former times some including the
 nine Archons, were elected out of the tribe as a whole, while others,
 namely those who are now elected in the Theseum, were apportioned among
 the demes; but since the demes used to sell the elections, these
 magistrates too are now elected from the whole tribe, except the
 members of the Council and the guards of the dockyards, who are still
 left to the demes.
 
 Pay is received for the following services. First the members of the
 Assembly receive a drachma for the ordinary meetings, and nine obols
 for the 'sovereign' meeting. Then the jurors at the law-courts receive
 three obols; and the members of the Council five obols. The Prytanes
 receive an allowance of an obol for their maintenance. The nine Archons
 receive four obols apiece for maintenance, and also keep a herald and a
 flute-player; and the Archon for Salamis receives a drachma a day. The
 Commissioners for Games dine in the Prytaneum during the month of
 Hecatombaeon in which the Panathenaic festival takes place, from the
 fourteenth day onwards. The Amphictyonic deputies to Delos receive a
 drachma a day from the exchequer of Delos. Also all magistrates sent to
 Samos, Scyros, Lemnos, or Imbros receive an allowance for their
 maintenance. The military offices may be held any number of times, but
 none of the others more than once, except the membership of the
 Council, which may be held twice.
 
 
 
 Part 63
 
 The juries for the law-courts are chosen by lot by the nine Archons,
 each for their own tribe, and by the clerk to the Thesmothetae for the
 tenth. There are ten entrances into the courts, one for each tribe;
 twenty rooms in which the lots are drawn, two for each tribe; a hundred
 chests, ten for each tribe; other chests, in which are placed the
 tickets of the jurors on whom the lot falls; and two vases.  Further,
 staves, equal in number to the jurors required, are placed by the side
 of each entrance; and counters are put into one vase, equal in number
 to the staves. These are inscribed with letters of the alphabet
 beginning with the eleventh (lambda), equal in number to the courts
 which require to be filled. All persons above thirty years of age are
 qualified to serve as jurors, provided they are not debtors to the
 state and have not lost their civil rights. If any unqualified person
 serves as juror, an information is laid against him, and he is brought
 before the court; and, if he is convicted, the jurors assess the
 punishment or fine which they consider him to deserve. If he is
 condemned to a money fine, he must be imprisoned until he has paid up
 both the original debt, on account of which the information was laid
 against him, and also the fine which the court as imposed upon him.
 Each juror has his ticket of boxwood, on which is inscribed his name,
 with the name of his father and his deme, and one of the letters of the
 alphabet up to kappa; for the jurors in their several tribes are
 divided into ten sections, with approximately an equal number in each
 letter. When the Thesmothetes has decided by lot which letters are
 required to attend at the courts, the servant puts up above each court
 the letter which has been assigned to it by the lot.
 
 
 
 Part 64
 
 The ten chests above mentioned are placed in front of the entrance used
 by each tribe, and are inscribed with the letters of the alphabet from
 alpha to kappa. The jurors cast in their tickets, each into the chest
 on which is inscribed the letter which is on his ticket; then the
 servant shakes them all up, and the Archon draws one ticket from each
 chest. The individual so selected is called the Ticket-hanger
 (Empectes), and his function is to hang up the tickets out of his chest
 on the bar which bears the same letter as that on the chest.  He is
 chosen by lot, lest, if the Ticket-hanger were always the same person,
 he might tamper with the results. There are five of these bars in each
 of the rooms assigned for the lot-drawing. Then the Archon casts in the
 dice and thereby chooses the jurors from each tribe, room by room. The
 dice are made of brass, coloured black or white; and according to the
 number of jurors required, so many white dice are put in, one for each
 five tickets, while the remainder are black, in the same proportion. As
 the Archon draws out the dice, the crier calls out the names of the
 individuals chosen. The Ticket-hanger is included among those selected.
 Each juror, as he is chosen and answers to his name, draws a counter
 from the vase, and holding it out with the letter uppermost shows it
 first to the presiding Archon; and he, when he has seen it, throws the
 ticket of the juror into the chest on which is inscribed the letter
 which is on the counter, so that the juror must go into the court
 assigned to him by lot, and not into one chosen by himself, and that it
 may be impossible for any one to collect the jurors of his choice into
 any particular court. For this purpose chests are placed near the
 Archon, as many in number as there are courts to be filled that day,
 bearing the letters of the courts on which the lot has fallen.
 
 
 
 Part 65
 
 The juror thereupon, after showing his counter again to the attendant,
 passes through the barrier into the court. The attendant gives him a
 staff of the same colour as the court bearing the letter which is on
 his counter, so as to ensure his going into the court assigned to him
 by lot; since, if he were to go into any other, he would be betrayed by
 the colour of his staff. Each court has a certain colour painted on the
 lintel of the entrance. Accordingly the juror, bearing his staff,
 enters the court which has the same colour as his staff, and the same
 letter as his counter. As he enters, he receives a voucher from the
 official to whom this duty has been assigned by lot. So with their
 counters and their staves the selected jurors take their seats in the
 court, having thus completed the process of admission. The unsuccessful
 candidates receive back their tickets from the Ticket-hangers. The
 public servants carry the chests from each tribe, one to each court,
 containing the names of the members of the tribe who are in that court,
 and hand them over to the officials assigned to the duty of giving back
 their tickets to the jurors in each court, so that these officials may
 call them up by name and pay them their fee.
 
 
 
 Part 66
 
 When all the courts are full, two ballot boxes are placed in the first
 court, and a number of brazen dice, bearing the colours of the several
 courts, and other dice inscribed with the names of the presiding
 magistrates. Then two of the Thesmothetae, selected by lot, severally
 throw the dice with the colours into one box, and those with the
 magistrates' names into the other. The magistrate whose name is first
 drawn is thereupon proclaimed by the crier as assigned for duty in the
 court which is first drawn, and the second in the second, and similarly
 with the rest. The object of this procedure is that no one may know
 which court he will have, but that each may take the court assigned to
 him by lot.
 
  When the jurors have come in, and have been assigned to their
 respective courts, the presiding magistrate in each court draws one
 ticket out of each chest (making ten in all, one out of each tribe),
 and throws them into another empty chest. He then draws out five of
 them, and assigns one to the superintendence of the water-clock, and
 the other four to the telling of the votes. This is to prevent any
 tampering beforehand with either the superintendent of the clock or the
 tellers of the votes, and to secure that there is no malpractice in
 these respects. The five who have not been selected for these duties
 receive from them a statement of the order in which the jurors shall
 receive their fees, and of the places where the several tribes shall
 respectively gather in the court for this purpose when their duties are
 completed; the object being that the jurors may be broken up into small
 groups for the reception of their pay, and not all crowd together and
 impede one another.
 
 
 
 Part 67
 
 These preliminaries being concluded, the cases are called on. If it is
 a day for private cases, the private litigants are called.  Four cases
 are taken in each of the categories defined in the law, and the
 litigants swear to confine their speeches to the point at issue.  If it
 is a day for public causes, the public litigants are called, and only
 one case is tried. Water-clocks are provided, having small
 supply-tubes, into which the water is poured by which the length of the
 pleadings is regulated. Ten gallons are allowed for a case in which an
 amount of more than five thousand drachmas is involved, and three for
 the second speech on each side. When the amount is between one and five
 thousand drachmas, seven gallons are allowed for the first speech and
 two for the second; when it is less than one thousand, five and two.
 Six gallons are allowed for arbitrations between rival claimants, in
 which there is no second speech. The official chosen by lot to
 superintend the water-clock places his hand on the supply tube whenever
 the clerk is about to read a resolution or law or affidavit or treaty.
 When, however, a case is conducted according to a set measurement of
 the day, he does not stop the supply, but each party receives an equal
 allowance of water. The standard of measurement is the length of the
 days in the month Poseideon. The measured day is employed in cases
 when imprisonment, death, exile, loss of civil rights, or confiscation
 of goods is assigned as the penalty.
 
 
 
 Part 68
 
 Most of the courts consist of 500 members; and when it is necessary
 to bring public cases before a jury of 1,000 members, two courts
 combine for the purpose, the most important cases of all are brought
 1,500 jurors, or three courts. The ballot balls are made of brass with
 stems running through the centre, half of them having the stem pierced
 and the other half solid. When the speeches are concluded, the
 officials assigned to the taking of the votes give each juror two
 ballot balls, one pierced and one solid. This is done in full view of
 the rival litigants, to secure that no one shall receive two pierced or
 two solid balls. Then the official designated for the purpose takes
 away the jurors' staves, in return for which each one as he records his
 vote receives a brass voucher marked with the numeral 3 (because he
 gets three obols when he gives it up). This is to ensure that all shall
 vote; since no one can get a voucher unless he votes. Two urns, one of
 brass and the other of wood, stand in the court, in distinct spots so
 that no one may surreptitiously insert ballot balls; in these the
 jurors record their votes. The brazen urn is for effective votes, the
 wooden for unused votes; and the brazen urn has a lid pierced so as to
 take only one ballot ball, in order that no one may put in two at a
 time.
 
 When the jurors are about to vote, the crier demands first whether the
 litigants enter a protest against any of the evidence; for no protest
 can be received after the voting has begun. Then he proclaims again,
 'The pierced ballot for the plaintiff, the solid for the defendant';
 and the juror, taking his two ballot balls from the stand, with his
 hand closed over the stem so as not to show either the pierced or the
 solid ballot to the litigants, casts the one which is to count into the
 brazen urn, and the other into the wooden urn.
 
 
 
 Part 69
 
 When all the jurors have voted, the attendants take the urn containing
 the effective votes and discharge them on to a reckoning board having
 as many cavities as there are ballot balls, so that the effective
 votes, whether pierced or solid, may be plainly displayed and easily
 counted. Then the officials assigned to the taking of the votes tell
 them off on the board, the solid in one place and the pierced in
 another, and the crier announces the numbers of the votes, the pierced
 ballots being for the prosecutor and the solid for the defendant.
 Whichever has the majority is victorious; but if the votes are equal
 the verdict is for the defendant. Each juror receives two ballots, and
 uses one to record his vote, and throws the other away.
 
 Then, if damages have to be awarded, they vote again in the same way,
 first returning their pay-vouchers and receiving back their staves.
 Half a gallon of water is allowed to each party for the discussion of
 the damages. Finally, when all has been completed in accordance with
 the law, the jurors receive their pay in the order assigned by the lot.
 
 
 
 
 THE END
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by An Anonymous Volunteer
 
 
 
 
 
 THE POETICS OF ARISTOTLE
 
 By Aristotle
 
 A Translation By S. H. Butcher
 
 
 [Transcriber's Annotations and Conventions: the translator left
 intact some Greek words to illustrate a specific point of the original
 discourse. In this transcription, in order to retain the accuracy of
 this text, those words are rendered by spelling out each Greek letter
 individually, such as {alpha beta gamma delta...}. The reader can
 distinguish these words by the enclosing braces {}. Where multiple
 words occur together, they are separated by the "/" symbol for clarity.
 Readers who do not speak or read the Greek language will usually neither
 gain nor lose understanding by skipping over these passages. Those who
 understand Greek, however, may gain a deeper insight to the original
 meaning and distinctions expressed by Aristotle.]
 
 
 
 
 Analysis of Contents
 
   I     'Imitation' the common principle of the Arts of Poetry.
   II    The Objects of Imitation.
   III   The Manner of Imitation.
   IV    The Origin and Development of Poetry.
   V     Definition of the Ludicrous, and a brief sketch of the rise of
         Comedy.
   VI    Definition of Tragedy.
   VII   The Plot must be a Whole.
   VIII  The Plot must be a Unity.
   IX    (Plot continued.) Dramatic Unity.
   X     (Plot continued.) Definitions of Simple and Complex Plots.
   XI    (Plot continued.) Reversal of the Situation, Recognition, and
         Tragic or disastrous Incident defined and explained.
   XII   The 'quantitative parts' of Tragedy defined.
   XIII  (Plot continued.) What constitutes Tragic Action.
   XIV   (Plot continued.) The tragic emotions of pity and fear should
         spring out of the Plot itself.
   XV    The element of Character in Tragedy.
   XVI   (Plot continued.) Recognition: its various kinds, with examples.
   XVII  Practical rules for the Tragic Poet.
   XVIII Further rules for the Tragic Poet.
   XIX   Thought, or the Intellectual element, and Diction in Tragedy.
   XX    Diction, or Language in general.
   XXI   Poetic Diction.
   XXII  (Poetic Diction continued.) How Poetry combines elevation of
         language with perspicuity.
   XXIII Epic Poetry.
   XXIV  (Epic Poetry continued.) Further points of agreement with Tragedy.
   XXV   Critical Objections brought against Poetry, and the principles on
         which they are to be answered.
   XXVI  A general estimate of the comparative worth of Epic Poetry and
         Tragedy.
 
 
 
 
 ARISTOTLE'S POETICS
 
 
 
 
 I
 
 I propose to treat of Poetry in itself and of its various kinds, noting
 the essential quality of each; to inquire into the structure of the plot
 as requisite to a good poem; into the number and nature of the parts of
 which a poem is composed; and similarly into whatever else falls within
 the same inquiry. Following, then, the order of nature, let us begin
 with the principles which come first.
 
 Epic poetry and Tragedy, Comedy also and Dithyrambic: poetry, and the
 music of the flute and of the lyre in most of their forms, are all in
 their general conception modes of imitation. They differ, however, from
 one: another in three respects,--the medium, the objects, the manner or
 mode of imitation, being in each case distinct.
 
 For as there are persons who, by conscious art or mere habit, imitate
 and represent various objects through the medium of colour and form, or
 again by the voice; so in the arts above mentioned, taken as a whole,
 the imitation is produced by rhythm, language, or 'harmony,' either
 singly or combined.
 
 Thus in the music of the flute and of the lyre, 'harmony' and rhythm
 alone are employed; also in other arts, such as that of the shepherd's
 pipe, which are essentially similar to these. In dancing, rhythm alone
 is used without 'harmony'; for even dancing imitates character, emotion,
 and action, by rhythmical movement.
 
 There is another art which imitates by means of language alone, and
 that either in prose or verse--which, verse, again, may either combine
 different metres or consist of but one kind--but this has hitherto been
 without a name. For there is no common term we could apply to the mimes
 of Sophron and Xenarchus and the Socratic dialogues on the one hand;
 and, on the other, to poetic imitations in iambic, elegiac, or any
 similar metre. People do, indeed, add the word 'maker' or 'poet' to
 the name of the metre, and speak of elegiac poets, or epic (that is,
 hexameter) poets, as if it were not the imitation that makes the poet,
 but the verse that entitles them all indiscriminately to the name. Even
 when a treatise on medicine or natural science is brought out in verse,
 the name of poet is by custom given to the author; and yet Homer and
 Empedocles have nothing in common but the metre, so that it would be
 right to call the one poet, the other physicist rather than poet. On the
 same principle, even if a writer in his poetic imitation were to combine
 all metres, as Chaeremon did in his Centaur, which is a medley composed
 of metres of all kinds, we should bring him too under the general term
 poet. So much then for these distinctions.
 
 There are, again, some arts which employ all the means above mentioned,
 namely, rhythm, tune, and metre. Such are Dithyrambic and Nomic poetry,
 and also Tragedy and Comedy; but between them the difference is, that in
 the first two cases these means are all employed in combination, in the
 latter, now one means is employed, now another.
 
 Such, then, are the differences of the arts with respect to the medium
 of imitation.
 
 
 
 
 II
 
 Since the objects of imitation are men in action, and these men must be
 either of a higher or a lower type (for moral character mainly answers
 to these divisions, goodness and badness being the distinguishing marks
 of moral differences), it follows that we must represent men either as
 better than in real life, or as worse, or as they are. It is the same
 in painting. Polygnotus depicted men as nobler than they are, Pauson as
 less noble, Dionysius drew them true to life.
 
 Now it is evident that each of the modes of imitation above mentioned
 will exhibit these differences, and become a distinct kind in imitating
 objects that are thus distinct. Such diversities may be found even in
 dancing, flute-playing, and lyre-playing. So again in language, whether
 prose or verse unaccompanied by music. Homer, for example, makes men
 better than they are; Cleophon as they are; Hegemon the Thasian, the
 inventor of parodies, and Nicochares, the author of the Deiliad, worse
 than they are. The same thing holds good of Dithyrambs and Nomes;
 here too one may portray different types, as Timotheus and Philoxenus
 differed in representing their Cyclopes. The same distinction marks
 off Tragedy from Comedy; for Comedy aims at representing men as worse,
 Tragedy as better than in actual life.
 
 
 
 
 III
 
 There is still a third difference--the manner in which each of these
 objects may be imitated. For the medium being the same, and the objects
 the same, the poet may imitate by narration--in which case he can either
 take another personality as Homer does, or speak in his own person,
 unchanged--or he may present all his characters as living and moving
 before us.
 
 These, then, as we said at the beginning, are the three differences
 which distinguish artistic imitation,--the medium, the objects, and the
 manner. So that from one point of view, Sophocles is an imitator of the
 same kind as Homer--for both imitate higher types of character; from
 another point of view, of the same kind as Aristophanes--for both
 imitate persons acting and doing. Hence, some say, the name of 'drama'
 is given to such poems, as representing action. For the same reason the
 Dorians claim the invention both of Tragedy and Comedy. The claim to
 Comedy is put forward by the Megarians,--not only by those of Greece
 proper, who allege that it originated under their democracy, but also
 by the Megarians of Sicily, for the poet Epicharmus, who is much earlier
 than Chionides and Magnes, belonged to that country. Tragedy too is
 claimed by certain Dorians of the Peloponnese. In each case they appeal
 to the evidence of language. The outlying villages, they say, are by
 them called {kappa omega mu alpha iota}, by the Athenians {delta eta
 mu iota}: and they assume that Comedians were so named not from {kappa
 omega mu 'alpha zeta epsilon iota nu}, 'to revel,' but because they
 wandered from village to village (kappa alpha tau alpha / kappa omega mu
 alpha sigma), being excluded contemptuously from the city. They add
 also that the Dorian word for 'doing' is {delta rho alpha nu}, and the
 Athenian, {pi rho alpha tau tau epsilon iota nu}.
 
 This may suffice as to the number and nature of the various modes of
 imitation.
 
 
 
 
 IV
 
 Poetry in general seems to have sprung from two causes, each of them
 lying deep in our nature. First, the instinct of imitation is implanted
 in man from childhood, one difference between him and other animals
 being that he is the most imitative of living creatures, and through
 imitation learns his earliest lessons; and no less universal is the
 pleasure felt in things imitated. We have evidence of this in the facts
 of experience. Objects which in themselves we view with pain, we delight
 to contemplate when reproduced with minute fidelity: such as the forms
 of the most ignoble animals and of dead bodies. The cause of this again
 is, that to learn gives the liveliest pleasure, not only to philosophers
 but to men in general; whose capacity, however, of learning is more
 limited. Thus the reason why men enjoy seeing a likeness is, that in
 contemplating it they find themselves learning or inferring, and saying
 perhaps, 'Ah, that is he.' For if you happen not to have seen the
 original, the pleasure will be due not to the imitation as such, but to
 the execution, the colouring, or some such other cause.
 
 Imitation, then, is one instinct of our nature. Next, there is the
 instinct for 'harmony' and rhythm, metres being manifestly sections of
 rhythm. Persons, therefore, starting with this natural gift developed
 by degrees their special aptitudes, till their rude improvisations gave
 birth to Poetry.
 
 Poetry now diverged in two directions, according to the individual
 character of the writers. The graver spirits imitated noble actions, and
 the actions of good men. The more trivial sort imitated the actions of
 meaner persons, at first composing satires, as the former did hymns to
 the gods and the praises of famous men. A poem of the satirical kind
 cannot indeed be put down to any author earlier than Homer; though many
 such writers probably there were. But from Homer onward, instances
 can be cited,--his own Margites, for example, and other similar
 compositions. The appropriate metre was also here introduced; hence the
 measure is still called the iambic or lampooning measure, being that
 in which people lampooned one another. Thus the older poets were
 distinguished as writers of heroic or of lampooning verse.
 
 As, in the serious style, Homer is pre-eminent among poets, for he alone
 combined dramatic form with excellence of imitation, so he too first
 laid down the main lines of Comedy, by dramatising the ludicrous instead
 of writing personal satire. His Margites bears the same relation to
 Comedy that the Iliad and Odyssey do to Tragedy. But when Tragedy and
 Comedy came to light, the two classes of poets still followed their
 natural bent: the lampooners became writers of Comedy, and the Epic
 poets were succeeded by Tragedians, since the drama was a larger and
 higher form of art.
 
 Whether Tragedy has as yet perfected its proper types or not; and
 whether it is to be judged in itself, or in relation also to the
 audience,--this raises another question. Be that as it may, Tragedy--as
 also Comedy--was at first mere improvisation. The one originated with
 the authors of the Dithyramb, the other with those of the phallic songs,
 which are still in use in many of our cities. Tragedy advanced by slow
 degrees; each new element that showed itself was in turn developed.
 Having passed through many changes, it found its natural form, and there
 it stopped.
 
 Aeschylus first introduced a second actor; he diminished the importance
 of the Chorus, and assigned the leading part to the dialogue. Sophocles
 raised the number of actors to three, and added scene-painting.
 Moreover, it was not till late that the short plot was discarded for
 one of greater compass, and the grotesque diction of the earlier satyric
 form for the stately manner of Tragedy. The iambic measure then replaced
 the trochaic tetrameter, which was originally employed when the poetry
 was of the Satyric order, and had greater affinities with dancing. Once
 dialogue had come in, Nature herself discovered the appropriate measure.
 For the iambic is, of all measures, the most colloquial: we see it
 in the fact that conversational speech runs into iambic lines more
 frequently than into any other kind of verse; rarely into hexameters,
 and only when we drop the colloquial intonation. The additions to
 the number of 'episodes' or acts, and the other accessories of which
 tradition; tells, must be taken as already described; for to discuss
 them in detail would, doubtless, be a large undertaking.
 
 
 
 
 V
 
 Comedy is, as we have said, an imitation of characters of a lower type,
 not, however, in the full sense of the word bad, the Ludicrous being
 merely a subdivision of the ugly. It consists in some defect or ugliness
 which is not painful or destructive. To take an obvious example, the
 comic mask is ugly and distorted, but does not imply pain.
 
 The successive changes through which Tragedy passed, and the authors
 of these changes, are well known, whereas Comedy has had no history,
 because it was not at first treated seriously. It was late before the
 Archon granted a comic chorus to a poet; the performers were till then
 voluntary. Comedy had already taken definite shape when comic poets,
 distinctively so called, are heard of. Who furnished it with masks, or
 prologues, or increased the number of actors,--these and other similar
 details remain unknown. As for the plot, it came originally from
 Sicily; but of Athenian writers Crates was the first who, abandoning the
 'iambic' or lampooning form, generalised his themes and plots.
 
 Epic poetry agrees with Tragedy in so far as it is an imitation in verse
 of characters of a higher type. They differ, in that Epic poetry admits
 but one kind of metre, and is narrative in form. They differ, again,
 in their length: for Tragedy endeavours, as far as possible, to confine
 itself to a single revolution of the sun, or but slightly to exceed this
 limit; whereas the Epic action has no limits of time. This, then, is
 a second point of difference; though at first the same freedom was
 admitted in Tragedy as in Epic poetry.
 
 Of their constituent parts some are common to both, some peculiar to
 Tragedy, whoever, therefore, knows what is good or bad Tragedy, knows
 also about Epic poetry. All the elements of an Epic poem are found in
 Tragedy, but the elements of a Tragedy are not all found in the Epic
 poem.
 
 
 
 
 VI
 
 Of the poetry which imitates in hexameter verse, and of Comedy, we
 will speak hereafter. Let us now discuss Tragedy, resuming its formal
 definition, as resulting from what has been already said.
 
 Tragedy, then, is an imitation of an action that is serious, complete,
 and of a certain magnitude; in language embellished with each kind of
 artistic ornament, the several kinds being found in separate parts of
 the play; in the form of action, not of narrative; through pity and
 fear effecting the proper purgation of these emotions. By 'language
 embellished,' I mean language into which rhythm, 'harmony,' and song
 enter. By 'the several kinds in separate parts,' I mean, that some parts
 are rendered through the medium of verse alone, others again with the
 aid of song.
 
 Now as tragic imitation implies persons acting, it necessarily follows,
 in the first place, that Spectacular equipment will be a part of
 Tragedy. Next, Song and Diction, for these are the medium of imitation.
 By 'Diction' I mean the mere metrical arrangement of the words: as for
 'Song,' it is a term whose sense every one understands.
 
 Again, Tragedy is the imitation of an action; and an action implies
 personal agents, who necessarily possess certain distinctive qualities
 both of character and thought; for it is by these that we qualify
 actions themselves, and these--thought and character--are the two
 natural causes from which actions spring, and on actions again all
 success or failure depends. Hence, the Plot is the imitation of the
 action: for by plot I here mean the arrangement of the incidents. By
 Character I mean that in virtue of which we ascribe certain qualities to
 the agents. Thought is required wherever a statement is proved, or, it
 may be, a general truth enunciated. Every Tragedy, therefore, must have
 six parts, which parts determine its quality--namely, Plot, Character,
 Diction, Thought, Spectacle, Song. Two of the parts constitute the
 medium of imitation, one the manner, and three the objects of imitation.
 And these complete the list. These elements have been employed, we may
 say, by the poets to a man; in fact, every play contains Spectacular
 elements as well as Character, Plot, Diction, Song, and Thought.
 
 But most important of all is the structure of the incidents. For Tragedy
 is an imitation, not of men, but of an action and of life, and life
 consists in action, and its end is a mode of action, not a quality. Now
 character determines men's qualities, but it is by their actions that
 they are happy or the reverse. Dramatic action, therefore, is not with
 a view to the representation of character: character comes in as
 subsidiary to the actions. Hence the incidents and the plot are the
 end of a tragedy; and the end is the chief thing of all. Again, without
 action there cannot be a tragedy; there may be without character.
 The tragedies of most of our modern poets fail in the rendering of
 character; and of poets in general this is often true. It is the same
 in painting; and here lies the difference between Zeuxis and Polygnotus.
 Polygnotus delineates character well: the style of Zeuxis is devoid
 of ethical quality. Again, if you string together a set of speeches
 expressive of character, and well finished in point of diction and
 thought, you will not produce the essential tragic effect nearly so well
 as with a play which, however deficient in these respects, yet has a
 plot and artistically constructed incidents. Besides which, the most
 powerful elements of emotional: interest in Tragedy Peripeteia or
 Reversal of the Situation, and Recognition scenes--are parts of the
 plot. A further proof is, that novices in the art attain to finish: of
 diction and precision of portraiture before they can construct the plot.
 It is the same with almost all the early poets.
 
 The Plot, then, is the first principle, and, as it were, the soul of
 a tragedy: Character holds the second place. A similar fact is seen in
 painting. The most beautiful colours, laid on confusedly, will not give
 as much pleasure as the chalk outline of a portrait. Thus Tragedy is
 the imitation of an action, and of the agents mainly with a view to the
 action.
 
 Third in order is Thought,--that is, the faculty of saying what is
 possible and pertinent in given circumstances. In the case of oratory,
 this is the function of the Political art and of the art of rhetoric:
 and so indeed the older poets make their characters speak the language
 of civic life; the poets of our time, the language of the rhetoricians.
 Character is that which reveals moral purpose, showing what kind of
 things a man chooses or avoids. Speeches, therefore, which do not make
 this manifest, or in which the speaker does not choose or avoid anything
 whatever, are not expressive of character. Thought, on the other hand,
 is found where something is proved to be, or not to be, or a general
 maxim is enunciated.
 
 Fourth among the elements enumerated comes Diction; by which I mean, as
 has been already said, the expression of the meaning in words; and its
 essence is the same both in verse and prose.
 
 Of the remaining elements Song holds the chief place among the
 embellishments.
 
 The Spectacle has, indeed, an emotional attraction of its own, but, of
 all the parts, it is the least artistic, and connected least with the
 art of poetry. For the power of Tragedy, we may be sure, is felt
 even apart from representation and actors. Besides, the production of
 spectacular effects depends more on the art of the stage machinist than
 on that of the poet.
 
 
 
 
 VII
 
 These principles being established, let us now discuss the proper
 structure of the Plot, since this is the first and most important thing
 in Tragedy.
 
 Now, according to our definition, Tragedy is an imitation of an action
 that is complete, and whole, and of a certain magnitude; for there may
 be a whole that is wanting in magnitude. A whole is that which has a
 beginning, a middle, and an end. A beginning is that which does not
 itself follow anything by causal necessity, but after which something
 naturally is or comes to be. An end, on the contrary, is that which
 itself naturally follows some other thing, either by necessity, or as
 a rule, but has nothing following it. A middle is that which follows
 something as some other thing follows it. A well constructed plot,
 therefore, must neither begin nor end at haphazard, but conform to these
 principles.
 
 Again, a beautiful object, whether it be a living organism or any whole
 composed of parts, must not only have an orderly arrangement of parts,
 but must also be of a certain magnitude; for beauty depends on magnitude
 and order. Hence a very small animal organism cannot be beautiful;
 for the view of it is confused, the object being seen in an almost
 imperceptible moment of time. Nor, again, can one of vast size be
 beautiful; for as the eye cannot take it all in at once, the unity and
 sense of the whole is lost for the spectator; as for instance if there
 were one a thousand miles long. As, therefore, in the case of animate
 bodies and organisms a certain magnitude is necessary, and a magnitude
 which may be easily embraced in one view; so in the plot, a certain
 length is necessary, and a length which can be easily embraced by the
 memory. The limit of length in relation to dramatic competition and
 sensuous presentment, is no part of artistic theory. For had it been the
 rule for a hundred tragedies to compete together, the performance would
 have been regulated by the water-clock,--as indeed we are told was
 formerly done. But the limit as fixed by the nature of the drama itself
 is this: the greater the length, the more beautiful will the piece be
 by reason of its size, provided that the whole be perspicuous. And
 to define the matter roughly, we may say that the proper magnitude is
 comprised within such limits, that the sequence of events, according
 to the law of probability or necessity, will admit of a change from bad
 fortune to good, or from good fortune to bad.
 
 
 
 
 VIII
 
 Unity of plot does not, as some persons think, consist in the Unity of
 the hero. For infinitely various are the incidents in one man's life
 which cannot be reduced to unity; and so, too, there are many actions of
 one man out of which we cannot make one action. Hence, the error, as it
 appears, of all poets who have composed a Heracleid, a Theseid, or other
 poems of the kind. They imagine that as Heracles was one man, the story
 of Heracles must also be a unity. But Homer, as in all else he is of
 surpassing merit, here too--whether from art or natural genius--seems
 to have happily discerned the truth. In composing the Odyssey he did not
 include all the adventures of Odysseus--such as his wound on Parnassus,
 or his feigned madness at the mustering of the host--incidents between
 which there was no necessary or probable connection: but he made the
 Odyssey, and likewise the Iliad, to centre round an action that in our
 sense of the word is one. As therefore, in the other imitative arts, the
 imitation is one when the object imitated is one, so the plot, being an
 imitation of an action, must imitate one action and that a whole, the
 structural union of the parts being such that, if any one of them is
 displaced or removed, the whole will be disjointed and disturbed. For a
 thing whose presence or absence makes no visible difference, is not an
 organic part of the whole.
 
 
 
 
 IX
 
 It is, moreover, evident from what has been said, that it is not
 the function of the poet to relate what has happened, but what may
 happen,--what is possible according to the law of probability or
 necessity. The poet and the historian differ not by writing in verse or
 in prose. The work of Herodotus might be put into verse, and it would
 still be a species of history, with metre no less than without it. The
 true difference is that one relates what has happened, the other what
 may happen. Poetry, therefore, is a more philosophical and a higher
 thing than history: for poetry tends to express the universal, history
 the particular. By the universal, I mean how a person of a certain type
 will on occasion speak or act, according to the law of probability or
 necessity; and it is this universality at which poetry aims in the names
 she attaches to the personages. The particular is--for example--what
 Alcibiades did or suffered. In Comedy this is already apparent: for here
 the poet first constructs the plot on the lines of probability, and then
 inserts characteristic names;--unlike the lampooners who write about
 particular individuals. But tragedians still keep to real names, the
 reason being that what is possible is credible: what has not happened
 we do not at once feel sure to be possible: but what has happened is
 manifestly possible: otherwise it would not have happened. Still there
 are even some tragedies in which there are only one or two well known
 names, the rest being fictitious. In others, none are well known, as in
 Agathon's Antheus, where incidents and names alike are fictitious, and
 yet they give none the less pleasure. We must not, therefore, at all
 costs keep to the received legends, which are the usual subjects of
 Tragedy. Indeed, it would be absurd to attempt it; for even subjects
 that are known are known only to a few, and yet give pleasure to all.
 It clearly follows that the poet or 'maker' should be the maker of plots
 rather than of verses; since he is a poet because he imitates, and what
 he imitates are actions. And even if he chances to take an historical
 subject, he is none the less a poet; for there is no reason why some
 events that have actually happened should not conform to the law of the
 probable and possible, and in virtue of that quality in them he is their
 poet or maker.
 
 Of all plots and actions the epeisodic are the worst. I call a plot
 'epeisodic' in which the episodes or acts succeed one another without
 probable or necessary sequence. Bad poets compose such pieces by their
 own fault, good poets, to please the players; for, as they write show
 pieces for competition, they stretch the plot beyond its capacity, and
 are often forced to break the natural continuity.
 
 But again, Tragedy is an imitation not only of a complete action, but of
 events inspiring fear or pity. Such an effect is best produced when the
 events come on us by sunrise; and the effect is heightened when, at the
 same time, they follow as cause and effect. The tragic wonder will thee
 be greater than if they happened of themselves or by accident; for even
 coincidences are most striking when they have an air of design. We may
 instance the statue of Mitys at Argos, which fell upon his murderer
 while he was a spectator at a festival, and killed him. Such events seem
 not to be due to mere chance. Plots, therefore, constructed on these
 principles are necessarily the best.
 
 
 
 
 X
 
 Plots are either Simple or Complex, for the actions in real life, of
 which the plots are an imitation, obviously show a similar distinction.
 An action which is one and continuous in the sense above defined, I call
 Simple, when the change of fortune takes place without Reversal of the
 Situation and without Recognition.
 
 A Complex action is one in which the change is accompanied by such
 Reversal, or by Recognition, or by both. These last should arise from
 the internal structure of the plot, so that what follows should be the
 necessary or probable result of the preceding action. It makes all the
 difference whether any given event is a case of propter hoc or post hoc.
 
 
 
 
 XI
 
 Reversal of the Situation is a change by which the action veers round
 to its opposite, subject always to our rule of probability or necessity.
 Thus in the Oedipus, the messenger comes to cheer Oedipus and free
 him from his alarms about his mother, but by revealing who he is, he
 produces the opposite effect. Again in the Lynceus, Lynceus is being led
 away to his death, and Danaus goes with him, meaning, to slay him; but
 the outcome of the preceding incidents is that Danaus is killed and
 Lynceus saved. Recognition, as the name indicates, is a change from
 ignorance to knowledge, producing love or hate between the persons
 destined by the poet for good or bad fortune. The best form of
 recognition is coincident with a Reversal of the Situation, as in the
 Oedipus. There are indeed other forms. Even inanimate things of the most
 trivial kind may in a sense be objects of recognition. Again, we may
 recognise or discover whether a person has done a thing or not. But the
 recognition which is most intimately connected with the plot and action
 is, as we have said, the recognition of persons. This recognition,
 combined, with Reversal, will produce either pity or fear; and actions
 producing these effects are those which, by our definition, Tragedy
 represents. Moreover, it is upon such situations that the issues of good
 or bad fortune will depend. Recognition, then, being between persons,
 it may happen that one person only is recognised by the other-when the
 latter is already known--or it may be necessary that the recognition
 should be on both sides. Thus Iphigenia is revealed to Orestes by the
 sending of the letter; but another act of recognition is required to
 make Orestes known to Iphigenia.
 
 Two parts, then, of the Plot--Reversal of the Situation and
 Recognition--turn upon surprises. A third part is the Scene of
 Suffering. The Scene of Suffering is a destructive or painful action,
 such as death on the stage, bodily agony, wounds and the like.
 
 
 
 
 XII
 
 [The parts of Tragedy which must be treated as elements of the whole
 have been already mentioned. We now come to the quantitative parts,
 and the separate parts into which Tragedy is divided, namely, Prologue,
 Episode, Exode, Choric song; this last being divided into Parode and
 Stasimon. These are common to all plays: peculiar to some are the songs
 of actors from the stage and the Commoi.
 
 The Prologue is that entire part of a tragedy which precedes the Parode
 of the Chorus. The Episode is that entire part of a tragedy which
 is between complete choric songs. The Exode is that entire part of a
 tragedy which has no choric song after it. Of the Choric part the Parode
 is the first undivided utterance of the Chorus: the Stasimon is a Choric
 ode without anapaests or trochaic tetrameters: the Commos is a joint
 lamentation of Chorus and actors. The parts of Tragedy which must
 be treated as elements of the whole have been already mentioned. The
 quantitative parts the separate parts into which it is divided--are here
 enumerated.]
 
 
 
 
 XIII
 
 As the sequel to what has already been said, we must proceed to consider
 what the poet should aim at, and what he should avoid, in constructing
 his plots; and by what means the specific effect of Tragedy will be
 produced.
 
 A perfect tragedy should, as we have seen, be arranged not on the simple
 but on the complex plan. It should, moreover, imitate actions which
 excite pity and fear, this being the distinctive mark of tragic
 imitation. It follows plainly, in the first place, that the change, of
 fortune presented must not be the spectacle of a virtuous man brought
 from prosperity to adversity: for this moves neither pity nor fear; it
 merely shocks us. Nor, again, that of a bad man passing from adversity
 to prosperity: for nothing can be more alien to the spirit of Tragedy;
 it possesses no single tragic quality; it neither satisfies the moral
 sense nor calls forth pity or fear. Nor, again, should the downfall of
 the utter villain be exhibited. A plot of this kind would, doubtless,
 satisfy the moral sense, but it would inspire neither pity nor fear; for
 pity is aroused by unmerited misfortune, fear by the misfortune of a man
 like ourselves. Such an event, therefore, will be neither pitiful
 nor terrible. There remains, then, the character between these two
 extremes,--that of a man who is not eminently good and just,-yet whose
 misfortune is brought about not by vice or depravity, but by some error
 or frailty. He must be one who is highly renowned and prosperous,--a
 personage like Oedipus, Thyestes, or other illustrious men of such
 families.
 
 A well constructed plot should, therefore, be single in its issue,
 rather than double as some maintain. The change of fortune should be not
 from bad to good, but, reversely, from good to bad. It should come about
 as the result not of vice, but of some great error or frailty, in a
 character either such as we have described, or better rather than
 worse. The practice of the stage bears out our view. At first the poets
 recounted any legend that came in their way. Now, the best tragedies
 are founded on the story of a few houses, on the fortunes of Alcmaeon,
 Oedipus, Orestes, Meleager, Thyestes, Telephus, and those others who
 have done or suffered something terrible. A tragedy, then, to be perfect
 according to the rules of art should be of this construction. Hence
 they are in error who censure Euripides just because he follows this
 principle in his plays, many of which end unhappily. It is, as we have
 said, the right ending. The best proof is that on the stage and in
 dramatic competition, such plays, if well worked out, are the most
 tragic in effect; and Euripides, faulty though he may be in the general
 management of his subject, yet is felt to be the most tragic of the
 poets.
 
 In the second rank comes the kind of tragedy which some place first.
 Like the Odyssey, it has a double thread of plot, and also an opposite
 catastrophe for the good and for the bad. It is accounted the best
 because of the weakness of the spectators; for the poet is guided in
 what he writes by the wishes of his audience. The pleasure, however,
 thence derived is not the true tragic pleasure. It is proper rather to
 Comedy, where those who, in the piece, are the deadliest enemies--like
 Orestes and Aegisthus--quit the stage as friends at the close, and no
 one slays or is slain.
 
 
 
 
 XIV
 
 Fear and pity may be aroused by spectacular means; but they may also
 result from the inner structure of the piece, which is the better way,
 and indicates a superior poet. For the plot ought to be so constructed
 that, even without the aid of the eye, he who hears the tale told will
 thrill with horror and melt to pity at what takes place. This is the
 impression we should receive from hearing the story of the Oedipus. But
 to produce this effect by the mere spectacle is a less artistic method,
 and dependent on extraneous aids. Those who employ spectacular means
 to create a sense not of the terrible but only of the monstrous, are
 strangers to the purpose of Tragedy; for we must not demand of Tragedy
 any and every kind of pleasure, but only that which is proper to it. And
 since the pleasure which the poet should afford is that which comes from
 pity and fear through imitation, it is evident that this quality must be
 impressed upon the incidents.
 
 Let us then determine what are the circumstances which strike us as
 terrible or pitiful.
 
 Actions capable of this effect must happen between persons who are
 either friends or enemies or indifferent to one another. If an enemy
 kills an enemy, there is nothing to excite pity either in the act or
 the intention,--except so far as the suffering in itself is pitiful.
 So again with indifferent persons. But when the tragic incident occurs
 between those who are near or dear to one another--if, for example, a
 brother kills, or intends to kill, a brother, a son his father, a mother
 her son, a son his mother, or any other deed of the kind is done--these
 are the situations to be looked for by the poet. He may not indeed
 destroy the framework of the received legends--the fact, for instance,
 that Clytemnestra was slain by Orestes and Eriphyle by Alcmaeon but he
 ought to show invention of his own, and skilfully handle the traditional
 material. Let us explain more clearly what is meant by skilful handling.
 
 The action may be done consciously and with knowledge of the persons, in
 the manner of the older poets. It is thus too that Euripides makes Medea
 slay her children. Or, again, the deed of horror may be done, but
 done in ignorance, and the tie of kinship or friendship be discovered
 afterwards. The Oedipus of Sophocles is an example. Here, indeed, the
 incident is outside the drama proper; but cases occur where it falls
 within the action of the play: one may cite the Alcmaeon of Astydamas,
 or Telegonus in the Wounded Odysseus. Again, there is a third case,--<to
 be about to act with knowledge of the persons and then not to act. The
 fourth case is> when some one is about to do an irreparable deed through
 ignorance, and makes the discovery before it is done. These are the only
 possible ways. For the deed must either be done or not done,--and that
 wittingly or unwittingly. But of all these ways, to be about to act
 knowing the persons, and then not to act, is the worst. It is shocking
 without being tragic, for no disaster follows. It is, therefore, never,
 or very rarely, found in poetry. One instance, however, is in the
 Antigone, where Haemon threatens to kill Creon. The next and better way
 is that the deed should be perpetrated. Still better, that it should be
 perpetrated in ignorance, and the discovery made afterwards. There
 is then nothing to shock us, while the discovery produces a startling
 effect. The last case is the best, as when in the Cresphontes Merope is
 about to slay her son, but, recognising who he is, spares his life. So
 in the Iphigenia, the sister recognises the brother just in time. Again
 in the Helle, the son recognises the mother when on the point of giving
 her up. This, then, is why a few families only, as has been already
 observed, furnish the subjects of tragedy. It was not art, but happy
 chance, that led the poets in search of subjects to impress the tragic
 quality upon their plots. They are compelled, therefore, to have
 recourse to those houses whose history contains moving incidents like
 these.
 
 Enough has now been said concerning the structure of the incidents, and
 the right kind of plot.
 
 
 
 
 XV
 
 In respect of Character there are four things to be aimed at. First, and
 most important, it must be good. Now any speech or action that manifests
 moral purpose of any kind will be expressive of character: the character
 will be good if the purpose is good. This rule is relative to each
 class. Even a woman may be good, and also a slave; though the woman
 may be said to be an inferior being, and the slave quite worthless. The
 second thing to aim at is propriety. There is a type of manly valour;
 but valour in a woman, or unscrupulous cleverness, is inappropriate.
 Thirdly, character must be true to life: for this is a distinct thing
 from goodness and propriety, as here described. The fourth point is
 consistency: for though the subject of the imitation, who suggested the
 type, be inconsistent, still he must be consistently inconsistent. As an
 example of motiveless degradation of character, we have Menelaus in
 the Orestes: of character indecorous and inappropriate, the lament of
 Odysseus in the Scylla, and the speech of Melanippe: of inconsistency,
 the Iphigenia at Aulis,--for Iphigenia the suppliant in no way resembles
 her later self.
 
 As in the structure of the plot, so too in the portraiture of character,
 the poet should always aim either at the necessary or the probable. Thus
 a person of a given character should speak or act in a given way, by the
 rule either of necessity or of probability; just as this event should
 follow that by necessary or probable sequence. It is therefore evident
 that the unravelling of the plot, no less than the complication, must
 arise out of the plot itself, it must not be brought about by the 'Deus
 ex Machina'--as in the Medea, or in the Return of the Greeks in the
 Iliad. The 'Deus ex Machina' should be employed only for events external
 to the drama,--for antecedent or subsequent events, which lie beyond the
 range of human knowledge, and which require to be reported or foretold;
 for to the gods we ascribe the power of seeing all things. Within the
 action there must be nothing irrational. If the irrational cannot be
 excluded, it should be outside the scope of the tragedy. Such is the
 irrational element in the Oedipus of Sophocles.
 
 Again, since Tragedy is an imitation of persons who are above the common
 level, the example of good portrait-painters should be followed. They,
 while reproducing the distinctive form of the original, make a likeness
 which is true to life and yet more beautiful. So too the poet, in
 representing men who are irascible or indolent, or have other defects
 of character, should preserve the type and yet ennoble it. In this way
 Achilles is portrayed by Agathon and Homer.
 
 These then are rules the poet should observe. Nor should he neglect
 those appeals to the senses, which, though not among the essentials, are
 the concomitants of poetry; for here too there is much room for error.
 But of this enough has been said in our published treatises.
 
 
 
 
 XVI
 
 What Recognition is has been already explained. We will now enumerate
 its kinds.
 
 First, the least artistic form, which, from poverty of wit, is
 most commonly employed recognition by signs. Of these some are
 congenital,--such as 'the spear which the earth-born race bear on their
 bodies,' or the stars introduced by Carcinus in his Thyestes. Others are
 acquired after birth; and of these some are bodily marks, as scars; some
 external tokens, as necklaces, or the little ark in the Tyro by which
 the discovery is effected. Even these admit of more or less skilful
 treatment. Thus in the recognition of Odysseus by his scar, the
 discovery is made in one way by the nurse, in another by the swineherds.
 The use of tokens for the express purpose of proof--and, indeed,
 any formal proof with or without tokens--is a less artistic mode of
 recognition. A better kind is that which comes about by a turn of
 incident, as in the Bath Scene in the Odyssey.
 
 Next come the recognitions invented at will by the poet, and on that
 account wanting in art. For example, Orestes in the Iphigenia reveals
 the fact that he is Orestes. She, indeed, makes herself known by the
 letter; but he, by speaking himself, and saying what the poet, not what
 the plot requires. This, therefore, is nearly allied to the fault above
 mentioned:--for Orestes might as well have brought tokens with him.
 Another similar instance is the 'voice of the shuttle' in the Tereus of
 Sophocles.
 
 The third kind depends on memory when the sight of some object awakens
 a feeling: as in the Cyprians of Dicaeogenes, where the hero breaks into
 tears on seeing the picture; or again in the 'Lay of Alcinous,' where
 Odysseus, hearing the minstrel play the lyre, recalls the past and
 weeps; and hence the recognition.
 
 The fourth kind is by process of reasoning. Thus in the Choephori: 'Some
 one resembling me has come: no one resembles me but Orestes: therefore
 Orestes has come.' Such too is the discovery made by Iphigenia in the
 play of Polyidus the Sophist. It was a natural reflection for Orestes to
 make, 'So I too must die at the altar like my sister.' So, again, in
 the Tydeus of Theodectes, the father says, 'I came to find my son, and
 I lose my own life.' So too in the Phineidae: the women, on seeing the
 place, inferred their fate:--'Here we are doomed to die, for here
 we were cast forth.' Again, there is a composite kind of recognition
 involving false inference on the part of one of the characters, as in
 the Odysseus Disguised as a Messenger. A said <that no one else was able
 to bend the bow;... hence B (the disguised Odysseus) imagined that A
 would> recognise the bow which, in fact, he had not seen; and to bring
 about a recognition by this means that the expectation A would recognise
 the bow is false inference.
 
 But, of all recognitions, the best is that which arises from the
 incidents themselves, where the startling discovery is made by natural
 means. Such is that in the Oedipus of Sophocles, and in the Iphigenia;
 for it was natural that Iphigenia should wish to dispatch a letter.
 These recognitions alone dispense with the artificial aid of tokens or
 amulets. Next come the recognitions by process of reasoning.
 
 
 
 
 XVII
 
 In constructing the plot and working it out with the proper diction,
 the poet should place the scene, as far as possible, before his eyes. In
 this way, seeing everything with the utmost vividness, as if he were a
 spectator of the action, he will discover what is in keeping with it,
 and be most unlikely to overlook inconsistencies. The need of such a
 rule is shown by the fault found in Carcinus. Amphiaraus was on his way
 from the temple. This fact escaped the observation of one who did not
 see the situation. On the stage, however, the piece failed, the audience
 being offended at the oversight.
 
 Again, the poet should work out his play, to the best of his power, with
 appropriate gestures; for those who feel emotion are most convincing
 through natural sympathy with the characters they represent; and one
 who is agitated storms, one who is angry rages, with the most life-like
 reality. Hence poetry implies either a happy gift of nature or a strain
 of madness. In the one case a man can take the mould of any character;
 in the other, he is lifted out of his proper self.
 
 As for the story, whether the poet takes it ready made or constructs it
 for himself, he should first sketch its general outline, and then
 fill in the episodes and amplify in detail. The general plan may be
 illustrated by the Iphigenia. A young girl is sacrificed; she disappears
 mysteriously from the eyes of those who sacrificed her; She is
 transported to another country, where the custom is to offer up all
 strangers to the goddess. To this ministry she is appointed. Some time
 later her own brother chances to arrive. The fact that the oracle for
 some reason ordered him to go there, is outside the general plan of the
 play. The purpose, again, of his coming is outside the action proper.
 However, he comes, he is seized, and, when on the point of being
 sacrificed, reveals who he is. The mode of recognition may be either
 that of Euripides or of Polyidus, in whose play he exclaims very
 naturally:--'So it was not my sister only, but I too, who was doomed to
 be sacrificed'; and by that remark he is saved.
 
 After this, the names being once given, it remains to fill in the
 episodes. We must see that they are relevant to the action. In the case
 of Orestes, for example, there is the madness which led to his capture,
 and his deliverance by means of the purificatory rite. In the drama, the
 episodes are short, but it is these that give extension to Epic poetry.
 Thus the story of the Odyssey can be stated briefly. A certain man is
 absent from home for many years; he is jealously watched by Poseidon,
 and left desolate. Meanwhile his home is in a wretched plight--suitors
 are wasting his substance and plotting against his son. At length,
 tempest-tost, he himself arrives; he makes certain persons acquainted
 with him; he attacks the suitors with his own hand, and is himself
 preserved while he destroys them. This is the essence of the plot; the
 rest is episode.
 
 
 
 
 XVIII
 
 Every tragedy falls into two parts,--Complication and Unravelling or
 Denouement. Incidents extraneous to the action are frequently combined
 with a portion of the action proper, to form the Complication; the rest
 is the Unravelling. By the Complication I mean all that extends from
 the beginning of the action to the part which marks the turning-point
 to good or bad fortune. The Unravelling is that which extends from the
 beginning of the change to the end. Thus, in the Lynceus of Theodectes,
 the Complication consists of the incidents presupposed in the drama, the
 seizure of the child, and then again, The Unravelling extends from
 the accusation of murder to the end.
 
 There are four kinds of Tragedy, the Complex, depending entirely on
 Reversal of the Situation and Recognition; the Pathetic (where the
 motive is passion),--such as the tragedies on Ajax and Ixion; the
 Ethical (where the motives are ethical),--such as the Phthiotides and
 the Peleus. The fourth kind is the Simple <We here exclude the purely
 spectacular element>, exemplified by the Phorcides, the Prometheus, and
 scenes laid in Hades. The poet should endeavour, if possible, to combine
 all poetic elements; or failing that, the greatest number and those the
 most important; the more so, in face of the cavilling criticism of the
 day. For whereas there have hitherto been good poets, each in his own
 branch, the critics now expect one man to surpass all others in their
 several lines of excellence.
 
 In speaking of a tragedy as the same or different, the best test to take
 is the plot. Identity exists where the Complication and Unravelling are
 the same. Many poets tie the knot well, but unravel it ill. Both arts,
 however, should always be mastered.
 
 Again, the poet should remember what has been often said, and not make
 an Epic structure into a Tragedy--by an Epic structure I mean one with
 a multiplicity of plots--as if, for instance, you were to make a tragedy
 out of the entire story of the Iliad. In the Epic poem, owing to its
 length, each part assumes its proper magnitude. In the drama the result
 is far from answering to the poet's expectation. The proof is that the
 poets who have dramatised the whole story of the Fall of Troy, instead
 of selecting portions, like Euripides; or who have taken the whole
 tale of Niobe, and not a part of her story, like Aeschylus, either fail
 utterly or meet with poor success on the stage. Even Agathon has been
 known to fail from this one defect. In his Reversals of the Situation,
 however, he shows a marvellous skill in the effort to hit the popular
 taste,--to produce a tragic effect that satisfies the moral sense. This
 effect is produced when the clever rogue, like Sisyphus, is outwitted,
 or the brave villain defeated. Such an event is probable in Agathon's
 sense of the word: 'it is probable,' he says, 'that many things should
 happen contrary to probability.'
 
 The Chorus too should be regarded as one of the actors; it should be an
 integral part of the whole, and share in the action, in the manner not
 of Euripides but of Sophocles. As for the later poets, their choral
 songs pertain as little to the subject of the piece as to that of any
 other tragedy. They are, therefore, sung as mere interludes, a practice
 first begun by Agathon. Yet what difference is there between introducing
 such choral interludes, and transferring a speech, or even a whole act,
 from one play to another?
 
 
 
 
 XIX
 
 It remains to speak of Diction and Thought, the other parts of Tragedy
 having been already discussed. Concerning Thought, we may assume what
 is said in the Rhetoric, to which inquiry the subject more strictly
 belongs. Under Thought is included every effect which has to be produced
 by speech, the subdivisions being,--proof and refutation; the excitation
 of the feelings, such as pity, fear, anger, and the like; the suggestion
 of importance or its opposite. Now, it is evident that the dramatic
 incidents must be treated from the same points of view as the dramatic
 speeches, when the object is to evoke the sense of pity, fear,
 importance, or probability. The only difference is, that the incidents
 should speak for themselves without verbal exposition; while the effects
 aimed at in speech should be produced by the speaker, and as a result of
 the speech. For what were the business of a speaker, if the Thought were
 revealed quite apart from what he says?
 
 Next, as regards Diction. One branch of the inquiry treats of the Modes
 of Utterance. But this province of knowledge belongs to the art
 of Delivery and to the masters of that science. It includes, for
 instance,--what is a command, a prayer, a statement, a threat, a
 question, an answer, and so forth. To know or not to know these things
 involves no serious censure upon the poet's art. For who can admit
 the fault imputed to Homer by Protagoras,--that in the words, 'Sing,
 goddess, of the wrath,' he gives a command under the idea that he utters
 a prayer? For to tell some one to do a thing or not to do it is, he
 says, a command. We may, therefore, pass this over as an inquiry that
 belongs to another art, not to poetry.
 
 
 
 
 XX
 
 [Language in general includes the following parts:--Letter, Syllable,
 Connecting word, Noun, Verb, Inflexion or Case, Sentence or Phrase.
 
 A Letter is an indivisible sound, yet not every such sound, but only
 one which can form part of a group of sounds. For even brutes utter
 indivisible sounds, none of which I call a letter. The sound I mean
 may be either a vowel, a semi-vowel, or a mute. A vowel is that which
 without impact of tongue or lip has an audible sound. A semi-vowel, that
 which with such impact has an audible sound, as S and R. A mute, that
 which with such impact has by itself no sound, but joined to a vowel
 sound becomes audible, as G and D. These are distinguished according
 to the form assumed by the mouth and the place where they are produced;
 according as they are aspirated or smooth, long or short; as they are
 acute, grave, or of an intermediate tone; which inquiry belongs in
 detail to the writers on metre.
 
 A Syllable is a non-significant sound, composed of a mute and a
 vowel: for GR without A is a syllable, as also with A,--GRA. But the
 investigation of these differences belongs also to metrical science.
 
 A Connecting word is a non-significant sound, which neither causes nor
 hinders the union of many sounds into one significant sound; it may
 be placed at either end or in the middle of a sentence. Or, a
 non-significant sound, which out of several sounds, each of them
 significant, is capable of forming one significant sound,--as {alpha mu
 theta iota}, {pi epsilon rho iota}, and the like. Or, a non-significant
 sound, which marks the beginning, end, or division of a sentence; such,
 however, that it cannot correctly stand by itself at the beginning of a
 sentence, as {mu epsilon nu}, {eta tau omicron iota}, {delta epsilon}.
 
 A Noun is a composite significant sound, not marking time, of which no
 part is in itself significant: for in double or compound words we do not
 employ the separate parts as if each were in itself significant. Thus
 in Theodorus, 'god-given,' the {delta omega rho omicron nu} or 'gift' is
 not in itself significant.
 
 A Verb is a composite significant sound, marking time, in which, as in
 the noun, no part is in itself significant. For 'man,' or 'white' does
 not express the idea of 'when'; but 'he walks,' or 'he has walked' does
 connote time, present or past.
 
 Inflexion belongs both to the noun and verb, and expresses either the
 relation 'of,' 'to,' or the like; or that of number, whether one or
 many, as 'man' or 'men '; or the modes or tones in actual delivery, e.g.
 a question or a command. 'Did he go?' and 'go' are verbal inflexions of
 this kind.
 
 A Sentence or Phrase is a composite significant sound, some at least of
 whose parts are in themselves significant; for not every such group
 of words consists of verbs and nouns--'the definition of man,' for
 example--but it may dispense even with the verb. Still it will always
 have some significant part, as 'in walking,' or 'Cleon son of Cleon.' A
 sentence or phrase may form a unity in two ways,--either as signifying
 one thing, or as consisting of several parts linked together. Thus the
 Iliad is one by the linking together of parts, the definition of man by
 the unity of the thing signified.]
 
 
 
 
 XXI
 
 Words are of two kinds, simple and double. By simple I mean those
 composed of non-significant elements, such as {gamma eta}. By double
 or compound, those composed either of a significant and non-significant
 element (though within the whole word no element is significant), or
 of elements that are both significant. A word may likewise be triple,
 quadruple, or multiple in form, like so many Massilian expressions, e.g.
 'Hermo-caico-xanthus who prayed to Father Zeus>.'
 
 Every word is either current, or strange, or metaphorical, or
 ornamental, or newly-coined, or lengthened, or contracted, or altered.
 
 By a current or proper word I mean one which is in general use among
 a people; by a strange word, one which is in use in another country.
 Plainly, therefore, the same word may be at once strange and current,
 but not in relation to the same people. The word {sigma iota gamma
 upsilon nu omicron nu}, 'lance,' is to the Cyprians a current term but
 to us a strange one.
 
 Metaphor is the application of an alien name by transference either from
 genus to species, or from species to genus, or from species to species,
 or by analogy, that is, proportion. Thus from genus to species, as:
 'There lies my ship'; for lying at anchor is a species of lying. From
 species to genus, as: 'Verily ten thousand noble deeds hath Odysseus
 wrought'; for ten thousand is a species of large number, and is here
 used for a large number generally. From species to species, as: 'With
 blade of bronze drew away the life,' and 'Cleft the water with the
 vessel of unyielding bronze.' Here {alpha rho upsilon rho alpha iota},
 'to draw away,' is used for {tau alpha mu epsilon iota nu}, 'to cleave,'
 and {tau alpha mu epsilon iota nu} again for {alpha rho upsilon alpha
 iota},--each being a species of taking away. Analogy or proportion is
 when the second term is to the first as the fourth to the third. We
 may then use the fourth for the second, or the second for the fourth.
 Sometimes too we qualify the metaphor by adding the term to which the
 proper word is relative. Thus the cup is to Dionysus as the shield to
 Ares. The cup may, therefore, be called 'the shield of Dionysus,' and
 the shield 'the cup of Ares.' Or, again, as old age is to life, so is
 evening to day. Evening may therefore be called 'the old age of
 the day,' and old age, 'the evening of life,' or, in the phrase
 of Empedocles, 'life's setting sun.' For some of the terms of the
 proportion there is at times no word in existence; still the metaphor
 may be used. For instance, to scatter seed is called sowing: but the
 action of the sun in scattering his rays is nameless. Still this process
 bears to the sun the same relation as sowing to the seed. Hence the
 expression of the poet 'sowing the god-created light.' There is another
 way in which this kind of metaphor may be employed. We may apply an
 alien term, and then deny of that term one of its proper attributes; as
 if we were to call the shield, not 'the cup of Ares,' but 'the wineless
 cup.'
 
 {An ornamental word...}
 
 A newly-coined word is one which has never been even in local use, but
 is adopted by the poet himself. Some such words there appear to be: as
 {epsilon rho nu upsilon gamma epsilon sigma}, 'sprouters,' for {kappa
 epsilon rho alpha tau alpha}, 'horns,' and {alpha rho eta tau eta rho},
 'supplicator,' for {iota epsilon rho epsilon upsilon sigma}, 'priest.'
 
 A word is lengthened when its own vowel is exchanged for a longer one,
 or when a syllable is inserted. A word is contracted when some part of
 it is removed. Instances of lengthening are,--{pi omicron lambda eta
 omicron sigma} for {pi omicron lambda epsilon omega sigma}, and {Pi eta
 lambda eta iota alpha delta epsilon omega} for {Pi eta lambda epsilon
 iota delta omicron upsilon}: of contraction,--{kappa rho iota}, {delta
 omega}, and {omicron psi}, as in {mu iota alpha / gamma iota nu epsilon
 tau alpha iota / alpha mu phi omicron tau episilon rho omega nu /
 omicron psi}.
 
 An altered word is one in which part of the ordinary form is left
 unchanged, and part is re-cast; as in {delta epsilon xi iota-tau epsilon
 rho omicron nu / kappa alpha tau alpha / mu alpha zeta omicron nu},
 {delta epsilon xi iota tau epsilon rho omicron nu} is for {delta epsilon
 xi iota omicron nu}.
 
 [Nouns in themselves are either masculine, feminine, or neuter.
 Masculine are such as end in {nu}, {rho}, {sigma}, or in some letter
 compounded with {sigma},--these being two, and {xi}. Feminine, such as
 end in vowels that are always long, namely {eta} and {omega}, and--of
 vowels that admit of lengthening--those in {alpha}. Thus the number of
 letters in which nouns masculine and feminine end is the same; for {psi}
 and {xi} are equivalent to endings in {sigma}. No noun ends in a mute
 or a vowel short by nature. Three only end in {iota},--{mu eta lambda
 iota}, {kappa omicron mu mu iota}, {pi epsilon pi epsilon rho iota}:
 five end in {upsilon}. Neuter nouns end in these two latter vowels; also
 in {nu} and {sigma}.]
 
 
 
 
 XXII
 
 The perfection of style is to be clear without being mean. The clearest
 style is that which uses only current or proper words; at the same
 time it is mean:--witness the poetry of Cleophon and of Sthenelus. That
 diction, on the other hand, is lofty and raised above the commonplace
 which employs unusual words. By unusual, I mean strange (or rare) words,
 metaphorical, lengthened,--anything, in short, that differs from the
 normal idiom. Yet a style wholly composed of such words is either a
 riddle or a jargon; a riddle, if it consists of metaphors; a jargon, if
 it consists of strange (or rare) words. For the essence of a riddle is
 to express true facts under impossible combinations. Now this cannot be
 done by any arrangement of ordinary words, but by the use of metaphor it
 can. Such is the riddle:--'A man I saw who on another man had glued the
 bronze by aid of fire,' and others of the same kind. A diction that
 is made up of strange (or rare) terms is a jargon. A certain infusion,
 therefore, of these elements is necessary to style; for the strange (or
 rare) word, the metaphorical, the ornamental, and the other kinds above
 mentioned, will raise it above the commonplace and mean, while the use
 of proper words will make it perspicuous. But nothing contributes more
 to produce a clearness of diction that is remote from commonness than
 the lengthening, contraction, and alteration of words. For by deviating
 in exceptional cases from the normal idiom, the language will gain
 distinction; while, at the same time, the partial conformity with usage
 will give perspicuity. The critics, therefore, are in error who censure
 these licenses of speech, and hold the author up to ridicule. Thus
 Eucleides, the elder, declared that it would be an easy matter to be
 a poet if you might lengthen syllables at will. He caricatured the
 practice in the very form of his diction, as in the verse: '{Epsilon pi
 iota chi alpha rho eta nu / epsilon iota delta omicron nu / Mu alpha rho
 alpha theta omega nu alpha delta epsilon / Beta alpha delta iota zeta
 omicron nu tau alpha}, or, {omicron upsilon kappa / alpha nu / gamma /
 epsilon rho alpha mu epsilon nu omicron sigma / tau omicron nu / epsilon
 kappa epsilon iota nu omicron upsilon /epsilon lambda lambda epsilon
 beta omicron rho omicron nu}. To employ such license at all obtrusively
 is, no doubt, grotesque; but in any mode of poetic diction there must
 be moderation. Even metaphors, strange (or rare) words, or any similar
 forms of speech, would produce the like effect if used without propriety
 and with the express purpose of being ludicrous. How great a difference
 is made by the appropriate use of lengthening, may be seen in Epic
 poetry by the insertion of ordinary forms in the verse. So, again, if
 we take a strange (or rare) word, a metaphor, or any similar mode of
 expression, and replace it by the current or proper term, the truth of
 our observation will be manifest. For example Aeschylus and Euripides
 each composed the same iambic line. But the alteration of a single word
 by Euripides, who employed the rarer term instead of the ordinary one,
 makes one verse appear beautiful and the other trivial. Aeschylus in his
 Philoctetes says: {Phi alpha gamma epsilon delta alpha iota nu alpha /
 delta / eta / mu omicron upsilon / sigma alpha rho kappa alpha sigma /
 epsilon rho theta iota epsilon iota / pi omicron delta omicron sigma}.
 
 Euripides substitutes {Theta omicron iota nu alpha tau alpha iota}
 'feasts on' for {epsilon sigma theta iota epsilon iota} 'feeds on.'
 Again, in the line, {nu upsilon nu / delta epsilon / mu /epsilon omega
 nu / omicron lambda iota gamma iota gamma upsilon sigma / tau epsilon /
 kappa alpha iota / omicron upsilon tau iota delta alpha nu omicron sigma
 / kappa alpha iota / alpha epsilon iota kappa eta sigma), the difference
 will be felt if we substitute the common words, {nu upsilon nu / delta
 epsilon / mu / epsilon omega nu / mu iota kappa rho omicron sigma /
 tau epsilon / kappa alpha iota / alpha rho theta epsilon nu iota kappa
 omicron sigma / kappa alpha iota / alpha epsilon iota delta gamma
 sigma}. Or, if for the line, {delta iota phi rho omicron nu / alpha
 epsilon iota kappa epsilon lambda iota omicron nu / kappa alpha tau
 alpha theta epsilon iota sigma / omicron lambda iota gamma eta nu /
 tau epsilon / tau rho alpha pi epsilon iota sigma / omicron lambda iota
 gamma eta nu / tau epsilon / tau rho alpha pi epsilon zeta alpha nu,}
 We read, {delta iota phi rho omicron nu / mu omicron chi theta eta rho
 omicron nu / kappa alpha tau alpha theta epsilon iota sigma / mu iota
 kappa rho alpha nu / tau epsilon / tau rho alpha pi epsilon zeta alpha
 nu}.
 
 Or, for {eta iota omicron nu epsilon sigma / beta omicron omicron omega
 rho iota nu, eta iota omicron nu epsilon sigma kappa rho alpha zeta
 omicron upsilon rho iota nu}
 
 Again, Ariphrades ridiculed the tragedians for using phrases which no
 one would employ in ordinary speech: for example, {delta omega mu alpha
 tau omega nu / alpha pi omicron} instead of {alpha pi omicron / delta
 omega mu alpha tau omega nu}, {rho epsilon theta epsilon nu}, {epsilon
 gamma omega / delta epsilon / nu iota nu}, {Alpha chi iota lambda lambda
 epsilon omega sigma / pi epsilon rho iota} instead of {pi epsilon rho
 iota / 'Alpha chi iota lambda lambda epsilon omega sigma}, and the like.
 It is precisely because such phrases are not part of the current idiom
 that they give distinction to the style. This, however, he failed to
 see.
 
 It is a great matter to observe propriety in these several modes of
 expression, as also in compound words, strange (or rare) words, and so
 forth. But the greatest thing by far is to have a command of metaphor.
 This alone cannot be imparted by another; it is the mark of genius, for
 to make good metaphors implies an eye for resemblances.
 
 Of the various kinds of words, the compound are best adapted to
 Dithyrambs, rare words to heroic poetry, metaphors to iambic. In heroic
 poetry, indeed, all these varieties are serviceable. But in iambic
 verse, which reproduces, as far as may be, familiar speech, the most
 appropriate words are those which are found even in prose. These
 are,--the current or proper, the metaphorical, the ornamental.
 
 Concerning Tragedy and imitation by means of action this may suffice.
 
 
 
 
 XXIII
 
 As to that poetic imitation which is narrative in form and employs
 a single metre, the plot manifestly ought, as in a tragedy, to be
 constructed on dramatic principles. It should have for its subject a
 single action, whole and complete, with a beginning, a middle, and
 an end. It will thus resemble a living organism in all its unity, and
 produce the pleasure proper to it. It will differ in structure from
 historical compositions, which of necessity present not a single action,
 but a single period, and all that happened within that period to one
 person or to many, little connected together as the events may be. For
 as the sea-fight at Salamis and the battle with the Carthaginians in
 Sicily took place at the same time, but did not tend to any one result,
 so in the sequence of events, one thing sometimes follows another, and
 yet no single result is thereby produced. Such is the practice, we may
 say, of most poets. Here again, then, as has been already observed, the
 transcendent excellence of Homer is manifest. He never attempts to make
 the whole war of Troy the subject of his poem, though that war had
 a beginning and an end. It would have been too vast a theme, and not
 easily embraced in a single view. If, again, he had kept it within
 moderate limits, it must have been over-complicated by the variety of
 the incidents. As it is, he detaches a single portion, and admits as
 episodes many events from the general story of the war--such as the
 Catalogue of the ships and others--thus diversifying the poem. All other
 poets take a single hero, a single period, or an action single indeed,
 but with a multiplicity of parts. Thus did the author of the Cypria
 and of the Little Iliad. For this reason the Iliad and the Odyssey
 each furnish the subject of one tragedy, or, at most, of two; while the
 Cypria supplies materials for many, and the Little Iliad for eight--the
 Award of the Arms, the Philoctetes, the Neoptolemus, the Eurypylus, the
 Mendicant Odysseus, the Laconian Women, the Fall of Ilium, the Departure
 of the Fleet.
 
 
 
 
 XXIV
 
 Again, Epic poetry must have as many kinds as Tragedy: it must be
 simple, or complex, or 'ethical,' or 'pathetic.' The parts also, with
 the exception of song and spectacle, are the same; for it requires
 Reversals of the Situation, Recognitions, and Scenes of Suffering.
 Moreover, the thoughts and the diction must be artistic. In all these
 respects Homer is our earliest and sufficient model. Indeed each of
 his poems has a twofold character. The Iliad is at once simple and
 'pathetic,' and the Odyssey complex (for Recognition scenes run through
 it), and at the same time 'ethical.' Moreover, in diction and thought
 they are supreme.
 
 Epic poetry differs from Tragedy in the scale on which it is
 constructed, and in its metre. As regards scale or length, we have
 already laid down an adequate limit:--the beginning and the end must be
 capable of being brought within a single view. This condition will be
 satisfied by poems on a smaller scale than the old epics, and answering
 in length to the group of tragedies presented at a single sitting.
 
 Epic poetry has, however, a great--a special--capacity for enlarging
 its dimensions, and we can see the reason. In Tragedy we cannot imitate
 several lines of actions carried on at one and the same time; we must
 confine ourselves to the action on the stage and the part taken by the
 players. But in Epic poetry, owing to the narrative form, many events
 simultaneously transacted can be presented; and these, if relevant to
 the subject, add mass and dignity to the poem. The Epic has here an
 advantage, and one that conduces to grandeur of effect, to diverting the
 mind of the hearer, and relieving the story with varying episodes. For
 sameness of incident soon produces satiety, and makes tragedies fail on
 the stage.
 
 As for the metre, the heroic measure has proved its fitness by the test
 of experience. If a narrative poem in any other metre or in many metres
 were now composed, it would be found incongruous. For of all measures
 the heroic is the stateliest and the most massive; and hence it most
 readily admits rare words and metaphors, which is another point in which
 the narrative form of imitation stands alone. On the other hand, the
 iambic and the trochaic tetrameter are stirring measures, the latter
 being akin to dancing, the former expressive of action. Still more
 absurd would it be to mix together different metres, as was done by
 Chaeremon. Hence no one has ever composed a poem on a great scale in any
 other than heroic verse. Nature herself, as we have said, teaches the
 choice of the proper measure.
 
 Homer, admirable in all respects, has the special merit of being the
 only poet who rightly appreciates the part he should take himself. The
 poet should speak as little as possible in his own person, for it is not
 this that makes him an imitator. Other poets appear themselves upon the
 scene throughout, and imitate but little and rarely. Homer, after a few
 prefatory words, at once brings in a man, or woman, or other personage;
 none of them wanting in characteristic qualities, but each with a
 character of his own.
 
 The element of the wonderful is required in Tragedy. The irrational, on
 which the wonderful depends for its chief effects, has wider scope in
 Epic poetry, because there the person acting is not seen. Thus, the
 pursuit of Hector would be ludicrous if placed upon the stage--the
 Greeks standing still and not joining in the pursuit, and Achilles
 waving them back. But in the Epic poem the absurdity passes unnoticed.
 Now the wonderful is pleasing: as may be inferred from the fact that
 every one tells a story with some addition of his own, knowing that his
 hearers like it. It is Homer who has chiefly taught other poets the
 art of telling lies skilfully. The secret of it lies in a fallacy, For,
 assuming that if one thing is or becomes, a second is or becomes, men
 imagine that, if the second is, the first likewise is or becomes. But
 this is a false inference. Hence, where the first thing is untrue, it is
 quite unnecessary, provided the second be true, to add that the first
 is or has become. For the mind, knowing the second to be true, falsely
 infers the truth of the first. There is an example of this in the Bath
 Scene of the Odyssey.
 
 Accordingly, the poet should prefer probable impossibilities to
 improbable possibilities. The tragic plot must not be composed of
 irrational parts. Everything irrational should, if possible, be
 excluded; or, at all events, it should lie outside the action of the
 play (as, in the Oedipus, the hero's ignorance as to the manner of
 Laius' death); not within the drama,--as in the Electra, the messenger's
 account of the Pythian games; or, as in the Mysians, the man who
 has come from Tegea to Mysia and is still speechless. The plea that
 otherwise the plot would have been ruined, is ridiculous; such a plot
 should not in the first instance be constructed. But once the irrational
 has been introduced and an air of likelihood imparted to it, we must
 accept it in spite of the absurdity. Take even the irrational incidents
 in the Odyssey, where Odysseus is left upon the shore of Ithaca. How
 intolerable even these might have been would be apparent if an inferior
 poet were to treat the subject. As it is, the absurdity is veiled by the
 poetic charm with which the poet invests it.
 
 The diction should be elaborated in the pauses of the action, where
 there is no expression of character or thought. For, conversely,
 character and thought are merely obscured by a diction that is over
 brilliant.
 
 
 
 
 XXV
 
 With respect to critical difficulties and their solutions, the number
 and nature of the sources from which they may be drawn may be thus
 exhibited.
 
 The poet being an imitator, like a painter or any other artist, must
 of necessity imitate one of three objects,--things as they were or are,
 things as they are said or thought to be, or things as they ought to be.
 The vehicle of expression is language,--either current terms or, it
 may be, rare words or metaphors. There are also many modifications of
 language, which we concede to the poets. Add to this, that the standard
 of correctness is not the same in poetry and politics, any more than in
 poetry and any other art. Within the art of poetry itself there are
 two kinds of faults, those which touch its essence, and those which are
 accidental. If a poet has chosen to imitate something, <but has imitated
 it incorrectly> through want of capacity, the error is inherent in
 the poetry. But if the failure is due to a wrong choice if he has
 represented a horse as throwing out both his off legs at once, or
 introduced technical inaccuracies in medicine, for example, or in any
 other art the error is not essential to the poetry. These are the points
 of view from which we should consider and answer the objections raised
 by the critics.
 
 First as to matters which concern the poet's own art. If he describes
 the impossible, he is guilty of an error; but the error may be
 justified, if the end of the art be thereby attained (the end being that
 already mentioned), if, that is, the effect of this or any other part of
 the poem is thus rendered more striking. A case in point is the pursuit
 of Hector. If, however, the end might have been as well, or better,
 attained without violating the special rules of the poetic art, the
 error is not justified: for every kind of error should, if possible, be
 avoided.
 
 Again, does the error touch the essentials of the poetic art, or some
 accident of it? For example,--not to know that a hind has no horns is a
 less serious matter than to paint it inartistically.
 
 Further, if it be objected that the description is not true to fact, the
 poet may perhaps reply,--'But the objects are as they ought to be': just
 as Sophocles said that he drew men as they ought to be; Euripides,
 as they are. In this way the objection may be met. If, however, the
 representation be of neither kind, the poet may answer,--This is how men
 say the thing is.' This applies to tales about the gods. It may well be
 that these stories are not higher than fact nor yet true to fact: they
 are, very possibly, what Xenophanes says of them. But anyhow, 'this
 is what is said.' Again, a description may be no better than the fact:
 'still, it was the fact'; as in the passage about the arms: 'Upright
 upon their butt-ends stood the spears.' This was the custom then, as it
 now is among the Illyrians.
 
 Again, in examining whether what has been said or done by some one is
 poetically right or not, we must not look merely to the particular act
 or saying, and ask whether it is poetically good or bad. We must also
 consider by whom it is said or done, to whom, when, by what means, or
 for what end; whether, for instance, it be to secure a greater good, or
 avert a greater evil.
 
 Other difficulties may be resolved by due regard to the usage of
 language. We may note a rare word, as in {omicron upsilon rho eta alpha
 sigma / mu epsilon nu / pi rho omega tau omicron nu}, where the poet
 perhaps employs {omicron upsilon rho eta alpha sigma} not in the sense
 of mules, but of sentinels. So, again, of Dolon: 'ill-favoured indeed
 he was to look upon.' It is not meant that his body was ill-shaped, but
 that his face was ugly; for the Cretans use the word {epsilon upsilon
 epsilon iota delta epsilon sigma}, 'well-favoured,' to denote a fair
 face. Again, {zeta omega rho omicron tau epsilon rho omicron nu /
 delta epsilon / kappa epsilon rho alpha iota epsilon}, 'mix the drink
 livelier,' does not mean `mix it stronger' as for hard drinkers, but
 'mix it quicker.'
 
 Sometimes an expression is metaphorical, as 'Now all gods and men were
 sleeping through the night,'--while at the same time the poet says:
 'Often indeed as he turned his gaze to the Trojan plain, he marvelled
 at the sound of flutes and pipes.' 'All' is here used metaphorically for
 'many,' all being a species of many. So in the verse,--'alone she hath
 no part...,' {omicron iota eta}, 'alone,' is metaphorical; for the best
 known may be called the only one.
 
 Again, the solution may depend upon accent or breathing. Thus Hippias of
 Thasos solved the difficulties in the lines,--{delta iota delta omicron
 mu epsilon nu (delta iota delta omicron mu epsilon nu) delta epsilon
 / omicron iota,} and { tau omicron / mu epsilon nu / omicron upsilon
 (omicron upsilon) kappa alpha tau alpha pi upsilon theta epsilon tau
 alpha iota / omicron mu beta rho omega}.
 
 Or again, the question may be solved by punctuation, as in
 Empedocles,--'Of a sudden things became mortal that before had learnt to
 be immortal, and things unmixed before mixed.'
 
 Or again, by ambiguity of meaning,--as {pi alpha rho omega chi eta kappa
 epsilon nu / delta epsilon / pi lambda epsilon omega / nu upsilon xi},
 where the word {pi lambda epsilon omega} is ambiguous.
 
 Or by the usage of language. Thus any mixed drink is called {omicron
 iota nu omicron sigma}, 'wine.' Hence Ganymede is said 'to pour the wine
 to Zeus,' though the gods do not drink wine. So too workers in iron
 are called {chi alpha lambda kappa epsilon alpha sigma}, or workers in
 bronze. This, however, may also be taken as a metaphor.
 
 Again, when a word seems to involve some inconsistency of meaning, we
 should consider how many senses it may bear in the particular passage.
 For example: 'there was stayed the spear of bronze'--we should ask
 in how many ways we may take 'being checked there.' The true mode
 of interpretation is the precise opposite of what Glaucon mentions.
 Critics, he says, jump at certain groundless conclusions; they pass
 adverse judgment and then proceed to reason on it; and, assuming that
 the poet has said whatever they happen to think, find fault if a thing
 is inconsistent with their own fancy. The question about Icarius
 has been treated in this fashion. The critics imagine he was a
 Lacedaemonian. They think it strange, therefore, that Telemachus should
 not have met him when he went to Lacedaemon. But the Cephallenian story
 may perhaps be the true one. They allege that Odysseus took a wife from
 among themselves, and that her father was Icadius not Icarius. It is
 merely a mistake, then, that gives plausibility to the objection.
 
 In general, the impossible must be justified by reference to artistic
 requirements, or to the higher reality, or to received opinion. With
 respect to the requirements of art, a probable impossibility is to
 be preferred to a thing improbable and yet possible. Again, it may be
 impossible that there should be men such as Zeuxis painted. 'Yes,' we
 say, 'but the impossible is the higher thing; for the ideal type must
 surpass the reality.' To justify the irrational, we appeal to what is
 commonly said to be. In addition to which, we urge that the irrational
 sometimes does not violate reason; just as 'it is probable that a thing
 may happen contrary to probability.'
 
 Things that sound contradictory should be examined by the same rules as
 in dialectical refutation whether the same thing is meant, in the same
 relation, and in the same sense. We should therefore solve the question
 by reference to what the poet says himself, or to what is tacitly
 assumed by a person of intelligence.
 
 The element of the irrational, and, similarly, depravity of character,
 are justly censured when there is no inner necessity for introducing
 them. Such is the irrational element in the introduction of Aegeus by
 Euripides and the badness of Menelaus in the Orestes.
 
 Thus, there are five sources from which critical objections are drawn.
 Things are censured either as impossible, or irrational, or morally
 hurtful, or contradictory, or contrary to artistic correctness. The
 answers should be sought under the twelve heads above mentioned.
 
 
 
 
 XXVI
 
 The question may be raised whether the Epic or Tragic mode of imitation
 is the higher. If the more refined art is the higher, and the more
 refined in every case is that which appeals to the better sort of
 audience, the art which imitates anything and everything is manifestly
 most unrefined. The audience is supposed to be too dull to comprehend
 unless something of their own is thrown in by the performers, who
 therefore indulge in restless movements. Bad flute-players twist and
 twirl, if they have to represent 'the quoit-throw,' or hustle the
 coryphaeus when they perform the 'Scylla.' Tragedy, it is said, has
 this same defect. We may compare the opinion that the older actors
 entertained of their successors. Mynniscus used to call Callippides
 'ape' on account of the extravagance of his action, and the same view
 was held of Pindarus. Tragic art, then, as a whole, stands to Epic in
 the same relation as the younger to the elder actors. So we are told
 that Epic poetry is addressed to a cultivated audience, who do not need
 gesture; Tragedy, to an inferior public. Being then unrefined, it is
 evidently the lower of the two.
 
 Now, in the first place, this censure attaches not to the poetic but to
 the histrionic art; for gesticulation may be equally overdone in
 epic recitation, as by Sosi-stratus, or in lyrical competition, as by
 Mnasitheus the Opuntian. Next, all action is not to be condemned any
 more than all dancing--but only that of bad performers. Such was the
 fault found in Callippides, as also in others of our own day, who are
 censured for representing degraded women. Again, Tragedy like Epic
 poetry produces its effect even without action; it reveals its power
 by mere reading. If, then, in all other respects it is superior, this
 fault, we say, is not inherent in it.
 
 And superior it is, because it has all the epic elements--it may even
 use the epic metre--with the music and spectacular effects as important
 accessories; and these produce the most vivid of pleasures. Further,
 it has vividness of impression in reading as well as in representation.
 Moreover, the art attains its end within narrower limits; for the
 concentrated effect is more pleasurable than one which is spread over a
 long time and so diluted. What, for example, would be the effect of the
 Oedipus of Sophocles, if it were cast into a form as long as the Iliad?
 Once more, the Epic imitation has less unity; as is shown by this, that
 any Epic poem will furnish subjects for several tragedies. Thus if
 the story adopted by the poet has a strict unity, it must either be
 concisely told and appear truncated; or, if it conform to the Epic canon
 of length, it must seem weak and watery. <Such length implies some loss
 of unity,> if, I mean, the poem is constructed out of several actions,
 like the Iliad and the Odyssey, which have many such parts, each with a
 certain magnitude of its own. Yet these poems are as perfect as possible
 in structure; each is, in the highest degree attainable, an imitation of
 a single action.
 
 If, then, Tragedy is superior to Epic poetry in all these respects, and,
 moreover, fulfils its specific function better as an art for each art
 ought to produce, not any chance pleasure, but the pleasure proper to
 it, as already stated it plainly follows that Tragedy is the higher art,
 as attaining its end more perfectly.
 
 Thus much may suffice concerning Tragic and Epic poetry in general;
 their several kinds and parts, with the number of each and their
 differences; the causes that make a poem good or bad; the objections of
 the critics and the answers to these objections.
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Glyn Hughes.  HTML version by Al Haines.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 The Categories
 
 
 By
 
 Aristotle
 
 
 Translated by E. M. Edghill
 
 
 
 Section 1
 
 Part 1
 
 Things are said to be named 'equivocally' when, though they have a
 common name, the definition corresponding with the name differs for
 each. Thus, a real man and a figure in a picture can both lay claim to
 the name 'animal'; yet these are equivocally so named, for, though they
 have a common name, the definition corresponding with the name differs
 for each. For should any one define in what sense each is an animal,
 his definition in the one case will be appropriate to that case only.
 
 On the other hand, things are said to be named 'univocally' which have
 both the name and the definition answering to the name in common. A man
 and an ox are both 'animal', and these are univocally so named,
 inasmuch as not only the name, but also the definition, is the same in
 both cases: for if a man should state in what sense each is an animal,
 the statement in the one case would be identical with that in the other.
 
 Things are said to be named 'derivatively', which derive their name
 from some other name, but differ from it in termination. Thus the
 grammarian derives his name from the word 'grammar', and the courageous
 man from the word 'courage'.
 
 
 
 Part 2
 
 Forms of speech are either simple or composite. Examples of the latter
 are such expressions as 'the man runs', 'the man wins'; of the former
 'man', 'ox', 'runs', 'wins'.
 
 Of things themselves some are predicable of a subject, and are never
 present in a subject. Thus 'man' is predicable of the individual man,
 and is never present in a subject.
 
 By being 'present in a subject' I do not mean present as parts are
 present in a whole, but being incapable of existence apart from the
 said subject.
 
 Some things, again, are present in a subject, but are never predicable
 of a subject. For instance, a certain point of grammatical knowledge is
 present in the mind, but is not predicable of any subject; or again, a
 certain whiteness may be present in the body (for colour requires a
 material basis), yet it is never predicable of anything.
 
 Other things, again, are both predicable of a subject and present in a
 subject. Thus while knowledge is present in the human mind, it is
 predicable of grammar.
 
 There is, lastly, a class of things which are neither present in a
 subject nor predicable of a subject, such as the individual man or the
 individual horse. But, to speak more generally, that which is
 individual and has the character of a unit is never predicable of a
 subject. Yet in some cases there is nothing to prevent such being
 present in a subject. Thus a certain point of grammatical knowledge is
 present in a subject.
 
 
 
 Part 3
 
 When one thing is predicated of another, all that which is predicable
 of the predicate will be predicable also of the subject. Thus, 'man' is
 predicated of the individual man; but 'animal' is predicated of 'man';
 it will, therefore, be predicable of the individual man also: for the
 individual man is both 'man' and 'animal'.
 
 If genera are different and co-ordinate, their differentiae are
 themselves different in kind. Take as an instance the genus 'animal'
 and the genus 'knowledge'. 'With feet', 'two-footed', 'winged',
 'aquatic', are differentiae of 'animal'; the species of knowledge are
 not distinguished by the same differentiae. One species of knowledge
 does not differ from another in being 'two-footed'.
 
 But where one genus is subordinate to another, there is nothing to
 prevent their having the same differentiae: for the greater class is
 predicated of the lesser, so that all the differentiae of the predicate
 will be differentiae also of the subject.
 
 
 
 Part 4
 
 Expressions which are in no way composite signify substance, quantity,
 quality, relation, place, time, position, state, action, or affection.
 To sketch my meaning roughly, examples of substance are 'man' or 'the
 horse', of quantity, such terms as 'two cubits long' or 'three cubits
 long', of quality, such attributes as 'white', 'grammatical'. 'Double',
 'half', 'greater', fall under the category of relation; 'in the
 market place', 'in the Lyceum', under that of place; 'yesterday', 'last
 year', under that of time. 'Lying', 'sitting', are terms indicating
 position, 'shod', 'armed', state; 'to lance', 'to cauterize', action;
 'to be lanced', 'to be cauterized', affection.
 
 No one of these terms, in and by itself, involves an affirmation; it is
 by the combination of such terms that positive or negative statements
 arise. For every assertion must, as is admitted, be either true or
 false, whereas expressions which are not in any way composite such as
 'man', 'white', 'runs', 'wins', cannot be either true or false.
 
 
 
 Part 5
 
 Substance, in the truest and primary and most definite sense of the
 word, is that which is neither predicable of a subject nor present in a
 subject; for instance, the individual man or horse. But in a secondary
 sense those things are called substances within which, as species, the
 primary substances are included; also those which, as genera, include
 the species. For instance, the individual man is included in the
 species 'man', and the genus to which the species belongs is 'animal';
 these, therefore--that is to say, the species 'man' and the genus
 'animal,-are termed secondary substances.
 
 It is plain from what has been said that both the name and the
 definition of the predicate must be predicable of the subject. For
 instance, 'man' is predicated of the individual man. Now in this case
 the name of the species 'man' is applied to the individual, for we use
 the term 'man' in describing the individual; and the definition of
 'man' will also be predicated of the individual man, for the individual
 man is both man and animal. Thus, both the name and the definition of
 the species are predicable of the individual.
 
 With regard, on the other hand, to those things which are present in a
 subject, it is generally the case that neither their name nor their
 definition is predicable of that in which they are present. Though,
 however, the definition is never predicable, there is nothing in
 certain cases to prevent the name being used. For instance, 'white'
 being present in a body is predicated of that in which it is present,
 for a body is called white: the definition, however, of the colour
 'white' is never predicable of the body.
 
 Everything except primary substances is either predicable of a primary
 substance or present in a primary substance. This becomes evident by
 reference to particular instances which occur. 'Animal' is predicated
 of the species 'man', therefore of the individual man, for if there
 were no individual man of whom it could be predicated, it could not be
 predicated of the species 'man' at all. Again, colour is present in
 body, therefore in individual bodies, for if there were no individual
 body in which it was present, it could not be present in body at all.
 Thus everything except primary substances is either predicated of
 primary substances, or is present in them, and if these last did not
 exist, it would be impossible for anything else to exist.
 
 Of secondary substances, the species is more truly substance than the
 genus, being more nearly related to primary substance. For if any one
 should render an account of what a primary substance is, he would
 render a more instructive account, and one more proper to the subject,
 by stating the species than by stating the genus. Thus, he would give a
 more instructive account of an individual man by stating that he was
 man than by stating that he was animal, for the former description is
 peculiar to the individual in a greater degree, while the latter is too
 general. Again, the man who gives an account of the nature of an
 individual tree will give a more instructive account by mentioning the
 species 'tree' than by mentioning the genus 'plant'.
 
 Moreover, primary substances are most properly called substances in
 virtue of the fact that they are the entities which underlie everything
 else, and that everything else is either predicated of them or present
 in them. Now the same relation which subsists between primary substance
 and everything else subsists also between the species and the genus:
 for the species is to the genus as subject is to predicate, since the
 genus is predicated of the species, whereas the species cannot be
 predicated of the genus. Thus we have a second ground for asserting
 that the species is more truly substance than the genus.
 
 Of species themselves, except in the case of such as are genera, no one
 is more truly substance than another. We should not give a more
 appropriate account of the individual man by stating the species to
 which he belonged, than we should of an individual horse by adopting
 the same method of definition. In the same way, of primary substances,
 no one is more truly substance than another; an individual man is not
 more truly substance than an individual ox.
 
 It is, then, with good reason that of all that remains, when we exclude
 primary substances, we concede to species and genera alone the name
 'secondary substance', for these alone of all the predicates convey a
 knowledge of primary substance. For it is by stating the species or the
 genus that we appropriately define any individual man; and we shall
 make our definition more exact by stating the former than by stating
 the latter. All other things that we state, such as that he is white,
 that he runs, and so on, are irrelevant to the definition. Thus it is
 just that these alone, apart from primary substances, should be called
 substances.
 
 Further, primary substances are most properly so called, because they
 underlie and are the subjects of everything else. Now the same relation
 that subsists between primary substance and everything else subsists
 also between the species and the genus to which the primary substance
 belongs, on the one hand, and every attribute which is not included
 within these, on the other. For these are the subjects of all such. If
 we call an individual man 'skilled in grammar', the predicate is
 applicable also to the species and to the genus to which he belongs.
 This law holds good in all cases.
 
 It is a common characteristic of all substance that it is never present
 in a subject. For primary substance is neither present in a subject nor
 predicated of a subject; while, with regard to secondary substances, it
 is clear from the following arguments (apart from others) that they are
 not present in a subject. For 'man' is predicated of the individual
 man, but is not present in any subject: for manhood is not present in
 the individual man. In the same way, 'animal' is also predicated of the
 individual man, but is not present in him. Again, when a thing is
 present in a subject, though the name may quite well be applied to that
 in which it is present, the definition cannot be applied. Yet of
 secondary substances, not only the name, but also the definition,
 applies to the subject: we should use both the definition of the
 species and that of the genus with reference to the individual man.
 Thus substance cannot be present in a subject.
 
 Yet this is not peculiar to substance, for it is also the case that
 differentiae cannot be present in subjects. The characteristics
 'terrestrial' and 'two-footed' are predicated of the species 'man', but
 not present in it. For they are not in man. Moreover, the definition of
 the differentia may be predicated of that of which the differentia
 itself is predicated. For instance, if the characteristic 'terrestrial'
 is predicated of the species 'man', the definition also of that
 characteristic may be used to form the predicate of the species 'man':
 for 'man' is terrestrial.
 
 The fact that the parts of substances appear to be present in the
 whole, as in a subject, should not make us apprehensive lest we should
 have to admit that such parts are not substances: for in explaining the
 phrase 'being present in a subject', we stated' that we meant
 'otherwise than as parts in a whole'.
 
 It is the mark of substances and of differentiae that, in all
 propositions of which they form the predicate, they are predicated
 univocally. For all such propositions have for their subject either the
 individual or the species. It is true that, inasmuch as primary
 substance is not predicable of anything, it can never form the
 predicate of any proposition. But of secondary substances, the species
 is predicated of the individual, the genus both of the species and of
 the individual. Similarly the differentiae are predicated of the
 species and of the individuals. Moreover, the definition of the species
 and that of the genus are applicable to the primary substance, and that
 of the genus to the species. For all that is predicated of the
 predicate will be predicated also of the subject. Similarly, the
 definition of the differentiae will be applicable to the species and to
 the individuals. But it was stated above that the word 'univocal' was
 applied to those things which had both name and definition in common.
 It is, therefore, established that in every proposition, of which
 either substance or a differentia forms the predicate, these are
 predicated univocally.
 
 All substance appears to signify that which is individual. In the case
 of primary substance this is indisputably true, for the thing is a
 unit. In the case of secondary substances, when we speak, for instance,
 of 'man' or 'animal', our form of speech gives the impression that we
 are here also indicating that which is individual, but the impression
 is not strictly true; for a secondary substance is not an individual,
 but a class with a certain qualification; for it is not one and single
 as a primary substance is; the words 'man', 'animal', are predicable of
 more than one subject.
 
 Yet species and genus do not merely indicate quality, like the term
 'white'; 'white' indicates quality and nothing further, but species and
 genus determine the quality with reference to a substance: they signify
 substance qualitatively differentiated. The determinate qualification
 covers a larger field in the case of the genus that in that of the
 species: he who uses the word 'animal' is herein using a word of wider
 extension than he who uses the word 'man'.
 
 Another mark of substance is that it has no contrary. What could be the
 contrary of any primary substance, such as the individual man or
 animal? It has none. Nor can the species or the genus have a contrary.
 Yet this characteristic is not peculiar to substance, but is true of
 many other things, such as quantity. There is nothing that forms the
 contrary of 'two cubits long' or of 'three cubits long', or of 'ten',
 or of any such term. A man may contend that 'much' is the contrary of
 'little', or 'great' of 'small', but of definite quantitative terms no
 contrary exists.
 
 Substance, again, does not appear to admit of variation of degree. I do
 not mean by this that one substance cannot be more or less truly
 substance than another, for it has already been stated that this is
 the case; but that no single substance admits of varying degrees within
 itself. For instance, one particular substance, 'man', cannot be more
 or less man either than himself at some other time or than some other
 man. One man cannot be more man than another, as that which is white
 may be more or less white than some other white object, or as that
 which is beautiful may be more or less beautiful than some other
 beautiful object. The same quality, moreover, is said to subsist in a
 thing in varying degrees at different times. A body, being white, is
 said to be whiter at one time than it was before, or, being warm, is
 said to be warmer or less warm than at some other time. But substance
 is not said to be more or less that which it is: a man is not more
 truly a man at one time than he was before, nor is anything, if it is
 substance, more or less what it is. Substance, then, does not admit of
 variation of degree.
 
 The most distinctive mark of substance appears to be that, while
 remaining numerically one and the same, it is capable of admitting
 contrary qualities. From among things other than substance, we should
 find ourselves unable to bring forward any which possessed this mark.
 Thus, one and the same colour cannot be white and black. Nor can the
 same one action be good and bad: this law holds good with everything
 that is not substance. But one and the selfsame substance, while
 retaining its identity, is yet capable of admitting contrary qualities.
 The same individual person is at one time white, at another black, at
 one time warm, at another cold, at one time good, at another bad. This
 capacity is found nowhere else, though it might be maintained that a
 statement or opinion was an exception to the rule. The same statement,
 it is agreed, can be both true and false. For if the statement 'he is
 sitting' is true, yet, when the person in question has risen, the same
 statement will be false. The same applies to opinions. For if any one
 thinks truly that a person is sitting, yet, when that person has risen,
 this same opinion, if still held, will be false. Yet although this
 exception may be allowed, there is, nevertheless, a difference in the
 manner in which the thing takes place. It is by themselves changing
 that substances admit contrary qualities. It is thus that that which
 was hot becomes cold, for it has entered into a different state.
 Similarly that which was white becomes black, and that which was bad
 good, by a process of change; and in the same way in all other cases it
 is by changing that substances are capable of admitting contrary
 qualities. But statements and opinions themselves remain unaltered in
 all respects: it is by the alteration in the facts of the case that the
 contrary quality comes to be theirs. The statement 'he is sitting'
 remains unaltered, but it is at one time true, at another false,
 according to circumstances. What has been said of statements applies
 also to opinions. Thus, in respect of the manner in which the thing
 takes place, it is the peculiar mark of substance that it should be
 capable of admitting contrary qualities; for it is by itself changing
 that it does so.
 
 If, then, a man should make this exception and contend that statements
 and opinions are capable of admitting contrary qualities, his
 contention is unsound. For statements and opinions are said to have
 this capacity, not because they themselves undergo modification, but
 because this modification occurs in the case of something else. The
 truth or falsity of a statement depends on facts, and not on any power
 on the part of the statement itself of admitting contrary qualities. In
 short, there is nothing which can alter the nature of statements and
 opinions. As, then, no change takes place in themselves, these cannot
 be said to be capable of admitting contrary qualities.
 
 But it is by reason of the modification which takes place within the
 substance itself that a substance is said to be capable of admitting
 contrary qualities; for a substance admits within itself either disease
 or health, whiteness or blackness. It is in this sense that it is said
 to be capable of admitting contrary qualities.
 
 To sum up, it is a distinctive mark of substance, that, while remaining
 numerically one and the same, it is capable of admitting contrary
 qualities, the modification taking place through a change in the
 substance itself.
 
 Let these remarks suffice on the subject of substance.
 
 
 
 Part 6
 
 Quantity is either discrete or continuous. Moreover, some quantities
 are such that each part of the whole has a relative position to the
 other parts: others have within them no such relation of part to part.
 
 Instances of discrete quantities are number and speech; of continuous,
 lines, surfaces, solids, and, besides these, time and place.
 
 In the case of the parts of a number, there is no common boundary at
 which they join. For example: two fives make ten, but the two fives
 have no common boundary, but are separate; the parts three and seven
 also do not join at any boundary. Nor, to generalize, would it ever be
 possible in the case of number that there should be a common boundary
 among the parts; they are always separate. Number, therefore, is a
 discrete quantity.
 
 The same is true of speech. That speech is a quantity is evident: for
 it is measured in long and short syllables. I mean here that speech
 which is vocal. Moreover, it is a discrete quantity for its parts have
 no common boundary. There is no common boundary at which the syllables
 join, but each is separate and distinct from the rest.
 
 A line, on the other hand, is a continuous quantity, for it is possible
 to find a common boundary at which its parts join. In the case of the
 line, this common boundary is the point; in the case of the plane, it
 is the line: for the parts of the plane have also a common boundary.
 Similarly you can find a common boundary in the case of the parts of a
 solid, namely either a line or a plane.
 
 Space and time also belong to this class of quantities. Time, past,
 present, and future, forms a continuous whole. Space, likewise, is a
 continuous quantity; for the parts of a solid occupy a certain space,
 and these have a common boundary; it follows that the parts of space
 also, which are occupied by the parts of the solid, have the same
 common boundary as the parts of the solid. Thus, not only time, but
 space also, is a continuous quantity, for its parts have a common
 boundary.
 
 Quantities consist either of parts which bear a relative position each
 to each, or of parts which do not. The parts of a line bear a relative
 position to each other, for each lies somewhere, and it would be
 possible to distinguish each, and to state the position of each on the
 plane and to explain to what sort of part among the rest each was
 contiguous. Similarly the parts of a plane have position, for it could
 similarly be stated what was the position of each and what sort of
 parts were contiguous. The same is true with regard to the solid and to
 space. But it would be impossible to show that the parts of a number had
 a relative position each to each, or a particular position, or to state
 what parts were contiguous. Nor could this be done in the case of time,
 for none of the parts of time has an abiding existence, and that which
 does not abide can hardly have position. It would be better to say that
 such parts had a relative order, in virtue of one being prior to
 another. Similarly with number: in counting, 'one' is prior to 'two',
 and 'two' to 'three', and thus the parts of number may be said to
 possess a relative order, though it would be impossible to discover any
 distinct position for each. This holds good also in the case of speech.
 None of its parts has an abiding existence: when once a syllable is
 pronounced, it is not possible to retain it, so that, naturally, as the
 parts do not abide, they cannot have position. Thus, some quantities
 consist of parts which have position, and some of those which have not.
 
 Strictly speaking, only the things which I have mentioned belong to the
 category of quantity: everything else that is called quantitative is a
 quantity in a secondary sense. It is because we have in mind some one
 of these quantities, properly so called, that we apply quantitative
 terms to other things. We speak of what is white as large, because the
 surface over which the white extends is large; we speak of an action or
 a process as lengthy, because the time covered is long; these things
 cannot in their own right claim the quantitative epithet. For instance,
 should any one explain how long an action was, his statement would be
 made in terms of the time taken, to the effect that it lasted a year,
 or something of that sort. In the same way, he would explain the size
 of a white object in terms of surface, for he would state the area
 which it covered. Thus the things already mentioned, and these alone,
 are in their intrinsic nature quantities; nothing else can claim the
 name in its own right, but, if at all, only in a secondary sense.
 
 Quantities have no contraries. In the case of definite quantities this
 is obvious; thus, there is nothing that is the contrary of 'two cubits
 long' or of 'three cubits long', or of a surface, or of any such
 quantities. A man might, indeed, argue that 'much' was the contrary of
 'little', and 'great' of 'small'. But these are not quantitative, but
 relative; things are not great or small absolutely, they are so called
 rather as the result of an act of comparison. For instance, a mountain
 is called small, a grain large, in virtue of the fact that the latter
 is greater than others of its kind, the former less. Thus there is a
 reference here to an external standard, for if the terms 'great' and
 'small' were used absolutely, a mountain would never be called small or
 a grain large. Again, we say that there are many people in a village,
 and few in Athens, although those in the city are many times as
 numerous as those in the village: or we say that a house has many in
 it, and a theatre few, though those in the theatre far outnumber those
 in the house. The terms 'two cubits long', 'three cubits long', and so
 on indicate quantity, the terms 'great' and 'small' indicate relation,
 for they have reference to an external standard. It is, therefore,
 plain that these are to be classed as relative.
 
 Again, whether we define them as quantitative or not, they have no
 contraries: for how can there be a contrary of an attribute which is
 not to be apprehended in or by itself, but only by reference to
 something external? Again, if 'great' and 'small' are contraries, it
 will come about that the same subject can admit contrary qualities at
 one and the same time, and that things will themselves be contrary to
 themselves. For it happens at times that the same thing is both small
 and great. For the same thing may be small in comparison with one
 thing, and great in comparison with another, so that the same thing
 comes to be both small and great at one and the same time, and is of
 such a nature as to admit contrary qualities at one and the same
 moment. Yet it was agreed, when substance was being discussed, that
 nothing admits contrary qualities at one and the same moment. For
 though substance is capable of admitting contrary qualities, yet no one
 is at the same time both sick and healthy, nothing is at the same time
 both white and black. Nor is there anything which is qualified in
 contrary ways at one and the same time.
 
 Moreover, if these were contraries, they would themselves be contrary
 to themselves. For if 'great' is the contrary of 'small', and the same
 thing is both great and small at the same time, then 'small' or 'great'
 is the contrary of itself. But this is impossible. The term 'great',
 therefore, is not the contrary of the term 'small', nor 'much' of
 'little'. And even though a man should call these terms not relative
 but quantitative, they would not have contraries.
 
 It is in the case of space that quantity most plausibly appears to
 admit of a contrary. For men define the term 'above' as the contrary of
 'below', when it is the region at the centre they mean by 'below'; and
 this is so, because nothing is farther from the extremities of the
 universe than the region at the centre. Indeed, it seems that in
 defining contraries of every kind men have recourse to a spatial
 metaphor, for they say that those things are contraries which, within
 the same class, are separated by the greatest possible distance.
 
 Quantity does not, it appears, admit of variation of degree. One thing
 cannot be two cubits long in a greater degree than another. Similarly
 with regard to number: what is 'three' is not more truly three than
 what is 'five' is five; nor is one set of three more truly three than
 another set. Again, one period of time is not said to be more truly
 time than another. Nor is there any other kind of quantity, of all that
 have been mentioned, with regard to which variation of degree can be
 predicated. The category of quantity, therefore, does not admit of
 variation of degree.
 
 The most distinctive mark of quantity is that equality and inequality
 are predicated of it. Each of the aforesaid quantities is said to be
 equal or unequal. For instance, one solid is said to be equal or
 unequal to another; number, too, and time can have these terms applied
 to them, indeed can all those kinds of quantity that have been
 mentioned.
 
 That which is not a quantity can by no means, it would seem, be termed
 equal or unequal to anything else. One particular disposition or one
 particular quality, such as whiteness, is by no means compared with
 another in terms of equality and inequality but rather in terms of
 similarity. Thus it is the distinctive mark of quantity that it can be
 called equal and unequal.
 
 
 
 Section 2
 
 
 Part 7
 
 Those things are called relative, which, being either said to be of
 something else or related to something else, are explained by reference
 to that other thing. For instance, the word 'superior' is explained by
 reference to something else, for it is superiority over something else
 that is meant. Similarly, the expression 'double' has this external
 reference, for it is the double of something else that is meant. So it
 is with everything else of this kind. There are, moreover, other
 relatives, e.g. habit, disposition, perception, knowledge, and
 attitude. The significance of all these is explained by a reference to
 something else and in no other way. Thus, a habit is a habit of
 something, knowledge is knowledge of something, attitude is the
 attitude of something. So it is with all other relatives that have been
 mentioned. Those terms, then, are called relative, the nature of which
 is explained by reference to something else, the preposition 'of' or
 some other preposition being used to indicate the relation. Thus, one
 mountain is called great in comparison with another; for the
 mountain claims this attribute by comparison with something. Again,
 that which is called similar must be similar to something else, and all
 other such attributes have this external reference. It is to be noted
 that lying and standing and sitting are particular attitudes, but
 attitude is itself a relative term. To lie, to stand, to be seated, are
 not themselves attitudes, but take their name from the aforesaid
 attitudes.
 
 It is possible for relatives to have contraries. Thus virtue has a
 contrary, vice, these both being relatives; knowledge, too, has a
 contrary, ignorance. But this is not the mark of all relatives;
 'double' and 'triple' have no contrary, nor indeed has any such term.
 
 It also appears that relatives can admit of variation of degree. For
 'like' and 'unlike', 'equal' and 'unequal', have the modifications
 'more' and 'less' applied to them, and each of these is relative in
 character: for the terms 'like' and 'unequal' bear a
 reference to something external. Yet, again, it is not every relative
 term that admits of variation of degree. No term such as 'double'
 admits of this modification. All relatives have correlatives: by the
 term 'slave' we mean the slave of a master, by the term 'master', the
 master of a slave; by 'double', the double of its half; by 'half', the
 half of its double; by 'greater', greater than that which is less; by
 'less', less than that which is greater.
 
 So it is with every other relative term; but the case we use to express
 the correlation differs in some instances. Thus, by knowledge we mean
 knowledge of the knowable; by the knowable, that which is to be
 apprehended by knowledge; by perception, perception of the perceptible;
 by the perceptible, that which is apprehended by perception.
 
 Sometimes, however, reciprocity of correlation does not appear to
 exist. This comes about when a blunder is made, and that to which the
 relative is related is not accurately stated. If a man states that a
 wing is necessarily relative to a bird, the connexion between these two
 will not be reciprocal, for it will not be possible to say that a bird
 is a bird by reason of its wings. The reason is that the original
 statement was inaccurate, for the wing is not said to be relative to
 the bird qua bird, since many creatures besides birds have wings, but
 qua winged creature. If, then, the statement is made accurate, the
 connexion will be reciprocal, for we can speak of a wing, having
 reference necessarily to a winged creature, and of a winged creature as
 being such because of its wings.
 
 Occasionally, perhaps, it is necessary to coin words, if no word exists
 by which a correlation can adequately be explained. If we define a
 rudder as necessarily having reference to a boat, our definition will
 not be appropriate, for the rudder does not have this reference to a
 boat qua boat, as there are boats which have no rudders. Thus we cannot
 use the terms reciprocally, for the word 'boat' cannot be said to find
 its explanation in the word 'rudder'. As there is no existing word, our
 definition would perhaps be more accurate if we coined some word like
 'ruddered' as the correlative of 'rudder'. If we express ourselves thus
 accurately, at any rate the terms are reciprocally connected, for the
 'ruddered' thing is 'ruddered' in virtue of its rudder. So it is in all
 other cases. A head will be more accurately defined as the correlative
 of that which is 'headed', than as that of an animal, for the animal
 does not have a head qua animal, since many animals have no head.
 
 Thus we may perhaps most easily comprehend that to which a thing is
 related, when a name does not exist, if, from that which has a name, we
 derive a new name, and apply it to that with which the first is
 reciprocally connected, as in the aforesaid instances, when we derived
 the word 'winged' from 'wing' and from 'rudder'.
 
 All relatives, then, if properly defined, have a correlative. I add
 this condition because, if that to which they are related is stated as
 haphazard and not accurately, the two are not found to be
 interdependent. Let me state what I mean more clearly. Even in the case
 of acknowledged correlatives, and where names exist for each, there
 will be no interdependence if one of the two is denoted, not by that
 name which expresses the correlative notion, but by one of irrelevant
 significance. The term 'slave', if defined as related, not to a master,
 but to a man, or a biped, or anything of that sort, is not reciprocally
 connected with that in relation to which it is defined, for the
 statement is not exact. Further, if one thing is said to be correlative
 with another, and the terminology used is correct, then, though all
 irrelevant attributes should be removed, and only that one attribute
 left in virtue of which it was correctly stated to be correlative with
 that other, the stated correlation will still exist. If the correlative
 of 'the slave' is said to be 'the master', then, though all irrelevant
 attributes of the said 'master', such as 'biped', 'receptive of
 knowledge', 'human', should be removed, and the attribute 'master'
 alone left, the stated correlation existing between him and the slave
 will remain the same, for it is of a master that a slave is said to be
 the slave. On the other hand, if, of two correlatives, one is not
 correctly termed, then, when all other attributes are removed and that
 alone is left in virtue of which it was stated to be correlative, the
 stated correlation will be found to have disappeared.
 
 For suppose the correlative of 'the slave' should be said to be 'the
 man', or the correlative of 'the wing' is 'the bird'; if the attribute
 'master' be withdrawn from 'the man', the correlation between 'the man'
 and 'the slave' will cease to exist, for if the man is not a master,
 the slave is not a slave. Similarly, if the attribute 'winged' be
 withdrawn from 'the bird', 'the wing' will no longer be relative; for
 if the so-called correlative is not winged, it follows that 'the wing'
 has no correlative.
 
 Thus it is essential that the correlated terms should be exactly
 designated; if there is a name existing, the statement will be easy; if
 not, it is doubtless our duty to construct names. When the terminology
 is thus correct, it is evident that all correlatives are interdependent.
 
 Correlatives are thought to come into existence simultaneously. This is
 for the most part true, as in the case of the double and the half. The
 existence of the half necessitates the existence of that of which it is
 a half. Similarly the existence of a master necessitates the existence
 of a slave, and that of a slave implies that of a master; these are
 merely instances of a general rule. Moreover, they cancel one another;
 for if there is no double it follows that there is no half, and vice
 versa; this rule also applies to all such correlatives. Yet it does not
 appear to be true in all cases that correlatives come into existence
 simultaneously. The object of knowledge would appear to exist before
 knowledge itself, for it is usually the case that we acquire knowledge
 of objects already existing; it would be difficult, if not impossible,
 to find a branch of knowledge the beginning of the existence of which
 was contemporaneous with that of its object.
 
 Again, while the object of knowledge, if it ceases to exist, cancels at
 the same time the knowledge which was its correlative, the converse of
 this is not true. It is true that if the object of knowledge does not
 exist there can be no knowledge: for there will no longer be anything
 to know. Yet it is equally true that, if knowledge of a certain object
 does not exist, the object may nevertheless quite well exist. Thus, in
 the case of the squaring of the circle, if indeed that process is an
 object of knowledge, though it itself exists as an object of knowledge,
 yet the knowledge of it has not yet come into existence. Again, if all
 animals ceased to exist, there would be no knowledge, but there might
 yet be many objects of knowledge.
 
 This is likewise the case with regard to perception: for the object of
 perception is, it appears, prior to the act of perception. If the
 perceptible is annihilated, perception also will cease to exist; but
 the annihilation of perception does not cancel the existence of the
 perceptible. For perception implies a body perceived and a body in
 which perception takes place. Now if that which is perceptible is
 annihilated, it follows that the body is annihilated, for the body is a
 perceptible thing; and if the body does not exist, it follows that
 perception also ceases to exist. Thus the annihilation of the
 perceptible involves that of perception.
 
 But the annihilation of perception does not involve that of the
 perceptible. For if the animal is annihilated, it follows that
 perception also is annihilated, but perceptibles such as body, heat,
 sweetness, bitterness, and so on, will remain.
 
 Again, perception is generated at the same time as the perceiving
 subject, for it comes into existence at the same time as the animal.
 But the perceptible surely exists before perception; for fire and water
 and such elements, out of which the animal is itself composed, exist
 before the animal is an animal at all, and before perception. Thus it
 would seem that the perceptible exists before perception.
 
 It may be questioned whether it is true that no substance is relative,
 as seems to be the case, or whether exception is to be made in the case
 of certain secondary substances. With regard to primary substances, it
 is quite true that there is no such possibility, for neither wholes nor
 parts of primary substances are relative. The individual man or ox is
 not defined with reference to something external. Similarly with the
 parts: a particular hand or head is not defined as a particular hand or
 head of a particular person, but as the hand or head of a particular
 person. It is true also, for the most part at least, in the case of
 secondary substances; the species 'man' and the species 'ox' are not
 defined with reference to anything outside themselves. Wood, again, is
 only relative in so far as it is some one's property, not in so far as
 it is wood. It is plain, then, that in the cases mentioned substance is
 not relative. But with regard to some secondary substances there is a
 difference of opinion; thus, such terms as 'head' and 'hand' are
 defined with reference to that of which the things indicated are a
 part, and so it comes about that these appear to have a relative
 character. Indeed, if our definition of that which is relative was
 complete, it is very difficult, if not impossible, to prove that no
 substance is relative. If, however, our definition was not complete, if
 those things only are properly called relative in the case of which
 relation to an external object is a necessary condition of existence,
 perhaps some explanation of the dilemma may be found.
 
 The former definition does indeed apply to all relatives, but the fact
 that a thing is explained with reference to something else does not
 make it essentially relative.
 
 From this it is plain that, if a man definitely apprehends a relative
 thing, he will also definitely apprehend that to which it is relative.
 Indeed this is self-evident: for if a man knows that some particular
 thing is relative, assuming that we call that a relative in the case of
 which relation to something is a necessary condition of existence, he
 knows that also to which it is related. For if he does not know at all
 that to which it is related, he will not know whether or not it is
 relative. This is clear, moreover, in particular instances. If a man
 knows definitely that such and such a thing is 'double', he will also
 forthwith know definitely that of which it is the double. For if there
 is nothing definite of which he knows it to be the double, he does not
 know at all that it is double. Again, if he knows that a thing is more
 beautiful, it follows necessarily that he will forthwith definitely
 know that also than which it is more beautiful. He will not merely know
 indefinitely that it is more beautiful than something which is less
 beautiful, for this would be supposition, not knowledge. For if he does
 not know definitely that than which it is more beautiful, he can no
 longer claim to know definitely that it is more beautiful than
 something else which is less beautiful: for it might be that nothing
 was less beautiful. It is, therefore, evident that if a man apprehends
 some relative thing definitely, he necessarily knows that also
 definitely to which it is related.
 
 Now the head, the hand, and such things are substances, and it is
 possible to know their essential character definitely, but it does not
 necessarily follow that we should know that to which they are related.
 It is not possible to know forthwith whose head or hand is meant. Thus
 these are not relatives, and, this being the case, it would be true to
 say that no substance is relative in character. It is perhaps a
 difficult matter, in such cases, to make a positive statement without
 more exhaustive examination, but to have raised questions with regard
 to details is not without advantage.
 
 
 
 Part 8
 
 By 'quality' I mean that in virtue of which people are said to be such
 and such.
 
 Quality is a term that is used in many senses. One sort of quality let
 us call 'habit' or 'disposition'. Habit differs from disposition in
 being more lasting and more firmly established. The various kinds of
 knowledge and of virtue are habits, for knowledge, even when acquired
 only in a moderate degree, is, it is agreed, abiding in its character
 and difficult to displace, unless some great mental upheaval takes
 place, through disease or any such cause. The virtues, also, such as
 justice, self-restraint, and so on, are not easily dislodged or
 dismissed, so as to give place to vice.
 
 By a disposition, on the other hand, we mean a condition that is easily
 changed and quickly gives place to its opposite. Thus, heat, cold,
 disease, health, and so on are dispositions. For a man is disposed in
 one way or another with reference to these, but quickly changes,
 becoming cold instead of warm, ill instead of well. So it is with all
 other dispositions also, unless through lapse of time a disposition has
 itself become inveterate and almost impossible to dislodge: in which
 case we should perhaps go so far as to call it a habit.
 
 It is evident that men incline to call those conditions habits which
 are of a more or less permanent type and difficult to displace; for
 those who are not retentive of knowledge, but volatile, are not said to
 have such and such a 'habit' as regards knowledge, yet they are
 disposed, we may say, either better or worse, towards knowledge. Thus
 habit differs from disposition in this, that while the latter in
 ephemeral, the former is permanent and difficult to alter.
 
 Habits are at the same time dispositions, but dispositions are not
 necessarily habits. For those who have some specific habit may be said
 also, in virtue of that habit, to be thus or thus disposed; but those
 who are disposed in some specific way have not in all cases the
 corresponding habit.
 
 Another sort of quality is that in virtue of which, for example, we
 call men good boxers or runners, or healthy or sickly: in fact it
 includes all those terms which refer to inborn capacity or incapacity.
 Such things are not predicated of a person in virtue of his
 disposition, but in virtue of his inborn capacity or incapacity to do
 something with ease or to avoid defeat of any kind. Persons are called
 good boxers or good runners, not in virtue of such and such a
 disposition, but in virtue of an inborn capacity to accomplish
 something with ease. Men are called healthy in virtue of the inborn
 capacity of easy resistance to those unhealthy influences that may
 ordinarily arise; unhealthy, in virtue of the lack of this capacity.
 Similarly with regard to softness and hardness. Hardness is predicated
 of a thing because it has that capacity of resistance which enables it
 to withstand disintegration; softness, again, is predicated of a thing
 by reason of the lack of that capacity.
 
 A third class within this category is that of affective qualities and
 affections. Sweetness, bitterness, sourness, are examples of this sort
 of quality, together with all that is akin to these; heat, moreover,
 and cold, whiteness, and blackness are affective qualities. It is
 evident that these are qualities, for those things that possess them
 are themselves said to be such and such by reason of their presence.
 Honey is called sweet because it contains sweetness; the body is called
 white because it contains whiteness; and so in all other cases.
 
 The term 'affective quality' is not used as indicating that those
 things which admit these qualities are affected in any way. Honey is
 not called sweet because it is affected in a specific way, nor is this
 what is meant in any other instance. Similarly heat and cold are called
 affective qualities, not because those things which admit them are
 affected. What is meant is that these said qualities are capable of
 producing an 'affection' in the way of perception. For sweetness has
 the power of affecting the sense of taste; heat, that of touch; and so
 it is with the rest of these qualities.
 
 Whiteness and blackness, however, and the other colours, are not said
 to be affective qualities in this sense, but because they themselves
 are the results of an affection. It is plain that many changes of
 colour take place because of affections. When a man is ashamed, he
 blushes; when he is afraid, he becomes pale, and so on. So true is
 this, that when a man is by nature liable to such affections, arising
 from some concomitance of elements in his constitution, it is a
 probable inference that he has the corresponding complexion of skin.
 For the same disposition of bodily elements, which in the former
 instance was momentarily present in the case of an access of shame,
 might be a result of a man's natural temperament, so as to produce the
 corresponding colouring also as a natural characteristic. All
 conditions, therefore, of this kind, if caused by certain permanent and
 lasting affections, are called affective qualities. For pallor and
 duskiness of complexion are called qualities, inasmuch as we are said
 to be such and such in virtue of them, not only if they originate in
 natural constitution, but also if they come about through long disease
 or sunburn, and are difficult to remove, or indeed remain throughout
 life. For in the same way we are said to be such and such because of
 these.
 
 Those conditions, however, which arise from causes which may easily be
 rendered ineffective or speedily removed, are called, not qualities,
 but affections: for we are not said to be such in virtue of them. The man
 who blushes through shame is not said to be a constitutional blusher,
 nor is the man who becomes pale through fear said to be
 constitutionally pale. He is said rather to have been affected.
 
 Thus such conditions are called affections, not qualities. In like
 manner there are affective qualities and affections of the soul. That
 temper with which a man is born and which has its origin in certain
 deep-seated affections is called a quality. I mean such conditions as
 insanity, irascibility, and so on: for people are said to be mad or
 irascible in virtue of these. Similarly those abnormal psychic states
 which are not inborn, but arise from the concomitance of certain other
 elements, and are difficult to remove, or altogether permanent, are
 called qualities, for in virtue of them men are said to be such and
 such.
 
 Those, however, which arise from causes easily rendered ineffective are
 called affections, not qualities. Suppose that a man is irritable when
 vexed: he is not even spoken of as a bad-tempered man, when in such
 circumstances he loses his temper somewhat, but rather is said to be
 affected. Such conditions are therefore termed, not qualities, but
 affections.
 
 The fourth sort of quality is figure and the shape that belongs to a
 thing; and besides this, straightness and curvedness and any other
 qualities of this type; each of these defines a thing as being such and
 such. Because it is triangular or quadrangular a thing is said to have
 a specific character, or again because it is straight or curved; in
 fact a thing's shape in every case gives rise to a qualification of it.
 
 Rarity and density, roughness and smoothness, seem to be terms
 indicating quality: yet these, it would appear, really belong to a
 class different from that of quality. For it is rather a certain
 relative position of the parts composing the thing thus qualified
 which, it appears, is indicated by each of these terms. A thing is
 dense, owing to the fact that its parts are closely combined with one
 another; rare, because there are interstices between the parts; smooth,
 because its parts lie, so to speak, evenly; rough, because some parts
 project beyond others.
 
 There may be other sorts of quality, but those that are most properly
 so called have, we may safely say, been enumerated.
 
 These, then, are qualities, and the things that take their name from
 them as derivatives, or are in some other way dependent on them, are
 said to be qualified in some specific way. In most, indeed in almost
 all cases, the name of that which is qualified is derived from that of
 the quality. Thus the terms 'whiteness', 'grammar', 'justice', give us
 the adjectives 'white', 'grammatical', 'just', and so on.
 
 There are some cases, however, in which, as the quality under
 consideration has no name, it is impossible that those possessed of it
 should have a name that is derivative. For instance, the name given to
 the runner or boxer, who is so called in virtue of an inborn capacity,
 is not derived from that of any quality; for both those capacities have
 no name assigned to them. In this, the inborn capacity is distinct from
 the science, with reference to which men are called, e.g. boxers or
 wrestlers. Such a science is classed as a disposition; it has a name,
 and is called 'boxing' or 'wrestling' as the case may be, and the name
 given to those disposed in this way is derived from that of the
 science. Sometimes, even though a name exists for the quality, that
 which takes its character from the quality has a name that is not a
 derivative. For instance, the upright man takes his character from the
 possession of the quality of integrity, but the name given him is not
 derived from the word 'integrity'. Yet this does not occur often.
 
 We may therefore state that those things are said to be possessed of
 some specific quality which have a name derived from that of the
 aforesaid quality, or which are in some other way dependent on it.
 
 One quality may be the contrary of another; thus justice is the
 contrary of injustice, whiteness of blackness, and so on. The things,
 also, which are said to be such and such in virtue of these qualities,
 may be contrary the one to the other; for that which is unjust is
 contrary to that which is just, that which is white to that which is
 black. This, however, is not always the case. Red, yellow, and such
 colours, though qualities, have no contraries.
 
 If one of two contraries is a quality, the other will also be a
 quality. This will be evident from particular instances, if we apply
 the names used to denote the other categories; for instance, granted
 that justice is the contrary of injustice and justice is a quality,
 injustice will also be a quality: neither quantity, nor relation, nor
 place, nor indeed any other category but that of quality, will be
 applicable properly to injustice. So it is with all other contraries
 falling under the category of quality.
 
 Qualities admit of variation of degree. Whiteness is predicated of one
 thing in a greater or less degree than of another. This is also the
 case with reference to justice. Moreover, one and the same thing may
 exhibit a quality in a greater degree than it did before: if a thing is
 white, it may become whiter.
 
 Though this is generally the case, there are exceptions. For if we
 should say that justice admitted of variation of degree, difficulties
 might ensue, and this is true with regard to all those qualities which
 are dispositions. There are some, indeed, who dispute the possibility
 of variation here. They maintain that justice and health cannot very
 well admit of variation of degree themselves, but that people vary in
 the degree in which they possess these qualities, and that this is the
 case with grammatical learning and all those qualities which are
 classed as dispositions. However that may be, it is an incontrovertible
 fact that the things which in virtue of these qualities are said to be
 what they are vary in the degree in which they possess them; for one
 man is said to be better versed in grammar, or more healthy or just,
 than another, and so on.
 
 The qualities expressed by the terms 'triangular' and 'quadrangular' do
 not appear to admit of variation of degree, nor indeed do any that have
 to do with figure. For those things to which the definition of the
 triangle or circle is applicable are all equally triangular or
 circular. Those, on the other hand, to which the same definition is not
 applicable, cannot be said to differ from one another in degree; the
 square is no more a circle than the rectangle, for to neither is the
 definition of the circle appropriate. In short, if the definition of
 the term proposed is not applicable to both objects, they cannot be
 compared. Thus it is not all qualities which admit of variation of
 degree.
 
 Whereas none of the characteristics I have mentioned are peculiar to
 quality, the fact that likeness and unlikeness can be predicated with
 reference to quality only, gives to that category its distinctive
 feature. One thing is like another only with reference to that in
 virtue of which it is such and such; thus this forms the peculiar mark
 of quality.
 
 We must not be disturbed because it may be argued that, though
 proposing to discuss the category of quality, we have included in it
 many relative terms. We did say that habits and dispositions were
 relative. In practically all such cases the genus is relative, the
 individual not. Thus knowledge, as a genus, is explained by reference
 to something else, for we mean a knowledge of something. But particular
 branches of knowledge are not thus explained. The knowledge of grammar
 is not relative to anything external, nor is the knowledge of music,
 but these, if relative at all, are relative only in virtue of their
 genera; thus grammar is said be the knowledge of something, not the
 grammar of something; similarly music is the knowledge of something,
 not the music of something.
 
 Thus individual branches of knowledge are not relative. And it is
 because we possess these individual branches of knowledge that we are
 said to be such and such. It is these that we actually possess: we are
 called experts because we possess knowledge in some particular branch.
 Those particular branches, therefore, of knowledge, in virtue of which
 we are sometimes said to be such and such, are themselves qualities,
 and are not relative. Further, if anything should happen to fall within
 both the category of quality and that of relation, there would be
 nothing extraordinary in classing it under both these heads.
 
 
 
 Section 3
 
 
 Part 9
 
 Action and affection both admit of contraries and also of variation of
 degree. Heating is the contrary of cooling, being heated of being
 cooled, being glad of being vexed. Thus they admit of contraries. They
 also admit of variation of degree: for it is possible to heat in a
 greater or less degree; also to be heated in a greater or less degree.
 Thus action and affection also admit of variation of degree. So much,
 then, is stated with regard to these categories.
 
 We spoke, moreover, of the category of position when we were dealing
 with that of relation, and stated that such terms derived their names
 from those of the corresponding attitudes.
 
 As for the rest, time, place, state, since they are easily
 intelligible, I say no more about them than was said at the beginning,
 that in the category of state are included such states as 'shod',
 'armed', in that of place 'in the Lyceum' and so on, as was explained
 before.
 
 
 
 Part 10
 
 The proposed categories have, then, been adequately dealt with. We must
 next explain the various senses in which the term 'opposite' is used.
 Things are said to be opposed in four senses: (i) as correlatives to
 one another, (ii) as contraries to one another, (iii) as privatives to
 positives, (iv) as affirmatives to negatives.
 
 Let me sketch my meaning in outline. An instance of the use of the word
 'opposite' with reference to correlatives is afforded by the
 expressions 'double' and 'half'; with reference to contraries by 'bad'
 and 'good'. Opposites in the sense of 'privatives' and 'positives' are
 'blindness' and 'sight'; in the sense of affirmatives and negatives, the
 propositions 'he sits', 'he does not sit'.
 
 (i) Pairs of opposites which fall under the category of relation are
 explained by a reference of the one to the other, the reference being
 indicated by the preposition 'of' or by some other preposition. Thus,
 double is a relative term, for that which is double is explained as the
 double of something. Knowledge, again, is the opposite of the thing
 known, in the same sense; and the thing known also is explained by its
 relation to its opposite, knowledge. For the thing known is explained
 as that which is known by something, that is, by knowledge. Such
 things, then, as are opposite the one to the other in the sense of
 being correlatives are explained by a reference of the one to the other.
 
 (ii) Pairs of opposites which are contraries are not in any way
 interdependent, but are contrary the one to the other. The good is not
 spoken of as the good of the bad, but as the contrary of the bad, nor
 is white spoken of as the white of the black, but as the contrary of
 the black. These two types of opposition are therefore distinct. Those
 contraries which are such that the subjects in which they are naturally
 present, or of which they are predicated, must necessarily contain
 either the one or the other of them, have no intermediate, but those in
 the case of which no such necessity obtains, always have an
 intermediate. Thus disease and health are naturally present in the body
 of an animal, and it is necessary that either the one or the other
 should be present in the body of an animal. Odd and even, again, are
 predicated of number, and it is necessary that the one or the other
 should be present in numbers. Now there is no intermediate between the
 terms of either of these two pairs. On the other hand, in those
 contraries with regard to which no such necessity obtains, we find an
 intermediate. Blackness and whiteness are naturally present in the
 body, but it is not necessary that either the one or the other should
 be present in the body, inasmuch as it is not true to say that
 everybody must be white or black. Badness and goodness, again, are
 predicated of man, and of many other things, but it is not necessary
 that either the one quality or the other should be present in that of
 which they are predicated: it is not true to say that everything that
 may be good or bad must be either good or bad. These pairs of
 contraries have intermediates: the intermediates between white and
 black are grey, sallow, and all the other colours that come between;
 the intermediate between good and bad is that which is neither the one
 nor the other.
 
 Some intermediate qualities have names, such as grey and sallow and all
 the other colours that come between white and black; in other cases,
 however, it is not easy to name the intermediate, but we must define it
 as that which is not either extreme, as in the case of that which is
 neither good nor bad, neither just nor unjust.
 
 (iii) 'privatives' and 'positives' have reference to the same subject.
 Thus, sight and blindness have reference to the eye. It is a universal
 rule that each of a pair of opposites of this type has reference to
 that to which the particular 'positive' is natural. We say that that is
 capable of some particular faculty or possession has suffered privation
 when the faculty or possession in question is in no way present in that
 in which, and at the time at which, it should naturally be present. We
 do not call that toothless which has not teeth, or that blind which has
 not sight, but rather that which has not teeth or sight at the time
 when by nature it should. For there are some creatures which from birth
 are without sight, or without teeth, but these are not called toothless
 or blind.
 
 To be without some faculty or to possess it is not the same as the
 corresponding 'privative' or 'positive'. 'Sight' is a 'positive',
 'blindness' a 'privative', but 'to possess sight' is not equivalent to
 'sight', 'to be blind' is not equivalent to 'blindness'. Blindness is a
 'privative', to be blind is to be in a state of privation, but is not a
 'privative'. Moreover, if 'blindness' were equivalent to 'being blind',
 both would be predicated of the same subject; but though a man is said
 to be blind, he is by no means said to be blindness.
 
 To be in a state of 'possession' is, it appears, the opposite of being
 in a state of 'privation', just as 'positives' and 'privatives'
 themselves are opposite. There is the same type of antithesis in both
 cases; for just as blindness is opposed to sight, so is being blind
 opposed to having sight.
 
 That which is affirmed or denied is not itself affirmation or denial.
 By 'affirmation' we mean an affirmative proposition, by 'denial' a
 negative. Now, those facts which form the matter of the affirmation or
 denial are not propositions; yet these two are said to be opposed in
 the same sense as the affirmation and denial, for in this case also the
 type of antithesis is the same. For as the affirmation is opposed to
 the denial, as in the two propositions 'he sits', 'he does not sit', so
 also the fact which constitutes the matter of the proposition in one
 case is opposed to that in the other, his sitting, that is to say, to
 his not sitting.
 
 It is evident that 'positives' and 'privatives' are not opposed each to
 each in the same sense as relatives. The one is not explained by
 reference to the other; sight is not sight of blindness, nor is any
 other preposition used to indicate the relation. Similarly blindness is
 not said to be blindness of sight, but rather, privation of sight.
 Relatives, moreover, reciprocate; if blindness, therefore, were a
 relative, there would be a reciprocity of relation between it and that
 with which it was correlative. But this is not the case. Sight is not
 called the sight of blindness.
 
 That those terms which fall under the heads of 'positives' and
 'privatives' are not opposed each to each as contraries, either, is
 plain from the following facts: Of a pair of contraries such that they
 have no intermediate, one or the other must needs be present in the
 subject in which they naturally subsist, or of which they are
 predicated; for it is those, as we proved, in the case of which this
 necessity obtains, that have no intermediate. Moreover, we cited health
 and disease, odd and even, as instances. But those contraries which
 have an intermediate are not subject to any such necessity. It is not
 necessary that every substance, receptive of such qualities, should be
 either black or white, cold or hot, for something intermediate between
 these contraries may very well be present in the subject. We proved,
 moreover, that those contraries have an intermediate in the case of
 which the said necessity does not obtain. Yet when one of the two
 contraries is a constitutive property of the subject, as it is a
 constitutive property of fire to be hot, of snow to be white, it is
 necessary determinately that one of the two contraries, not one or the
 other, should be present in the subject; for fire cannot be cold, or
 snow black. Thus, it is not the case here that one of the two must
 needs be present in every subject receptive of these qualities, but
 only in that subject of which the one forms a constitutive property.
 Moreover, in such cases it is one member of the pair determinately, and
 not either the one or the other, which must be present.
 
 In the case of 'positives' and 'privatives', on the other hand, neither
 of the aforesaid statements holds good. For it is not necessary that a
 subject receptive of the qualities should always have either the one or
 the other; that which has not yet advanced to the state when sight is
 natural is not said either to be blind or to see. Thus 'positives' and
 'privatives' do not belong to that class of contraries which consists
 of those which have no intermediate. On the other hand, they do not
 belong either to that class which consists of contraries which have an
 intermediate. For under certain conditions it is necessary that either
 the one or the other should form part of the constitution of every
 appropriate subject. For when a thing has reached the stage when it is
 by nature capable of sight, it will be said either to see or to be
 blind, and that in an indeterminate sense, signifying that the capacity
 may be either present or absent; for it is not necessary either that it
 should see or that it should be blind, but that it should be either in
 the one state or in the other. Yet in the case of those contraries
 which have an intermediate we found that it was never necessary that
 either the one or the other should be present in every appropriate
 subject, but only that in certain subjects one of the pair should be
 present, and that in a determinate sense. It is, therefore, plain that
 'positives' and 'privatives' are not opposed each to each in either of
 the senses in which contraries are opposed.
 
 Again, in the case of contraries, it is possible that there should be
 changes from either into the other, while the subject retains its
 identity, unless indeed one of the contraries is a constitutive
 property of that subject, as heat is of fire. For it is possible that
 that that which is healthy should become diseased, that which is white,
 black, that which is cold, hot, that which is good, bad, that which is
 bad, good. The bad man, if he is being brought into a better way of
 life and thought, may make some advance, however slight, and if he
 should once improve, even ever so little, it is plain that he might
 change completely, or at any rate make very great progress; for a man
 becomes more and more easily moved to virtue, however small the
 improvement was at first. It is, therefore, natural to suppose that he
 will make yet greater progress than he has made in the past; and as
 this process goes on, it will change him completely and establish him
 in the contrary state, provided he is not hindered by lack of time. In
 the case of 'positives' and 'privatives', however, change in both
 directions is impossible. There may be a change from possession to
 privation, but not from privation to possession. The man who has become
 blind does not regain his sight; the man who has become bald does not
 regain his hair; the man who has lost his teeth does not grow a new
 set.
 
 (iv) Statements opposed as affirmation and negation belong
 manifestly to a class which is distinct, for in this case, and in this
 case only, it is necessary for the one opposite to be true and the
 other false.
 
 Neither in the case of contraries, nor in the case of correlatives, nor
 in the case of 'positives' and 'privatives', is it necessary for one to
 be true and the other false. Health and disease are contraries: neither
 of them is true or false. 'Double' and 'half' are opposed to each other
 as correlatives: neither of them is true or false. The case is the
 same, of course, with regard to 'positives' and 'privatives' such as
 'sight' and 'blindness'. In short, where there is no sort of
 combination of words, truth and falsity have no place, and all the
 opposites we have mentioned so far consist of simple words.
 
 At the same time, when the words which enter into opposed statements
 are contraries, these, more than any other set of opposites, would seem
 to claim this characteristic. 'Socrates is ill' is the contrary of
 'Socrates is well', but not even of such composite expressions is it
 true to say that one of the pair must always be true and the other
 false. For if Socrates exists, one will be true and the other false,
 but if he does not exist, both will be false; for neither 'Socrates is
 ill' nor 'Socrates is well' is true, if Socrates does not exist at all.
 
 In the case of 'positives' and 'privatives', if the subject does not
 exist at all, neither proposition is true, but even if the subject
 exists, it is not always the fact that one is true and the other false.
 For 'Socrates has sight' is the opposite of 'Socrates is blind' in the
 sense of the word 'opposite' which applies to possession and privation.
 Now if Socrates exists, it is not necessary that one should be true and
 the other false, for when he is not yet able to acquire the power of
 vision, both are false, as also if Socrates is altogether non-existent.
 
 But in the case of affirmation and negation, whether the subject exists
 or not, one is always false and the other true. For manifestly, if
 Socrates exists, one of the two propositions 'Socrates is ill',
 'Socrates is not ill', is true, and the other false. This is likewise
 the case if he does not exist; for if he does not exist, to say that he
 is ill is false, to say that he is not ill is true. Thus it is in the
 case of those opposites only, which are opposite in the sense in which
 the term is used with reference to affirmation and negation, that the
 rule holds good, that one of the pair must be true and the other false.
 
 
 
 Part 11
 
 That the contrary of a good is an evil is shown by induction: the
 contrary of health is disease, of courage, cowardice, and so on. But
 the contrary of an evil is sometimes a good, sometimes an evil. For
 defect, which is an evil, has excess for its contrary, this also being
 an evil, and the mean, which is a good, is equally the contrary of the
 one and of the other. It is only in a few cases, however, that we see
 instances of this: in most, the contrary of an evil is a good.
 
 In the case of contraries, it is not always necessary that if one
 exists the other should also exist: for if all become healthy there
 will be health and no disease, and again, if everything turns white,
 there will be white, but no black. Again, since the fact that Socrates
 is ill is the contrary of the fact that Socrates is well, and two
 contrary conditions cannot both obtain in one and the same individual
 at the same time, both these contraries could not exist at once: for if
 that Socrates was well was a fact, then that Socrates was ill could not
 possibly be one.
 
 It is plain that contrary attributes must needs be present in subjects
 which belong to the same species or genus. Disease and health require
 as their subject the body of an animal; white and black require a body,
 without further qualification; justice and injustice require as their
 subject the human soul.
 
 Moreover, it is necessary that pairs of contraries should in all cases
 either belong to the same genus or belong to contrary genera or be
 themselves genera. White and black belong to the same genus, colour;
 justice and injustice, to contrary genera, virtue and vice; while good
 and evil do not belong to genera, but are themselves actual genera,
 with terms under them.
 
 
 
 Part 12
 
 There are four senses in which one thing can be said to be 'prior' to
 another. Primarily and most properly the term has reference to time: in
 this sense the word is used to indicate that one thing is older or more
 ancient than another, for the expressions 'older' and 'more ancient'
 imply greater length of time.
 
 Secondly, one thing is said to be 'prior' to another when the sequence
 of their being cannot be reversed. In this sense 'one' is 'prior' to
 'two'. For if 'two' exists, it follows directly that 'one' must exist,
 but if 'one' exists, it does not follow necessarily that 'two' exists:
 thus the sequence subsisting cannot be reversed. It is agreed, then,
 that when the sequence of two things cannot be reversed, then that one
 on which the other depends is called 'prior' to that other.
 
 In the third place, the term 'prior' is used with reference to any
 order, as in the case of science and of oratory. For in sciences which
 use demonstration there is that which is prior and that which is
 posterior in order; in geometry, the elements are prior to the
 propositions; in reading and writing, the letters of the alphabet are
 prior to the syllables. Similarly, in the case of speeches, the
 exordium is prior in order to the narrative.
 
 Besides these senses of the word, there is a fourth. That which is
 better and more honourable is said to have a natural priority. In
 common parlance men speak of those whom they honour and love as 'coming
 first' with them. This sense of the word is perhaps the most
 far-fetched.
 
 Such, then, are the different senses in which the term 'prior' is used.
 
 Yet it would seem that besides those mentioned there is yet another.
 For in those things, the being of each of which implies that of the
 other, that which is in any way the cause may reasonably be said to be
 by nature 'prior' to the effect. It is plain that there are instances
 of this. The fact of the being of a man carries with it the truth of
 the proposition that he is, and the implication is reciprocal: for if a
 man is, the proposition wherein we allege that he is true, and
 conversely, if the proposition wherein we allege that he is true, then
 he is. The true proposition, however, is in no way the cause of the
 being of the man, but the fact of the man's being does seem somehow to
 be the cause of the truth of the proposition, for the truth or falsity
 of the proposition depends on the fact of the man's being or not being.
 
 Thus the word 'prior' may be used in five senses.
 
 
 
 Part 13
 
 The term 'simultaneous' is primarily and most appropriately applied to
 those things the genesis of the one of which is simultaneous with that
 of the other; for in such cases neither is prior or posterior to the
 other. Such things are said to be simultaneous in point of time. Those
 things, again, are 'simultaneous' in point of nature, the being of each
 of which involves that of the other, while at the same time neither is
 the cause of the other's being. This is the case with regard to the
 double and the half, for these are reciprocally dependent, since, if
 there is a double, there is also a half, and if there is a half, there
 is also a double, while at the same time neither is the cause of the
 being of the other.
 
 Again, those species which are distinguished one from another and
 opposed one to another within the same genus are said to be
 'simultaneous' in nature. I mean those species which are distinguished
 each from each by one and the same method of division. Thus the
 'winged' species is simultaneous with the 'terrestrial' and the 'water'
 species. These are distinguished within the same genus, and are opposed
 each to each, for the genus 'animal' has the 'winged', the
 'terrestrial', and the 'water' species, and no one of these is prior or
 posterior to another; on the contrary, all such things appear to be
 'simultaneous' in nature. Each of these also, the terrestrial, the
 winged, and the water species, can be divided again into subspecies.
 Those species, then, also will be 'simultaneous' in point of nature,
 which, belonging to the same genus, are distinguished each from each by
 one and the same method of differentiation.
 
 But genera are prior to species, for the sequence of their being cannot
 be reversed. If there is the species 'water-animal', there will be the
 genus 'animal', but granted the being of the genus 'animal', it does
 not follow necessarily that there will be the species 'water-animal'.
 
 Those things, therefore, are said to be 'simultaneous' in nature, the
 being of each of which involves that of the other, while at the same
 time neither is in any way the cause of the other's being; those
 species, also, which are distinguished each from each and opposed
 within the same genus. Those things, moreover, are 'simultaneous' in
 the unqualified sense of the word which come into being at the same
 time.
 
 
 
 Part 14
 
 There are six sorts of movement: generation, destruction, increase,
 diminution, alteration, and change of place.
 
 It is evident in all but one case that all these sorts of movement are
 distinct each from each. Generation is distinct from destruction,
 increase and change of place from diminution, and so on. But in the
 case of alteration it may be argued that the process necessarily
 implies one or other of the other five sorts of motion. This is not
 true, for we may say that all affections, or nearly all, produce in us
 an alteration which is distinct from all other sorts of motion, for
 that which is affected need not suffer either increase or diminution or
 any of the other sorts of motion. Thus alteration is a distinct sort of
 motion; for, if it were not, the thing altered would not only be
 altered, but would forthwith necessarily suffer increase or diminution
 or some one of the other sorts of motion in addition; which as a matter
 of fact is not the case. Similarly that which was undergoing the
 process of increase or was subject to some other sort of motion would,
 if alteration were not a distinct form of motion, necessarily be
 subject to alteration also. But there are some things which undergo
 increase but yet not alteration. The square, for instance, if a gnomon
 is applied to it, undergoes increase but not alteration, and so it is
 with all other figures of this sort. Alteration and increase,
 therefore, are distinct.
 
 Speaking generally, rest is the contrary of motion. But the different
 forms of motion have their own contraries in other forms; thus
 destruction is the contrary of generation, diminution of increase, rest
 in a place, of change of place. As for this last, change in the reverse
 direction would seem to be most truly its contrary; thus motion upwards
 is the contrary of motion downwards and vice versa.
 
 In the case of that sort of motion which yet remains, of those that
 have been enumerated, it is not easy to state what is its contrary. It
 appears to have no contrary, unless one should define the contrary here
 also either as 'rest in its quality' or as 'change in the direction of
 the contrary quality', just as we defined the contrary of change of
 place either as rest in a place or as change in the reverse direction.
 For a thing is altered when change of quality takes place; therefore
 either rest in its quality or change in the direction of the contrary
 may be called the contrary of this qualitative form of motion. In this
 way becoming white is the contrary of becoming black; there is
 alteration in the contrary direction, since a change of a qualitative
 nature takes place.
 
 
 
 Part 15
 
 The term 'to have' is used in various senses. In the first place it is
 used with reference to habit or disposition or any other quality, for
 we are said to 'have' a piece of knowledge or a virtue. Then, again, it
 has reference to quantity, as, for instance, in the case of a man's
 height; for he is said to 'have' a height of three or four cubits. It
 is used, moreover, with regard to apparel, a man being said to 'have' a
 coat or tunic; or in respect of something which we have on a part of
 ourselves, as a ring on the hand: or in respect of something which is a
 part of us, as hand or foot. The term refers also to content, as in the
 case of a vessel and wheat, or of a jar and wine; a jar is said to
 'have' wine, and a corn-measure wheat. The expression in such cases has
 reference to content. Or it refers to that which has been acquired; we
 are said to 'have' a house or a field. A man is also said to 'have' a
 wife, and a wife a husband, and this appears to be the most remote
 meaning of the term, for by the use of it we mean simply that the
 husband lives with the wife.
 
 Other senses of the word might perhaps be found, but the most ordinary
 ones have all been enumerated.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Eric Eldred
 
 
 
 
 
 A TREATISE ON GOVERNMENT
 
 By Aristotle
 
 
 Translated From The Greek Of Aristotle By William Ellis, A.M.
 
 London & Toronto Published By J M Dent & Sons Ltd. & In New York By E.
 P. Dutton &. Co
 
 First Issue Of This Edition 1912 Reprinted 1919, 1923, 1928
 
 
 
 
 
 INTRODUCTION
 
 
 The Politics of Aristotle is the second part of a treatise of which
 the Ethics is the first part. It looks back to the Ethics as the Ethics
 looks forward to the Politics. For Aristotle did not separate, as we are
 inclined to do, the spheres of the statesman and the moralist. In the
 Ethics he has described the character necessary for the good life, but
 that life is for him essentially to be lived in society, and when in the
 last chapters of the Ethics he comes to the practical application of his
 inquiries, that finds expression not in moral exhortations addressed to
 the individual but in a description of the legislative opportunities
 of the statesman. It is the legislator's task to frame a society which
 shall make the good life possible. Politics for Aristotle is not a
 struggle between individuals or classes for power, nor a device for
 getting done such elementary tasks as the maintenance of order and
 security without too great encroachments on individual liberty. The
 state is "a community of well-being in families and aggregations
 of families for the sake of a perfect and self-sufficing life." The
 legislator is a craftsman whose material is society and whose aim is the
 good life.
 
 In an early dialogue of Plato's, the Protagoras, Socrates asks
 Protagoras why it is not as easy to find teachers of virtue as it is to
 find teachers of swordsmanship, riding, or any other art. Protagoras'
 answer is that there are no special teachers of virtue, because virtue
 is taught by the whole community. Plato and Aristotle both accept the
 view of moral education implied in this answer. In a passage of the
 Republic (492 b) Plato repudiates the notion that the sophists have a
 corrupting moral influence upon young men. The public themselves,
 he says, are the real sophists and the most complete and thorough
 educators. No private education can hold out against the irresistible
 force of public opinion and the ordinary moral standards of society.
 But that makes it all the more essential that public opinion and
 social environment should not be left to grow up at haphazard as they
 ordinarily do, but should be made by the wise legislator the expression
 of the good and be informed in all their details by his knowledge. The
 legislator is the only possible teacher of virtue.
 
 Such a programme for a treatise on government might lead us to expect in
 the Politics mainly a description of a Utopia or ideal state which
 might inspire poets or philosophers but have little direct effect upon
 political institutions. Plato's Republic is obviously impracticable, for
 its author had turned away in despair from existing politics. He has no
 proposals, in that dialogue at least, for making the best of things as
 they are. The first lesson his philosopher has to learn is to turn away
 from this world of becoming and decay, and to look upon the unchanging
 eternal world of ideas. Thus his ideal city is, as he says, a pattern
 laid up in heaven by which the just man may rule his life, a pattern
 therefore in the meantime for the individual and not for the statesman.
 It is a city, he admits in the Laws, for gods or the children of gods,
 not for men as they are.
 
 Aristotle has none of the high enthusiasm or poetic imagination of
 Plato. He is even unduly impatient of Plato's idealism, as is shown
 by the criticisms in the second book. But he has a power to see the
 possibilities of good in things that are imperfect, and the patience of
 the true politician who has learned that if he would make men what
 they ought to be, he must take them as he finds them. His ideal
 is constructed not of pure reason or poetry, but from careful and
 sympathetic study of a wide range of facts. His criticism of Plato in
 the light of history, in Book II. chap, v., though as a criticism it is
 curiously inept, reveals his own attitude admirably: "Let us remember
 that we should not disregard the experience of ages; in the multitude
 of years, these things, if they were good, would certainly not have been
 unknown; for almost everything has been found out, although sometimes
 they are not put together; in other cases men do not use the knowledge
 which they have." Aristotle in his Constitutions had made a study of one
 hundred and fifty-eight constitutions of the states of his day, and the
 fruits of that study are seen in the continual reference to concrete
 political experience, which makes the Politics in some respects a
 critical history of the workings of the institutions of the Greek city
 state. In Books IV., V., and VI. the ideal state seems far away, and
 we find a dispassionate survey of imperfect states, the best ways of
 preserving them, and an analysis of the causes of their instability.
 It is as though Aristotle were saying: "I have shown you the proper and
 normal type of constitution, but if you will not have it and insist on
 living under a perverted form, you may as well know how to make the best
 of it." In this way the Politics, though it defines the state in the
 light of its ideal, discusses states and institutions as they are.
 Ostensibly it is merely a continuation of the Ethics, but it comes to
 treat political questions from a purely political standpoint.
 
 This combination of idealism and respect for the teachings of experience
 constitutes in some ways the strength and value of the Politics, but it
 also makes it harder to follow. The large nation states to which we are
 accustomed make it difficult for us to think that the state could be
 constructed and modelled to express the good life. We can appreciate
 Aristotle's critical analysis of constitutions, but find it hard to take
 seriously his advice to the legislator. Moreover, the idealism and the
 empiricism of the Politics are never really reconciled by Aristotle
 himself.
 
 It may help to an understanding of the Politics if something is said on
 those two points.
 
 We are accustomed since the growth of the historical method to the
 belief that states are "not made but grow," and are apt to be impatient
 with the belief which Aristotle and Plato show in the powers of the
 lawgiver. But however true the maxim may be of the modern nation state,
 it was not true of the much smaller and more self-conscious Greek city.
 When Aristotle talks of the legislator, he is not talking in the
 air. Students of the Academy had been actually called on to give new
 constitutions to Greek states. For the Greeks the constitution was not
 merely as it is so often with us, a matter of political machinery. It
 was regarded as a way of life. Further, the constitution within the
 framework of which the ordinary process of administration and passing
 of decrees went on, was always regarded as the work of a special man or
 body of men, the lawgivers. If we study Greek history, we find that the
 position of the legislator corresponds to that assigned to him by
 Plato and Aristotle. All Greek states, except those perversions
 which Aristotle criticises as being "above law," worked under rigid
 constitutions, and the constitution was only changed when the whole
 people gave a commission to a lawgiver to draw up a new one. Such was
 the position of the AEsumnetes, whom Aristotle describes in Book III.
 chap, xiv., in earlier times, and of the pupils of the Academy in the
 fourth century. The lawgiver was not an ordinary politician. He was
 a state doctor, called in to prescribe for an ailing constitution. So
 Herodotus recounts that when the people of Cyrene asked the oracle of
 Delphi to help them in their dissensions, the oracle told them to go to
 Mantinea, and the Mantineans lent them Demonax, who acted as a "setter
 straight" and drew up a new constitution for Cyrene. So again the
 Milesians, Herodotus tells us, were long troubled by civil discord, till
 they asked help from Paros, and the Parians sent ten commissioners
 who gave Miletus a new constitution. So the Athenians, when they were
 founding their model new colony at Thurii, employed Hippodamus of
 Miletus, whom Aristotle mentions in Book II, as the best expert in
 town-planning, to plan the streets of the city, and Protagoras as the
 best expert in law-making, to give the city its laws. In the Laws Plato
 represents one of the persons of the dialogue as having been asked
 by the people of Gortyna to draw up laws for a colony which they were
 founding. The situation described must have occurred frequently in
 actual life. The Greeks thought administration should be democratic and
 law-making the work of experts. We think more naturally of law-making
 as the special right of the people and administration as necessarily
 confined to experts.
 
 Aristotle's Politics, then, is a handbook for the legislator, the expert
 who is to be called in when a state wants help. We have called him a
 state doctor. It is one of the most marked characteristics of Greek
 political theory that Plato and Aristotle think of the statesman as one
 who has knowledge of what ought to be done, and can help those who call
 him in to prescribe for them, rather than one who has power to control
 the forces of society. The desire of society for the statesman's
 advice is taken for granted, Plato in the Republic says that a good
 constitution is only possible when the ruler does not want to rule;
 where men contend for power, where they have not learnt to distinguish
 between the art of getting hold of the helm of state and the art of
 steering, which alone is statesmanship, true politics is impossible.
 
 With this position much that Aristotle has to say about government is in
 agreement. He assumes the characteristic Platonic view that all men seek
 the good, and go wrong through ignorance, not through evil will, and so
 he naturally regards the state as a community which exists for the sake
 of the good life. It is in the state that that common seeking after
 the good which is the profoundest truth about men and nature becomes
 explicit and knows itself. The state is for Aristotle prior to the
 family and the village, although it succeeds them in time, for only when
 the state with its conscious organisation is reached can man understand
 the secret of his past struggles after something he knew not what. If
 primitive society is understood in the light of the state, the state is
 understood in the light of its most perfect form, when the good after
 which all societies are seeking is realised in its perfection. Hence for
 Aristotle as for Plato, the natural state or the state as such is the
 ideal state, and the ideal state is the starting-point of political
 inquiry.
 
 In accordance with the same line of thought, imperfect states, although
 called perversions, are regarded by Aristotle as the result rather of
 misconception and ignorance than of perverse will. They all represent,
 he says, some kind of justice. Oligarchs and democrats go wrong in
 their conception of the good. They have come short of the perfect state
 through misunderstanding of the end or through ignorance of the proper
 means to the end. But if they are states at all, they embody some common
 conception of the good, some common aspirations of all their members.
 
 The Greek doctrine that the essence of the state consists in community
 of purpose is the counterpart of the notion often held in modern times
 that the essence of the state is force. The existence of force is for
 Plato and Aristotle a sign not of the state but of the state's failure.
 It comes from the struggle between conflicting misconceptions of the
 good. In so far as men conceive the good rightly they are united. The
 state represents their common agreement, force their failure to make
 that agreement complete. The cure, therefore, of political ills is
 knowledge of the good life, and the statesman is he who has such
 knowledge, for that alone can give men what they are always seeking.
 
 If the state is the organisation of men seeking a common good, power and
 political position must be given to those who can forward this end. This
 is the principle expressed in Aristotle's account of political justice,
 the principle of "tools to those who can use them." As the aim of the
 state is differently conceived, the qualifications for government
 will vary. In the ideal state power will be given to the man with most
 knowledge of the good; in other states to the men who are most truly
 capable of achieving that end which the citizens have set themselves
 to pursue. The justest distribution of political power is that in which
 there is least waste of political ability.
 
 Further, the belief that the constitution of a state is only the
 outward expression of the common aspirations and beliefs of its members,
 explains the paramount political importance which Aristotle assigns to
 education. It is the great instrument by which the legislator can ensure
 that the future citizens of his state will share those common beliefs
 which make the state possible. The Greeks with their small states had
 a far clearer apprehension than we can have of the dependence of a
 constitution upon the people who have to work it.
 
 Such is in brief the attitude in which Aristotle approaches political
 problems, but in working out its application to men and institutions
 as they are, Aristotle admits certain compromises which are not really
 consistent with it.
 
 1. Aristotle thinks of membership of a state as community in pursuit of
 the good. He wishes to confine membership in it to those who are capable
 of that pursuit in the highest and most explicit manner. His citizens,
 therefore, must be men of leisure, capable of rational thought upon
 the end of life. He does not recognise the significance of that less
 conscious but deep-seated membership of the state which finds its
 expression in loyalty and patriotism. His definition of citizen includes
 only a small part of the population of any Greek city. He is forced to
 admit that the state is not possible without the co-operation of men
 whom he will not admit to membership in it, either because they are not
 capable of sufficient rational appreciation of political ends, like the
 barbarians whom he thought were natural slaves, or because the leisure
 necessary for citizenship can only be gained by the work of the artisans
 who by that very work make themselves incapable of the life which
 they make possible for others. "The artisan only attains excellence
 in proportion as he becomes a slave," and the slave is only a living
 instrument of the good life. He exists for the state, but the state does
 not exist for him.
 
 2. Aristotle in his account of the ideal state seems to waver between
 two ideals. There is the ideal of an aristocracy and the ideal of what
 he calls constitutional government, a mixed constitution. The principle
 of "tools to those who can use them" ought to lead him, as it does
 Plato, to an aristocracy. Those who have complete knowledge of the good
 must be few, and therefore Plato gave entire power in his state into
 the hands of the small minority of philosopher guardians. It is in
 accordance with this principle that Aristotle holds that kingship is
 the proper form of government when there is in the state one man of
 transcendent virtue. At the same time, Aristotle always holds that
 absolute government is not properly political, that government is not
 like the rule of a shepherd over his sheep, but the rule of equals
 over equals. He admits that the democrats are right in insisting that
 equality is a necessary element in the state, though he thinks they do
 not admit the importance of other equally necessary elements. Hence he
 comes to say that ruling and being ruled over by turns is an essential
 feature of constitutional government, which he admits as an alternative
 to aristocracy. The end of the state, which is to be the standard of the
 distribution of political power, is conceived sometimes as a good for
 the apprehension and attainment of which "virtue" is necessary and
 sufficient (this is the principle of aristocracy), and sometimes as a
 more complex good, which needs for its attainment not only "virtue" but
 wealth and equality. This latter conception is the principle on which
 the mixed constitution is based. This in its distribution of political
 power gives some weight to "virtue," some to wealth, and some to mere
 number. But the principle of "ruling and being ruled by turns" is not
 really compatible with an unmodified principle of "tools to those who
 can use them." Aristotle is right in seeing that political government
 demands equality, not in the sense that all members of the state should
 be equal in ability or should have equal power, but in the sense that
 none of them can properly be regarded simply as tools with which the
 legislator works, that each has a right to say what will be made of his
 own life. The analogy between the legislator and the craftsman on which
 Plato insists, breaks down because the legislator is dealing with men
 like himself, men who can to some extent conceive their own end in life
 and cannot be treated merely as means to the end of the legislator. The
 sense of the value of "ruling and being ruled in turn" is derived from
 the experience that the ruler may use his power to subordinate the
 lives of the citizens of the state not to the common good but to his
 own private purposes. In modern terms, it is a simple, rough-and-ready
 attempt to solve that constant problem of politics, how efficient
 government is to be combined with popular control. This problem arises
 from the imperfection of human nature, apparent in rulers as well as in
 ruled, and if the principle which attempts to solve it be admitted as a
 principle of importance in the formation of the best constitution, then
 the starting-point of politics will be man's actual imperfection, not
 his ideal nature. Instead, then, of beginning with a state which would
 express man's ideal nature, and adapting it as well as may be to man's
 actual shortcomings from that ideal, we must recognise that the state
 and all political machinery are as much the expression of man's weakness
 as of his ideal possibilities. The state is possible only because
 men have common aspirations, but government, and political power, the
 existence of officials who are given authority to act in the name of the
 whole state, are necessary because men's community is imperfect, because
 man's social nature expresses itself in conflicting ways, in the clash
 of interests, the rivalry of parties, and the struggle of classes,
 instead of in the united seeking after a common good. Plato and
 Aristotle were familiar with the legislator who was called in by the
 whole people, and they tended therefore to take the general will or
 common consent of the people for granted. Most political questions are
 concerned with the construction and expression of the general will, and
 with attempts to ensure that the political machinery made to express the
 general will shall not be exploited for private or sectional ends.
 
 Aristotle's mixed constitution springs from a recognition of sectional
 interests in the state. For the proper relation between the claims of
 "virtue," wealth, and numbers is to be based not upon their relative
 importance in the good life, but upon the strength of the parties which
 they represent. The mixed constitution is practicable in a state where
 the middle class is strong, as only the middle class can mediate between
 the rich and the poor. The mixed constitution will be stable if it
 represents the actual balance of power between different classes in the
 state. When we come to Aristotle's analysis of existing constitutions,
 we find that while he regards them as imperfect approximations to the
 ideal, he also thinks of them as the result of the struggle between
 classes. Democracy, he explains, is the government not of the many but
 of the poor; oligarchy a government not of the few but of the rich.
 And each class is thought of, not as trying to express an ideal, but as
 struggling to acquire power or maintain its position. If ever the class
 existed in unredeemed nakedness, it was in the Greek cities of the
 fourth century, and its existence is abundantly recognised by Aristotle.
 His account of the causes of revolutions in Book V. shows how far were
 the existing states of Greece from the ideal with which he starts.
 His analysis of the facts forces him to look upon them as the scene
 of struggling factions. The causes of revolutions are not described as
 primarily changes in the conception of the common good, but changes in
 the military or economic power of the several classes in the state. The
 aim which he sets before oligarchs or democracies is not the good life,
 but simple stability or permanence of the existing constitution.
 
 With this spirit of realism which pervades Books IV., V., and VI.
 the idealism of Books I., II., VII., and VIII. is never reconciled.
 Aristotle is content to call existing constitutions perversions of
 the true form. But we cannot read the Politics without recognising
 and profiting from the insight into the nature of the state which is
 revealed throughout. Aristotle's failure does not lie in this, that he
 is both idealist and realist, but that he keeps these two tendencies
 too far apart. He thinks too much of his ideal state, as something to
 be reached once for all by knowledge, as a fixed type to which actual
 states approximate or from which they are perversions. But if we are to
 think of actual politics as intelligible in the light of the ideal, we
 must think of that ideal as progressively revealed in history, not as
 something to be discovered by turning our back on experience and having
 recourse to abstract reasoning. If we stretch forward from what exists
 to an ideal, it is to a better which may be in its turn transcended, not
 to a single immutable best. Aristotle found in the society of his
 time men who were not capable of political reflection, and who, as he
 thought, did their best work under superintendence. He therefore called
 them natural slaves. For, according to Aristotle, that is a man's
 natural condition in which he does his best work. But Aristotle also
 thinks of nature as something fixed and immutable; and therefore
 sanctions the institution of slavery, which assumes that what men are
 that they will always be, and sets up an artificial barrier to their
 ever becoming anything else. We see in Aristotle's defence of slavery
 how the conception of nature as the ideal can have a debasing influence
 upon views of practical politics. His high ideal of citizenship offers
 to those who can satisfy its claims the prospect of a fair life;
 those who fall short are deemed to be different in nature and shut out
 entirely from approach to the ideal.
 
 
 A. D. LINDSAY.
 
 
 
 
 BIBLIOGRAPHY
 
 First edition of works (with omission of Rhetorica, Poetica, and
 second book of OEconomica), 5 vols. by Aldus Manutius, Venice, 1495-8;
 re-impression supervised by Erasmus and with certain corrections by
 Grynaeus (including Rhetorica and Poetica), 1531, 1539, revised 1550;
 later editions were followed by that of Immanuel Bekker and Brandis
 (Greek and Latin), 5 vols. The 5th vol. contains the Index by Bonitz,
 1831-70; Didot edition (Greek and Latin), 5 vols. 1848-74.
 
 ENGLISH TRANSLATIONS: Edited by T. Taylor, with Porphyry's Introduction,
 9 vols., 1812; under editorship of J. A. Smith and W. D. Ross, 1908.
 
 Later editions of separate works:
 
 De Anima: Torstrik, 1862; Trendelenburg, 2nd edition, 1877, with English
 translation, E. Wallace, 1882; Biehl, 1884, 1896; with English, R. D.
 Hicks, 1907.
 
 Ethica: J. S. Brewer (Nicomachean), 1836; W. E. Jelf, 1856; J. E. T.
 Rogers, 1865; A. Grant, 1857-8, 1866, 1874, 1885; E. Moore, 1871, 1878,
 4th edition, 1890; Ramsauer (Nicomachean), 1878, Susemihl, 1878, 1880,
 revised by O. Apelt, 1903; A. Grant, 1885; I. Bywater (Nicomachean),
 1890; J. Burnet, 1900.
 
 Historia Animalium: Schneider, 1812; Aubert and Wimmer, 1860, Dittmeyer,
 1907.
 
 Metaphysica: Schwegler, 1848; W. Christ, 1899.
 
 Organon: Waitz, 1844-6.
 
 Poetica: Vahlen, 1867, 1874, with Notes by E. Moore, 1875; with English
 translation by E. R. Wharton, 1883, 1885; Uberweg, 1870, 1875; with
 German translation, Susemihl, 1874; Schmidt, 1875; Christ, 1878; I.
 Bywater, 1898; T. G. Tucker, 1899.
 
 De Republics, Atheniensium: Text and facsimile of Papyrus, F. G. Kenyon,
 1891, 3rd edition, 1892; Kaibel and Wilamowitz--Moel-lendorf, 1891, 3rd
 edition, 1898; Van Herwerden and Leeuwen (from Kenyon's text), 1891;
 Blass, 1892, 1895, 1898, 1903; J. E. Sandys, 1893.
 
 Politica: Susemihl, 1872; with German, 1878, 3rd edition, 1882; Susemihl
 and Hicks, 1894, etc.; O. Immisch, 1909.
 
 Physica: C. Prantl, 1879.
 
 Rhetorica: Stahr, 1862; Sprengel (with Latin text), 1867; Cope and
 Sandys, 1877; Roemer, 1885, 1898.
 
 ENGLISH TRANSLATIONS OF ONE OR MORE WORKS: De Anima (with Parva
 Naturalia), by W. A. Hammond, 1902. Ethica: Of Morals to Nicomachus, by
 E. Pargiter, 1745; with Politica, by J. Gillies, 1797, 1804, 1813;
 with Rhetorica and Poetica, by T. Taylor, 1818, and later editions.
 Nicomachean Ethics, 1819; mainly from text of Bekker, by D. P. Chase,
 1847; revised 1861, and later editions with an introductory essay by
 G. H. Lewes (Camelot Classics), 1890; re-edited by J. M. Mitchell (New
 Universal Library), 1906, 1910; with an introductory essay by Prof.
 J.H. Smith (Everyman's Library), 1911; by R.W.Browne (Bohn's Classical
 Library), 1848, etc.; by R. Williams, 1869, 1876; by W. M. Hatch and
 others (with translation of paraphrase attributed to Andronicus of
 Rhodes), edited by E. Hatch, 1879; by F, H. Peters, 1881; J. E. C.
 Welldon, 1892; J. Gillies (Lubbock's Hundred Books), 1893. Historia
 Animalium, by R. Creswell (Bohn's Classical Library), 1848; with
 Treatise on Physiognomy, by T. Taylor, 1809. Metaphysica, by T. Taylor,
 1801; by J. H. M'Mahon (Bohn's Classical Library), 1848. Organon, with
 Porphyry's Introduction, by O. F. Owen (Bohn's Classical Library),
 1848. Posterior Analytics, E. Poste, 1850; E. S. Bourchier, 1901; On
 Fallacies, E. Poste, 1866. Parva Naturalia (Greek and English), by G. R.
 T. Ross, 1906; with De Anima, by W. A. Hammond, 1902. Youth and Old Age,
 Life and Death and Respiration, W. Ogle, 1897. Poetica, with Notes
 from the French of D'Acier, 1705; by H. J. Pye, 1788, 1792; T. Twining,
 1789,1812, with Preface and Notes by H. Hamilton, 1851; Treatise on
 Rhetorica and Poetica, by T. Hobbes (Bohn's Classical Library), 1850;
 by Wharton, 1883 (see Greek version), S. H. Butcher, 1895, 1898, 3rd
 edition, 1902; E. S. Bourchier, 1907; by Ingram Bywater, 1909. De
 Partibus Animalium, W. Ogle, 1882. De Republica Athenientium, by E.
 Poste, 1891; F. G. Kenyon, 1891; T. J. Dymes, 1891. De Virtutibus et
 Vitiis, by W. Bridgman, 1804. Politica, from the French of Regius,
 1598; by W. Ellis, 1776, 1778, 1888 (Morley's Universal Library), 1893
 (Lubbock's Hundred Books); by E. Walford (with AEconomics, and Life by
 Dr. Gillies) (Bohn's Classical Library), 1848; J. E. C. Welldon, 1883;
 B. Jowett, 1885; with Introduction and Index by H. W. C. Davis, 1905;
 Books i. iii. iv. (vii.) from Bekker's text by W. E. Bolland, with
 Introduction by A. Lang, 1877. Problemata (with writings of other
 philosophers), 1597, 1607, 1680, 1684, etc. Rhetorica: A summary by T.
 Hobbes, 1655 (?), new edition, 1759; by the translators of the Art of
 Thinking, 1686, 1816; by D. M. Crimmin, 1812; J. Gillies, 1823;
 Anon. 1847; J. E. C. Welldon, 1886; R. C. Jebb, with Introduction
 and Supplementary Notes by J. E. Sandys, 1909 (see under Poetica and
 Ethica). Secreta Secretorum (supposititious work), Anon. 1702; from the
 Hebrew version by M. Gaster, 1907, 1908. Version by Lydgate and Burgh,
 edited by R. Steele (E.E.T.S.), 1894, 1898.
 
 LIFE, ETC.: J. W. Blakesley, 1839; A Crichton (Jardine's Naturalist's
 Library), 1843; J. S. Blackie, Four Phases of Morals, Socrates,
 Aristotle, etc., 1871; G. Grote, Aristotle, edited by A. Bain and G.
 C. Robertson, 1872, 1880; E. Wallace, Outlines of the Philosophy of
 Aristotle, 1875, 1880; A. Grant (Ancient Classics for English readers),
 1877; T. Davidson, Aristotle and Ancient Educational Ideals (Great
 Educators), 1892.
 
 
 
 
 
 A TREATISE ON GOVERNMENT
 
 
 
 
 BOOK I
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I
 
 
 As we see that every city is a society, and every society Ed. is
 established for some good purpose; for an apparent [Bekker 1252a] good
 is the spring of all human actions; it is evident that this is the
 principle upon which they are every one founded, and this is more
 especially true of that which has for its object the best possible, and
 is itself the most excellent, and comprehends all the rest. Now this is
 called a city, and the society thereof a political society; for those
 who think that the principles of a political, a regal, a family, and
 a herile government are the same are mistaken, while they suppose that
 each of these differ in the numbers to whom their power extends, but
 not in their constitution: so that with them a herile government is one
 composed of a very few, a domestic of more, a civil and a regal of still
 more, as if there was no difference between a large family and a small
 city, or that a regal government and a political one are the same, only
 that in the one a single person is continually at the head of public
 affairs; in the other, that each member of the state has in his turn a
 share in the government, and is at one time a magistrate, at another
 a private person, according to the rules of political science. But now
 this is not true, as will be evident to any one who will consider this
 question in the most approved method. As, in an inquiry into every other
 subject, it is necessary to separate the different parts of which it is
 compounded, till we arrive at their first elements, which are the most
 minute parts thereof; so by the same proceeding we shall acquire a
 knowledge of the primary parts of a city and see wherein they differ
 from each other, and whether the rules of art will give us any
 assistance in examining into each of these things which are mentioned.
 
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II
 
 
 Now if in this particular science any one would attend to its original
 seeds, and their first shoot, he would then as in others have the
 subject perfectly before him; and perceive, in the first place, that it
 is requisite that those should be joined together whose species cannot
 exist without each other, as the male and the female, for the business
 of propagation; and this not through choice, but by that natural impulse
 which acts both upon plants and animals also, for the purpose of their
 leaving behind them others like themselves. It is also from natural
 causes that some beings command and others obey, that each may obtain
 their mutual safety; for a being who is endowed with a mind capable
 of reflection and forethought is by nature the superior and governor,
 whereas he whose excellence is merely corporeal is formect to be a
 slave; whence it follows that the different state of master [1252b] and
 slave is equally advantageous to both. But there is a natural difference
 between a female and a slave: for nature is not like the artists
 who make the Delphic swords for the use of the poor, but for every
 particular purpose she has her separate instruments, and thus her ends
 are most complete, for whatsoever is employed on one subject only,
 brings that one to much greater perfection than when employed on many;
 and yet among the barbarians, a female and a slave are upon a level in
 the community, the reason for which is, that amongst them there are none
 qualified by nature to govern, therefore their society can be nothing
 but between slaves of different sexes. For which reason the poets say,
 it is proper for the Greeks to govern the barbarians, as if a barbarian
 and a slave were by nature one. Now of these two societies the domestic
 is the first, and Hesiod is right when he says, "First a house, then
 a wife, then an ox for the plough," for the poor man has always an ox
 before a household slave. That society then which nature has established
 for daily support is the domestic, and those who compose it are called
 by Charondas _homosipuoi_, and by Epimenides the Cretan _homokapnoi_;
 but the society of many families, which was first instituted for their
 lasting, mutual advantage, is called a village, and a village is most
 naturally composed of the descendants of one family, whom some persons
 call homogalaktes, the children and the children's children thereof: for
 which reason cities were originally governed by kings, as the barbarian
 states now are, which are composed of those who had before submitted to
 kingly government; for every family is governed by the elder, as are the
 branches thereof, on account of their relationship thereunto, which
 is what Homer says, "Each one ruled his wife and child;" and in this
 scattered manner they formerly lived. And the opinion which universally
 prevails, that the gods themselves are subject to kingly government,
 arises from hence, that all men formerly were, and many are so now; and
 as they imagined themselves to be made in the likeness of the gods, so
 they supposed their manner of life must needs be the same. And when many
 villages so entirely join themselves together as in every respect to
 form but one society, that society is a city, and contains in itself, if
 I may so speak, the end and perfection of government: first founded that
 we might live, but continued that we may live happily. For which reason
 every city must be allowed to be the work of nature, if we admit that
 the original society between male and female is; for to this as their
 end all subordinate societies tend, and the end of everything is the
 nature of it. For what every being is in its most perfect state, that
 certainly is the nature of that being, whether it be a man, a horse, or
 a house: besides, whatsoever produces the final cause and the end which
 we [1253a] desire, must be best; but a government complete in itself is
 that final cause and what is best. Hence it is evident that a city is
 a natural production, and that man is naturally a political animal, and
 that whosoever is naturally and not accidentally unfit for society, must
 be either inferior or superior to man: thus the man in Homer, who is
 reviled for being "without society, without law, without family." Such
 a one must naturally be of a quarrelsome disposition, and as solitary as
 the birds. The gift of speech also evidently proves that man is a more
 social animal than the bees, or any of the herding cattle: for nature,
 as we say, does nothing in vain, and man is the only animal who enjoys
 it. Voice indeed, as being the token of pleasure and pain, is imparted
 to others also, and thus much their nature is capable of, to perceive
 pleasure and pain, and to impart these sensations to others; but it is
 by speech that we are enabled to express what is useful for us, and what
 is hurtful, and of course what is just and what is unjust: for in
 this particular man differs from other animals, that he alone has
 a perception of good and evil, of just and unjust, and it is a
 participation of these common sentiments which forms a family and a
 city. Besides, the notion of a city naturally precedes that of a family
 or an individual, for the whole must necessarily be prior to the parts,
 for if you take away the whole man, you cannot say a foot or a hand
 remains, unless by equivocation, as supposing a hand of stone to be
 made, but that would only be a dead one; but everything is understood to
 be this or that by its energic qualities and powers, so that when these
 no longer remain, neither can that be said to be the same, but something
 of the same name. That a city then precedes an individual is plain,
 for if an individual is not in himself sufficient to compose a perfect
 government, he is to a city as other parts are to a whole; but he that
 is incapable of society, or so complete in himself as not to want it,
 makes no part of a city, as a beast or a god. There is then in all
 persons a natural impetus to associate with each other in this manner,
 and he who first founded civil society was the cause of the greatest
 good; for as by the completion of it man is the most excellent of all
 living beings, so without law and justice he would be the worst of all,
 for nothing is so difficult to subdue as injustice in arms: but these
 arms man is born with, namely, prudence and valour, which he may apply
 to the most opposite purposes, for he who abuses them will be the most
 wicked, the most cruel, the most lustful, and most gluttonous being
 imaginable; for justice is a political virtue, by the rules of it the
 state is regulated, and these rules are the criterion of what is right.
 
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III
 
 
 SINCE it is now evident of what parts a city is composed, it will be
 necessary to treat first of family government, for every city is made
 up of families, and every family [1253b] has again its separate parts of
 which it is composed. When a family is complete, it consists of freemen
 and slaves; but as in every subject we should begin with examining into
 the smallest parts of which it consists, and as the first and smallest
 parts of a family are the master and slave, the husband and wife, the
 father and child, let us first inquire into these three, what each of
 them may be, and what they ought to be; that is to say, the herile, the
 nuptial, and the paternal. Let these then be considered as the three
 distinct parts of a family: some think that the providing what is
 necessary for the family is something different from the government of
 it, others that this is the greatest part of it; it shall be considered
 separately; but we will first speak of a master and a slave, that we
 may both understand the nature of those things which are absolutely
 necessary, and also try if we can learn anything better on this subject
 than what is already known. Some persons have thought that the power of
 the master over his slave originates from his superior knowledge, and
 that this knowledge is the same in the master, the magistrate, and the
 king, as we have already said; but others think that herile government
 is contrary to nature, and that it is the law which makes one man a
 slave and another free, but that in nature there is no difference; for
 which reason that power cannot be founded in justice, but in force.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV
 
 
 Since then a subsistence is necessary in every family, the means of
 procuring it certainly makes up part of the management of a family, for
 without necessaries it is impossible to live, and to live well. As
 in all arts which are brought to perfection it is necessary that they
 should have their proper instruments if they would complete their works,
 so is it in the art of managing a family: now of instruments some of
 them are alive, others inanimate; thus with respect to the pilot of the
 ship, the tiller is without life, the sailor is alive; for a servant
 is as an instrument in many arts. Thus property is as an instrument
 to living; an estate is a multitude of instruments; so a slave is an
 animated instrument, but every one that can minister of himself is more
 valuable than any other instrument; for if every instrument, at command,
 or from a preconception of its master's will, could accomplish its work
 (as the story goes of the statues of Daedalus; or what the poet tells us
 of the tripods of Vulcan, "that they moved of their own accord into the
 assembly of the gods "), the shuttle would then weave, and the lyre play
 of itself; nor would the architect want servants, or the [1254a] master
 slaves. Now what are generally called instruments are the efficients
 of something else, but possessions are what we simply use: thus with a
 shuttle we make something else for our use; but we only use a coat, or a
 bed: since then making and using differ from each other in species, and
 they both require their instruments, it is necessary that these should
 be different from each other. Now life is itself what we use, and not
 what we employ as the efficient of something else; for which reason the
 services of a slave are for use. A possession may be considered in the
 same nature as a part of anything; now a part is not only a part of
 something, but also is nothing else; so is a possession; therefore a
 master is only the master of the slave, but no part of him; but the
 slave is not only the slave of the master, but nothing else but that.
 This fully explains what is the nature of a slave, and what are his
 capacities; for that being who by nature is nothing of himself, but
 totally another's, and is a man, is a slave by nature; and that man who
 is the property of another, is his mere chattel, though he continues a
 man; but a chattel is an instrument for use, separate from the body.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V
 
 
 But whether any person is such by nature, and whether it is advantageous
 and just for any one to be a slave or no, or whether all slavery is
 contrary to nature, shall be considered hereafter; not that it is
 difficult to determine it upon general principles, or to understand
 it from matters of fact; for that some should govern, and others be
 governed, is not only necessary but useful, and from the hour of their
 birth some are marked out for those purposes, and others for the other,
 and there are many species of both sorts. And the better those are who
 are governed the better also is the government, as for instance of man,
 rather than the brute creation: for the more excellent the materials
 are with which the work is finished, the more excellent certainly is the
 work; and wherever there is a governor and a governed, there certainly
 is some work produced; for whatsoever is composed of many parts, which
 jointly become one, whether conjunct or separate, evidently show the
 marks of governing and governed; and this is true of every living thing
 in all nature; nay, even in some things which partake not of life, as
 in music; but this probably would be a disquisition too foreign to our
 present purpose. Every living thing in the first place is composed of
 soul and body, of these the one is by nature the governor, the other the
 governed; now if we would know what is natural, we ought to search for
 it in those subjects in which nature appears most perfect, and not in
 those which are corrupted; we should therefore examine into a man who
 is most perfectly formed both in soul and body, in whom this is evident,
 for in the depraved and vicious the body seems [1254b] to rule rather
 than the soul, on account of their being corrupt and contrary to nature.
 We may then, as we affirm, perceive in an animal the first principles
 of herile and political government; for the soul governs the body as the
 master governs his slave; the mind governs the appetite with a political
 or a kingly power, which shows that it is both natural and advantageous
 that the body should be governed by the soul, and the pathetic part by
 the mind, and that part which is possessed of reason; but to have no
 ruling power, or an improper one, is hurtful to all; and this holds
 true not only of man, but of other animals also, for tame animals are
 naturally better than wild ones, and it is advantageous that both should
 be under subjection to man; for this is productive of their common
 safety: so is it naturally with the male and the female; the one is
 superior, the other inferior; the one governs, the other is governed;
 and the same rule must necessarily hold good with respect to all
 mankind. Those men therefore who are as much inferior to others as the
 body is to the soul, are to be thus disposed of, as the proper use of
 them is their bodies, in which their excellence consists; and if what I
 have said be true, they are slaves by nature, and it is advantageous to
 them to be always under government. He then is by nature formed a slave
 who is qualified to become the chattel of another person, and on that
 account is so, and who has just reason enough to know that there is such
 a faculty, without being indued with the use of it; for other animals
 have no perception of reason, but are entirely guided by appetite,
 and indeed they vary very little in their use from each other; for the
 advantage which we receive, both from slaves and tame animals, arises
 from their bodily strength administering to our necessities; for it
 is the intention of nature to make the bodies of slaves and freemen
 different from each other, that the one should be robust for their
 necessary purposes, the others erect, useless indeed for what slaves are
 employed in, but fit for civil life, which is divided into the duties of
 war and peace; though these rules do not always take place, for slaves
 have sometimes the bodies of freemen, sometimes the souls; if then it
 is evident that if some bodies are as much more excellent than others as
 the statues of the gods excel the human form, every one will allow that
 the inferior ought to be slaves to the superior; and if this is true
 with respect to the body, it is still juster to determine in the same
 manner, when we consider the soul; though it is not so easy to perceive
 the beauty of [1255a] the soul as it is of the body. Since then some
 men are slaves by nature, and others are freemen, it is clear that where
 slavery is advantageous to any one, then it is just to make him a slave.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI
 
 
 But it is not difficult to perceive that those who maintain the contrary
 opinion have some reason on their side; for a man may become a slave two
 different ways; for he may be so by law also, and this law is a certain
 compact, by which whatsoever is taken in battle is adjudged to be the
 property of the conquerors: but many persons who are conversant in law
 call in question this pretended right, and say that it would be hard
 that a man should be compelled by violence to be the slave and subject
 of another who had the power to compel him, and was his superior in
 strength; and upon this subject, even of those who are wise, some think
 one way and some another; but the cause of this doubt and variety of
 opinions arises from hence, that great abilities, when accompanied with
 proper means, are generally able to succeed by force: for victory is
 always owing to a superiority in some advantageous circumstances; so
 that it seems that force never prevails but in consequence of great
 abilities. But still the dispute concerning the justice of it remains;
 for some persons think, that justice consists in benevolence, others
 think it just that the powerful should govern: in the midst of these
 contrary opinions, there are no reasons sufficient to convince us, that
 the right of being master and governor ought not to be placed with those
 who have the greatest abilities. Some persons, entirely resting upon the
 right which the law gives (for that which is legal is in some respects
 just), insist upon it that slavery occasioned by war is just, not that
 they say it is wholly so, for it may happen that the principle upon
 which the wars were commenced is unjust; moreover no one will say that a
 man who is unworthily in slavery is therefore a slave; for if so, men of
 the noblest families might happen to be slaves, and the descendants of
 slaves, if they should chance to be taken prisoners in war and sold: to
 avoid this difficulty they say that such persons should not be called
 slaves, but barbarians only should; but when they say this, they do
 nothing more than inquire who is a slave by nature, which was what we
 at first said; for we must acknowledge that there are some persons
 who, wherever they are, must necessarily be slaves, but others in no
 situation; thus also it is with those of noble descent: it is not only
 in their own country that they are Esteemed as such, but everywhere,
 but the barbarians are respected on this account at home only; as if
 nobility and freedom were of two sorts, the one universal, the other not
 so. Thus says the Helen of Theodectes:
 
   "Who dares reproach me with the name of slave? When from the
 immortal gods, on either side, I draw my lineage."
 
 Those who express sentiments like these, shew only that they distinguish
 the slave and the freeman, the noble and the ignoble from each other
 by their virtues and their [1255b] vices; for they think it reasonable,
 that as a man begets a man, and a beast a beast, so from a good man, a
 good man should be descended; and this is what nature desires to do, but
 frequently cannot accomplish it. It is evident then that this doubt
 has some reason in it, and that these persons are not slaves, and those
 freemen, by the appointment of nature; and also that in some instances
 it is sufficiently clear, that it is advantageous to both parties for
 this man to be a slave, and that to be a master, and that it is right
 and just, that some should be governed, and others govern, in the manner
 that nature intended; of which sort of government is that which a master
 exercises over a slave. But to govern ill is disadvantageous to both;
 for the same thing is useful to the part and to the whole, to the body
 and to the soul; but the slave is as it were a part of the master, as if
 he were an animated part of his body, though separate. For which reason
 a mutual utility and friendship may subsist between the master and the
 slave, I mean when they are placed by nature in that relation to each
 other, for the contrary takes place amongst those who are reduced to
 slavery by the law, or by conquest.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII
 
 
 It is evident from what has been said, that a herile and a political
 government are not the same, or that all governments are alike to each
 other, as some affirm; for one is adapted to the nature of freemen, the
 other to that of slaves. Domestic government is a monarchy, for that is
 what prevails in every house; but a political state is the government of
 free men and equals. The master is not so called from his knowing how to
 manage his slave, but because he is so; for the same reason a slave and
 a freeman have their respective appellations. There is also one sort of
 knowledge proper for a master, another for a slave; the slave's is of
 the nature of that which was taught by a slave at Syracuse; for he for
 a stipulated sum instructed the boys in all the business of a household
 slave, of which there are various sorts to be learnt, as the art of
 cookery, and other such-like services, of which some are allotted to
 some, and others to others; some employments being more honourable,
 others more necessary; according to the proverb, "One slave excels
 another, one master excels another:" in such-like things the knowledge
 of a slave consists. The knowledge of the master is to be able properly
 to employ his slaves, for the mastership of slaves is the employment,
 not the mere possession of them; not that this knowledge contains
 anything great or respectable; for what a slave ought to know how to do,
 that a master ought to know how to order; for which reason, those who
 have it in their power to be free from these low attentions, employ a
 steward for this business, and apply themselves either to public affairs
 or philosophy: the knowledge of procuring what is necessary for a family
 is different from that which belongs either to the master or the slave:
 and to do this justly must be either by war or hunting. And thus much of
 the difference between a master and a slave.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII
 
 
 [1256a] As a slave is a particular species of property, let us by
 all means inquire into the nature of property in general, and the
 acquisition of money, according to the manner we have proposed. In the
 first place then, some one may doubt whether the getting of money is
 the same thing as economy, or whether it is a part of it, or something
 subservient to it; and if so, whether it is as the art of making
 shuttles is to the art of weaving, or the art of making brass to that
 of statue founding, for they are not of the same service; for the one
 supplies the tools, the other the matter: by the matter I mean the
 subject out of which the work is finished, as wool for the cloth and
 brass for the statue. It is evident then that the getting of money is
 not the same thing as economy, for the business of the one is to furnish
 the means of the other to use them; and what art is there employed in
 the management of a family but economy, but whether this is a part of
 it, or something of a different species, is a doubt; for if it is
 the business of him who is to get money to find out how riches and
 possessions may be procured, and both these arise from various
 causes, we must first inquire whether the art of husbandry is part of
 money-getting or something different, and in general, whether the same
 is not true of every acquisition and every attention which relates to
 provision. But as there are many sorts of provision, so are the methods
 of living both of man and the brute creation very various; and as it is
 impossible to live without food, the difference in that particular makes
 the lives of animals so different from each other. Of beasts, some
 live in herds, others separate, as is most convenient for procuring
 themselves food; as some of them live upon flesh, others on fruit, and
 others on whatsoever they light on, nature having so distinguished
 their course of life, that they can very easily procure themselves
 subsistence; and as the same things are not agreeable to all, but one
 animal likes one thing and another another, it follows that the lives
 of those beasts who live upon flesh must be different from the lives of
 those who live on fruits; so is it with men, their lives differ greatly
 from each other; and of all these the shepherd's is the idlest, for they
 live upon the flesh of tame animals, without any trouble, while they are
 obliged to change their habitations on account of their flocks, which
 they are compelled to follow, cultivating, as it were, a living farm.
 Others live exercising violence over living creatures, one pursuing this
 thing, another that, these preying upon men; those who live near lakes
 and marshes and rivers, or the sea itself, on fishing, while others are
 fowlers, or hunters of wild beasts; but the greater part of mankind live
 upon the produce of the earth and its cultivated fruits; and the manner
 in which all those live who follow the direction of nature, and labour
 for their own subsistence, is nearly the same, without ever thinking
 to procure any provision by way of exchange or merchandise, such are
 shepherds, husband-men, [1256b] robbers, fishermen, and hunters: some
 join different employments together, and thus live very agreeably;
 supplying those deficiencies which were wanting to make their
 subsistence depend upon themselves only: thus, for instance, the same
 person shall be a shepherd and a robber, or a husbandman and a hunter;
 and so with respect to the rest, they pursue that mode of life which
 necessity points out. This provision then nature herself seems to have
 furnished all animals with, as well immediately upon their first origin
 as also when they are arrived at a state of maturity; for at the first
 of these periods some of them are provided in the womb with proper
 nourishment, which continues till that which is born can get food for
 itself, as is the case with worms and birds; and as to those which bring
 forth their young alive, they have the means for their subsistence for a
 certain time within themselves, namely milk. It is evident then that we
 may conclude of those things that are, that plants are created for the
 sake of animals, and animals for the sake of men; the tame for our use
 and provision; the wild, at least the greater part, for our provision
 also, or for some other advantageous purpose, as furnishing us with
 clothes, and the like. As nature therefore makes nothing either
 imperfect or in vain, it necessarily follows that she has made all these
 things for men: for which reason what we gain in war is in a certain
 degree a natural acquisition; for hunting is a part of it, which it is
 necessary for us to employ against wild beasts; and those men who being
 intended by nature for slavery are unwilling to submit to it, on which
 occasion such a. war is by nature just: that species of acquisition then
 only which is according to nature is part of economy; and this ought to
 be at hand, or if not, immediately procured, namely, what is necessary
 to be kept in store to live upon, and which are useful as well for the
 state as the family. And true riches seem to consist in these; and the
 acquisition of those possessions which are necessary for a happy life is
 not infinite; though Solon says otherwise in this verse:
 
   "No bounds to riches can be fixed for man;"
 
 for they may be fixed as in other arts; for the instruments of no art
 whatsoever are infinite, either in their number or their magnitude; but
 riches are a number of instruments in domestic and civil economy; it is
 therefore evident that the acquisition of certain things according
 to nature is a part both of domestic and civil economy, and for what
 reason.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IX
 
 
 There is also another species of acquisition which they [1257a]
 particularly call pecuniary, and with great propriety; and by this
 indeed it seems that there are no bounds to riches and wealth. Now many
 persons suppose, from their near relation to each other, that this is
 one and the same with that we have just mentioned, but it is not the
 same as that, though not very different; one of these is natural, the
 other is not, but rather owing to some art and skill; we will enter into
 a particular examination of this subject. The uses of every possession
 are two, both dependent upon the thing itself, but not in the same
 manner, the one supposing an inseparable connection with it, the other
 not; as a shoe, for instance, which may be either worn, or exchanged
 for something else, both these are the uses of the shoe; for he who
 exchanges a shoe with some man who wants one, for money or provisions,
 uses the shoe as a shoe, but not according to the original intention,
 for shoes were not at first made to be exchanged. The same thing holds
 true of all other possessions; for barter, in general, had its original
 beginning in nature, some men having a surplus, others too little of
 what was necessary for them: hence it is evident, that the selling
 provisions for money is not according to the natural use of things; for
 they were obliged to use barter for those things which they wanted; but
 it is plain that barter could have no place in the first, that is to
 say, in family society; but must have begun when the number of those
 who composed the community was enlarged: for the first of these had all
 things in common; but when they came to be separated they were obliged
 to exchange with each other many different things which both parties
 wanted. Which custom of barter is still preserved amongst many barbarous
 nations, who procure one necessary with another, but never sell
 anything; as giving and receiving wine for corn and the like. This
 sort of barter is not contradictory to nature, nor is it any species of
 money-getting; but is necessary in procuring that subsistence which is
 so consonant thereunto. But this barter introduced the use of money, as
 might be expected; for a convenient place from whence to import what you
 wanted, or to export what you had a surplus of, being often at a great
 distance, money necessarily made its way into commerce; for it is not
 everything which is naturally most useful that is easiest of carriage;
 for which reason they invented something to exchange with each other
 which they should mutually give and take, that being really valuable
 itself, should have the additional advantage of being of easy
 conveyance, for the purposes of life, as iron and silver, or anything
 else of the same nature: and this at first passed in value simply
 according to its weight or size; but in process of time it had a certain
 stamp, to save the trouble of weighing, which stamp expressed its value.
 [1257b]
 
 Money then being established as the necessary medium of exchange,
 another species of money-getting soon took place, namely, by buying
 and selling, at probably first in a simple manner, afterwards with more
 skill and experience, where and how the greatest profits might be made.
 For which reason the art of money-getting seems to be chiefly conversant
 about trade, and the business of it to be able to tell where the
 greatest profits can be made, being the means of procuring abundance
 of wealth and possessions: and thus wealth is very often supposed to
 consist in the quantity of money which any one possesses, as this is the
 medium by which all trade is conducted and a fortune made, others again
 regard it as of no value, as being of none by nature, but arbitrarily
 made so by compact; so that if those who use it should alter their
 sentiments, it would be worth nothing, as being of no service for
 any necessary purpose. Besides, he who abounds in money often wants
 necessary food; and it is impossible to say that any person is in good
 circumstances when with all his possessions he may perish with hunger.
 
 Like Midas in the fable, who from his insatiable wish had everything he
 touched turned into gold. For which reason others endeavour to procure
 other riches and other property, and rightly, for there are other riches
 and property in nature; and these are the proper objects of economy:
 while trade only procures money, not by all means, but by the exchange
 of it, and for that purpose it is this which it is chiefly employed
 about, for money is the first principle and the end of trade; nor are
 there any bounds to be set to what is thereby acquired. Thus also there
 are no limits to the art of medicine, with respect to the health which
 it attempts to procure; the same also is true of all other arts; no line
 can be drawn to terminate their bounds, the several professors of them
 being desirous to extend them as far as possible. (But still the means
 to be employed for that purpose are limited; and these are the limits
 beyond which the art cannot proceed.) Thus in the art of acquiring
 riches there are no limits, for the object of that is money and
 possessions; but economy has a boundary, though this has not: for
 acquiring riches is not the business of that, for which reason it should
 seem that some boundary should be set to riches, though we see the
 contrary to this is what is practised; for all those who get riches add
 to their money without end; the cause of which is the near connection
 of these two arts with each other, which sometimes occasions the one to
 change employments with the other, as getting of money is their common
 object: for economy requires the possession of wealth, but not on
 its own account but with another view, to purchase things necessary
 therewith; but the other procures it merely to increase it: so that some
 persons are confirmed in their belief, that this is the proper object
 of economy, and think that for this purpose money should be saved and
 hoarded up without end; the reason for which disposition is, that they
 are intent upon living, but not upon living well; and this desire being
 boundless in its extent, the means which they aim at for that purpose
 are boundless also; and those who propose to live well, often confine
 that to the enjoyment of the pleasures of sense; so that as this also
 seems to depend upon what a man has, all their care is to get money,
 and hence arises the other cause for this art; for as this enjoyment is
 excessive in its degree, they endeavour to procure means proportionate
 to supply it; and if they cannot do this merely by the art of dealing in
 money, they will endeavour to do it by other ways, and apply all their
 powers to a purpose they were not by nature intended for. Thus, for
 instance, courage was intended to inspire fortitude, not to get money
 by; neither is this the end of the soldier's or the physician's art,
 but victory and health. But such persons make everything subservient to
 money-getting, as if this was the only end; and to the end everything
 ought to refer.
 
 We have now considered that art of money-getting which is not necessary,
 and have seen in what manner we became in want of it; and also that
 which is necessary, which is different from it; for that economy which
 is natural, and whose object is to provide food, is not like this
 unlimited in its extent, but has its bounds.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER X
 
 
 We have now determined what was before doubtful, whether or no the art
 of getting money is his business who is at the head of a family or a
 state, and though not strictly so, it is however very necessary; for
 as a politician does not make men, but receiving them from the hand of
 nature employs them to proper purposes; thus the earth, or the sea, or
 something else ought to supply them with provisions, and this it is the
 business of the master of the family to manage properly; for it is not
 the weaver's business to make yarn, but to use it, and to distinguish
 what is good and useful from what is bad and of no service; and indeed
 some one may inquire why getting money should be a part of economy when
 the art of healing is not, as it is as requisite that the family should
 be in health as that they should eat, or have anything else which is
 necessary; and as it is indeed in some particulars the business both of
 the master of the family, and he to whom the government of the state
 is entrusted, to see after the health of those under their care, but in
 others not, but the physician's; so also as to money; in some respects
 it is the business of the master of the family, in others not, but of
 the servant; but as we have already said, it is chiefly nature's, for
 it is her part to supply her offspring with food; for everything finds
 nourishment left for it in what produced it; for which reason
 the natural riches of all men arise from fruits and animals. Now
 money-making, as we say, being twofold, it may be applied to two
 purposes, the service of the house or retail trade; of which the first
 is necessary and commendable, the other justly censurable; for it has
 not its origin in [1258b] nature, but by it men gain from each other;
 for usury is most reasonably detested, as it is increasing our fortune
 by money itself, and not employing it for the purpose it was originally
 intended, namely exchange.
 
 And this is the explanation of the name (TOKOS), which means the
 breeding of money. For as offspring resemble their parents, so usury
 is money bred of money. Whence of all forms of money-making it is most
 against nature.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XI
 
 
 Having already sufficiently considered the general principles of this
 subject, let us now go into the practical part thereof; the one is a
 liberal employment for the mind, the other necessary. These things are
 useful in the management of one's affairs; to be skilful in the nature
 of cattle, which are most profitable, and where, and how; as for
 instance, what advantage will arise from keeping horses, or oxen, or
 sheep, or any other live stock; it is also necessary to be acquainted
 with the comparative value of these things, and which of them in
 particular places are worth most; for some do better in one place, some
 in another. Agriculture also should be understood, and the management
 of arable grounds and orchards; and also the care of bees, and fish, and
 birds, from whence any profit may arise; these are the first and most
 proper parts of domestic management.
 
 With respect to gaining money by exchange, the principal method of doing
 this is by merchandise, which is carried on in three different ways,
 either by sending the commodity for sale by sea or by land, or else
 selling it on the place where it grows; and these differ from each other
 in this, that the one is more profitable, the other safer. The second
 method is by usury. The third by receiving wages for work done, and
 this either by being employed in some mean art, or else in mere bodily
 labour. There is also a third species of improving a fortune, that is
 something between this and the first; for it partly depends upon
 nature, partly upon exchange; the subject of which is, things that are
 immediately from the earth, or their produce, which, though they bear
 no fruit, are yet useful, such as selling of timber and the whole art of
 metallurgy, which includes many different species, for there are various
 sorts of things dug out of the earth.
 
 These we have now mentioned in general, but to enter into particulars
 concerning each of them, though it might be useful to the artist, would
 be tiresome to dwell on. Now of all the works of art, those are the most
 excellent wherein chance has the least to do, and those are the meanest
 which deprave the body, those the most servile in which bodily strength
 alone is chiefly wanted, those most illiberal which require least skill;
 but as there are books written on these subjects by some persons, as
 by Chares the Panian, and Apollodorus the Lemnian, upon husbandry and
 planting; and by others on other matters, [1259b] let those who have
 occasion consult them thereon; besides, every person should collect
 together whatsoever he hears occasionally mentioned, by means of which
 many of those who aimed at making a fortune have succeeded in their
 intentions; for all these are useful to those who make a point of
 getting money, as in the contrivance of Thales the Milesian (which was
 certainly a gainful one, but as it was his it was attributed to
 his wisdom, though the method he used was a general one, and would
 universally succeed), when they reviled him for his poverty, as if the
 study of philosophy was useless: for they say that he, perceiving by his
 skill in astrology that there would be great plenty of olives that year,
 while it was yet winter, having got a little money, he gave earnest for
 all the oil works that were in Miletus and Chios, which he hired at a
 low price, there being no one to bid against him; but when the season
 came for making oil, many persons wanting them, he all at once let them
 upon what terms he pleased; and raising a large sum of money by that
 means, convinced them that it was easy for philosophers to be rich if
 they chose it, but that that was not what they aimed at; in this manner
 is Thales said to have shown his wisdom. It indeed is, as we have
 said, generally gainful for a person to contrive to make a monopoly of
 anything; for which reason some cities also take this method when they
 want money, and monopolise their commodities. There was a certain person
 in Sicily who laid out a sum of money which was deposited in his hand in
 buying up all the iron from the iron merchants; so that when the dealers
 came from the markets to purchase, there was no one had any to sell but
 himself; and though he put no great advance upon it, yet by laying out
 fifty talents he made an hundred. When Dionysius heard this he permitted
 him to take his money with him, but forbid him to continue any longer in
 Sicily, as being one who contrived means for getting money inconsistent
 with his affairs. This man's view and Thales's was exactly the same;
 both of them contrived to procure a monopoly for themselves: it is
 useful also for politicians to understand these things, for many states
 want to raise money and by such means, as well as private families,
 nay more so; for which reason some persons who are employed in the
 management of public affairs confine themselves to this province only.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XII
 
 
 There are then three parts of domestic government, the masters, of
 which we have already treated, the fathers, and the husbands; now the
 government of the wife and children should both be that of free persons,
 but not the [I259b] same; for the wife should be treated as a citizen of
 a free state, the children should be under kingly power; for the male is
 by nature superior to the female, except when something happens contrary
 to the usual course of nature, as is the elder and perfect to the
 younger and imperfect. Now in the generality of free states, the
 governors and the governed alternately change place; for an equality
 without any preference is what nature chooses; however, when one
 governs and another is governed, she endeavours that there should be a
 distinction between them in forms, expressions, and honours; according
 to what Amasis said of his laver. This then should be the established
 rule between the man and the woman. The government of children should
 be kingly; for the power of the father over the child is founded in
 affection and seniority, which is a species of kingly government; for
 which reason Homer very properly calls Jupiter "the father of gods and
 men," who was king of both these; for nature requires that a king should
 be of the same species with those whom he governs, though superior in
 some particulars, as is the case between the elder and the younger, the
 father and the son.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIII
 
 
 It is evident then that in the due government of a family, greater
 attention should be paid to the several members of it and their virtues
 than to the possessions or riches of it; and greater to the freemen
 than the slaves: but here some one may doubt whether there is any other
 virtue in a slave than his organic services, and of higher estimation
 than these, as temperance, fortitude, justice, and such-like habits, or
 whether they possess only bodily qualities: each side of the question
 has its difficulties; for if they possess these virtues, wherein do
 they differ from freemen? and that they do not, since they are men,
 and partakers of reason, is absurd. Nearly the same inquiry may be made
 concerning a woman and a child, whether these also have their proper
 virtues; whether a woman ought to be temperate, brave, and just, and
 whether a child is temperate or no; and indeed this inquiry ought to be
 general, whether the virtues of those who, by nature, either govern or
 are governed, are the same or different; for if it is necessary that
 both of them should partake of the fair and good, why is it also
 necessary that, without exception, the one should govern, the other
 always be governed? for this cannot arise from their possessing these
 qualities in different degrees; for to govern, and to be governed, are
 things different in species, but more or less are not. And yet it is
 wonderful that one party ought to have them, and the other not; for if
 he who is to govern should not be temperate and just, how can he govern
 well? or if he is to be governed, how can he be governed well? for he
 who is intemperate [1260a] and a coward will never do what he ought: it
 is evident then that both parties ought to be virtuous; but there is a
 difference between them, as there is between those who by nature command
 and who by nature obey, and this originates in the soul; for in this
 nature has planted the governing and submitting principle, the virtues
 of which we say are different, as are those of a rational and an
 irrational being. It is plain then that the same principle may be
 extended farther, and that there are in nature a variety of things which
 govern and are governed; for a freeman is governed in a different manner
 from a slave, a male from a female, and a man from a child: and all
 these have parts of mind within them, but in a different manner. Thus
 a slave can have no power of determination, a woman but a weak one, a
 child an imperfect one. Thus also must it necessarily be with respect to
 moral virtues; all must be supposed to possess them, but not in the
 same manner, but as is best suited to every one's employment; on which
 account he who is to govern ought to be perfect in moral virtue, for his
 business is entirely that of an architect, and reason is the architect;
 while others want only that portion of it which may be sufficient for
 their station; from whence it is evident, that although moral virtue is
 common to all those we have spoken of, yet the temperance of a man and
 a woman are not the same, nor their courage, nor their justice, though
 Socrates thought otherwise; for the courage of the man consists in
 commanding, the woman's in obeying; and the same is true in other
 particulars: and this will be evident to those who will examine
 different virtues separately; for those who use general terms deceive
 themselves when they say, that virtue consists in a good disposition of
 mind, or doing what is right, or something of this sort. They do much
 better who enumerate the different virtues as Georgias did, than those
 who thus define them; and as Sophocles speaks of a woman, we think
 of all persons, that their 'virtues should be applicable to their
 characters, for says he,
 
   "Silence is a woman's ornament,"
 
 but it is not a man's; and as a child is incomplete, it is evident that
 his virtue is not to be referred to himself in his present situation,
 but to that in which he will be complete, and his preceptor. In like
 manner the virtue of a slave is to be referred to his master; for we
 laid it down as a maxim, that the use of a slave was to employ him in
 what you wanted; so that it is clear enough that few virtues are wanted
 in his station, only that he may not neglect his work through idleness
 or fear: some person may question if what I have said is true, whether
 virtue is not necessary for artificers in their calling, for they often
 through idleness neglect their work, but the difference between them
 is very great; for a slave is connected with you for life, but the
 artificer not so nearly: as near therefore as the artificer approaches
 to the situation of a slave, just so much ought he to have of the
 virtues of one; for a mean artificer is to a certain point a slave; but
 then a slave is one of those things which are by nature what they are,
 but this is not true [1260b] of a shoemaker, or any other artist. It is
 evident then that a slave ought to be trained to those virtues which are
 proper for his situation by his master; and not by him who has the power
 of a master, to teach him any particular art. Those therefore are in the
 wrong who would deprive slaves of reason, and say that they have only to
 follow their orders; for slaves want more instruction than children, and
 thus we determine this matter. It is necessary, I am sensible, for every
 one who treats upon government, to enter particularly into the relations
 of husband and wife, and of parent and child, and to show what are the
 virtues of each and their respective connections with each other; what
 is right and what is wrong; and how the one ought to be followed, and
 the other avoided. Since then every family is part of a city, and each
 of those individuals is part of a family, and the virtue of the parts
 ought to correspond to the virtue of the whole; it is necessary, that
 both the wives and children of the community should be instructed
 correspondent to the nature thereof, if it is of consequence to the
 virtue of the state, that the wives and children therein should be
 virtuous, and of consequence it certainly is, for the wives are one half
 of the free persons; and of the children the succeeding citizens are to
 be formed. As then we have determined these points, we will leave
 the rest to be spoken to in another place, as if the subject was now
 finished; and beginning again anew, first consider the sentiments of
 those who have treated of the most perfect forms of government.
 
 
 
 
 BOOK II
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I
 
 
 Since then we propose to inquire what civil society is of all others
 best for those who have it in their power to live entirely as they wish,
 it is necessary to examine into the polity of those states which are
 allowed to be well governed; and if there should be any others which
 some persons have described, and which appear properly regulated, to
 note what is right and useful in them; and when we point out wherein
 they have failed, let not this be imputed to an affectation of wisdom,
 for it is because there are great defects in all those which are already
 established, that I have been induced to undertake this work. We will
 begin with that part of the subject which naturally presents itself
 first to our consideration. The members of every state must of necessity
 have all things in common, or some things common, and not others,
 or nothing at all common. To have nothing in common is evidently
 impossible, for society itself is one species of [1261a] community; and
 the first thing necessary thereunto is a common place of habitation,
 namely the city, which must be one, and this every citizen must have a
 share in. But in a government which is to be well founded, will it be
 best to admit of a community in everything which is capable thereof, or
 only in some particulars, but in others not? for it is possible that the
 citizens may have their wives, and children, and goods in common, as
 in Plato's Commonwealth; for in that Socrates affirms that all these
 particulars ought to be so. Which then shall we prefer? the custom which
 is already established, or the laws which are proposed in that treatise?
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II
 
 
 Now as a community of wives is attended with many other difficulties, so
 neither does the cause for which he would frame his government in this
 manner seem agreeable to reason, nor is it capable of producing that end
 which he has proposed, and for which he says it ought to take place; nor
 has he given any particular directions for putting it in practice. Now
 I also am willing to agree with Socrates in the principle which he
 proceeds upon, and admit that the city ought to be one as much as
 possible; and yet it is evident that if it is contracted too much, it
 will be no longer a city, for that necessarily supposes a multitude; so
 that if we proceed in this manner, we shall reduce a city to a family,
 and a family to a single person: for we admit that a family is one in a
 greater degree than a city, and a single person than a family; so that
 if this end could be obtained, it should never be put in practice, as it
 would annihilate the city; for a city does not only consist of a large
 number of inhabitants, but there must also be different sorts; for were
 they all alike, there could be no city; for a confederacy and a city are
 two different things; for a confederacy is valuable from its numbers,
 although all those who compose it are men of the same calling; for this
 is entered into for the sake of mutual defence, as we add an additional
 weight to make the scale go down. The same distinction prevails between
 a city and a nation when the people are not collected into separate
 villages, but live as the Arcadians. Now those things in which a city
 should be one are of different sorts, and in preserving an alternate
 reciprocation of power between these, the safety thereof consists (as
 I have already mentioned in my treatise on Morals), for amongst freemen
 and equals this is absolutely necessary; for all cannot govern at the
 same time, but either by the year, or according to some other regulation
 or time, by which means every one in his turn will be in office; as
 if the shoemakers and carpenters should exchange occupations, and not
 always be employed in the same calling. But as it is evidently better,
 that these should continue to exercise their respective trades; so also
 in civil society, where it is possible, it would be better that the
 government should continue in the same hands; but where it [1261b] is
 not (as nature has made all men equal, and therefore it is just, be the
 administration good or bad, that all should partake of it), there it is
 best to observe a rotation, and let those who are their equals by turns
 submit to those who are at that time magistrates, as they will, in their
 turns, alternately be governors and governed, as if they were different
 men: by the same method different persons will execute different
 offices. From hence it is evident, that a city cannot be one in the
 manner that some persons propose; and that what has been said to be the
 greatest good which it could enjoy, is absolutely its destruction, which
 cannot be: for the good of anything is that which preserves it.
 For another reason also it is clear, that it is not for the best
 to endeavour to make a city too much one, because a family is more
 sufficient in itself than a single person, a city than a family; and
 indeed Plato supposes that a city owes its existence to that sufficiency
 in themselves which the members of it enjoy. If then this sufficiency is
 so desirable, the less the city is one the better.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III
 
 
 But admitting that it is most advantageous for a city to be one as much
 as possible, it does not seem to follow that this will take place by
 permitting all at once to say this is mine, and this is not mine (though
 this is what Socrates regards as a proof that a city is entirely one),
 for the word All is used in two senses; if it means each individual,
 what Socrates proposes will nearly take place; for each person will
 say, this is his own son, and his own wife, and his own property, and
 of everything else that may happen to belong to him, that it is his own.
 But those who have their wives and children in common will not say so,
 but all will say so, though not as individuals; therefore, to use the
 word all is evidently a fallacious mode of speech; for this word is
 sometimes used distributively, and sometimes collectively, on account
 of its double meaning, and is the cause of inconclusive syllogisms in
 reasoning. Therefore for all persons to say the same thing was their
 own, using the word all in its distributive sense, would be well, but is
 impossible: in its collective sense it would by no means contribute to
 the concord of the state. Besides, there would be another inconvenience
 attending this proposal, for what is common to many is taken least care
 of; for all men regard more what is their own than what others share
 with them in, to which they pay less attention than is incumbent on
 every one: let me add also, that every one is more negligent of what
 another is to see to, as well as himself, than of his own private
 business; as in a family one is often worse served by many servants than
 by a few. Let each citizen then in the state have a thousand children,
 but let none of them be considered as the children of that individual,
 but let the relation of father and child be common to them all, and they
 will all be neglected. Besides, in consequence of this, [1262a] whenever
 any citizen behaved well or ill, every person, be the number what it
 would, might say, this is my son, or this man's or that; and in
 this manner would they speak, and thus would they doubt of the whole
 thousand, or of whatever number the city consisted; and it would be
 uncertain to whom each child belonged, and when it was born, who was to
 take care of it: and which do you think is better, for every one to say
 this is mine, while they may apply it equally to two thousand or ten
 thousand; or as we say, this is mine in our present forms of government,
 where one man calls another his son, another calls that same person
 his brother, another nephew, or some other relation, either by blood
 or marriage, and first extends his care to him and his, while another
 regards him as one of the same parish and the same tribe; and it is
 better for any one to be a nephew in his private capacity than a son
 after that manner. Besides, it will be impossible to prevent some
 persons from suspecting that they are brothers and sisters, fathers and
 mothers to each other; for, from the mutual likeness there is between
 the sire and the offspring, they will necessarily conclude in what
 relation they stand to each other, which circumstance, we are informed
 by those writers who describe different parts of the world, does
 sometimes happen; for in Upper Africa there are wives in common who
 yet deliver their children to their respective fathers, being guided
 by their likeness to them. There are also some mares and cows which
 naturally bring forth their young so like the male, that we can easily
 distinguish by which of them they were impregnated: such was the mare
 called Just, in Pharsalia.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV
 
 
 Besides, those who contrive this plan of community cannot easily avoid
 the following evils; namely, blows, murders involuntary or voluntary,
 quarrels, and reproaches, all which it would be impious indeed to be
 guilty of towards our fathers and mothers, or those who are nearly
 related to us; though not to those who are not connected to us by any
 tie of affinity: and certainly these mischiefs must necessarily happen
 oftener amongst those who do not know how they are connected to each
 other than those who do; and when they do happen, if it is among the
 first of these, they admit of a legal expiation, but amongst the latter
 that cannot be done. It is also absurd for those who promote a
 community of children to forbid those who love each other from indulging
 themselves in the last excesses of that passion, while they do not
 restrain them from the passion itself, or those intercourses which are
 of all things most improper, between a Father and a son, a brother and
 a brother, and indeed the thing itself is most absurd. It is also
 ridiculous to prevent this intercourse between the nearest relations,
 for no other reason than the violence of the pleasure, while they think
 that the relation of father and daughter, the brother and sister, is of
 no consequence at all. It seems also more advantageous for the state,
 that the husbandmen should have their wives and children in common than
 the military, for there will be less affection [1262b] among them
 in that case than when otherwise; for such persons ought to be under
 subjection, that they may obey the laws, and not seek after innovations.
 Upon the whole, the consequences of such a law as this would be directly
 contrary to those things which good laws ought to establish, and which
 Socrates endeavoured to establish by his regulations concerning women
 and children: for we think that friendship is the greatest good which
 can happen to any city, as nothing so much prevents seditions: and amity
 in a city is what Socrates commends above all things, which appears
 to be, as indeed he says, the effect of friendship; as we learn from
 Aristophanes in the Erotics, who says, that those who love one another
 from the excess of that passion, desire to breathe the same soul, and
 from being two to be blended into one: from whence it would necessarily
 follow, that both or one of them must be destroyed. But now in a city
 which admits of this community, the tie of friendship must, from that
 very cause, be extremely weak, when no father can say, this is my son;
 or son, this is my father; for as a very little of what is sweet, being
 mixed with a great deal of water is imperceptible after the mixture, so
 must all family connections, and the names they go by, be necessarily
 disregarded in such a community, it being then by no means necessary
 that the father should have any regard for him he called a son, or
 the brothers for those they call brothers. There are two things which
 principally inspire mankind with care and love of their offspring,
 knowing it is their own, and what ought to be the object of their
 affection, neither of which can take place in this sort of community. As
 for exchanging the children of the artificers and husbandmen with those
 of the military, and theirs reciprocally with these, it will occasion
 great confusion in whatever manner it shall be done; for of necessity,
 those who carry the children must know from whom they took and to whom
 they gave them; and by this means those evils which I have already
 mentioned will necessarily be the more likely to happen, as blows,
 incestuous love, murders, and the like; for those who are given from
 their own parents to other citizens, the military, for instance, will
 not call them brothers, sons, fathers, or mothers. The same thing
 would happen to those of the military who were placed among the other
 citizens; so that by this means every one would be in fear how to act
 in consequence of consanguinity. And thus let us determine concerning a
 community of wives and children.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V
 
 
 We proceed next to consider in what manner property should be regulated
 in a state which is formed after the most perfect mode of government,
 whether it should be common or not; for this may be considered as a
 separate question from what had been determined concerning [1263a] wives
 and children; I mean, whether it is better that these should be held
 separate, as they now everywhere are, or that not only possessions but
 also the usufruct of them should be in common; or that the soil should
 have a particular owner, but that the produce should be brought together
 and used as one common stock, as some nations at present do; or on the
 contrary, should the soil be common, and should it also be cultivated in
 common, while the produce is divided amongst the individuals for their
 particular use, which is said to be practised by some barbarians; or
 shall both the soil and the fruit be common? When the business of
 the husbandman devolves not on the citizen, the matter is much easier
 settled; but when those labour together who have a common right of
 possession, this may occasion several difficulties; for there may not
 be an equal proportion between their labour and what they consume; and
 those who labour hard and have but a small proportion of the produce,
 will certainly complain of those who take a large share of it and do but
 little for that. Upon the whole, as a community between man and man so
 entire as to include everything possible, and thus to have all things
 that man can possess in common, is very difficult, so is it particularly
 so with respect to property; and this is evident from that community
 which takes place between those who go out to settle a colony; for they
 frequently have disputes with each other upon the most common occasions,
 and come to blows upon trifles: we find, too, that we oftenest correct
 those slaves who are generally employed in the common offices of the
 family: a community of property then has these and other inconveniences
 attending it.
 
 But the manner of life which is now established, more particularly when
 embellished with good morals and a system of equal laws, is far superior
 to it, for it will have the advantage of both; by both I mean properties
 being common, and divided also; for in some respects it ought to be in
 a manner common, but upon the whole private: for every man's attention
 being employed on his own particular concerns, will prevent mutual
 complaints against each other; nay, by this means industry will be
 increased, as each person will labour to improve his own private
 property; and it will then be, that from a principle of virtue they will
 mutually perform good offices to each other, according to the proverb,
 "All things are common amongst friends;" and in some cities there are
 traces of this custom to be seen, so that it is not impracticable, and
 particularly in those which are best governed; some things are by this
 means in a manner common, and others might be so; for there, every
 person enjoying his own private property, some things he assists his
 friend with, others are considered as in common; as in Lacedaemon, where
 they use each other's slaves, as if they were, so to speak, their own,
 as they do their horses and dogs, or even any provision they may want in
 a journey.
 
 It is evident then that it is best to have property private, but to make
 the use of it common; but how the citizens are to be brought to it is
 the particular [1263b] business of the legislator. And also with respect
 to pleasure, it is unspeakable how advantageous it is, that a man should
 think he has something which he may call his own; for it is by no means
 to no purpose, that each person should have an affection for himself,
 for that is natural, and yet to be a self-lover is justly censured; for
 we mean by that, not one that simply loves himself, but one that loves
 himself more than he ought; in like manner we blame a money-lover,
 and yet both money and self is what all men love. Besides, it is very
 pleasing to us to oblige and assist our friends and companions, as well
 as those whom we are connected with by the rights of hospitality; and
 this cannot be done without the establishment of private property, which
 cannot take place with those who make a city too much one; besides, they
 prevent every opportunity of exercising two principal virtues, modesty
 and liberality. Modesty with respect to the female sex, for this virtue
 requires you to abstain from her who is another's; liberality, which
 depends upon private property, for without that no one can appear
 liberal, or do any generous action; for liberality consists in imparting
 to others what is our own.
 
 This system of polity does indeed recommend itself by its good
 appearance and specious pretences to humanity; and when first proposed
 to any one, must give him great pleasure, as he will conclude it to be
 a wonderful bond of friendship, connecting all to all; particularly
 when any one censures the evils which are now to be found in society,
 as arising from properties not being common, I mean the disputes which
 happen between man and man, upon their different contracts with each
 other; those judgments which are passed in court in consequence of
 fraud, and perjury, and flattering the rich, none of which arise from
 properties being private, but from the vices of mankind. Besides,
 those who live in one general community, and have all things in common,
 oftener dispute with each other than those who have their property
 separate; from the very small number indeed of those who have their
 property in common, compared with those where it is appropriated,
 the instances of their quarrels are but few. It is also but right to
 mention, not only the inconveniences they are preserved from who live in
 a communion of goods, but also the advantages they are deprived of; for
 when the whole comes to be considered, this manner of life will be found
 impracticable.
 
 We must suppose, then, that Socrates's mistake arose from the principle
 he set out with being false; we admit, indeed, that both a family and a
 city ought to be one in some particulars, but not entirely; for there
 is a point beyond which if a city proceeds in reducing itself to one, it
 will be no longer a city.
 
 There is also another point at which it will still continue to be a
 city, but it will approach so near to not being one, that it will be
 worse than none; as if any one should reduce the voices of those who
 sing in concert to one, or a verse to a foot. But the people ought to
 be made one, and a community, as I have already said, by education;
 as property at Lacedaemon, and their public tables at Crete, were made
 common by their legislators. But yet, whosoever shall introduce any
 education, and think thereby to make his city excellent and respectable,
 will be absurd, while he expects to form it by such regulations, and not
 by manners, philosophy, and laws. And whoever [1264a] would establish
 a government upon a community of goods, ought to know that he should
 consult the experience of many years, which would plainly enough inform
 him whether such a scheme is useful; for almost all things have already
 been found out, but some have been neglected, and others which have been
 known have not been put in practice. But this would be most evident, if
 any one could see such a government really established: for it would be
 impossible to frame such a city without dividing and separating it into
 its distinct parts, as public tables, wards, and tribes; so that here
 the laws will do nothing more than forbid the military to engage
 in agriculture, which is what the Lacedaemonians are at present
 endeavouring to do.
 
 Nor has Socrates told us (nor is it easy to say) what plan of government
 should be pursued with respect to the individuals in the state where
 there is a community of goods established; for though the majority
 of his citizens will in general consist of a multitude of persons of
 different occupations, of those he has determined nothing; whether the
 property of the husbandman ought to be in common, or whether each person
 should have his share to himself; and also, whether their wives and
 children ought to be in common: for if all things are to be alike common
 to all, where will be the difference between them and the military, or
 what would they get by submitting to their government? and upon what
 principles would they do it, unless they should establish the wise
 practice of the Cretans? for they, allowing everything else to their
 slaves, forbid them only gymnastic exercises and the use of arms. And if
 they are not, but these should be in the same situation with respect to
 their property which they are in other cities, what sort of a community
 will there be? in one city there must of necessity be two, and those
 contrary to each other; for he makes the military the guardians of the
 state, and the husbandman, artisans, and others, citizens; and all those
 quarrels, accusations, and things of the like sort, which he says are
 the bane of other cities, will be found in his also: notwithstanding
 Socrates says they will not want many laws in consequence of their
 education, but such only as may be necessary for regulating the streets,
 the markets, and the like, while at the same time it is the education of
 the military only that he has taken any care of. Besides, he makes the
 husbandmen masters of property upon paying a tribute; but this would
 be likely to make them far more troublesome and high-spirited than the
 Helots, the Penestise, or the slaves which others employ; nor has he
 ever determined whether it is necessary to give any attention to them
 in these particulars, nor thought of what is connected therewith,
 their polity, their education, their laws; besides, it is of no little
 consequence, nor is it easy to determine, how these should be framed so
 as to preserve the community of the military.
 
 Besides, if he makes the wives common, while the property [1264b]
 continues separate, who shall manage the domestic concerns with the same
 care which the man bestows upon his fields? nor will the inconvenience
 be remedied by making property as well as wives common; and it is absurd
 to draw a comparison from the brute creation, and say, that the same
 principle should regulate the connection of a man and a woman which
 regulates theirs amongst whom there is no family association.
 
 It is also very hazardous to settle the magistracy as Socrates has
 done; for he would have persons of the same rank always in office, which
 becomes the cause of sedition even amongst those who are of no account,
 but more particularly amongst those who are of a courageous and warlike
 disposition; it is indeed evidently necessary that he should frame his
 community in this manner; for that golden particle which God has mixed
 up in the soul of man flies not from one to the other, but always
 continues with the same; for he says, that some of our species have
 gold, and others silver, blended in their composition from the moment of
 their birth: but those who are to be husbandmen and artists, brass and
 iron; besides, though he deprives the military of happiness, he says,
 that the legislator ought to make all the citizens happy; but it
 is impossible that the whole city can be happy, without all, or the
 greater, or some part of it be happy. For happiness is not like
 that numerical equality which arises from certain numbers when added
 together, although neither of them may separately contain it; for
 happiness cannot be thus added together, but must exist in every
 individual, as some properties belong to every integral; and if the
 military are not happy, who else are so? for the artisans are not, nor
 the multitude of those who are employed in inferior offices. The state
 which Socrates has described has all these defects, and others which are
 not of less consequence.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI
 
 
 It is also nearly the same in the treatise upon Laws which was writ
 afterwards, for which reason it will be proper in this place to consider
 briefly what he has there said upon government, for Socrates has
 thoroughly settled but very few parts of it; as for instance, in what
 manner the community of wives and children ought to be regulated, how
 property should be established, and government conducted.
 
 Now he divides the inhabitants into two parts, husbandmen and soldiers,
 and from these he select a third part who are to be senators and govern
 the city; but he has not said whether or no the husbandman and artificer
 shall have any or what share in the government, or whether they shall
 have arms, and join with the others in war, or not. He thinks also
 that the women ought to go to war, and have the same education as the
 soldiers; as to other particulars, he has filled his treatise with
 matter foreign to the purpose; and with respect to education, he has
 only said what that of the guards ought to be.
 
 [1265a] As to his book of Laws, laws are the principal thing which that
 contains, for he has there said but little concerning government; and
 this government, which he was so desirous of framing in such a manner as
 to impart to its members a more entire community of goods than is to be
 found in other cities, he almost brings round again to be the same
 as that other government which he had first proposed; for except the
 community of wives and goods, he has framed both his governments alike,
 for the education of the citizens is to be the same in both; they are in
 both to live without any servile employ, and their common tables are to
 be the same, excepting that in that he says the women should have common
 tables, and that there should be a thousand men-at-arms, in this, that
 there should be five thousand.
 
 All the discourses of Socrates are masterly, noble, new, and
 inquisitive; but that they are all true it may probably be too much
 to say. For now with respect to the number just spoken of, it must be
 acknowledged that he would want the country of Babylonia for them, or
 some one like it, of an immeasurable extent, to support five thousand
 idle persons, besides a much greater number of women and servants. Every
 one, it is true, may frame an hypothesis as he pleases, but yet it ought
 to be possible. It has been said, that a legislator should have two
 things in view when he frames his laws, the country and the people. He
 will also do well, if he has some regard to the neighbouring states, if
 he intends that his community should maintain any political intercourse
 with them, for it is not only necessary that they should understand that
 practice of war which is adapted to their own country, but to others
 also; for admitting that any one chooses not this life either in
 public or private, yet there is not the less occasion for their being
 formidable to their enemies, not only when they invade their country,
 but also when they retire out of it.
 
 It may also be considered whether the quantity of each person's property
 may not be settled in a different manner from what he has done it in,
 by making it more determinate; for he says, that every one ought to have
 enough whereon to live moderately, as if any one had said to live well,
 which is the most comprehensive expression. Besides, a man may live
 moderately and miserably at the same time; he had therefore better
 have proposed, that they should live both moderately and liberally;
 for unless these two conspire, luxury will come in on the one hand, or
 wretchedness on the other, since these two modes of living are the only
 ones applicable to the employment of our substance; for we cannot say
 with respect to a man's fortune, that he is mild or courageous, but we
 may say that he is prudent and liberal, which are the only qualities
 connected therewith.
 
 It is also absurd to render property equal, and not to provide for
 the increasing number of the citizens; but to leave that circumstance
 uncertain, as if it would regulate itself according to the number of
 women who [1265b] should happen to be childless, let that be what it
 would because this seems to take place in other cities; but the case
 would not be the same in such a state which he proposes and those which
 now actually unite; for in these no one actually wants, as the property
 is divided amongst the whole community, be their numbers what they will;
 but as it could not then be divided, the supernumeraries, whether they
 were many or few, would have nothing at all. But it is more necessary
 than even to regulate property, to take care that the increase of the
 people should not exceed a certain number; and in determining that,
 to take into consideration those children who will die, and also those
 women who will be barren; and to neglect this, as is done in several
 cities, is to bring certain poverty on the citizens; and poverty is the
 cause of sedition and evil. Now Phidon the Corinthian, one of the oldest
 legislators, thought the families and the number of the citizens should
 continue the same; although it should happen that all should have
 allotments at the first, disproportionate to their numbers.
 
 In Plato's Laws it is however different; we shall mention hereafter what
 we think would be best in these particulars. He has also neglected in
 that treatise to point out how the governors are to be distinguished
 from the governed; for he says, that as of one sort of wool the warp
 ought to be made, and of another the woof, so ought some to govern, and
 others to be governed. But since he admits, that all their property may
 be increased fivefold, why should he not allow the same increase to the
 country? he ought also to consider whether his allotment of the houses
 will be useful to the community, for he appoints two houses to each
 person, separate from each other; but it is inconvenient for a person
 to inhabit two houses. Now he is desirous to have his whole plan of
 government neither a democracy nor an oligarchy, but something between
 both, which he calls a polity, for it is to be composed of men-at-arms.
 If Plato intended to frame a state in which more than in any other
 everything should be common, he has certainly given it a right name;
 but if he intended it to be the next in perfection to that which he had
 already framed, it is not so; for perhaps some persons will give the
 preference to the Lacedaemonian form of government, or some other which
 may more completely have attained to the aristocratic form.
 
 Some persons say, that the most perfect government should be composed
 of all others blended together, for which reason they commend that
 of Lacedaemon; for they say, that this is composed of an oligarchy,
 a monarchy, and a democracy, their kings representing the monarchical
 part, the senate the oligarchical; and, that in the ephori may be found
 the democratical, as these are taken from the people. But some say, that
 in the ephori is absolute power, and that it is their common meal and
 daily course of life, in which the democratical form is represented.
 It is also said in this treatise of [1266a] Laws, that the best form of
 government must, be one composed of a democracy and a tyranny; though
 such a mixture no one else would ever allow to be any government at all,
 or if it is, the worst possible; those propose what is much better who
 blend many governments together; for the most perfect is that which is
 formed of many parts. But now in this government of Plato's there are
 no traces of a monarchy, only of an oligarchy and democracy; though he
 seems to choose that it should rather incline to an oligarchy, as is
 evident from the appointment of the magistrates; for to choose them by
 lot is common to both; but that a man of fortune must necessarily be a
 member of the assembly, or to elect the magistrates, or take part in the
 management of public affairs, while others are passed over, makes the
 state incline to an oligarchy; as does the endeavouring that the
 greater part of the rich may be in office, and that the rank of their
 appointments may correspond with their fortunes.
 
 The same principle prevails also in the choice of their senate; the
 manner of electing which is favourable also to an oligarchy; for all
 are obliged to vote for those who are senators of the first class,
 afterwards they vote for the same number out of the second, and then out
 of the third; but this compulsion to vote at the election of senators
 does not extend to the third and fourth classes and the first and second
 class only are obliged to vote for the fourth. By this means he says
 he shall necessarily have an equal number of each rank, but he is
 mistaken--for the majority will always consist of those of the first
 rank, and the most considerable people; and for this reason, that
 many of the commonalty not being obliged to it, will not attend the
 elections. From hence it is evident, that such a state will not consist
 of a democracy and a monarchy, and this will be further proved by
 what we shall say when we come particularly to consider this form of
 government.
 
 There will also great danger arise from the manner of electing the
 senate, when those who are elected themselves are afterwards to elect
 others; for by this means, if a certain number choose to combine
 together, though not very considerable, the election will always fall
 according to their pleasure. Such are the things which Plato proposes
 concerning government in his book of Laws.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII
 
 
 There are also some other forms of government, which have been proposed
 either by private persons, or philosophers, or politicians, all of which
 come much nearer to those which have been really established, or now
 exist, than these two of Plato's; for neither have they introduced the
 innovation of a community of wives and children, and public tables for
 the women, but have been contented to set out with establishing such
 rules as are absolutely necessary.
 
 There are some persons who think, that the first object of government
 should be to regulate well everything relating to private property;
 for they say, that a neglect herein is the source of all seditions
 whatsoever. For this reason, Phaleas the Chalcedonian first proposed,
 that the fortunes of the citizens should be equal, which he thought was
 not difficult to accomplish when a community was first settled, but
 that it was a work of greater difficulty in one that had been long
 established; but yet that it might be effected, and an equality of
 circumstances introduced by these means, that the rich should give
 marriage portions, but never receive any, while the poor should always
 receive, but never give.
 
 But Plato, in his treatise of Laws, thinks that a difference in
 circumstances should be permitted to a certain degree; but that no
 citizen should be allowed to possess more than five times as much as the
 lowest census, as we have already mentioned. But legislators who
 would establish this principle are apt to overlook what they ought to
 consider; that while they regulate the quantity of provisions which each
 individual shall possess, they ought also to regulate the number of his
 children; for if these exceed the allotted quantity of provision, the
 law must necessarily be repealed; and yet, in spite of the repeal, it
 will have the bad effect of reducing many from wealth to poverty, so
 difficult is it for innovators not to fall into such mistakes. That an
 equality of goods was in some degree serviceable to strengthen the bands
 of society, seems to have been known to some of the ancients; for Solon
 made a law, as did some others also, to restrain persons from possessing
 as much land as they pleased. And upon the same principle there are laws
 which forbid men to sell their property, as among the Locrians, unless
 they can prove that some notorious misfortune has befallen them. They
 were also to preserve their ancient patrimony, which custom being broken
 through by the Leucadians, made their government too democratic; for
 by that means it was no longer necessary to be possessed of a certain
 fortune to be qualified to be a magistrate. But if an equality of goods
 is established, this may be either too much, when it enables the people
 to live luxuriously, or too little, when it obliges them to live
 hard. Hence it is evident, that it is not proper for the legislator
 to establish an equality of circumstances, but to fix a proper medium.
 Besides, if any one should regulate the division of property in such a
 manner that there should be a moderate sufficiency for all, it would
 be of no use; for it is of more consequence that the citizen should
 entertain a similarity of sentiments than an equality of circumstances;
 but this can never be attained unless they are properly educated under
 the direction of the law. But probably Phaleas may say, that this in
 what he himself mentions; for he both proposes a equality of property
 and one plan of education in his city. But he should have said
 particularly what education he intended, nor is it of any service to
 have this to much one; for this education may be one, and yet such as
 will make the citizens over-greedy, to grasp after honours, or riches,
 or both. Besides, not only an inequality of possessions, but also
 of honours, will occasion [1267a] seditions, but this upon contrary
 grounds; for the vulgar will be seditious if there be an inequality of
 goods, by those of more elevated sentiments, if there is an equality of
 honours.
 
   "When good and bad do equal honours share."
 
 For men are not guilty of crimes for necessaries only (for which he
 thinks an equality of goods would be a sufficient remedy, as they would
 then have no occasion to steal cold or hunger), but that they may enjoy
 what they desire, and not wish for it in vain; for if their desire extend
 beyond the common necessaries of life, they were be wicked to gratify
 them; and not only so, but if their wishes point that way, they will do
 the same to enjoy those pleasures which are free from the alloy of pain.
 What remedy then shall we find for these three disorders? And first,
 to prevent stealing from necessity, let every one be supplied with a
 moderate subsistence, which may make the addition of his own industry
 necessary; second to prevent stealing to procure the luxuries of life,
 temperance be enjoined; and thirdly, let those who wish for pleasure in
 itself seek for it only in philosophy, all others want the assistance of
 men.
 
 Since then men are guilty of the greatest crimes from ambition, and not
 from necessity, no one, for instance aims at being a tyrant to keep him
 from the cold, hence great honour is due to him who kills not a thief,
 but tyrant; so that polity which Phaleas establishes would only be
 salutary to prevent little crimes. He has also been very desirous to
 establish such rules as will conduce to perfect the internal policy of
 his state, and he ought also to have done the same with respect to
 its neighbours and all foreign nations; for the considerations of the
 military establishment should take place in planning every government,
 that it may not be unprovided in case of a war, of which he has said
 nothing; so also with respect to property, it ought not only to be
 adapted to the exigencies of the state, but also to such dangers as may
 arise from without.
 
 Thus it should not be so much as to tempt those who are near, and more
 powerful to invade it, while those who possess it are not able to drive
 out the invaders, nor so little as that the state should not be able to
 go to war with those who are quite equal to itself, and of this he has
 determined nothing; it must indeed be allowed that it is advantageous to
 a community to be rather rich than poor; probably the proper boundary is
 this, not to possess enough to make it worth while for a more powerful
 neighbour to attack you, any more than he would those who had not so
 much as yourself; thus when Autophradatus proposed to besiege Atarneus,
 Eubulus advised him to consider what time it would require to take the
 city, and then would have him determine whether it would answer, for
 that he should choose, if it would even take less than he proposed,
 to quit the place; his saying this made Autophradatus reflect upon the
 business and give over the siege. There is, indeed, some advantage in an
 equality of goods amongst the citizens to prevent seditions; and yet,
 to say truth, no very great one; for men of great abilities will stomach
 their being put upon a level with the rest of the community. For
 which reason they will very often appear ready for every commotion and
 sedition; for the wickedness of mankind is insatiable. For though
 at first two oboli might be sufficient, yet when once it is become
 customary, they continually want something more, until they set no
 limits to their expectations; for it is the nature of our desires to be
 boundless, and many live only to gratify them. But for this purpose the
 first object is, not so much to establish an equality of fortune, as
 to prevent those who are of a good disposition from desiring more than
 their own, and those who are of a bad one from being able to acquire it;
 and this may be done if they are kept in an inferior station, and not
 exposed to injustice. Nor has he treated well the equality of goods, for
 he has extended his regulation only to land; whereas a man's substance
 consists not only in this, but also in slaves, cattle, money, and all
 that variety of things which fall under the name of chattels; now there
 must be either an equality established in all these, or some certain
 rule, or they must be left entirely at large. It appears too by his
 laws, that he intends to establish only a small state, as all the
 artificers are to belong to the public, and add nothing to the
 complement of citizens; but if all those who are to be employed in
 public works are to be the slaves of the public, it should be done
 in the same manner as it is at Epidamnum, and as Diophantus formerly
 regulated it at Athens. From these particulars any one may nearly judge
 whether Phaleas's community is well or ill established.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII
 
 
 Hippodamus, the son of Euruphon a Milesian, contrived the art of laying
 out towns, and separated the Pireus. This man was in other respects
 too eager after notice, and seemed to many to live in a very affected
 manner, with his flowing locks and his expensive ornaments, and a coarse
 warm vest which he wore, not only in the winter, but also in the
 hot weather. As he was very desirous of the character of a universal
 scholar, he was the first who, not being actually engaged in the
 management of public affairs, sat himself to inquire what sort of
 government was best; and he planned a state, consisting of ten thousand
 persons, divided into three parts, one consisting of artisans, another
 of husbandmen, and the third of soldiers; he also divided the lands into
 three parts, and allotted one to sacred purposes, another to the public,
 and the third to individuals. The first of these was to supply what was
 necessary for the established worship of the gods; the second was to
 be allotted to the support of the soldiery; and the third was to be
 the property of the husbandman. He thought also that there need only be
 three sorts of laws, corresponding to the three sorts of actions which
 can be brought, namely, for assault, trespasses, or death. He ordered
 also that there should be a particular court of appeal, into which
 all causes might be removed which were supposed to have been unjustly
 determined elsewhere; which court should be composed of old men chosen
 for that purpose. He thought also [1268a] that they should not pass
 sentence by votes; but that every one should bring with him a tablet, on
 which he should write, that he found the party guilty, if it was so, but
 if not, he should bring a plain tablet; but if he acquitted him of one
 part of the indictment but not of the other, he should express that
 also on the tablet; for he disapproved of that general custom already
 established, as it obliges the judges to be guilty of perjury if they
 determined positively either on the one side or the other. He also made
 a law, that those should be rewarded who found out anything for the good
 of the city, and that the children of those who fell in battle should be
 educated at the public expense; which law had never been proposed by any
 other legislator, though it is at present in use at Athens as well as in
 other cities, he would have the magistrates chosen out of the people
 in general, by whom he meant the three parts before spoken of; and that
 those who were so elected should be the particular guardians of what
 belonged to the public, to strangers, and to orphans.
 
 These are the principal parts and most worthy of notice in Hippodamus's
 plan. But some persons might doubt the propriety of his division of the
 citizens into three parts; for the artisans, the husbandmen, and the
 soldiers are to compose one community, where the husbandmen are to have
 no arms, and the artisans neither arms nor land, which would in a manner
 render them slaves to the soldiery. It is also impossible that the whole
 community should partake of all the honourable employments in it--for
 the generals and the guardians of the state must necessarily be
 appointed out of the soldiery, and indeed the most honourable
 magistrates; but as the two other parts will not have their share in the
 government, how can they be expected to have any affection for it? But
 it is necessary that the soldiery should be superior to the other two
 parts, and this superiority will not be easily gained without they are
 very numerous; and if they are so, why should the community consist
 of any other members? why should any others have a right to elect the
 magistrates? Besides, of what use are the husbandmen to this community?
 Artisans, 'tis true, are necessary, for these every city wants, and they
 can live upon their business. If the husbandmen indeed furnished the
 soldiers with provisions, they would be properly part of the community;
 but these are supposed to have their private property, and to cultivate
 it for their own use. Moreover, if the soldiers themselves are to
 cultivate that common land which is appropriated for their support,
 there will be no distinction between the soldier and the husbandman,
 which the legislator intended there should be; and if there should be
 any others who are to cultivate the private property of the husbandman
 and the common lands of the military, there will be a fourth order in
 the state which will have no share in it, and always entertain hostile
 sentiments towards it. If any one should propose that the same persons
 should cultivate their own lands and the public ones also, then there
 would be a deficiency [1268b] of provisions to supply two families,
 as the lands would not immediately yield enough for themselves and the
 soldiers also; and all these things would occasion great confusion.
 
 Nor do I approve of his method of determining causes, when he would
 have the judge split the case which comes simply before him; and thus,
 instead of being a judge, become an arbitrator. Now when any matter
 is brought to arbitration, it is customary for many persons to confer
 together upon the business that is before them; but when a cause is
 brought before judges it is not so; and many legislators take care
 that the judges shall not have it in their power to communicate their
 sentiments to each other. Besides, what can prevent confusion on the
 bench when one judge thinks a fine should be different from what another
 has set it at; one proposing twenty minae, another ten, or be it more
 or less, another four, and another five; and it is evident, that in this
 manner they will differ from each other, while some will give the whole
 damages sued for, and others nothing; in this situation, how shall their
 determinations be settled? Besides, a judge cannot be obliged to perjure
 himself who simply acquits or condemns, if the action is fairly and
 justly brought; for he who acquits the party does not say that he ought
 not to pay any fine at all, but that he ought not to pay a fine of
 twenty minae. But he that condemns him is guilty of perjury if he
 sentences him to pay twenty minae while he believes the damages ought
 not to be so much.
 
 Now with respect to these honours which he proposes to bestow on those
 who can give any information useful to the community, this, though very
 pleasing in speculation, is what the legislator should not settle, for
 it would encourage informers, and probably occasion commotions in the
 state. And this proposal of his gives rise also to further conjectures
 and inquiries; for some persons have doubted whether it is useful or
 hurtful to alter the established law of any country, if even for the
 better; for which reason one cannot immediately determine upon what he
 here says, whether it is advantageous to alter the law or not. We know,
 indeed, that it is possible to propose to new model both the laws and
 government as a common good; and since we have mentioned this subject,
 it may be very proper to enter into a few particulars concerning it, for
 it contains some difficulties, as I have already said, and it may appear
 better to alter them, since it has been found useful in other sciences.
 
 Thus the science of physic is extended beyond its ancient bounds; so is
 the gymnastic, and indeed all other arts and powers; so that one may lay
 it down for certain that the same thing will necessarily hold good in
 the art of government. And it may also be affirmed, that experience
 itself gives a proof of this; for the ancient laws are too simple and
 barbarous; which allowed the Greeks to wear swords in the city, and to
 buy their wives of each [1269a]. other. And indeed all the remains of
 old laws which we have are very simple; for instance, a law in Cuma
 relative to murder. If any person who prosecutes another for murder can
 produce a certain number of witnesses to it of his own relations, the
 accused person shall be held guilty. Upon the whole, all persons ought
 to endeavour to follow what is right, and not what is established; and
 it is probable that the first men, whether they sprung out of the earth,
 or were saved from some general calamity, had very little understanding
 or knowledge, as is affirmed of these aborigines; so that it would be
 absurd to continue in the practice of their rules. Nor is it, moreover,
 right to permit written laws always to remain without alteration; for
 as in all other sciences, so in politics, it is impossible to express
 everything in writing with perfect exactness; for when we commit
 anything to writing we must use general terms, but in every action there
 is something particular to itself, which these may not comprehend; from
 whence it is evident, that certain laws will at certain times admit of
 alterations. But if we consider this matter in another point of view, it
 will appear to require great caution; for when the advantage proposed is
 trifling, as the accustoming the people easily to abolish their laws
 is of bad consequence, it is evidently better to pass over some faults
 which either the legislator or the magistrates may have committed; for
 the alterations will not be of so much service as a habit of disobeying
 the magistrates will be of disservice. Besides, the instance brought
 from the arts is fallacious; for it is not the same thing to alter the
 one as the other. For a law derives all its strength from custom, and
 this requires long time to establish; so that, to make it an easy matter
 to pass from the established laws to other new ones, is to weaken the
 power of laws. Besides, here is another question; if the laws are to be
 altered, are they all to be altered, and in every government or not, and
 whether at the pleasure of one person or many? all which particulars
 will make a great difference; for which reason we will at present drop
 the inquiry, to pursue it at some other time.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IX
 
 
 There are two considerations which offer themselves with respect to the
 government established at Lacedaemon and Crete, and indeed in almost all
 other states whatsoever; one is whether their laws do or do not promote
 the best establishment possible? the other is whether there is anything,
 if we consider either the principles upon which it is founded or the
 executive part of it, which prevents the form of government that they
 had proposed to follow from being observed; now it is allowed that in
 every well-regulated state the members of it should be free from servile
 labour; but in what manner this shall be effected is not so easy to
 determine; for the Penestse have very often attacked the Thessalians,
 and the Helots the Lacedaemonians, for they in a manner continually
 watch an opportunity for some misfortune befalling them. But no such
 thing has ever happened to the Cretans; the [1269b] reason for which
 probably is, that although they are engaged in frequent wars with the
 neighbouring cities, yet none of these would enter into an alliance with
 the revolters, as it would be disadvantageous for them, who themselves
 also have their villains. But now there is perpetual enmity between the
 Lacedaemonians and all their neighbours, the Argives, the Messenians,
 and the Arcadians. Their slaves also first revolted from the Thessalians
 while they were engaged in wars with their neighbours the Acheans, the
 Perrabeans, and the Magnesians. It seems to me indeed, if nothing else,
 yet something very troublesome to keep upon proper terms with them;
 for if you are remiss in your discipline they grow insolent, and think
 themselves upon an equality with their masters; and if they are hardly
 used they are continually plotting against you and hate you. It is
 evident, then, that those who employ slaves have not as yet hit upon the
 right way of managing them.
 
 As to the indulging of women in any particular liberties, it is hurtful
 to the end of government and the prosperity of the city; for as a man
 and his wife are the two parts of a family, if we suppose a city to be
 divided into two parts, we must allow that the number of men and women
 will be equal.
 
 In whatever city then the women are not under good regulations, we must
 look upon one half of it as not under the restraint of law, as it
 there happened; for the legislator, desiring to make his whole city
 a collection of warriors with respect to the men, he most evidently
 accomplished his design; but in the meantime the women were quite
 neglected, for they live without restraint in every improper indulgence
 and luxury. So that in such a state riches will necessarily be in
 general esteem, particularly if the men are governed by their wives,
 which has been the case with many a brave and warlike people except
 the Celts, and those other nations, if there are any such, who openly
 practise pederasty. And the first mythologists seem not improperly to
 have joined Mars and Venus together; for all nations of this character
 are greatly addicted either to the love of women or of boys, for which
 reason it was thus at Lacedaemon; and many things in their state were
 done by the authority of the women. For what is the difference, if the
 power is in the hands of the women, or in the hands of those whom they
 themselves govern? it must turn to the same account. As this boldness of
 the women can be of no use in any common occurrences, if it was ever so,
 it must be in war; but even here we find that the Lacedaemonian women
 were of the greatest disservice, as was proved at the time of the Theban
 invasion, when they were of no use at all, as they are in other cities,
 but made more disturbance than even the enemy.
 
 The origin of this indulgence which the Lacedaemonian women enjoy is
 easily accounted for, from the long time the men were absent from home
 upon foreign expeditions [1270a] against the Argives, and afterwards the
 Arcadians and Messenians, so that, when these wars were at an end, their
 military life, in which there is no little virtue, prepared them to obey
 the precepts of their law-giver; but we are told, that when Lycurgus
 endeavoured also to reduce the women to an obedience to his laws, upon
 their refusal he declined it. It may indeed be said that the women were
 the causes of these things, and of course all the fault was theirs. But
 we are not now considering where the fault lies, or where it does not
 lie, but what is right and what is wrong; and when the manners of the
 women are not well regulated, as I have already said, it must not only
 occasion faults which are disgraceful to the state, but also increase
 the love of money. In the next place, fault may be found with his
 unequal division of property, for some will have far too much, others
 too little; by which means the land will come into few hands, which
 business is badly regulated by his laws. For he made it infamous for any
 one either to buy or sell their possessions, in which he did right; but
 he permitted any one that chose it to give them away, or bequeath them,
 although nearly the same consequences will arise from one practice as
 from the other. It is supposed that near two parts in five of the whole
 country is the property of women, owing to their being so often sole
 heirs, and having such large fortunes in marriage; though it would
 be better to allow them none, or a little, or a certain regulated
 proportion. Now every one is permitted to make a woman his heir if he
 pleases; and if he dies intestate, he who succeeds as heir at law gives
 it to whom he pleases. From whence it happens that although the country
 is able to support fifteen hundred horse and thirty thousand foot, the
 number does not amount to one thousand.
 
 And from these facts it is evident, that this particular is badly
 regulated; for the city could not support one shock, but was ruined for
 want of men. They say, that during the reigns of their ancient kings
 they used to present foreigners with the freedom of their city, to
 prevent there being a want of men while they carried on long wars; it is
 also affirmed that the number of Spartans was formerly ten thousand; but
 be that as it will, an equality of property conduces much to increase
 the number of the people. The law, too, which he made to encourage
 population was by no means calculated to correct this inequality;
 for being willing that the Spartans should be as numerous as [1270b]
 possible, to make them desirous of having large families he ordered that
 he who had three children should be excused the night-watch, and that he
 who had four should pay no taxes: though it is very evident, that while
 the land was divided in this manner, that if the people increased there
 must many of them be very poor.
 
 Nor was he less blamable for the manner in which he constituted the
 ephori; for these magistrates take cognisance of things of the last
 importance, and yet they are chosen out of the people in general; so
 that it often happens that a very poor person is elected to that office,
 who, from that circumstance, is easily bought. There have been many
 instances of this formerly, as well as in the late affair at Andros. And
 these men, being corrupted with money, went as far as they could to ruin
 the city: and, because their power was too great and nearly tyrannical,
 their kings were obliged to natter them, which contributed greatly to
 hurt the state; so that it altered from an aristocracy to a democracy.
 This magistracy is indeed the great support of the state; for the people
 are easy, knowing that they are eligible to the first office in it;
 so that, whether it took place by the intention of the legislator,
 or whether it happened by chance, this is of great service to their
 affairs; for it is necessary that every member of the state should
 endeavour that each part of the government should be preserved, and
 continue the same. And upon this principle their kings have always
 acted, out of regard to their honour; the wise and good from their
 attachment to the senate, a seat wherein they consider as the reward of
 virtue; and the common people, that they may support the ephori, of whom
 they consist. And it is proper that these magistrates should be chosen
 out of the whole community, not as the custom is at present, which is
 very ridiculous. The ephori are the supreme judges in causes of the last
 consequence; but as it is quite accidental what sort of persons they may
 be, it is not right that they should determine according to their own
 opinion, but by a written law or established custom. Their way of life
 also is not consistent with the manners of the city, for it is too
 indulgent; whereas that of others is too severe; so that they cannot
 support it, but are obliged privately to act contrary to law, that they
 may enjoy some of the pleasures of sense. There are also great defects
 in the institution of their senators. If indeed they were fitly trained
 to the practice of every human virtue, every one would readily admit
 that they would be useful to the government; but still it might be
 debated whether they should be continued judges for life, to determine
 points of the greatest moment, since the mind has its old age as well
 as the body; but as they are so brought up, [1271a] that even the
 legislator could not depend upon them as good men, their power must
 be inconsistent with the safety of the state: for it is known that the
 members of that body have been guilty both of bribery and partiality in
 many public affairs; for which reason it had been much better if they
 had been made answerable for their conduct, which they are not. But it
 may be said the ephori seem to have a check upon all the magistrates.
 They have indeed in this particular very great power; but I affirm that
 they should not be entrusted with this control in the manner they are.
 Moreover, the mode of choice which they make use of at the election of
 their senators is very childish. Nor is it right for any one to solicit
 for a place he is desirous of; for every person, whether he chooses it
 or not, ought to execute any office he is fit for. But his intention was
 evidently the same in this as in the other parts of his government.
 For making his citizens ambitious after honours, with men of that
 disposition he has filled his senate, since no others will solicit for
 that office; and yet the principal part of those crimes which men are
 deliberately guilty of arise from ambition and avarice.
 
 We will inquire at another time whether the office of a king is useful
 to the state: thus much is certain, that they should be chosen from a
 consideration of their conduct and not as they are now. But that the
 legislator himself did not expect to make all his citizens honourable
 and completely virtuous is evident from this, that he distrusts them as
 not being good men; for he sent those upon the same embassy that were at
 variance with each other; and thought, that in the dispute of the kings
 the safety of the state consisted. Neither were their common meals at
 first well established: for these should rather have been provided at
 the public expense, as at Crete, where, as at Lacedaemon, every one was
 obliged to buy his portion, although he might be very poor, and could by
 no means bear the expense, by which means the contrary happened to what
 the legislator desired: for he intended that those public meals should
 strengthen the democratic part of his government: but this regulation
 had quite the contrary effect, for those who were very poor could not
 take part in them; and it was an observation of their forefathers, that
 the not allowing those who could not contribute their proportion to the
 common tables to partake of them, would be the ruin of the state. Other
 persons have censured his laws concerning naval affairs, and not without
 reason, as it gave rise to disputes. For the commander of the fleet is
 in a manner set up in opposition to the kings, who are generals of the
 army for life.
 
 [1271b] There is also another defect in his laws worthy of censure,
 which Plato has given in his book of Laws; that the whole constitution
 was calculated only for the business of war: it is indeed excellent to
 make them conquerors; for which reason the preservation of the state
 depended thereon. The destruction of it commenced with their victories:
 for they knew not how to be idle, or engage in any other employment
 than war. In this particular also they were mistaken, that though they
 rightly thought, that those things which are the objects of contention
 amongst mankind are better procured by virtue than vice, yet they
 wrongfully preferred the things themselves to virtue. Nor was the public
 revenue well managed at Sparta, for the state was worth nothing while
 they were obliged to carry on the most extensive wars, and the subsidies
 were very badly raised; for as the Spartans possessed a large extent of
 country, they were not exact upon each other as to what they paid in.
 And thus an event contrary to the legislator's intention took place;
 for the state was poor, the individuals avaricious. Enough of the
 Lacedaemonian government; for these seem the chief defects in it.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER X
 
 
 The government of Crete bears a near resemblance to this, in some few
 particulars it is not worse, but in general it is far inferior in its
 contrivance. For it appears and is allowed in many particulars the
 constitution of Lacedaemon was formed in imitation of that of Crete;
 and in general most new things are an improvement upon the old. For they
 say, that when Lycurgus ceased to be guardian to King Charilles he
 went abroad and spent a long time with his relations in Crete, for the
 Lycians are a colony of the Lacedaemonians; and those who first settled
 there adopted that body of laws which they found already established by
 the inhabitants; in like manner also those who now live near them have
 the very laws which Minos first drew up.
 
 This island seems formed by nature to be the mistress of Greece, for it
 is entirely surrounded by a navigable ocean which washes almost all the
 maritime parts of that country, and is not far distant on the one side
 from Peloponnesus, on the other, which looks towards Asia, from Triopium
 and Rhodes. By means of this situation Minos acquired the empire of
 the sea and the islands; some of which he subdued, in others planted
 colonies: at last he died at Camicus while he was attacking Sicily.
 There is this analogy between the customs of the Lacedaemonians and
 the Cretans, the Helots cultivate the grounds [1272a] for the one, the
 domestic slaves for the other. Both states have their common meals, and
 the Lacedaemonians called these formerly not _psiditia_ but _andpia_,
 as the Cretans do; which proves from whence the custom arose. In this
 particular their governments are also alike: the ephori have the same
 power with those of Crete, who are called _kosmoi_; with this difference
 only, that the number of the one is five, of the other ten. The senators
 are the same as those whom the Cretans call the council. There was
 formerly also a kingly power in Crete; but it was afterwards dissolved,
 and the command of their armies was given to the _kosmoi_. Every one
 also has a vote in their public assembly; but this has only the power of
 confirming what has already passed the council and the _kosmoi_.
 
 The Cretans conducted their public meals better than the Lacedaemonians,
 for at Lacedaemon each individual was obliged to furnish what was
 assessed upon him; which if he could not do, there was a law which
 deprived him of the rights of a citizen, as has been already mentioned:
 but in Crete they were furnished by the community; for all the corn and
 cattle, taxes and contributions, which the domestic slaves were obliged
 to furnish, were divided into parts and allotted to the gods, the
 exigencies of the state, and these public meals; so that all the men,
 women, and children were maintained from a common stock. The legislator
 gave great attention to encourage a habit of eating sparingly, as very
 useful to the citizens. He also endeavoured, that his community might
 not be too populous, to lessen the connection with women, by introducing
 the love of boys: whether in this he did well or ill we shall have some
 other opportunity of considering. But that the public meals were better
 ordered at Crete than at Lacedaemon is very evident.
 
 The institution of the _kosmoi_, was still worse than that of the
 ephori: for it contained all the faults incident to that magistracy and
 some peculiar to itself; for in both cases it is uncertain who will be
 elected: but the Lacedaemonians have this advantage which the others
 have not, that as all are eligible, the whole community have a share
 in the highest honours, and therefore all desire to preserve the state:
 whereas among the Cretans the _kosmoi_ are not chosen out of the people
 in general, but out of some certain families, and the senate out of the
 _kosmoi_. And the same observations which may be made on the senate at
 Lacedaemon may be applied to these; for their being under no control,
 and their continuing for life, is an honour greater than they merit; and
 to have their proceedings not regulated by a written law, but left to
 their own discretion, is dangerous. (As to there being no insurrections,
 although the people share not in the management of public affairs, this
 is no proof of a well-constituted government, as the _kosmoi_ have no
 opportunity of being bribed like the ephori, as they live in an [1272b]
 island far from those who would corrupt them.) But the method they take
 to correct that fault is absurd, impolitic, and tyrannical: for very
 often either their fellow-magistrates or some private persons conspire
 together and turn out the _kosmoi_. They are also permitted to resign
 their office before their time is elapsed, and if all this was done by
 law it would be well, and not at the pleasure of the individuals, which
 is a bad rule to follow. But what is worst of all is, that general
 confusion which those who are in power introduce to impede the ordinary
 course of justice; which sufficiently shows what is the nature of the
 government, or rather lawless force: for it is usual with the principal
 persons amongst them to collect together some of the common people and
 their friends, and then revolt and set up for themselves, and come
 to blows with each other. And what is the difference, if a state is
 dissolved at once by such violent means, or if it gradually so alters in
 process of time as to be no longer the same constitution? A state like
 this would ever be exposed to the invasions of those who were powerful
 and inclined to attack it; but, as has been already mentioned, its
 situation preserves it, as it is free from the inroads of foreigners;
 and for this reason the family slaves still remain quiet at Crete, while
 the Helots are perpetually revolting: for the Cretans take no part in
 foreign affairs, and it is but lately that any foreign troops have
 made an attack upon the island; and their ravages soon proved the
 ineffectualness of their laws. And thus much for the government of
 Crete.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XI
 
 
 The government of Carthage seems well established, and in many respects
 superior to others; in some particulars it bears a near resemblance
 to the Lacedaemonians; and indeed these three states, the Cretans, the
 Lacedaemonians and the Carthaginians are in some things very like
 each other, in others they differ greatly. Amongst many excellent
 constitutions this may show how well their government is framed, that
 although the people are admitted to a share in the administration, the
 form of it remains unaltered, without any popular insurrections, worth
 notice, on the one hand, or degenerating into a tyranny on the
 other. Now the Carthaginians have these things in common with the
 Lacedaemonians: public tables for those who are connected together by
 the tie of mutual friendship, after the manner of their Phiditia; they
 have also a magistracy, consisting of an hundred and four persons,
 similar to the ephori, or rather selected with more judgment; for
 amongst the Lacedaemonians, all the citizens are eligible, but amongst
 the Carthaginians, they are chosen out of those of the better sort:
 there is also some analogy between the king and the senate in both these
 governments, though the Carthaginian method of appointing their kings
 is best, for they do not confine themselves to one family; nor do
 they permit the election to be at large, nor have they any regard to
 seniority; for if amongst the candidates there are any of greater merit
 than the rest, these they prefer to those who may be older; for as their
 power is very extensive, if they are [1273a] persons of no account,
 they may be very hurtful to the state, as they have always been to
 the Lacedaemonians; also the greater part of those things which become
 reprehensible by their excess are common to all those governments which
 we have described.
 
 Now of those principles on which the Carthaginians have established
 their mixed form of government, composed of an aristocracy and
 democracy, some incline to produce a democracy, others an oligarchy: for
 instance, if the kings and the senate are unanimous upon any point in
 debate, they can choose whether they will bring it before the people or
 no; but if they disagree, it is to these they must appeal, who are not
 only to hear what has been approved of by the senate, but are finally
 to determine upon it; and whosoever chooses it, has a right to speak
 against any matter whatsoever that may be proposed, which is not
 permitted in other cases. The five, who elect each other, have very
 great and extensive powers; and these choose the hundred, who are
 magistrates of the highest rank: their power also continues longer than
 any other magistrates, for it commences before they come into office,
 and is prolonged after they are out of it; and in this particular the
 state inclines to an oligarchy: but as they are not elected by lot, but
 by suffrage, and are not permitted to take money, they are the greatest
 supporters imaginable of an aristocracy.
 
 The determining all causes by the same magistrates, and not orae in one
 court and another in another, as at Lacedaemon, has the same influence.
 The constitution of Carthage is now shifting from an aristocracy to an
 oligarchy, in consequence of an opinion which is favourably entertained
 by many, who think that the magistrates in the community ought not to
 be persons of family only, but of fortune also; as it is impossible
 for those who are in bad circumstances to support the dignity of their
 office, or to be at leisure to apply to public business. As choosing men
 of fortune to be magistrates make a state incline to an oligarchy,
 and men of abilities to an aristocracy, so is there a third method of
 proceeding which took place in the polity of Carthage; for they have
 an eye to these two particulars when they elect their officers,
 particularly those of the highest rank, their kings and their generals.
 It must be admitted, that it was a great fault in their legislator not
 to guard against the constitution's degenerating from an aristocracy;
 for this is a most necessary thing to provide for at first, that those
 citizens who have the best abilities should never be obliged to do
 anything unworthy their character, but be always at leisure to serve the
 public, not only when in office, but also when private persons; for if
 once you are obliged to look among the wealthy, that you may have men at
 leisure to serve you, your greatest offices, of king and general,
 will soon become venal; in consequence of which, riches will be more
 honourable than virtue and a love of money be the ruling principle in
 the city-for what those who have the chief power regard as honourable
 will necessarily be the object which the [1273b] citizens in general
 will aim at; and where the first honours are not paid to virtue,
 there the aristocratic form of government cannot flourish: for it
 is reasonable to conclude, that those who bought their places should
 generally make an advantage of what they laid out their money for; as
 it is absurd to suppose, that if a man of probity who is poor should be
 desirous of gaining something, a bad man should not endeavour to do the
 same, especially to reimburse himself; for which reason the magistracy
 should be formed of those who are most able to support an aristocracy.
 It would have been better for the legislature to have passed over the
 poverty of men of merit, and only to have taken care to have ensured
 them sufficient leisure, when in office, to attend to public affairs.
 
 It seems also improper, that one person should execute several offices,
 which was approved of at Carthage; for one business is best done by one
 person; and it is the duty of the legislator to look to this, and not
 make the same person a musician and a shoemaker: so that where the state
 is not small it is more politic and more popular to admit many persons
 to have a share in the government; for, as I just now said, it is not
 only more usual, but everything is better and sooner done, when one
 thing only is allotted to one person: and this is evident both in the
 army and navy, where almost every one, in his turn, both commands and
 is under command. But as their government inclines to an oligarchy, they
 avoid the ill effects of it by always appointing some of the popular
 party to the government of cities to make their fortunes. Thus they
 consult this fault in their constitution and render it stable; but
 this is depending on chance; whereas the legislator ought to frame his
 government, that there the no room for insurrections. But now, if there
 should be any general calamity, and the people should revolt from their
 rulers, there is no remedy for reducing them to obedience by the laws.
 And these are the particulars of the Lacedaemonian, the Cretan, and the
 Carthaginian governments which seem worthy of commendation.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XII
 
 
 Some of those persons who have written upon government had never any
 share in public affairs, but always led a private life. Everything
 worthy of notice in their works we have already spoke to. Others
 were legislators, some in their own cities, others were employed in
 regulating the governments of foreign states. Some of them only composed
 a body of laws; others formed the constitution also, as Lycurgus; and
 Solon, who did both. The Lacedaemonians have been already mentioned.
 Some persons think that Solon was an excellent legislator, who could
 dissolve a pure oligarchy, and save the people from that slavery which
 hung over them, and establish the ancient democratic form of government
 in his country; wherein every part of it was so framed as to be well
 adapted to the whole. In the senate of Areopagus an oligarchy was
 preserved; by the manner of electing their [1274a] magistrates, an
 aristocracy; and in their courts of justice, a democracy.
 
 Solon seems not to have altered the established form of government,
 either with respect to the senate or the mode of electing their
 magistrates; but to have raised the people to great consideration in the
 state by allotting the supreme judicial department to them; and for this
 some persons blame him, as having done what would soon overturn that
 balance of power he intended to establish; for by trying all causes
 whatsoever before the people, who were chosen by lot to determine them,
 it was necessary to flatter a tyrannical populace who had got this
 power; which contributed to bring the government to that pure democracy
 it now is.
 
 Both Ephialtes and Pericles abridged the power of the Areopagites, the
 latter of whom introduced the method of paying those who attended
 the courts of justice: and thus every one who aimed at being popular
 proceeded increasing the power of the people to what we now see it. But
 it is evident that this was not Solon's intention, but that it arose
 from accident; for the people being the cause of the naval victory
 over the Medes, assumed greatly upon it, and enlisted themselves
 under factious demagogues, although opposed by the better part of the
 citizens. He thought it indeed most necessary to entrust the people
 with the choice of their magistrates and the power of calling them to
 account; for without that they must have been slaves and enemies to the
 other citizens: but he ordered them to elect those only who were persons
 of good account and property, either out of those who were worth five
 hundred medimns, or those who were called xeugitai, or those of the
 third census, who were called horsemen.
 
 As for those of the fourth, which consisted of mechanics, they were
 incapable of any office. Zaleucus was the legislator of the Western
 Locrians, as was Charondas, the Catanean, of his own cities, and those
 also in Italy and Sicily which belonged to the Calcidians. Some persons
 endeavour to prove that Onomacritus, the Locrian, was the first person
 of note who drew up laws; and that he employed himself in that business
 while he was at Crete, where he continued some time to learn the
 prophetic art: and they say, that Thales was his companion; and that
 Lycurgus and Zaleucus were the scholars of Thales, and Charondas of
 Zaleucus; but those who advance this, advance what is repugnant to
 chronology. Philolaus also, of the family of the Bacchiades, was a
 Theban legislator. This man was very fond of Diocles, a victor in
 the Olympic games, and when he left his country from a disgust at an
 improper passion which his mother Alithoe had entertained for him, and
 settled at Thebes, Philolaus followed him, where they both died, and
 where they still show their tombs placed in view of each other, but so
 disposed, that one of them looks towards Corinth, the other does not;
 the reason they give for this is, that Diodes, from his detestation of
 his mother's passion, would have his tomb so placed that no one could
 see Corinth from it; but Philolaus chose that it might be seen from his:
 and this was the cause of their living at Thebes. [1274b]
 
 As Philolaus gave them laws concerning many other things, so did he upon
 adoption, which they call adoptive laws; and this he in particular did
 to preserve the number of families. Charondas did nothing new, except
 in actions for perjury, which he was the first person who took into
 particular consideration. He also drew up his laws with greater elegance
 and accuracy than even any of our present legislators. Philolaus
 introduced the law for the equal distribution of goods; Plato that for
 the community of women, children, and goods, and also for public tables
 for the women; and one concerning drunkenness, that they might observe
 sobriety in their symposiums. He also made a law concerning their
 warlike exercises; that they should acquire a habit of using both hands
 alike, as it was necessary that one hand should be as useful as the
 other.
 
 As for Draco's laws, they were published when the government was already
 established, and they have nothing particular in them worth mentioning,
 except their severity on account of the enormity of their punishments.
 Pittacus was the author of some laws, but never drew up any form of
 government; one of which was this, that if a drunken man beat any person
 he should be punished more than if he did it when sober; for as
 people are more apt to be abusive when drunk than sober, he paid no
 consideration to the excuse which drunkenness might claim, but regarded
 only the common benefit. Andromadas Regmus was also a lawgiver to the
 Thracian talcidians. There are some laws of his concerning murders and
 heiresses extant, but these contain nothing that any one can say is new
 and his own. And thus much for different sorts of governments, as well
 those which really exist as those which different persons have proposed.
 
 
 
 
 BOOK III
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I
 
 
 Every one who inquires into the nature of government, and what are its
 different forms, should make this almost his first question, What is a
 city? For upon this there is a dispute: for some persons say the city
 did this or that, while others say, not the city, but the oligarchy,
 or the tyranny. We see that the city is the only object which both the
 politician and legislator have in view in all they do: but government
 is a certain ordering of those who inhabit a city. As a city is a
 collective body, and, like other wholes, composed of many parts, it is
 evident our first inquiry must be, what a citizen is: for a city is a
 certain number of citizens. So that we must consider whom we ought to
 call citizen, and who is one; for this is often doubtful: for every one
 will not allow that this character is applicable to the same person; for
 that man who would be a citizen in a republic would very often not be
 one in an oligarchy. We do not include in this inquiry many of those who
 acquire this appellation out of the ordinary way, as honorary persons,
 for instance, but those only who have a natural right to it.
 
 Now it is not residence which constitutes a man a citizen; for in this
 sojourners and slaves are upon an equality with him; nor will it be
 sufficient for this purpose, that you have the privilege of the laws,
 and may plead or be impleaded, for this all those of different nations,
 between whom there is a mutual agreement for that purpose, are allowed;
 although it very often happens, that sojourners have not a perfect right
 therein without the protection of a patron, to whom they are obliged to
 apply, which shows that their share in the community is incomplete. In
 like manner, with respect to boys who are not yet enrolled, or old men
 who are past war, we admit that they are in some respects citizens,
 but not completely so, but with some exceptions, for these are not yet
 arrived to years of maturity, and those are past service; nor is
 there any difference between them. But what we mean is sufficiently
 intelligible and clear, we want a complete citizen, one in whom there
 is no deficiency to be corrected to make him so. As to those who are
 banished, or infamous, there may be the same objections made and the
 same answer given. There is nothing that more characterises a complete
 citizen than having a share in the judicial and executive part of the
 government.
 
 With respect to offices, some are fixed to a particular time, so that
 no person is, on any account, permitted to fill them twice; or else
 not till some certain period has intervened; others are not fixed, as a
 juryman's, and a member of the general assembly: but probably some one
 may say these are not offices, nor have the citizens in these capacities
 any share in the government; though surely it is ridiculous to say that
 those who have the principal power in the state bear no office in it.
 But this objection is of no weight, for it is only a dispute about
 words; as there is no general term which can be applied both to the
 office of a juryman and a member of the assembly. For the sake of
 distinction, suppose we call it an indeterminate office: but I lay it
 down as a maxim, that those are citizens who could exercise it. Such
 then is the description of a citizen who comes nearest to what all those
 who are called citizens are. Every one also should know, that of the
 component parts of those things which differ from each other in species,
 after the first or second remove, those which follow have either nothing
 at all or very little common to each.
 
 Now we see that governments differ from each other in their form,
 and that some of them are defective, others [1275b] as excellent as
 possible: for it is evident, that those which have many deficiencies
 and degeneracies in them must be far inferior to those which are without
 such faults. What I mean by degeneracies will be hereafter explained.
 Hence it is clear that the office of a citizen must differ as
 governments do from each other: for which reason he who is called
 a citizen has, in a democracy, every privilege which that station
 supposes. In other forms of government he may enjoy them; but not
 necessarily: for in some states the people have no power; nor have they
 any general assembly, but a few select men.
 
 The trial also of different causes is allotted to different persons; as
 at Lacedaemon all disputes concerning contracts are brought before some
 of the ephori: the senate are the judges in cases of murder, and so on;
 some being to be heard by one magistrate, others by another: and thus
 at Carthage certain magistrates determine all causes. But our former
 description of a citizen will admit of correction; for in some
 governments the office of a juryman and a member of the general assembly
 is not an indeterminate one; but there are particular persons appointed
 for these purposes, some or all of the citizens being appointed jurymen
 or members of the general assembly, and this either for all causes and
 all public business whatsoever, or else for some particular one: and
 this may be sufficient to show what a citizen is; for he who has a right
 to a share in the judicial and executive part of government in any
 city, him we call a citizen of that place; and a city, in one word, is
 a collective body of such persons sufficient in themselves to all the
 purposes of life.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II
 
 
 In common use they define a citizen to be one who is sprung from
 citizens on both sides, not on the father's or the mother's only. Others
 carry the matter still further, and inquire how many of his ancestors
 have been citizens, as his grandfather, great-grandfather, etc., but
 some persons have questioned how the first of the family could prove
 themselves citizens, according to this popular and careless definition.
 Gorgias of Leontium, partly entertaining the same doubt, and partly in
 jest, says, that as a mortar is made by a mortar-maker, so a citizen is
 made by a citizen-maker, and a Larisssean by a Larisssean-maker. This
 is indeed a very simple account of the matter; for if citizens are so,
 according to this definition, it will be impossible to apply it to the
 first founders or first inhabitants of states, who cannot possibly claim
 in right either of their father or mother. It is probably a matter of
 still more difficulty to determine their rights as citizens who are
 admitted to their freedom after any revolution in the state. As, for
 instance, at Athens, after the expulsion of the tyrants, when Clisthenes
 enrolled many foreigners and city-slaves amongst the tribes; and the
 doubt with respect to them was, not whether they were citizens or no,
 but whether they were legally so or not. Though indeed some persons may
 have this further [1276a] doubt, whether a citizen can be a citizen
 when he is illegally made; as if an illegal citizen, and one who is
 no citizen at all, were in the same predicament: but since we see some
 persons govern unjustly, whom yet we admit to govern, though not justly,
 and the definition of a citizen is one who exercises certain offices,
 for such a one we have defined a citizen to be, it is evident, that a
 citizen illegally created yet continues to be a citizen, but whether
 justly or unjustly so belongs to the former inquiry.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III
 
 
 It has also been doubted what was and what was not the act of the city;
 as, for instance, when a democracy arises out of an aristocracy or a
 tyranny; for some persons then refuse to fulfil their contracts; as if
 the right to receive the money was in the tyrant and not in the state,
 and many other things of the same nature; as if any covenant was founded
 for violence and not for the common good. So in like manner, if anything
 is done by those who have the management of public affairs where a
 democracy is established, their actions are to be considered as the
 actions of the state, as well as in the oligarchy or tyranny.
 
 And here it seems very proper to consider this question, When shall we
 say that a city is the same, and when shall we say that it is different?
 
 It is but a superficial mode of examining into this question to begin
 with the place and the people; for it may happen that these may be
 divided from that, or that some one of them may live in one place, and
 some in another (but this question may be regarded as no very knotty
 one; for, as a city may acquire that appellation on many accounts,
 it may be solved many ways); and in like manner, when men inhabit one
 common place, when shall we say that they inhabit the same city, or that
 the city is the same? for it does not depend upon the walls; for I can
 suppose Peloponnesus itself surrounded with a wall, as Babylon was, and
 every other place, which rather encircles many nations than one city,
 and that they say was taken three days when some of the inhabitants
 knew nothing of it: but we shall find a proper time to determine this
 question; for the extent of a city, how large it should be, and whether
 it should consist of more than one people, these are particulars that
 the politician should by no means be unacquainted with. This, too, is a
 matter of inquiry, whether we shall say that a city is the same while
 it is inhabited by the same race of men, though some of them are
 perpetually dying, others coming into the world, as we say that a river
 or a fountain is the same, though the waters are continually changing;
 or when a revolution takes place shall we [1276b] say the men are the
 same, but the city is different: for if a city is a community, it is a
 community of citizens; but if the mode of government should alter, and
 become of another sort, it would seem a necessary consequence that the
 city is not the same; as we regard the tragic chorus as different from
 the comic, though it may probably consist of the same performers: thus
 every other community or composition is said to be different if the
 species of composition is different; as in music the same hands produce
 different harmony, as the Doric and Phrygian. If this is true, it is
 evident, that when we speak of a city as being the same we refer to the
 government there established; and this, whether it is called by the
 same name or any other, or inhabited by the same men or different.
 But whether or no it is right to dissolve the community when the
 constitution is altered is another question.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV
 
 
 What has been said, it follows that we should consider whether the
 same virtues which constitute a good man make a valuable citizen, or
 different; and if a particular inquiry is necessary for this matter we
 must first give a general description of the virtues of a good citizen;
 for as a sailor is one of those who make up a community, so is a
 citizen, although the province of one sailor may be different from
 another's (for one is a rower, another a steersman, a third a boatswain,
 and so on, each having their several appointments), it is evident that
 the most accurate description of any one good sailor must refer to
 his peculiar abilities, yet there are some things in which the same
 description may be applied to the whole crew, as the safety of the ship
 is the common business of all of them, for this is the general centre of
 all their cares: so also with respect to citizens, although they may
 in a few particulars be very different, yet there is one care common to
 them all, the safety of the community, for the community of the citizens
 composes the state; for which reason the virtue of a citizen has
 necessarily a reference to the state. But if there are different sorts
 of governments, it is evident that those actions which constitute the
 virtue of an excellent citizen in one community will not constitute it
 in another; wherefore the virtue of such a one cannot be perfect: but we
 say, a man is good when his virtues are perfect; from whence it follows,
 that an excellent citizen does not possess that virtue which constitutes
 a good man. Those who are any ways doubtful concerning this question
 may be convinced of the truth of it by examining into the best formed
 states: for, if it is impossible that a city should consist entirely of
 excellent citizens (while it is necessary that every one should do well
 in his calling, in which consists his excellence, as it is impossible
 that all the citizens should have the same [1277a] qualifications) it
 is impossible that the virtue of a citizen and a good man should be the
 same; for all should possess the virtue of an excellent citizen: for
 from hence necessarily arise the perfection of the city: but that every
 one should possess the virtue of a good man is impossible without
 all the citizens in a well-regulated state were necessarily virtuous.
 Besides, as a city is composed of dissimilar parts, as an animal is of
 life and body; the soul of reason and appetite; a family of a man and
 his wife--property of a master and a slave; in the same manner, as a
 city is composed of all these and many other very different parts, it
 necessarily follows that the virtue of all the citizens cannot be the
 same; as the business of him who leads the band is different from the
 other dancers. From all which proofs it is evident that the virtues of
 a citizen cannot be one and the same. But do we never find those virtues
 united which constitute a good man and excellent citizen? for we say,
 such a one is an excellent magistrate and a prudent and good man; but
 prudence is a necessary qualification for all those who engage in public
 affairs. Nay, some persons affirm that the education of those who are
 intended to command should, from the beginning, be different from other
 citizens, as the children of kings are generally instructed in riding
 and warlike exercises; and thus Euripides says:
 
   "... No showy arts Be mine, but teach me what the state requires."
 
 As if those who are to rule were to have an education peculiar to
 themselves. But if we allow, that the virtues of a good man and a
 good magistrate may be the same, and a citizen is one who obeys the
 magistrate, it follows that the virtue of the one cannot in general be
 the same as the virtue of the other, although it may be true of some
 particular citizen; for the virtue of the magistrate must be different
 from the virtue of the citizen. For which reason Jason declared that
 was he deprived of his kingdom he should pine away with regret, as not
 knowing how to live a private man. But it is a great recommendation to
 know how to command as well as to obey; and to do both these things well
 is the virtue of an accomplished citizen. If then the virtue of a good
 man consists only in being able to command, but the virtue of a good
 citizen renders him equally fit for the one as well as the other, the
 commendation of both of them is not the same. It appears, then, that
 both he who commands and he who obeys should each of them learn their
 separate business: but that the citizen should be master of and
 take part in both these, as any one may easily perceive; in a family
 government there is no occasion for the master to know how to perform
 the necessary offices, but rather to enjoy the labour of others; for to
 do the other is a servile part. I mean by the other, the common family
 business of the slave.
 
 There are many sorts of slaves; for their employments are various: of
 these the handicraftsmen are one, who, as their name imports, get their
 living by the labour of their hands, and amongst these all mechanics are
 included; [1277b] for which reasons such workmen, in some states, were
 not formerly admitted into any share in the government; till at length
 democracies were established: it is not therefore proper for any man
 of honour, or any citizen, or any one who engages in public affairs, to
 learn these servile employments without they have occasion for them for
 their own use; for without this was observed the distinction between a
 master and a slave would be lost. But there is a government of another
 sort, in which men govern those who are their equals in rank, and
 freemen, which we call a political government, in which men learn to
 command by first submitting to obey, as a good general of horse, or a
 commander-in-chief, must acquire a knowledge of their duty by
 having been long under the command of another, and the like in every
 appointment in the army: for well is it said, no one knows how to
 command who has not himself been under command of another. The virtues
 of those are indeed different, but a good citizen must necessarily be
 endowed with them; he ought also to know in what manner freemen ought
 to govern, as well as be governed: and this, too, is the duty of a good
 man. And if the temperance and justice of him who commands is different
 from his who, though a freeman, is under command, it is evident that the
 virtues of a good citizen cannot be the same as justice, for instance
 but must be of a different species in these two different situations, as
 the temperance and courage of a man and a woman are different from each
 other; for a man would appear a coward who had only that courage which
 would be graceful in a woman, and a woman would be thought a talker who
 should take as large a part in the conversation as would become a man of
 consequence.
 
 The domestic employments of each of them are also different; it is the
 man's business to acquire subsistence, the woman's to take care of it.
 But direction and knowledge of public affairs is a virtue peculiar to
 those who govern, while all others seem to be equally requisite for both
 parties; but with this the governed have no concern, it is theirs to
 entertain just notions: they indeed are like flute-makers, while those
 who govern are the musicians who play on them. And thus much to show
 whether the virtue of a good man and an excellent citizen is the same,
 or if it is different, and also how far it is the same, and how far
 different.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V
 
 
 But with respect to citizens there is a doubt remaining, whether those
 only are truly so who are allowed to share in the government, or whether
 the mechanics also are to be considered as such? for if those who are
 not permitted to rule are to be reckoned among them, it is impossible
 that the virtue of all the citizens should be the same, for these also
 are citizens; and if none of them are admitted to be citizens, where
 shall they be ranked? for they are neither [1278a] sojourners nor
 foreigners? or shall we say that there will no inconvenience arise from
 their not being citizens, as they are neither slaves nor freedmen:
 for this is certainly true, that all those are not citizens who are
 necessary to the existence of a city, as boys are not citizens in the
 same manner that men are, for those are perfectly so, the others under
 some conditions; for they are citizens, though imperfect ones: for
 in former times among some people the mechanics were either slaves or
 foreigners, for which reason many of them are so now: and indeed the
 best regulated states will not permit a mechanic to be a citizen; but
 if it be allowed them, we cannot then attribute the virtue we have
 described to every citizen or freeman, but to those only who are
 disengaged from servile offices. Now those who are employed by one
 person in them are slaves; those who do them for money are mechanics
 and hired servants: hence it is evident on the least reflection what is
 their situation, for what I have said is fully explained by appearances.
 Since the number of communities is very great, it follows necessarily
 that there will be many different sorts of citizens, particularly
 of those who are governed by others, so that in one state it may be
 necessary to admit mechanics and hired servants to be citizens, but in
 others it may be impossible; as particularly in an aristocracy, where
 honours are bestowed on virtue and dignity: for it is impossible for
 one who lives the life of a mechanic or hired servant to acquire the
 practice of virtue. In an oligarchy also hired servants are not admitted
 to be citizens; because there a man's right to bear any office is
 regulated by his fortune; but mechanics are, for many citizens are very
 rich.
 
 There was a law at Thebes that no one could have a share in the
 government till he had been ten years out of trade. In many states the
 law invites strangers to accept the freedom of the city; and in some
 democracies the son of a free-woman is himself free. The same is also
 observed in many others with respect to natural children; but it is
 through want of citizens regularly born that they admit such: for these
 laws are always made in consequence of a scarcity of inhabitants; so,
 as their numbers increase, they first deprive the children of a male or
 female slave of this privilege, next the child of a free-woman, and last
 of all they will admit none but those whose fathers and mothers were
 both free.
 
 That there are many sorts of citizens, and that he may be said to be as
 completely who shares the honours of the state, is evident from what
 has been already said. Thus Achilles, in Homer, complains of Agamemnon's
 treating him like an unhonoured stranger; for a stranger or sojourner is
 one who does not partake of the honours of the state: and whenever the
 right to the freedom of the city is kept obscure, it is for the sake of
 the inhabitants. [1278b] From what has been said it is plain whether the
 virtue of a good man and an excellent citizen is the same or different:
 and we find that in some states it is the same, in others not; and also
 that this is not true of each citizen, but of those only who take the
 lead, or are capable of taking the lead, in public affairs, either alone
 or in conjunction with others.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI
 
 
 Having established these points, we proceed next to consider whether one
 form of government only should be established, or more than one; and if
 more, how many, and of what sort, and what are the differences between
 them. The form of government is the ordering and regulating of the city,
 and all the offices in it, particularly those wherein the supreme power
 is lodged; and this power is always possessed by the administration; but
 the administration itself is that particular form of government which
 is established in any state: thus in a democracy the supreme power is
 lodged in the whole people; on the contrary, in an oligarchy it is in
 the hands of a few. We say then, that the form of government in these
 states is different, and we shall find the same thing hold good in
 others. Let us first determine for whose sake a city is established;
 and point out the different species of rule which man may submit to in
 social life.
 
 I have already mentioned in my treatise on the management of a family,
 and the power of the master, that man is an animal naturally formed
 for society, and that therefore, when he does not want any foreign
 assistance, he will of his own accord desire to live with others; not
 but that mutual advantage induces them to it, as far as it enables each
 person to live more agreeably; and this is indeed the great object
 not only to all in general, but also to each individual: but it is not
 merely matter of choice, but they join in society also, even that they
 may be able to live, which probably is not without some share of merit,
 and they also support civil society, even for the sake of preserving
 life, without they are grievously overwhelmed with the miseries of it:
 for it is very evident that men will endure many calamities for the sake
 of living, as being something naturally sweet and desirable. It is easy
 to point out the different modes of government, and we have already
 settled them in our exoteric discourses. The power of the master, though
 by nature equally serviceable, both to the master and to the slave, yet
 nevertheless has for its object the benefit of the master, while the
 benefit of the slave arises accidentally; for if the slave is destroyed,
 the power of the master is at an end: but the authority which a man
 has over his wife, and children, and his family, which we call domestic
 government, is either for the benefit of those who are under subjection,
 or else for the common benefit of the whole: but its particular object
 is the benefit of the governed, as we see in other arts; in physic, for
 instance, and the gymnastic exercises, wherein, if any benefit [1279a]
 arise to the master, it is accidental; for nothing forbids the master of
 the exercises from sometimes being himself one of those who exercises,
 as the steersman is always one of the sailors; but both the master of
 the exercises and the steersman consider the good of those who are under
 their government. Whatever good may happen to the steersman when he is
 a sailor, or to the master of the exercises when he himself makes one at
 the games, is not intentional, or the object of their power; thus in all
 political governments which are established to preserve and defend the
 equality of the citizens it is held right to rule by turns. Formerly, as
 was natural, every one expected that each of his fellow-citizens should
 in his turn serve the public, and thus administer to his private good,
 as he himself when in office had done for others; but now every one is
 desirous of being continually in power, that he may enjoy the advantage
 which he makes of public business and being in office; as if places were
 a never-failing remedy for every complaint, and were on that account so
 eagerly sought after.
 
 It is evident, then, that all those governments which have a common good
 in view are rightly established and strictly just, but those who have
 in view only the good of the rulers are all founded on wrong principles,
 and are widely different from what a government ought to be, for they
 are tyranny over slaves, whereas a city is a community of freemen.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII
 
 
 Having established these particulars, we come to consider next the
 different number of governments which there are, and what they are; and
 first, what are their excellencies: for when we have determined this,
 their defects will be evident enough.
 
 It is evident that every form of government or administration, for the
 words are of the same import, must contain a supreme power over the
 whole state, and this supreme power must necessarily be in the hands
 of one person, or a few, or many; and when either of these apply their
 power for the common good, such states are well governed; but when the
 interest of the one, the few, or the many who enjoy this power is alone
 consulted, then ill; for you must either affirm that those who make
 up the community are not citizens, or else let these share in the
 advantages of government. We usually call a state which is governed by
 one person for the common good, a kingdom; one that is governed by
 more than one, but by a few only, an aristocracy; either because the
 government is in the hands of the most worthy citizens, or because it
 is the best form for the city and its inhabitants. When the citizens at
 large govern for the public good, it is called a state; which is also
 a common name for all other governments, and these distinctions are
 consonant to reason; for it will not be difficult to find one person,
 or a very few, of very distinguished abilities, but almost impossible to
 meet with the majority [1279b] of a people eminent for every virtue;
 but if there is one common to a whole nation it is valour; for this is
 created and supported by numbers: for which reason in such a state
 the profession of arms will always have the greatest share in the
 government.
 
 Now the corruptions attending each of these governments are these; a
 kingdom may degenerate into a tyranny, an aristocracy into an oligarchy,
 and a state into a democracy. Now a tyranny is a monarchy where the good
 of one man only is the object of government, an oligarchy considers
 only the rich, and a democracy only the poor; but neither of them have a
 common good in view.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII
 
 
 It will be necessary to enlarge a little more upon the nature of each
 of these states, which is not without some difficulty, for he who would
 enter into a philosophical inquiry into the principles of them, and not
 content himself with a superficial view of their outward conduct, must
 pass over and omit nothing, but explain the true spirit of each of them.
 A tyranny then is, as has been said, a monarchy, where one person has
 an absolute and despotic power over the whole community and every member
 therein: an oligarchy, where the supreme power of the state is lodged
 with the rich: a democracy, on the contrary, is where those have it who
 are worth little or nothing. But the first difficulty that arises from
 the distinctions which we have laid down is this, should it happen that
 the majority of the inhabitants who possess the power of the state (for
 this is a democracy) should be rich, the question is, how does this
 agree with what we have said? The same difficulty occurs, should it ever
 happen that the poor compose a smaller part of the people than the rich,
 but from their superior abilities acquire the supreme power; for this is
 what they call an oligarchy; it should seem then that our definition
 of the different states was not correct: nay, moreover, could any one
 suppose that the majority of the people were poor, and the minority
 rich, and then describe the state in this manner, that an oligarchy
 was a government in which the rich, being few in number, possessed the
 supreme power, and that a democracy was a state in which the poor, being
 many in number, possessed it, still there will be another difficulty;
 for what name shall we give to those states we have been describing? I
 mean, that in which the greater number are rich, and that in which the
 lesser number are poor (where each of these possess the supreme power),
 if there are no other states than those we have described. It seems
 therefore evident to reason, that whether the supreme power is vested
 in the hands of many or few may be a matter of accident; but that it
 is clear enough, that when it is in the hands of the few, it will be
 a government of the rich; when in the hands of the many, it will be a
 government of the poor; since in all countries there are many poor and
 few rich: it is not therefore the cause that has been already assigned
 (namely, the number of people in power) that makes the difference
 between the two governments; but an oligarchy and democracy differ in
 this from each other, in the poverty of those who govern in the one,
 and the riches I28oa of those who govern in the other; for when the
 government is in the hands of the rich, be they few or be they more, it
 is an oligarchy; when it is in the hands of the poor, it is a democracy:
 but, as we have already said, the one will be always few, the other
 numerous, but both will enjoy liberty; and from the claims of wealth and
 liberty will arise continual disputes with each other for the lead in
 public affairs.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IX
 
 
 Let us first determine what are the proper limits of an oligarchy and
 a democracy, and what is just in each of these states; for all men have
 some natural inclination to justice; but they proceed therein only to
 a certain degree; nor can they universally point out what is absolutely
 just; as, for instance, what is equal appears just, and is so; but not
 to all; only among those who are equals: and what is unequal appears
 just, and is so; but not to all, only amongst those who are unequals;
 which circumstance some people neglect, and therefore judge ill; the
 reason for which is, they judge for themselves, and every one almost is
 the worst judge in his own cause. Since then justice has reference to
 persons, the same distinctions must be made with respect to persons
 which are made with respect to things, in the manner that I have already
 described in my Ethics.
 
 As to the equality of the things, these they agree in; but their dispute
 is concerning the equality of the persons, and chiefly for the reason
 above assigned; because they judge ill in their own cause; and also
 because each party thinks, that if they admit what is right in some
 particulars, they have done justice on the whole: thus, for instance,
 if some persons are unequal in riches, they suppose them unequal in the
 whole; or, on the contrary, if they are equal in liberty, they suppose
 them equal in the whole: but what is absolutely just they omit; for
 if civil society was founded for the sake of preserving and increasing
 property, every one's right in the city would be equal to his fortune;
 and then the reasoning of those who insist upon an oligarchy would be
 valid; for it would not be right that he who contributed one mina should
 have an equal share in the hundred along with him who brought in all the
 rest, either of the original money or what was afterwards acquired.
 
 Nor was civil society founded merely to preserve the lives of its
 members; but that they might live well: for otherwise a state might
 be composed of slaves, or the animal creation: but this is not so; for
 these have no share in the happiness of it; nor do they live after their
 own choice; nor is it an alliance mutually to defend each other from
 injuries, or for a commercial intercourse: for then the Tyrrhenians and
 Carthaginians, and all other nations between whom treaties of commerce
 subsist, would be citizens of one city; for they have articles
 to regulate their exports and imports, and engagements for mutual
 protection, and alliances for mutual defence; but [1280b] yet they
 have not all the same magistrates established among them, but they are
 different among the different people; nor does the one take any care,
 that the morals of the other should be as they ought, or that none of
 those who have entered into the common agreements should be unjust, or
 in any degree vicious, only that they do not injure any member of the
 confederacy. But whosoever endeavours to establish wholesome laws in
 a state, attends to the virtues and the vices of each individual who
 composes it; from whence it is evident, that the first care of him who
 would found a city, truly deserving that name, and not nominally so,
 must be to have his citizens virtuous; for otherwise it is merely an
 alliance for self-defence; differing from those of the same cast which
 are made between different people only in place: for law is an agreement
 and a pledge, as the sophist Lycophron says, between the citizens of
 their intending to do justice to each other, though not sufficient to
 make all the citizens just and good: and that this is fact is evident,
 for could any one bring different places together, as, for instance,
 enclose Megara and Corinth in a wall, yet they would not be one city,
 not even if the inhabitants intermarried with each other, though this
 inter-community contributes much to make a place one city. Besides,
 could we suppose a set of people to live separate from each other, but
 within such a distance as would admit of an intercourse, and that there
 were laws subsisting between each party, to prevent their injuring one
 another in their mutual dealings, supposing one a carpenter, another
 a husbandman, shoemaker, and the like, and that their numbers were ten
 thousand, still all that they would have together in common would be a
 tariff for trade, or an alliance for mutual defence, but not the same
 city. And why? not because their mutual intercourse is not near enough,
 for even if persons so situated should come to one place, and every one
 should live in his own house as in his native city, and there should be
 alliances subsisting between each party to mutually assist and prevent
 any injury being done to the other, still they would not be admitted
 to be a city by those who think correctly, if they preserved the same
 customs when they were together as when they were separate.
 
 It is evident, then, that a city is not a community of place; nor
 established for the sake of mutual safety or traffic with each other;
 but that these things are the necessary consequences of a city, although
 they may all exist where there is no city: but a city is a society of
 people joining together with their families and their children to live
 agreeably for the sake of having their lives as happy and as independent
 as possible: and for this purpose it is necessary that they should live
 in one place and intermarry with each other: hence in all cities there
 are family-meetings, clubs, sacrifices, and public entertainments to
 promote friendship; for a love of sociability is friendship itself;
 so that the end then for which a city is established is, that the
 inhabitants of it may live happy, and these things are conducive to that
 end: for it is a community of families and villages for the sake of a
 perfect independent life; that is, as we have already said, for the sake
 of living well and happily. It is not therefore founded for the purpose
 of men's merely [1281a] living together, but for their living as men
 ought; for which reason those who contribute most to this end deserve to
 have greater power in the city than those who are their equals in family
 and freedom, but their inferiors in civil virtue, or those who excel
 them in wealth but are below them in worth. It is evident from what
 has been said, that in all disputes upon government each party says
 something that is just.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER X
 
 
 It may also be a doubt where the supreme power ought to be lodged.
 Shall it be with the majority, or the wealthy, with a number of proper
 persons, or one better than the rest, or with a tyrant? But whichever
 of these we prefer some difficulty will arise. For what? shall the
 poor have it because they are the majority? they may then divide among
 themselves, what belongs to the rich: nor is this unjust; because truly
 it has been so judged by the supreme power. But what avails it to point
 out what is the height of injustice if this is not? Again, if the many
 seize into their own hands everything which belongs to the few, it is
 evident that the city will be at an end. But virtue will never destroy
 what is virtuous; nor can what is right be the ruin of the state:
 therefore such a law can never be right, nor can the acts of a tyrant
 ever be wrong, for of necessity they must all be just; for he, from his
 unlimited power, compels every one to obey his command, as the multitude
 oppress the rich. Is it right then that the rich, the few, should have
 the supreme power? and what if they be guilty of the same rapine and
 plunder the possessions of the majority, that will be as right as the
 other: but that all things of this sort are wrong and unjust is evident.
 Well then, these of the better sort shall have it: but must not then all
 the other citizens live unhonoured, without sharing the offices of the
 city; for the offices of a city are its honours, and if one set of men
 are always in power, it is evident that the rest must be without honour.
 Well then, let it be with one person of all others the fittest for it:
 but by this means the power will be still more contracted, and a greater
 number than before continue unhonoured. But some one may say, that it is
 wrong to let man have the supreme power and not the law, as his soul is
 subject to so many passions. But if this law appoints an aristocracy, or
 a democracy, how will it help us in our present doubts? for those things
 will happen which we have already mentioned.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XI
 
 
 Other particulars we will consider separately; but it seems proper to
 prove, that the supreme power ought to be lodged with the many, rather
 than with those of the better sort, who are few; and also to explain
 what doubts (and probably just ones) may arise: now, though not one
 individual of the many may himself be fit for the supreme power, yet
 when these many are joined together, it does not follow but they may be
 better qualified for it than those; and this not separately, but as a
 collective body; as the public suppers exceed those which are given at
 one person's private expense: for, as they are many, each person brings
 in his share of virtue and wisdom; and thus, coming together, they are
 like one man made up of a multitude, with many feet, many hands,
 and many intelligences: thus is it with respect to the manners and
 understandings of the multitude taken together; for which reason the
 public are the best judges of music and poetry; for some understand
 one part, some another, and all collectively the whole; and in this
 particular men of consequence differ from each of the many; as they
 say those who are beautiful do from those who are not so, and as fine
 pictures excel any natural objects, by collecting the several beautiful
 parts which were dispersed among different originals into one, although
 the separate parts, as the eye or any other, might be handsomer than in
 the picture.
 
 But if this distinction is to be made between every people and every
 general assembly, and some few men of consequence, it may be doubtful
 whether it is true; nay, it is clear enough that, with respect to a few,
 it is not; since the same conclusion might be applied even to brutes:
 and indeed wherein do some men differ from brutes? Not but that nothing
 prevents what I have said being true of the people in some states. The
 doubt then which we have lately proposed, with all its consequences, may
 be settled in this manner; it is necessary that the freemen who compose
 the bulk of the people should have absolute power in some things; but as
 they are neither men of property, nor act uniformly upon principles
 of virtue, it is not safe to trust them with the first offices in the
 state, both on account of their iniquity and their ignorance; from
 the one of which they will do what is wrong, from the other they will
 mistake: and yet it is dangerous to allow them no power or share in the
 government; for when there are many poor people who are incapable of
 acquiring the honours of their country, the state must necessarily have
 many enemies in it; let them then be permitted to vote in the public
 assemblies and to determine causes; for which reason Socrates, and some
 other legislators, gave them the power of electing the officers of the
 state, and also of inquiring into their conduct when they came out of
 office, and only prevented their being magistrates by themselves;
 for the multitude when they are collected together have all of them
 sufficient understanding for these purposes, and, mixing among those of
 higher rank, are serviceable to the city, as some things, which alone
 are improper for food, when mixed with others make the whole more
 wholesome than a few of them would be.
 
 But there is a difficulty attending this form of government, for it
 seems, that the person who himself was capable of curing any one who
 was then sick, must be the best judge whom to employ as a physician; but
 such a one must be himself a physician; and the same holds true in every
 other practice and art: and as a physician ought [1282a] to give an
 account of his practice to a physician, so ought it to be in other arts:
 those whose business is physic may be divided into three sorts, the
 first of these is he who makes up the medicines; the second prescribes,
 and is to the other as the architect is to the mason; the third is he
 who understands the science, but never practises it: now these three
 distinctions may be found in those who understand all other arts; nor
 have we less opinion of their judgment who are only instructed in the
 principles of the art than of those who practise it: and with respect
 to elections the same method of proceeding seems right; for to elect a
 proper person in any science is the business of those who are skilful
 therein; as in geometry, of geometricians; in steering, of steersmen:
 but if some individuals should know something of particular arts and
 works, they do not know more than the professors of them: so that even
 upon this principle neither the election of magistrates, nor the censure
 of their conduct, should be entrusted to the many.
 
 But probably all that has been here said may not be right; for, to
 resume the argument I lately used, if the people are not very brutal
 indeed, although we allow that each individual knows less of these
 affairs than those who have given particular attention to them, yet when
 they come together they will know them better, or at least not worse;
 besides, in some particular arts it is not the workman only who is the
 best judge; namely, in those the works of which are understood by those
 who do not profess them: thus he who builds a house is not the only
 judge of it, for the master of the family who inhabits it is a better;
 thus also a steersman is a better judge of a tiller than he who made
 it; and he who gives an entertainment than the cook. What has been said
 seems a sufficient solution of this difficulty; but there is another
 that follows: for it seems absurd that the power of the state should be
 lodged with those who are but of indifferent morals, instead of those
 who are of excellent characters. Now the power of election and censure
 are of the utmost consequence, and this, as has been said, in some
 states they entrust to the people; for the general assembly is the
 supreme court of all, and they have a voice in this, and deliberate in
 all public affairs, and try all causes, without any objection to the
 meanness of their circumstances, and at any age: but their treasurers,
 generals, and other great officers of state are taken from men of great
 fortune and worth. This difficulty also may be solved upon the same
 principle; and here too they may be right, for the power is not in the
 man who is member of the assembly, or council, but the assembly itself,
 and the council, and the people, of which each individual of the whole
 community are the parts, I mean as senator, adviser, or judge; for which
 reason it is very right, that the many should have the greatest powers
 in their own hands; for the people, the council, and the judges are
 composed of them, and the property of all these collectively is more
 than the property of any person or a few who fill the great offices of
 the state: and thus I determine these points.
 
 The first question that we stated shows plainly, that the supreme
 power should be lodged in laws duly made and that the magistrate or
 magistrates, either one or more, should be authorised to determine those
 cases which the laws cannot particularly speak to, as it is impossible
 for them, in general language, to explain themselves upon everything
 that may arise: but what these laws are which are established upon the
 best foundations has not been yet explained, but still remains a matter
 of some question: but the laws of every state will necessarily be like
 every state, either trifling or excellent, just or unjust; for it is
 evident, that the laws must be framed correspondent to the constitution
 of the government; and, if so, it is plain, that a well-formed
 government will have good laws, a bad one, bad ones.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XII
 
 
 Since in every art and science the end aimed at is always good, so
 particularly in this, which is the most excellent of all, the founding
 of civil society, the good wherein aimed at is justice; for it is this
 which is for the benefit of all. Now, it is the common opinion, that
 justice is a certain equality; and in this point all the philosophers
 are agreed when they treat of morals: for they say what is just, and to
 whom; and that equals ought to receive equal: but we should know how
 we are to determine what things are equal and what unequal; and in
 this there is some difficulty, which calls for the philosophy of the
 politician. Some persons will probably say, that the employments of the
 state ought to be given according to every particular excellence of each
 citizen, if there is no other difference between them and the rest of
 the community, but they are in every respect else alike: for justice
 attributes different things to persons differing from each other in
 their character, according to their respective merits. But if this is
 admitted to be true, complexion, or height, or any such advantage will
 be a claim for a greater share of the public rights. But that this is
 evidently absurd is clear from other arts and sciences; for with respect
 to musicians who play on the flute together, the best flute is not given
 to him who is of the best family, for he will play never the better for
 that, but the best instrument ought to be given to him who is the best
 artist.
 
 If what is now said does not make this clear, we will explain it still
 further: if there should be any one, a very excellent player on the
 flute, but very deficient in family and beauty, though each of them are
 more valuable endowments than a skill in music, and excel this art in a
 higher degree than that player excels others, yet the best flutes ought
 to be given to him; for the superiority [1283a] in beauty and fortune
 should have a reference to the business in hand; but these have none.
 Moreover, according to this reasoning, every possible excellence might
 come in comparison with every other; for if bodily strength might
 dispute the point with riches or liberty, even any bodily strength might
 do it; so that if one person excelled in size more than another did in
 virtue, and his size was to qualify him to take place of the other's
 virtue, everything must then admit of a comparison with each other; for
 if such a size is greater than virtue by so much, it is evident another
 must be equal to it: but, since this is impossible, it is plain that it
 would be contrary to common sense to dispute a right to any office in
 the state from every superiority whatsoever: for if one person is slow
 and the other swift, neither is the one better qualified nor the other
 worse on that account, though in the gymnastic races a difference in
 these particulars would gain the prize; but a pretension to the offices
 of the state should be founded on a superiority in those qualifications
 which are useful to it: for which reason those of family, independency,
 and fortune, with great propriety, contend with each other for them; for
 these are the fit persons to fill them: for a city can no more consist
 of all poor men than it can of all slaves But if such persons are
 requisite, it is evident that those also who are just and valiant are
 equally so; for without justice and valour no state can be supported,
 the former being necessary for its existence, the latter for its
 happiness.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIII
 
 
 It seems, then, requisite for the establishment of a state, that all, or
 at least many of these particulars should be well canvassed and inquired
 into; and that virtue and education may most justly claim the right of
 being considered as the necessary means of making the citizens happy, as
 we have already said. As those who are equal in one particular are not
 therefore equal in all, and those who are unequal in one particular
 are not therefore unequal in all, it follows that all those governments
 which are established upon a principle which supposes they are, are
 erroneous.
 
 We have already said, that all the members of the community will dispute
 with each other for the offices of the state; and in some particulars
 justly, but not so in general; the rich, for instance, because they
 have the greatest landed property, and the ultimate right to the soil is
 vested in the community; and also because their fidelity is in general
 most to be depended on. The freemen and men of family will dispute the
 point with each other, as nearly on an equality; for these latter have
 a right to a higher regard as citizens than obscure persons, for
 honourable descent is everywhere of great esteem: nor is it an improper
 conclusion, that the descendants of men of worth will be men of worth
 themselves; for noble birth is the fountain of virtue to men of family:
 for the same reason also we justly say, that virtue has a right to put
 in her pretensions. Justice, for instance, is a virtue, and so necessary
 to society, that all others must yield her the precedence.
 
 Let us now see what the many have to urge on their side against the few;
 and they may say, that if, when collectively taken, they are compared
 with them, they are stronger, richer, and better than they are. But
 should it ever happen that all these should inhabit the [1283b] same
 city, I mean the good, the rich, the noble, as well as the many, such as
 usually make up the community, I ask, will there then be any reason to
 dispute concerning who shall govern, or will there not? for in every
 community which we have mentioned there is no dispute where the supreme
 power should be placed; for as these differ from each other, so do those
 in whom that is placed; for in one state the rich enjoy it, in others
 the meritorious, and thus each according to their separate manners. Let
 us however consider what is to be done when all these happen at the same
 time to inhabit the same city. If the virtuous should be very few in
 number, how then shall we act? shall we prefer the virtuous on account
 of their abilities, if they are capable of governing the city? or should
 they be so many as almost entirely to compose the state?
 
 There is also a doubt concerning the pretensions of all those who claim
 the honours of government: for those who found them either on fortune or
 family have nothing which they can justly say in their defence; since
 it is evident upon their principle, that if any one person can be found
 richer than all the rest, the right of governing all these will be
 justly vested in this one person. In the same manner, one man who is
 of the best family will claim it from those who dispute the point upon
 family merit: and probably in an aristocracy the same dispute might
 arise on the score of virtue, if there is one man better than all the
 other men of worth who are in the same community; it seems just, by the
 same reasoning, that he should enjoy the supreme power. And upon this
 principle also, while the many suppose they ought to have the supreme
 command, as being more powerful than the few, if one or more than one,
 though a small number should be found stronger than themselves, these
 ought rather to have it than they.
 
 All these things seem to make it plain, that none of these principles
 are justly founded on which these persons would establish their right to
 the supreme power; and that all men whatsoever ought to obey them:
 for with respect to those who claim it as due to their virtue or their
 fortune, they might have justly some objection to make; for nothing
 hinders but that it may sometimes happen, that the many may be better
 or richer than the few, not as individuals, but in their collective
 capacity.
 
 As to the doubt which some persons have proposed and objected, we may
 answer it in this manner; it is this, whether a legislator, who would
 establish the most perfect system of laws, should calculate them for
 the use of the better part of the citizens, or the many, in the
 circumstances we have already mentioned? The rectitude of anything
 consists in its equality; that therefore which is equally right will be
 advantageous to the whole state, and to every member of it in common.
 
 Now, in general, a citizen is one who both shares in the government and
 also in his turn submits to be governed; [1284a] their condition, it is
 true, is different in different states: the best is that in which a man
 is enabled to choose and to persevere in a course of virtue during his
 whole life, both in his public and private state. But should there be
 one person, or a very few, eminent for an uncommon degree of virtue,
 though not enough to make up a civil state, so that the virtue of the
 many, or their political abilities, should be too inferior to come in
 comparison with theirs, if more than one; or if but one, with his only;
 such are not to be considered as part of the city; for it would be doing
 them injustice to rate them on a level with those who are so far their
 inferiors in virtue and political abilities, that they appear to them
 like a god amongst men. From whence it is evident, that a system of laws
 must be calculated for those who are equal to each other in nature and
 power. Such men, therefore, are not the object of law; for they are
 themselves a law: and it would be ridiculous in any one to endeavour to
 include them in the penalties of a law: for probably they might say what
 Antisthenes tells us the lions did to the hares when they demanded to
 be admitted to an equal share with them in the government. And it is on
 this account that democratic states have established the ostracism; for
 an equality seems the principal object of their government. For which
 reason they compel all those who are very eminent for their power, their
 fortune, their friendships, or any other cause which may give them too
 great weight in the government, to submit to the ostracism, and leave
 the city for a stated time; as the fabulous histories relate the
 Argonauts served Hercules, for they refused to take him with them in the
 ship Argo on account of his superior valour. For which reason those who
 hate a tyranny and find fault with the advice which Periander gave to
 Thrasybulus, must not think there was nothing to be said in its defence;
 for the story goes, that Periander said nothing to the messenger in
 answer to the business he was consulted about, but striking off those
 ears of corn which were higher than the rest, reduced the whole crop to
 a level; so that the messenger, without knowing the cause of what was
 done, related the fact to Thrasybulus, who understood by it that he must
 take off all the principal men in the city. Nor is this serviceable to
 tyrants only; nor is it tyrants only who do it; for the same thing is
 practised both in oligarchies and democracies: for the ostracism has in
 a manner nearly the same power, by restraining and banishing those who
 are too great; and what is done in one city is done also by those who
 have the supreme power in separate states; as the Athenians with respect
 to the Samians, the Chians, and the Lesbians; for when they suddenly
 acquired the superiority over all Greece, they brought the other states
 into subjection, contrary to the treaties which subsisted between them.
 The King of Persia also very often reduces the Medes and Babylonians
 when they assume upon their former power: [1284b] and this is a
 principle which all governments whatsoever keep in their eye; even those
 which are best administered, as well as those which are not, do it;
 these for the sake of private utility, the others for the public good.
 
 The same thing is to be perceived in the other arts and sciences; for
 a painter would not represent an animal with a foot disproportionally
 large, though he had drawn it remarkably beautiful; nor would the
 shipwright make the prow or any other part of the vessel larger than it
 ought to be; nor will the master of the band permit any who sings
 louder and better than the rest to sing in concert with them. There is
 therefore no reason that a monarch should not act in agreement with
 free states, to support his own power, if they do the same thing for the
 benefit of their respective communities; upon which account when there
 is any acknowledged difference in the power of the citizens, the reason
 upon which the ostracism is founded will be politically just; but it is
 better for the legislator so to establish his state at the beginning as
 not to want this remedy: but if in course of time such an inconvenience
 should arise, to endeavour to amend it by some such correction. Not that
 this was the use it was put to: for many did not regard the benefit of
 their respective communities, but made the ostracism a weapon in the
 hand of sedition.
 
 It is evident, then, that in corrupt governments it is partly just and
 useful to the individual, though probably it is as clear that it is not
 entirely just: for in a well-governed state there may be great doubts
 about the use of it, not on account of the pre-eminence which one may
 have in strength, riches, or connection: but when the pre-eminence is
 virtue, what then is to be done? for it seems not right to turn out and
 banish such a one; neither does it seem right to govern him, for that
 would be like desiring to share the power with Jupiter and to govern
 him: nothing then remains but what indeed seems natural, and that is for
 all persons quietly to submit to the government of those who are thus
 eminently virtuous, and let them be perpetually kings in the separate
 states.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIV
 
 
 What has been now said, it seems proper to change our subject and to
 inquire into the nature of monarchies; for we have already admitted them
 to be one of those species of government which are properly founded. And
 here let us consider whether a kingly government is proper for a city or
 a country whose principal object is the happiness of the inhabitants,
 or rather some other. But let us first determine whether this is of one
 kind only, or more; [1285a] and it is easy to know that it consists of
 many different species, and that the forms of government are not the
 same in all: for at Sparta the kingly power seems chiefly regulated by
 the laws; for it is not supreme in all circumstances; but when the king
 quits the territories of the state he is their general in war; and all
 religious affairs are entrusted to him: indeed the kingly power with
 them is chiefly that of a general who cannot be called to an account for
 his conduct, and whose command is for life: for he has not the power
 of life and death, except as a general; as they frequently had in
 their expeditions by martial law, which we learn from Homer; for when
 Agamemnon is affronted in council, he restrains his resentment, but when
 he is in the field and armed with this power, he tells the Greeks:
 
   "Whoe'er I know shall shun th' impending fight,
    To dogs and vultures soon shall be a prey; For death is mine...."
 
 This, then, is one species of monarchical government in which the kingly
 power is in a general for life; and is sometimes hereditary, sometimes
 elective: besides, there is also another, which is to be met with among
 some of the barbarians, in which the kings are invested with powers
 nearly equal to a tyranny, yet are, in some respects, bound by the laws
 and the customs of their country; for as the barbarians are by nature
 more prone to slavery than the Greeks, and those in Asia more than those
 in Europe, they endure without murmuring a despotic government; for
 this reason their governments are tyrannies; but yet not liable to be
 overthrown, as being customary and according to law. Their guards also
 are such as are used in a kingly government, not a despotic one; for the
 guards of their kings are his citizens, but a tyrant's are foreigners.
 The one commands, in the manner the law directs, those who willingly
 obey; the other, arbitrarily, those who consent not. The one, therefore,
 is guarded by the citizens, the other against them.
 
 These, then, are the two different sorts of these monarchies, and
 another is that which in ancient Greece they called _aesumnetes_; which
 is nothing more than an elective tyranny; and its difference from that
 which is to be found amongst the barbarians consists not in its not
 being according to law, but only in its not being according to the
 ancient customs of the country. Some persons possessed this power for
 life, others only for a particular time or particular purpose, as the
 people of Mitylene elected Pittacus to oppose the exiles, who were
 headed by Antimenides and Alcaeus the poet, as we learn from a poem
 of his; for he upbraids the Mitylenians for having chosen Pittacus for
 their tyrant, and with one [1285b] voice extolling him to the skies who
 was the ruin of a rash and devoted people. These sorts of government
 then are, and ever were, despotic, on account of their being tyrannies;
 but inasmuch as they are elective, and over a free people, they are also
 kingly.
 
 A fourth species of kingly government is that which was in use in the
 heroic times, when a free people submitted to a kingly government,
 according to the laws and customs of their country. For those who were
 at first of benefit to mankind, either in arts or arms, or by collecting
 them into civil society, or procuring them an establishment, became the
 kings of a willing people, and established an hereditary monarchy.
 They were particularly their generals in war, and presided over their
 sacrifices, excepting such only as belonged to the priests: they were
 also the supreme judges over the people; and in this case some of them
 took an oath, others did not; they did, the form of swearing was by
 their sceptre held out.
 
 In ancient times the power of the kings extended to everything
 whatsoever, both civil, domestic, and foreign; but in after-times they
 relinquished some of their privileges, and others the people assumed, so
 that, in some states, they left their kings only the right of presiding
 over the sacrifices; and even those whom it were worth while to call
 by that name had only the right of being commander-in-chief in their
 foreign wars.
 
 These, then, are the four sorts of kingdoms: the first is that of the
 heroic times; which was a government over a free people, with its rights
 in some particulars marked out; for the king was their general, their
 judge, and their high priest. The second, that of the barbarians; which
 is an hereditary despotic government regulated by laws: the third is
 that which they call aesumnetic, which is an elective tyranny. The
 fourth is the Lacedaemonian; and this, in few words, is nothing more
 than an hereditary generalship: and in these particulars they differ
 from each other. There is a fifth species of kingly government, which is
 when one person has a supreme power over all things whatsoever, in
 the manner that every state and every city has over those things which
 belong to the public: for as the master of a family is king in his own
 house, so such a king is master of a family in his own city or state.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XV
 
 
 But the different sorts of kingly governments may, if I may so say,
 be reduced to two; which we will consider more particularly. The last
 spoken of, and the Lacedaemonian, for the chief of the others are placed
 between these, which are as it were at the extremities, they having less
 power than an absolute government, and yet more than the Lacedaemonians;
 so that the whole matter in question may be reduced to these two points;
 the one is, whether it is advantageous to the citizens to have the
 office of general continue in one person for life, and whether it should
 be confined to any particular families or whether every one should be
 eligible: the other, whether [1286a] it is advantageous for one person
 to have the supreme power over everything or not. But to enter into the
 particulars concerning the office of a Lacedaemonian general would be
 rather to frame laws for a state than to consider the nature and utility
 of its constitution, since we know that the appointing of a general is
 what is done in every state. Passing over this question then, we will
 proceed to consider the other part of their government, which is
 the polity of the state; and this it will be necessary to examine
 particularly into, and to go through such questions as may arise.
 
 Now the first thing which presents itself to our consideration is this,
 whether it is best to be governed by a good man, or by good laws? Those
 who prefer a kingly government think that laws can only speak a general
 language, but cannot adapt themselves to particular circumstances; for
 which reason it is absurd in any science to follow written rule; and
 even in Egypt the physician was allowed to alter the mode of cure which
 the law prescribed to him, after the fourth day; but if he did it sooner
 it was at his own peril: from whence it is evident, on the very same
 account, that a government of written laws is not the best; and yet
 general reasoning is necessary to all those who are to govern, and it
 will be much more perfect in those who are entirely free from passions
 than in those to whom they are natural. But now this is a quality which
 laws possess; while the other is natural to the human soul. But some
 one will say in answer to this, that man will be a better judge of
 particulars. It will be necessary, then, for a king to be a lawgiver,
 and that his laws should be published, but that those should have no
 authority which are absurd, as those which are not, should. But whether
 is it better for the community that those things which cannot possibly
 come under the cognisance of the law either at all or properly should be
 under the government of every worthy citizen, as the present method is,
 when the public community, in their general assemblies, act as judges
 and counsellors, where all their determinations are upon particular
 cases, for one individual, be he who he will, will be found, upon
 comparison, inferior to a whole people taken collectively: but this
 is what a city is, as a public entertainment is better than one man's
 portion: for this reason the multitude judge of many things better than
 any one single person. They are also less liable to corruption from
 their numbers, as water is from its quantity: besides, the judgment of
 an individual must necessarily be perverted if he is overcome by anger
 or any other passion; but it would be hard indeed if the whole community
 should be misled by anger. Moreover, let the people be free, and they
 will do nothing but in conformity to the law, except only in those cases
 which the law cannot speak to. But though what I am going to propose may
 not easily be met with, yet if the majority of the state should happen
 to be good men, should they prefer one uncorrupt governor or many
 equally good, is it not evident that they should choose the many? But
 there may be divisions among [1286b] these which cannot happen when
 there is but one. In answer to this it may be replied that all their
 souls will be as much animated with virtue as this one man's.
 
 If then a government of many, and all of them good men, compose an
 aristocracy, and the government of one a kingly power, it is evident
 that the people should rather choose the first than the last; and this
 whether the state is powerful or not, if many such persons so alike
 can be met with: and for this reason probable it was, that the first
 governments were generally monarchies; because it was difficult to find
 a number of persons eminently virtuous, more particularly as the world
 was then divided into small communities; besides, kings were appointed
 in return for the benefits they had conferred on mankind; but such
 actions are peculiar to good men: but when many persons equal in virtue
 appeared at the time, they brooked not a superiority, but sought after
 an equality and established a free state; but after this, when they
 degenerated, they made a property of the public; which probably gave
 rise to oligarchies; for they made wealth meritorious, and the honours
 of government were reserved for the rich: and these afterwards turned
 to tyrannies and these in their turn gave rise to democracies; for
 the power of the tyrants continually decreasing, on account of their
 rapacious avarice, the people grew powerful enough to frame and
 establish democracies: and as cities after that happened to increase,
 probably it was not easy for them to be under any other government than
 a democracy. But if any person prefers a kingly government in a state,
 what is to be done with the king's children? Is the family also to
 reign? But should they have such children as some persons usually have,
 it will be very detrimental. It may be said, that then the king who
 has it in his power will never permit such children to succeed to his
 kingdom. But it is not easy to trust to that; for it is very hard and
 requires greater virtue than is to be met with in human nature. There is
 also a doubt concerning the power with which a king should be entrusted:
 whether he should be allowed force sufficient to compel those who do
 not choose to be obedient to the laws, and how he is to support his
 government? for if he is to govern according to law and do nothing of
 his own will which is contrary thereunto, at the same time it will
 be necessary to protect that power with which he guards the law, This
 matter however may not be very difficult to determine; for he ought to
 have a proper power, and such a one is that which will be sufficient
 to make the king superior to any one person or even a large part of the
 community, but inferior to the whole, as the ancients always appointed
 guards for that person whom they created aesumnetes or tyrant; and some
 one advised the Syracusians, when Dionysius asked for guards, to allow
 him such.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVI
 
 
 [1287a] We will next consider the absolute monarch that we have just
 mentioned, who does everything according to his own will: for a king
 governing under the direction of laws which he is obliged to follow does
 not of himself create any particular species of government, as we have
 already said: for in every state whatsoever, either aristocracy or
 democracy, it is easy to appoint a general for life; and there are many
 who entrust the administration of affairs to one person only; such is
 the government at Dyrrachium, and nearly the same at Opus. As for an
 absolute monarchy as it is called, that is to say, when the whole state
 is wholly subject to the will of one person, namely the king, it seems
 to many that it is unnatural that one man should have the entire rule
 over his fellow-citizens when the state consists of equals: for nature
 requires that the same right and the same rank should necessarily take
 place amongst all those who are equal by nature: for as it would be
 hurtful to the body for those who are of different constitutions to
 observe the same regimen, either of diet or clothing, so is it with
 respect to the honours of the state as hurtful, that those who are equal
 in merit should be unequal in rank; for which reason it is as much
 a man's duty to submit to command as to assume it, and this also by
 rotation; for this is law, for order is law; and it is more proper that
 law should govern than any one of the citizens: upon the same principle,
 if it is advantageous to place the supreme power in some particular
 persons, they should be appointed to be only guardians, and the servants
 of the laws, for the supreme power must be placed somewhere; but they
 say, that it is unjust that where all are equal one person should
 continually enjoy it. But it seems unlikely that man should be able to
 adjust that which the law cannot determine; it may be replied, that the
 law having laid down the best rules possible, leaves the adjustment and
 application of particulars to the discretion of the magistrate; besides,
 it allows anything to be altered which experience proves may be better
 established. Moreover, he who would place the supreme power in mind,
 would place it in God and the laws; but he who entrusts man with it,
 gives it to a wild beast, for such his appetites sometimes make him; for
 passion influences those who are in power, even the very best of men:
 for which reason law is reason without desire.
 
 The instance taken from the arts seems fallacious: wherein it is said to
 be wrong for a sick person to apply for a remedy to books, but that it
 would be far more eligible to employ those who are skilful in physic;
 for these do nothing contrary to reason from motives of friendship
 but earn their money by curing the sick, whereas those who have the
 management of public affairs do many things through hatred or favour.
 And, as a proof of what we have advanced, it may be observed, that
 whenever a sick person suspects that his physician has been persuaded by
 his enemies to be guilty of any foul practice to him in his profession,
 he then rather chooses to apply to books for his cure: and not only this
 [1287b] but even physicians themselves when they are ill call in other
 physicians: and those who teach others the gymnastic exercises,
 exercise with those of the same profession, as being incapable from
 self-partiality to form a proper judgment of what concerns themselves.
 From whence it is evident, that those who seek for what is just, seek
 for a mean; now law is a mean. Moreover; the moral law is far superior
 and conversant with far superior objects than the written law; for the
 supreme magistrate is safer to be trusted to than the one, though he is
 inferior to the other. But as it is impossible that one person should
 have an eye to everything himself, it will be necessary that the supreme
 magistrate should employ several subordinate ones under him; why then
 should not this be done at first, instead of appointing one person in
 this manner? Besides, if, according to what has been already said, the
 man of worth is on that account fit to govern, two men of worth are
 certainly better than one: as, for instance, in Homer, "Let two together
 go:" and also Agamemnon's wish; "Were ten such faithful counsel mine!"
 Not but that there are even now some particular magistrates invested
 with supreme power to decide, as judges, those things which the law
 cannot, as being one of those cases which comes not properly under its
 jurisdiction; for of those which can there is no doubt: since then laws
 comprehend some things, but not all, it is necessary to enquire and
 consider which of the two is preferable, that the best man or the best
 law should govern; for to reduce every subject which can come under the
 deliberation of man into a law is impossible.
 
 No one then denies, that it is necessary that there should be some
 person to decide those cases which cannot come under the cognisance of
 a written law: but we say, that it is better to have many than one;
 for though every one who decides according to the principles of the law
 decides justly; yet surely it seems absurd to suppose, that one person
 can see better with two eyes, and hear better with two ears, or do
 better with two hands and two feet, than many can do with many: for we
 see that absolute monarchs now furnish themselves with many eyes and
 ears and hands and feet; for they entrust those who are friends to
 them and their government with part of their power; for if they are not
 friends to the monarch, they will not do what he chooses; but if they
 are friends to him, they are friends also to his government: but a
 friend is an equal and like his friend: if then he thinks that such
 should govern, he thinks that his equal also should govern. These are
 nearly the objections which are usually made to a kingly power.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVII
 
 
 Probably what we have said may be true of some persons, but not of
 others; for some men are by nature formed to be under the government of
 a master; others, of a king; others, to be the citizens of a free state,
 just and useful; but a tyranny is not according to nature, nor the other
 perverted forms of government; for they are contrary to it. But it
 is evident from what has been said, that among equals it is neither
 advantageous nor [1288a] right that one person should be lord over all
 where there are no established laws, but his will is the law; or where
 there are; nor is it right that one who is good should have it over
 those who are good; or one who is not good over those who are not good;
 nor one who is superior to the rest in worth, except in a particular
 manner, which shall be described, though indeed it has been already
 mentioned. But let us next determine what people are best qualified
 for a kingly government, what for an aristocratic, and what for a
 democratic. And, first, for a kingly; and it should be those who are
 accustomed by nature to submit the civil government of themselves to a
 family eminent for virtue: for an aristocracy, those who are naturally
 framed to bear the rule of free men, whose superior virtue makes them
 worthy of the management of others: for a free state, a war-like people,
 formed by nature both to govern and be governed by laws which admit the
 poorest citizen to share the honours of the commonwealth according
 to his worth. But whenever a whole family or any one of another shall
 happen so far to excel in virtue as to exceed all other persons in the
 community, then it is right that the kingly power should be in them, or
 if it is an individual who does so, that he should be king and lord of
 all; for this, as we have just mentioned, is not only correspondent
 to that principle of right which all founders of all states, whether
 aristocracies, oligarchies, or democracies, have a regard to (for
 in placing the supreme power they all think it right to fix it to
 excellence, though not the same); but it is also agreeable to what
 has been already said; as it would not be right to kill, or banish, or
 ostracise such a one for his superior merit. Nor would it be proper
 to let him have the supreme power only in turn; for it is contrary to
 nature that what is highest should ever be lowest: but this would be
 the case should such a one ever be governed by others. So that there can
 nothing else be done but to submit, and permit him continually to
 enjoy the supreme power. And thus much with respect to kingly power in
 different states, and whether it is or is not advantageous to them, and
 to what, and in what manner.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVIII
 
 
 Since then we have said that there are three sorts of regular
 governments, and of these the best must necessarily be that which is
 administered by the best men (and this must be that which happens to
 have one man, or one family, or a number of persons excelling all the
 rest in virtue, who are able to govern and be governed in such a manner
 as will make life most agreeable, and we have already shown that the
 virtue of a good man and of a citizen in the most perfect government
 will be the same), it is evident, that in the same manner, and for those
 very qualities which would procure a man the character of good, any
 one would say, that the government of a state was a well-established
 aristocracy or kingdom; so that it will be found to be education and
 [1288b] morals that are almost the whole which go to make a good man,
 and the same qualities will make a good citizen or good king.
 
 These particulars being treated of, we will now proceed to consider
 what sort of government is best, how it naturally arises, and how it
 is established; for it is necessary to make a proper inquiry concerning
 this.
 
 
 
 
 BOOK IV
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I
 
 
 In every art and science which is not conversant in parts but in some
 one genus in which it is complete, it is the business of that art alone
 to determine what is fitted to its particular genus; as what particular
 exercise is fitted to a certain particular body, and suits it best: for
 that body which is formed by nature the most perfect and superior to
 others necessarily requires the best exercise-and also of what one kind
 that must be which will suit the generality; and this is the business of
 the gymnastic arts: and although any one should not desire to acquire
 an exact knowledge and skill in these exercises, yet it is not, on that
 account, the less necessary that he who professes to be a master and
 instruct the youth in them should be perfect therein: and we see that
 this is what equally befalls the healing, shipbuilding, cloth-making,
 and indeed all other arts; so that it evidently belongs to the same art
 to find out what kind of government is best, and would of all others be
 most correspondent to our wish, while it received no molestation from
 without: and what particular species of it is adapted to particular
 persons; for there are many who probably are incapable of enjoying the
 best form: so that the legislator, and he who is truly a politician,
 ought to be acquainted not only with that which is most perfect
 imaginable, but also that which is the best suited to any given
 circumstances. There is, moreover, a third sort, an imaginary one, and
 he ought, if such a one should be presented to his consideration, to be
 able to discern what sort of one it would be at the beginning; and, when
 once established, what would be the proper means to preserve it a long
 time. I mean, for instance, if a state should happen not to have the
 best form of government, or be deficient in what was necessary, or not
 receive every advantage possible, but something less. And, besides all
 this, it is necessary to know what sort of government is best fitting
 for all cities: for most of those writers who have treated this subject,
 however speciously they may handle other parts of it, have failed in
 describing the practical parts: for it is not enough to be able to
 perceive what is best without it is what can be put in practice. It
 should also be simple, and easy for all to attain to. But some seek only
 the most subtile forms of government. Others again, choosing [1289a]
 rather to treat of what is common, censure those under which they live,
 and extol the excellence of a particular state, as the Lacedaemonian,
 or some other: but every legislator ought to establish such a form of
 government as from the present state and disposition of the people who
 are to receive it they will most readily submit to and persuade the
 community to partake of: for it is not a business of less trouble to
 correct the mistakes of an established government than to form a new
 one; as it is as difficult to recover what we have forgot as to learn
 anything afresh. He, therefore, who aspires to the character of a
 legislator, ought, besides all we have already said, to be able to
 correct the mistakes of a government already established, as we have
 before mentioned. But this is impossible to be done by him who does
 not know how many different forms of government there are: some persons
 think that there is only one species both of democracy and oligarchy;
 but this is not true: so that every one should be acquainted with the
 difference of these governments, how great they are, and whence they
 arise; and should have equal knowledge to perceive what laws are best,
 and what are most suitable to each particular government: for all
 laws are, and ought to be, framed agreeable to the state that is to be
 governed by them, and not the state to the laws: for government is a
 certain ordering in a state which particularly respects the magistrates
 in what manner they shall be regulated, and where the supreme power
 shall be placed; and what shall be the final object which each community
 shall have in view; but the laws are something different from what
 regulates and expresses the form of the constitution-it is their office
 to direct the conduct of the magistrate in the execution of his office
 and the punishment of offenders. From whence it is evident, that the
 founders of laws should attend both to the number and the different
 sorts of government; for it is impossible that the same laws should be
 calculated for all sorts of oligarchies and all sorts of democracies,
 for of both these governments there are many species, not one only.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II
 
 
 Since, then, according to our first method in treating of the different
 forms of government, we have divided those which are regular into three
 sorts, the kingly, the aristocratical, the free states, and shown
 the three excesses which these are liable to: the kingly, of becoming
 tyrannical; the aristocratical, oligarchical; and the free state,
 democratical: and as we have already treated of the aristocratical and
 kingly; for to enter into an inquiry what sort of government is best
 is the same thing as to treat of these two expressly; for each of
 them desires to be established upon the principles of virtue: and as,
 moreover, we have already determined wherein a kingly power and an
 aristocracy differ from each other, and when a state may be said to be
 governed by a king, it now remains that we examine into a free state,
 and also these other governments, an oligarchy, a democracy, and a
 [1289b] tyranny; and it is evident of these three excesses which must be
 the worst of all, and which next to it; for, of course, the excesses of
 the best and most holy must be the worst; for it must necessarily happen
 either that the name of king only will remain, or else that the king
 will assume more power than belongs to him, from whence tyranny will
 arise, the worst excess imaginable, a government the most contrary
 possible to a free state. The excess next hurtful is an oligarchy; for
 an aristocracy differs much from this sort of government: that which is
 least so is a democracy. This subject has been already treated of by one
 of those writers who have gone before me, though his sentiments are not
 the same as mine: for he thought, that of all excellent constitutions,
 as a good oligarchy or the like, a democracy was the worst, but of all
 bad ones, the best.
 
 Now I affirm, that all these states have, without exception, fallen into
 excess; and also that he should not have said that one oligarchy was
 better than another, but that it was not quite so bad. But this question
 we shall not enter into at present. We shall first inquire how many
 different sorts of free states there are; since there are many
 species of democracies and oligarchies; and which of them is the most
 comprehensive, and most desirable after the best form of government; or
 if there is any other like an aristocracy, well established; and also
 which of these is best adapted to most cities, and which of them is
 preferable for particular persons: for, probably, some may suit better
 with an oligarchy than a democracy, and others better with a democracy
 than an oligarchy; and afterwards in what manner any one ought to
 proceed who desires to establish either of these states, I mean every
 species of democracy, and also of oligarchy. And to conclude, when we
 shall have briefly gone through everything that is necessary, we will
 endeavour to point out the sources of corruption, and stability, in
 government, as well those which are common to all as those which are
 peculiar to each state, and from what causes they chiefly arise.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III
 
 
 The reason for there being many different sorts of governments is this,
 that each state consists of a great number of parts; for, in the first
 place, we see that all cities are made up of families: and again, of
 the multitude of these some must be rich, some poor, and others in the
 middle station; and that, both of the rich and poor, some will be used
 to arms, others not. We see also, that some of the common people are
 husbandmen, others attend the market, and others are artificers. There
 is also a difference between the nobles in their wealth, and the dignity
 in which they live: for instance, in the number of horses they breed;
 for this cannot be supported without a large fortune: for which reason,
 in former times, those cities whose strength consisted in horse became
 by that means oligarchies; and they used horse in their expeditions
 against the neighbouring cities; as the Eretrians the Chalcidians, the
 Magnetians, who lived near the river Meander, and many others in Asia.
 Moreover, besides the difference of fortune, there is that which arises
 from family and merit; or, if there are any other distinctions [1290a]
 which make part of the city, they have been already mentioned in
 treating of an aristocracy, for there we considered how many parts each
 city must necessarily be composed of; and sometimes each of these have a
 share in the government, sometimes a few, sometimes more.
 
 It is evident then, that there must be many forms of government,
 differing from each other in their particular constitution: for the
 parts of which they are composed each differ from the other. For
 government is the ordering of the magistracies of the state; and these
 the community share between themselves, either as they can attain them
 by force, or according to some common equality which there is amongst
 them, as poverty, wealth, or something which they both partake of. There
 must therefore necessarily be as many different forms of governments as
 there are different ranks in the society, arising from the superiority
 of some over others, and their different situations. And these seem
 chiefly to be two, as they say, of the winds: namely, the north and
 the south; and all the others are declinations from these. And thus in
 politics, there is the government of the many and the government of
 the few; or a democracy and an oligarchy: for an aristocracy may be
 considered as a species of oligarchy, as being also a government of the
 few; and what we call a free state may be considered as a democracy: as
 in the winds they consider the west as part of the north, and the east
 as part of the south: and thus it is in music, according to some, who
 say there are only two species of it, the Doric and the Phrygian, and
 all other species of composition they call after one of these names; and
 many people are accustomed to consider the nature of government in the
 same light; but it is both more convenient and more correspondent to
 truth to distinguish governments as I have done, into two species: one,
 of those which are established upon proper principles; of which there
 may be one or two sorts: the other, which includes all the different
 excesses of these; so that we may compare the best form of government to
 the most harmonious piece of music; the oligarchic and despotic to the
 more violent tunes; and the democratic to the soft and gentle airs.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV
 
 
 We ought not to define a democracy as some do, who say simply, that it
 is a government where the supreme power is lodged in the people; for
 even in oligarchies the supreme power is in the majority. Nor should
 they define an oligarchy a government where the supreme power is in the
 hands of a few: for let us suppose the number of a people to be thirteen
 hundred, and that of these one thousand were rich, who would not permit
 the three hundred poor to have any share in the government, although
 they were free, and their equal in everything else; no one would say,
 that this government was a democracy. In like manner, if the poor, when
 few in number, should acquire the power over the rich, though more than
 themselves, no one would say, that this was an oligarchy; nor this, when
 the rest who are rich have no share in the administration. We should
 rather say, that a democracy is when the supreme power is in the [1290b]
 hands of the freemen; an oligarchy, when it is in the hands of the rich:
 it happens indeed that in the one case the many will possess it, in
 the other the few; because there are many poor and few rich. And if the
 power of the state was to be distributed according to the size of the
 citizens, as they say it is in Ethiopia, or according to their beauty,
 it would be an oligarchy: for the number of those who are large and
 beautiful is small.
 
 Nor are those things which we have already mentioned alone sufficient
 to describe these states; for since there are many species both of a
 democracy and an oligarchy, the matter requires further consideration;
 as we cannot admit, that if a few persons who are free possess the
 supreme power over the many who are not free, that this government is a
 democracy: as in Apollonia, in Ionia, and in Thera: for in each of these
 cities the honours of the state belong to some few particular families,
 who first founded the colonies. Nor would the rich, because they are
 superior in numbers, form a democracy, as formerly at Colophon; for
 there the majority had large possessions before the Lydian war: but a
 democracy is a state where the freemen and the poor, being the majority,
 are invested with the power of the state. An oligarchy is a state where
 the rich and those of noble families, being few, possess it.
 
 We have now proved that there are various forms of government and have
 assigned a reason for it; and shall proceed to show that there are
 even more than these, and what they are, and why; setting out with the
 principle we have already laid down. We admit that every city consists
 not of one, but many parts: thus, if we should endeavour to comprehend
 the different species of animals we should first of all note those parts
 which every animal must have, as a certain sensorium, and also what is
 necessary to acquire and retain food, as a mouth and a belly; besides
 certain parts to enable it to move from place to place. If, then, these
 are the only parts of an animal and there are differences between them;
 namely, in their various sorts of stomachs, bellies, and sensoriums: to
 which we must add their motive powers; the number of the combinations of
 all these must necessarily make up the different species of animals.
 For it is not possible that the same kind of animal should have any
 very great difference in its mouth or ears; so that when all these are
 collected, who happen to have these things similar in all, they make up
 a species of animals of which there are as many as there are of these
 general combinations of necessary parts.
 
 The same thing is true of what are called states; for a city is not made
 of one but many parts, as has already been often said; one of which is
 those who supply it with provisions, called husbandmen, another called
 mechanics, [1291a] whose employment is in the manual arts, without which
 the city could not be inhabited; of these some are busied about what is
 absolutely necessary, others in what contribute to the elegancies and
 pleasures of life; the third sort are your exchange-men, I mean by these
 your buyers, sellers, merchants, and victuallers; the fourth are your
 hired labourers or workmen; the fifth are the men-at-arms, a rank not
 less useful than the other, without you would have the community slaves
 to every invader; but what cannot defend itself is unworthy of the name
 of a city; for a city is self-sufficient, a slave not. So that when
 Socrates, in Plato's Republic, says that a city is necessarily composed
 of four sorts of people, he speaks elegantly but not correctly, and
 these are, according to him, weavers, husbandmen, shoe-makers, and
 builders; he then adds, as if these were not sufficient, smiths,
 herdsmen for what cattle are necessary, and also merchants and
 victuallers, and these are by way of appendix to his first list; as if
 a city was established for necessity, and not happiness, or as if a
 shoe-maker and a husbandman were equally useful. He reckons not the
 military a part before the increase of territory and joining to the
 borders of the neighbouring powers will make war necessary: and even
 amongst them who compose his four divisions, or whoever have any
 connection with each other, it will be necessary to have some one to
 distribute justice, and determine between man and man. If, then, the
 mind is a more valuable part of man than the body, every one would
 wish to have those things more regarded in his city which tend to the
 advantage of these than common matters, such are war and justice; to
 which may be added council, which is the business of civil wisdom (nor
 is it of any consequence whether these different employments are filled
 by different persons or one, as the same man is oftentimes both a
 soldier and a husbandman): so that if both the judge and the senator are
 parts of the city, it necessarily follows that the soldier must be
 so also. The seventh sort are those who serve the public in expensive
 employments at their own charge: these are called the rich. The eighth
 are those who execute the different offices of the state, and without
 these it could not possibly subsist: it is therefore necessary that
 there should be some persons capable of governing and filling the places
 in the city; and this either for life or in rotation: the office of
 senator, and judge, of which we have already sufficiently treated, are
 the only ones remaining. If, then, these things are necessary for a
 state, that it may be happy and just, it follows that the citizens who
 engage in public affairs should be men of abilities therein. [1291b]
 Several persons think, that different employments may be allotted to the
 same person; as a soldier's, a husbandman's, and an artificer's; as also
 that others may be both senators and judges.
 
 Besides, every one supposes himself a man of political abilities, and
 that he is qualified for almost every department in the state. But the
 same person cannot at once be poor and rich: for which reason the most
 obvious division of the city is into two parts, the poor and rich;
 moreover, since for the generality the one are few, the other many, they
 seem of all the parts of a city most contrary to each other; so that as
 the one or the other prevail they form different states; and these are
 the democracy and the oligarchy.
 
 But that there are many different states, and from what causes they
 arise, has been already mentioned: and that there are also different
 species both of democracies and oligarchies we will now show. Though
 this indeed is evident from what we have already said: there are also
 many different sorts of common people, and also of those who are
 called gentlemen. Of the different sorts of the first are husbandmen,
 artificers, exchange-men, who are employed in buying and selling,
 seamen, of which some are engaged in war, some in traffic, some in
 carrying goods and passengers from place to place, others in fishing,
 and of each of these there are often many, as fishermen at Tarentum and
 Byzantium, masters of galleys at Athens, merchants at AEgina and Chios,
 those who let ships on freight at Tenedos; we may add to these those who
 live by their manual labour and have but little property; so that they
 cannot live without some employ: and also those who are not free-born
 on both sides, and whatever other sort of common people there may be.
 As for gentlemen, they are such as are distinguished either by their
 fortune, their birth, their abilities, or their education, or any
 such-like excellence which is attributed to them.
 
 The most pure democracy is that which is so called principally from that
 equality which prevails in it: for this is what the law in that state
 directs; that the poor shall be in no greater subjection than the rich;
 nor that the supreme power shall be lodged with either of these, but
 that both shall share it. For if liberty and equality, as some persons
 suppose, are chiefly to be found in a democracy, it must be most so
 by every department of government being alike open to all; but as the
 people are the majority, and what they vote is law, it follows that such
 a state must be a democracy. This, then, is one species thereof. Another
 is, when the magistrates are elected by a certain census; but this
 should be but small, and every one who was included in it should be
 eligible, but as soon as he was below it should lose that right. [1292a]
 Another sort is, in which every citizen who is not infamous has a share
 in the government, but where the government is in the laws. Another,
 where every citizen without exception has this right. Another is like
 these in other particulars, but there the people govern, and not the
 law: and this takes place when everything is determined by a majority of
 votes, and not by a law; which happens when the people are influenced by
 the demagogues: for where a democracy is governed by stated laws there
 is no room for them, but men of worth fill the first offices in the
 state: but where the power is not vested in the laws, there demagogues
 abound: for there the people rule with kingly power: the whole composing
 one body; for they are supreme, not as individuals but in their
 collective capacity.
 
 Homer also discommends the government of many; but whether he means this
 we are speaking of, or where each person exercises his power separately,
 is uncertain. When the people possess this power they desire to be
 altogether absolute, that they may not be under the control of the law,
 and this is the time when flatterers are held in repute. Nor is there
 any difference between such a people and monarchs in a tyranny: for
 their manners are the same, and they both hold a despotic power over
 better persons than themselves. For their decrees are like the others'
 edicts; their demagogues like the others' flatterers: but their greatest
 resemblance consists in the mutual support they give to each other, the
 flatterer to the tyrant, the demagogue to the people: and to them it is
 owing that the supreme power is lodged in the votes of the people,
 and not in the laws; for they bring everything before them, as their
 influence is owing to their being supreme whose opinions they entirely
 direct; for these are they whom the multitude obey. Besides, those who
 accuse the magistrates insist upon it, that the right of determining on
 their conduct lies in the people, who gladly receive their complaints as
 the means of destroying all their offices.
 
 Any one, therefore, may with great justice blame such a government as
 being a democracy, and not a free state; for where the government is
 not in the laws, then there is no free state, for the law ought to be
 supreme over all things; and particular incidents which arise should be
 determined by the magistrates or the state. If, therefore, a
 democracy is to be reckoned a free state, it is evident that any such
 establishment which centres all power in the votes of the people cannot,
 properly speaking, be a democracy: for their decrees cannot be general
 in their extent. Thus, then, we may describe the several species of
 democracies.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V
 
 
 Of the different species of oligarchies one is, when the right to the
 offices is regulated by a certain census; so that the poor, although the
 majority, have no share in it; while all those who are included therein
 take part in the management of public affairs. Another sort is, when
 [1292b] the magistrates are men of very small fortune, who upon any
 vacancy do themselves fill it up: and if they do this out of the
 community at large, the state approaches to an aristocracy; if out of
 any particular class of people, it will be an oligarchy. Another sort of
 oligarchy is, when the power is an hereditary nobility. The fourth is,
 when the power is in the same hands as the other, but not under the
 control of law; and this sort of oligarchy exactly corresponds to a
 tyranny in monarchies, and to that particular species of democracies
 which I last mentioned in treating of that state: this has the
 particular name of a dynasty. These are the different sorts of
 oligarchies and democracies.
 
 It should also be known, that it often happens that a free state, where
 the supreme power is in the laws, may not be democratic, and yet in
 consequence of the established manners and customs of the people, may
 be governed as if it was; so, on the other hand, where the laws may
 countenance a more democratic form of government, these may make the
 state inclining to an oligarchy; and this chiefly happens when there
 has been any alteration in the government; for the people do not easily
 change, but love their own ancient customs; and it is by small degrees
 only that one thing takes place of another; so that the ancient laws
 will remain, while the power will be in the hands of those who have
 brought about a revolution in the state.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI
 
 
 It is evident from what has been said, that there are as many different
 sorts of democracies and oligarchies as I have reckoned up: for, of
 necessity, either all ranks of the people which I have enumerated must
 have a share in the government, or some only, and others not; for when
 the husbandmen, and those only who possess moderate fortunes, have the
 supreme power, they will govern according to law; for as they must get
 their livings by their employs, they have but little leisure for public
 business: they will therefore establish proper laws, and never call
 public assemblies but when there is a necessity for them; and they will
 readily let every one partake with them in the administration of public
 affairs as soon as they possess that fortune which the law requires for
 their qualification: every one, therefore, who is qualified will have
 his share in the government: for to exclude any would be to make the
 government an oligarchy, and for all to have leisure to attend
 without they had a subsistence would be impossible: for these reasons,
 therefore, this government is a species of democracy. Another species is
 distinguished by the mode of electing their magistrates, in which every
 one is eligible, to whose birth there are no objections, provided he is
 supposed to have leisure to attend: for which reason in such a democracy
 the supreme power will be vested in the laws, as there will be nothing
 paid to those who go to the public assemblies. A third species is where
 every freeman has a right to a share in the government, which he will
 not accept for the cause already assigned; for which reason here also
 the supreme power will be in the law. The fourth species [1293a] of
 democracy, the last which was established in order of time, arose when
 cities were greatly enlarged to what they were at first, and when the
 public revenue became something considerable; for then the populace, on
 account of their numbers, were admitted to share in the management of
 public affairs, for then even the poorest people were at leisure to
 attend to them, as they received wages for so doing; nay, they were more
 so than others, as they were not hindered by having anything of their
 own to mind, as the rich had; for which reason these last very often did
 not frequent the public assemblies and the courts of justice: thus the
 supreme power was lodged in the poor, and not in the laws. These are
 the different sorts of democracies, and such are the causes which
 necessarily gave birth to them.
 
 The first species of oligarchy is, when the generality of the state are
 men of moderate and not too large property; for this gives them leisure
 for the management of public affairs: and, as they are a numerous body,
 it necessarily follows that the supreme power must be in the laws, and
 not in men; for as they are far removed from a monarchical government,
 and have not sufficient fortune to neglect their private affairs, while
 they are too many to be supported by the public, they will of course
 determine to be governed by the laws, and not by each other. But if the
 men of property in the state are but few, and their property is large,
 then an oligarchy of the second sort will take place; for those who have
 most power will think that they have a right to lord it over the others;
 and, to accomplish this, they will associate to themselves some who have
 an inclination for public affairs, and as they are not powerful enough
 to govern without law, they will make a law for that purpose. And if
 those few who have large fortunes should acquire still greater power,
 the oligarchy will then alter into one of the third sort; for they will
 get all the offices of the state into their own hands by a law which
 directs the son to succeed upon the death of his father; and,
 after that, when, by means of their increasing wealth and powerful
 connections, they extend still further their oppression, a monarchical
 dynasty will directly succeed wherein men will be supreme, and not the
 law; and this is the fourth species of an oligarchy correspondent to the
 last-mentioned class of democracies.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII
 
 
 There are besides two other states, a democracy and an oligarchy, one
 of which all speak of, and it is always esteemed a species of the
 four sorts; and thus they reckon them up; a monarchy, an oligarchy, a
 democracy, and this fourth which they call an aristocracy. There is
 also a fifth, which bears a name that is also common to the other four,
 namely, a state: but as this is seldom to be met with, it has escaped
 those who have endeavoured to enumerate the different sorts of
 governments, which [1293b] they fix at four only, as does Plato in his
 Republic.
 
 An aristocracy, of which I have already treated in the first book, is
 rightly called so; for a state governed by the best men, upon the most
 virtuous principles, and not upon any hypothesis, which even good men
 may propose, has alone a right to be called an aristocracy, for it is
 there only that a man is at once a good man and a good citizen; while in
 other states men are good only relative to those states. Moreover, there
 are some other states which are called by the same name, that differ
 both from oligarchies and free states, wherein not only the rich but
 also the virtuous have a share in the administration; and have therefore
 acquired the name of aristocracies; for in those governments wherein
 virtue is not their common care, there are still men of worth and
 approved goodness. Whatever state, then, like the Carthaginians,
 favours the rich, the virtuous, and the citizens at large, is a sort
 of aristocracy: when only the two latter are held in esteem, as at
 Lacedaemon, and the state is jointly composed of these, it is a virtuous
 democracy. These are the two species of aristocracies after the first,
 which is the best of all governments. There is also a third, which is,
 whenever a free state inclines to the dominion of a few.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII
 
 
 It now remains for us to treat of that government which is particularly
 called a free state, and also of a tyranny; and the reason for my
 choosing to place that free state here is, because this, as well
 as those aristocracies already mentioned, although they do not seem
 excesses, yet, to speak true, they have all departed from what a perfect
 government is. Nay, they are deviations both of them equally from other
 forms, as I said at the beginning. It is proper to mention a tyranny the
 last of all governments, for it is of all others the least like one:
 but as my intention is to treat of all governments in general, for this
 reason that also, as I have said, will be taken into consideration in
 its proper place.
 
 I shall now inquire into a free state and show what it is; and we shall
 the better understand its positive nature as we have already described
 an oligarchy and a democracy; for a free state is indeed nothing more
 than a mixture of them, and it has been usual to call those which
 incline most to a democracy, a free state; those which incline most to
 an oligarchy, an aristocracy, because those who are rich are generally
 men of family and education; besides, they enjoy those things which
 others are often guilty of crimes to procure: for which reason they are
 regarded as men of worth and honour and note.
 
 Since, then, it is the genius of an aristocracy to allot the larger
 part of the government to the best citizens, they therefore say, that
 an oligarchy is chiefly composed of those men who are worthy and
 honourable: now it [1294a] seems impossible that where the government
 is in the hands of the good, there the laws should not be good, but bad;
 or, on the contrary, that where the government is in the hands of the
 bad, there the laws should be good; nor is a government well constituted
 because the laws are, without at the same time care is taken that they
 are observed; for to enforce obedience to the laws which it makes is one
 proof of a good constitution in the state-another is, to have laws well
 calculated for those who are to abide by them; for if they are improper
 they must be obeyed: and this may be done two ways, either by their
 being the best relative to the particular state, or the best absolutely.
 An aristocracy seems most likely to confer the honours of the state on
 the virtuous; for virtue is the object of an aristocracy, riches of an
 oligarchy, and liberty of a democracy; for what is approved of by the
 majority will prevail in all or in each of these three different states;
 and that which seems good to most of those who compose the community
 will prevail: for what is called a state prevails in many communities,
 which aim at a mixture of rich and poor, riches and liberty: as for
 the rich, they are usually supposed to take the place of the worthy and
 honourable. As there are three things which claim an equal rank in the
 state, freedom, riches, and virtue (for as for the fourth, rank, it is
 an attendant on two of the others, for virtue and riches are the origin
 of family), it is evident, that the conjuncture of the rich and the poor
 make up a free state; but that all three tend to an aristocracy more
 than any other, except that which is truly so, which holds the first
 rank.
 
 We have already seen that there are governments different from a
 monarchy, a democracy, and an oligarchy; and what they are, and wherein
 they differ from each other; and also aristocracies and states properly
 so called, which are derived from them; and it is evident that these are
 not much unlike each other.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IX
 
 
 We shall next proceed to show how that government which is peculiarly
 called a state arises alongside of democracy and oligarchy, and how it
 ought to be established; and this will at the same time show what are
 the proper boundaries of both these governments, for we must mark out
 wherein they differ from one another, and then from both these compose
 a state of such parts of each of them as will show from whence they were
 taken.
 
 There are three different ways in which two states may be blended and
 joined together; for, in the first place, all those rules may be adopted
 which the laws of each of them have ordered; as for instance in the
 judicial department, for in an oligarchy the rich are fined if they do
 not come to the court as jurymen, but the poor are not paid for their
 attendance; but in democracies they are, while the rich are not fined
 for their neglect. Now these things, as being common to both, are fit
 to be observed in a free [1294b] state which is composed of both. This,
 then, is one way in which they may be joined together. In the second
 place, a medium may be taken between the different methods which each
 state observes; for instance, in a democracy the right to vote in the
 public assembly is either confined by no census at all, or limited by a
 very small one; in an oligarchy none enjoy it but those whose census is
 high: therefore, as these two practices are contrary to each other, a
 census between each may be established in such a state. In the third
 place, different laws of each community may be adopted; as, for
 instance, as it seems correspondent to the nature of a democracy, that
 the magistrates should be chosen by lot, but an aristocracy by vote, and
 in the one state according to a census, but not in the other: let, then,
 an aristocracy and a free state copy something from each of them; let
 them follow an oligarchy in choosing their magistrates by vote, but a
 democracy in not admitting of any census, and thus blend together the
 different customs of the two governments. But the best proof of a happy
 mixture of a democracy and an oligarchy is this, when a person may
 properly call the same state a democracy and an oligarchy. It is evident
 that those who speak of it in this manner are induced to it because both
 these governments are there well blended together: and indeed this
 is common to all mediums, that the extremes of each side should be
 discerned therein, as at Lacedaemon; for many affirm that it is a
 democracy from the many particulars in which it follows that form of
 government; as for instance, in the first place, in the bringing up of
 their children, for the rich and poor are brought up in the same manner;
 and their education is such that the children of the poor may partake of
 it; and the same rules are observed when they are youths and men, there
 is no distinction between a rich person and a poor one; and in their
 public tables the same provision is served to all. The rich also wear
 only such clothes as the poorest man is able to purchase. Moreover, with
 respect to two magistracies of the highest rank, one they have a right
 to elect to, the other to fill; namely, the senate and the ephori.
 Others consider it as an oligarchy, the principles of which it follows
 in many things, as in choosing all their officers by vote, and not by
 lot; in there being but a few who have a right to sit in judgment on
 capital causes and the like. Indeed, a state which is well composed of
 two others ought to resemble them both, and neither, Such a state ought
 to have its means of preservation in itself, and not without; and when I
 say in itself, I do not mean that it should owe this to the forbearance
 of their neighbours, for this may happen to a bad government, but to
 every member of the community's not being willing that there should be
 the least alteration in their constitution. Such is the method in which
 a free state or aristocracy ought to be established.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER X
 
 
 It now remains to treat of a tyranny; not that there is [1295a] much
 to be said on that subject, but as it makes part of our plan, since
 we enumerated it amongst our different sorts of governments. In the
 beginning of this work we inquired into the nature of kingly government,
 and entered into a particular examination of what was most properly
 called so, and whether it was advantageous to a state or not, and what
 it should be, and how established; and we divided a tyranny into two
 pieces when we were upon this subject, because there is something
 analogous between this and a kingly government, for they are both of
 them established by law; for among some of the barbarians they elect a
 monarch with absolute power, and formerly among the Greeks there were
 some such, whom they called sesumnetes. Now these differ from each
 other; for some possess only kingly power regulated by law, and
 rule those who voluntarily submit to their government; others rule
 despotically according to their own will. There is a third species of
 tyranny, most properly so called, which is the very opposite to kingly
 power; for this is the government of one who rules over his equals and
 superiors without being accountable for his conduct, and whose object is
 his own advantage, and not the advantage of those he governs; for which
 reason he rules by compulsion, for no freemen will ever willingly submit
 to such a government. These are the different species of tyrannies,
 their principles, and their causes.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XI
 
 
 We proceed now to inquire what form of government and what manner
 of life is best for communities in general, not adapting it to that
 superior virtue which is above the reach of the vulgar, or that
 education which every advantage of nature and fortune only can furnish,
 nor to those imaginary plans which may be formed at pleasure; but to
 that mode of life which the greater part of mankind can attain to,
 and that government which most cities may establish: for as to those
 aristocracies which we have now mentioned, they are either too perfect
 for a state to support, or one so nearly alike to that state we now
 going to inquire into, that we shall treat of them both as one.
 
 The opinions which we form upon these subjects must depend upon one
 common principle: for if what I have said in my treatise on Morals is
 true, a happy life must arise from an uninterrupted course of virtue;
 and if virtue consists in a certain medium, the middle life must
 certainly be the happiest; which medium is attainable [1295b] by
 every one. The boundaries of virtue and vice in the state must also
 necessarily be the same as in a private person; for the form of
 government is the life of the city. In every city the people are divided
 into three sorts; the very rich, the very poor, and those who are
 between them. If this is universally admitted, that the mean is best, it
 is evident that even in point of fortune mediocrity is to be preferred;
 for that state is most submissive to reason; for those who are very
 handsome, or very strong, or very noble, or very rich; or, on the
 contrary; those who are very poor, or very weak, or very mean, with
 difficulty obey it; for the one are capricious and greatly flagitious,
 the other rascally and mean, the crimes of each arising from their
 different excesses: nor will they go through the different offices
 of the state; which is detrimental to it: besides, those who excel in
 strength, in riches, or friends, or the like, neither know how nor are
 willing to submit to command: and this begins at home when they are
 boys; for there they are brought up too delicately to be accustomed to
 obey their preceptors: as for the very poor, their general and excessive
 want of what the rich enjoy reduces them to a state too mean: so that
 the one know not how to command, but to be commanded as slaves, the
 others know not how to submit to any command, nor to command themselves
 but with despotic power.
 
 A city composed of such men must therefore consist of slaves and
 masters, not freemen; where one party must hate, and the other
 despise, where there could be no possibility of friendship or political
 community: for community supposes affection; for we do not even on the
 road associate with our enemies. It is also the genius of a city to be
 composed as much as possible of equals; which will be most so when the
 inhabitants are in the middle state: from whence it follows, that that
 city must be best framed which is composed of those whom we say are
 naturally its proper members. It is men of this station also who will be
 best assured of safety and protection; for they will neither covet what
 belongs to others, as the poor do; nor will others covet what is theirs,
 as the poor do what belongs to the rich; and thus, without plotting
 against any one, or having any one plot against them, they will live
 free from danger: for which reason Phocylides wisely wishes for the
 middle state, as being most productive of happiness. It is plain, then,
 that the most perfect political community must be amongst those who are
 in the middle rank, and those states are best instituted wherein these
 are a larger and more respectable part, if possible, than both the
 other; or, if that cannot be, at least than either of them separate;
 so that being thrown into the balance it may prevent either scale from
 preponderating.
 
 It is therefore the greatest happiness which the citizens can enjoy to
 possess a moderate and convenient fortune; for when some possess too
 much, and others nothing at [1296a] all, the government must either be
 in the hands of the meanest rabble or else a pure oligarchy; or, from
 the excesses of both, a tyranny; for this arises from a headstrong
 democracy or an oligarchy, but very seldom when the members of the
 community are nearly on an equality with each other. We will assign a
 reason for this when we come to treat of the alterations which different
 states are likely to undergo. The middle state is therefore best, as
 being least liable to those seditions and insurrections which disturb
 the community; and for the same reason extensive governments are least
 liable to these inconveniences; for there those in a middle state are
 very numerous, whereas in small ones it is easy to pass to the two
 extremes, so as hardly to have any in a medium remaining, but the
 one half rich, the other poor: and from the same principle it is that
 democracies are more firmly established and of longer continuance than
 oligarchies; but even in those when there is a want of a proper number
 of men of middling fortune, the poor extend their power too far, abuses
 arise, and the government is soon at an end.
 
 We ought to consider as a proof of what I now advance, that the best
 lawgivers themselves were those in the middle rank of life, amongst whom
 was Solon, as is evident from his poems, and Lycurgus, for he was not
 a king, and Charondas, and indeed most others. What has been said will
 show us why of so many free states some have changed to democracies,
 others to oligarchies: for whenever the number of those in the middle
 state has been too small, those who were the more numerous, whether the
 rich or the poor, always overpowered them and assumed to themselves the
 administration of public affairs; from hence arose either a democracy
 or an oligarchy. Moreover, when in consequence of their disputes and
 quarrels with each other, either the rich get the better of the poor, or
 the poor of the rich, neither of them will establish a free state;
 but, as the record of their victory, one which inclines to their own
 principles, and form either a democracy or an oligarchy.
 
 Those who made conquests in Greece, having all of them an eye to the
 respective forms of government in their own cities, established either
 democracies or oligarchies, not considering what was serviceable to the
 state, but what was similar to their own; for which reason a government
 has never been established where the supreme power has been placed
 amongst those of the middling rank, or very seldom; and, amongst a few,
 one man only of those who have yet been conquerors has been persuaded
 to give the preference to this order of [1296b] men: it is indeed an
 established custom with the inhabitants of most cities not to desire an
 equality, but either to aspire to govern, or when they are conquered, to
 submit.
 
 Thus we have shown what the best state is, and why. It will not be
 difficult to perceive of the many states which there are, for we have
 seen that there are various forms both of democracies and oligarchies,
 to which we should give the first place, to which the second, and in
 the same manner the next also; and to observe what are the particular
 excellences and defects of each, after we have first described the best
 possible; for that must be the best which is nearest to this, that worst
 which is most distant from the medium, without any one has a particular
 plan of his own which he judges by. I mean by this, that it may happen,
 that although one form of government may be better than another, yet
 there is no reason to prevent another from being preferable thereunto in
 particular circumstances and for particular purposes.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XII
 
 
 After what has been said, it follows that we should now show what
 particular form of government is most suitable for particular persons;
 first laying this down as a general maxim, that that party which desires
 to support the actual administration of the state ought always to be
 superior to that which would alter it. Every city is made up of quality
 and quantity: by quality I mean liberty, riches, education, and family,
 and by quantity its relative populousness: now it may happen that
 quality may exist in one of those parts of which the city is composed,
 and quantity in another; thus the number of the ignoble may be greater
 than the number of those of family, the number of the poor than that of
 the rich; but not so that the quantity of the one shall overbalance the
 quality of the other; those must be properly adjusted to each other; for
 where the number of the poor exceeds the proportion we have mentioned,
 there a democracy will rise up, and if the husbandry should have
 more power than others, it will be a democracy of husbandmen; and the
 democracy will be a particular species according to that class of
 men which may happen to be most numerous: thus, should these be the
 husbandmen, it will be of these, and the best; if of mechanics and those
 who hire themselves out, the worst possible: in the same manner it may
 be of any other set between these two. But when the rich and the noble
 prevail more by their quality than they are deficient in quantity, there
 an oligarchy ensues; and this oligarchy may be of different species,
 according to the nature of the prevailing party. Every legislator in
 framing his constitution ought to have a particular regard to those in
 the middle rank of life; and if he intends an oligarchy, these should
 be the object of his laws; if a democracy, to these they should be
 entrusted; and whenever their number exceeds that of the two others, or
 at least one of them, they give [1297a] stability to the constitution;
 for there is no fear that the rich and the poor should agree to conspire
 together against them, for neither of these will choose to serve the
 other. If any one would choose to fix the administration on the widest
 basis, he will find none preferable to this; for to rule by turns is
 what the rich and the poor will not submit to, on account of their
 hatred to each other. It is, moreover, allowed that an arbitrator is the
 most proper person for both parties to trust to; now this arbitrator is
 the middle rank.
 
 Those who would establish aristocratical governments are mistaken not
 only in giving too much power to the rich, but also in deceiving the
 common people; for at last, instead of an imaginary good, they must feel
 a real evil, for the encroachments of the rich are more destructive to
 the state than those of the poor.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIII
 
 
 There are five particulars in which, under fair pretences, the rich
 craftily endeavour to undermine the rights of the people, these are
 their public assemblies, their offices of state, their courts of
 justice, their military power, and their gymnastic exercises. With
 respect to their public assemblies, in having them open to all, but in
 fining the rich only, or others very little, for not attending; with
 respect to offices, in permitting the poor to swear off, but not
 granting this indulgence to those who are within the census;
 with respect to their courts of justice, in fining the rich for
 non-attendance, but the poor not at all, or those a great deal, and
 these very little, as was done by the laws of Charondas. In some
 places every citizen who was enrolled had a right to attend the public
 assemblies and to try causes; which if they did not do, a very heavy
 fine was laid upon them; that through fear of the fine they might avoid
 being enrolled, as they were then obliged to do neither the one nor the
 other. The same spirit of legislation prevailed with respect to their
 bearing arms and their gymnastic exercises; for the poor are excused if
 they have no arms, but the rich are fined; the same method takes place
 if they do not attend their gymnastic exercises, there is no penalty on
 one, but there is on the other: the consequence of which is, that the
 fear of this penalty induces the rich to keep the one and attend the
 other, while the poor do neither. These are the deceitful contrivances
 of oligarchical legislators.
 
 The contrary prevails in a democracy; for there they make the poor a
 proper allowance for attending the assemblies and the courts, but give
 the rich nothing for doing it: whence it is evident, that if any one
 would properly blend these customs together, they must extend both the
 pay and the fine to every member of the community, and then every one
 would share in it, whereas part only now do. The citizens of a free
 state ought to [1297b] consist of those only who bear arms: with respect
 to their census it is not easy to determine exactly what it ought to be,
 but the rule that should direct upon this subject should be to make it
 as extensive as possible, so that those who are enrolled in it make up
 a greater part of the people than those who are not; for those who are
 poor, although they partake not of the offices of the state, are willing
 to live quiet, provided that no one disturbs them in their property: but
 this is not an easy matter; for it may not always happen, that those who
 are at the head of public affairs are of a humane behaviour. In time
 of war the poor are accustomed to show no alacrity without they have
 provisions found them; when they have, then indeed they are willing to
 fight.
 
 In some governments the power is vested not only in those who bear arms,
 but also in those who have borne them. Among the Malienses the state was
 composed of these latter only, for all the officers were soldiers who
 had served their time. And the first states in Greece which succeeded
 those where kingly power was established, were governed by the military.
 First of all the horse, for at that time the strength and excellence of
 the army depended on the horse, for as to the heavy-armed foot they were
 useless without proper discipline; but the art of tactics was not known
 to the ancients, for which reason their strength lay in their horse: but
 when cities grew larger, and they depended more on their foot, greater
 numbers partook of the freedom of the city; for which reason what we
 call republics were formerly called democracies. The ancient governments
 were properly oligarchies or kingdoms; for on account of the few persons
 in each state, it would have been impossible to have found a sufficient
 number of the middle rank; so these being but few, and those used to
 subordination, they more easily submitted to be governed.
 
 We have now shown why there are many sorts of governments, and others
 different from those we have treated of: for there are more species of
 democracies than one, and the like is true of other forms, and what are
 their differences, and whence they arise; and also of all others
 which is the best, at least in general; and which is best suited for
 particular people.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIV
 
 
 We will now proceed to make some general reflections upon the
 governments next in order, and also to consider each of them in
 particular; beginning with those principles which appertain to each: now
 there are three things in all states which a careful legislator ought
 well to consider, which are of great consequence to all, and which
 properly attended to the state must necessarily be happy; and according
 to the variation of which the one will differ from the other. The first
 of these is the [1298a] public assembly; the second the officers of the
 state, that is, who they ought to be, and with what power they should be
 entrusted, and in what manner they should be appointed; the third, the
 judicial department.
 
 Now it is the proper business of the public assembly to determine
 concerning war and peace, making or breaking off alliances, to enact
 laws, to sentence to death, banishment, or confiscation of goods, and to
 call the magistrates to account for their behaviour when in office. Now
 these powers must necessarily be entrusted to the citizens in general,
 or all of them to some; either to one magistrate or more; or some to
 one, and some to another, or some to all, but others to some: to entrust
 all to all is in the spirit of a democracy, for the people aim at
 equality. There are many methods of delegating these powers to the
 citizens at large, one of which is to let them execute them by turn, and
 not altogether, as was done by Tellecles, the Milesian, in his state. In
 others the supreme council is composed of the different magistrates,
 and they succeed to the offices of the community by proper divisions of
 tribes, wards, and other very small proportions, till every one in his
 turn goes through them: nor does the whole community ever meet together,
 without it is when new laws are enacted, or some national affair is
 debated, or to hear what the magistrates have to propose to them.
 Another method is for the people to meet in a collective body, but
 only for the purpose of holding the comitia, making laws, determining
 concerning war or peace, and inquiring into the conduct of their
 magistrates, while the remaining part of the public business is
 conducted by the magistrates, who have their separate departments, and
 are chosen out of the whole community either by vote or ballot. Another
 method is for the people in general to meet for the choice of the
 magistrates, and to examine into their conduct; and also to deliberate
 concerning war and alliances, and to leave other things to the
 magistrates, whoever happen to be chosen, whose particular employments
 are such as necessarily require persons well skilled therein. A fourth
 method is for every person to deliberate upon every subject in public
 assembly, where the magistrates can determine nothing of themselves, and
 have only the privilege of giving their opinions first; and this is the
 method of the most pure democracy, which is analogous to the proceedings
 in a dynastic oligarchy and a tyrannic monarchy.
 
 These, then, are the methods in which public business is conducted in a
 democracy. When the power is in the hands of part of the community
 only, it is an oligarchy and this also admits of different customs; for
 whenever the officers of the state are chosen out of those who have a
 moderate fortune, and these from that circumstance are many, and
 when they depart not from that line which the law has laid down, but
 carefully follow it, and when all within the census are eligible,
 certainly it is then an oligarchy, but founded on true principles of
 government [1298b] from its moderation. When the people in general do
 not partake of the deliberative power, but certain persons chosen for
 that purpose, who govern according to law; this also, like the first,
 is an oligarchy. When those who have the deliberative power elect each
 other, and the son succeeds to the father, and when they can supersede
 the laws, such a government is of necessity a strict oligarchy. When
 some persons determine on one thing, and others on another, as war and
 peace, and when all inquire into the conduct of their magistrates, and
 other things are left to different officers, elected either by vote or
 lot, then the government is an aristocracy or a free state. When some
 are chosen by vote and others by lot, and these either from the people
 in general, or from a certain number elected for that purpose, or if
 both the votes and the lots are open to all, such a state is partly an
 aristocracy, partly a free government itself. These are the different
 methods in which the deliberative power is vested in different states,
 all of whom follow some regulation here laid down. It is advantageous to
 a democracy, in the present sense of the word, by which I mean a state
 wherein the people at large have a supreme power, even over the laws, to
 hold frequent public assemblies; and it will be best in this particular
 to imitate the example of oligarchies in their courts of justice; for
 they fine those who are appointed to try causes if they do not attend,
 so should they reward the poor for coming to the public assemblies:
 and their counsels will be best when all advise with each other, the
 citizens with the nobles, the nobles with the citizens. It is also
 advisable when the council is to be composed of part of the citizens, to
 elect, either by vote or lot, an equal number of both ranks. It is also
 proper, if the common people in the state are very numerous, either not
 to pay every one for his attendance, but such a number only as will make
 them equal to the nobles, or to reject many of them by lot.
 
 In an oligarchy they should either call up some of the common people to
 the council, or else establish a court, as is done in some other states,
 whom they call pre-advisers or guardians of the laws, whose business
 should be to propose first what they should afterwards enact. By this
 means the people would have a place in the administration of public
 affairs, without having it in their power to occasion any disorder in
 the government. Moreover, the people may be allowed to have a vote
 in whatever bill is proposed, but may not themselves propose anything
 contrary thereto; or they may give their advice, while the power of
 determining may be with the magistrates only. It is also necessary to
 follow a contrary practice to what is established in democracies,
 for the people should be allowed the power of pardoning, but not
 of condemning, for the cause should be referred back again to the
 magistrates: whereas the contrary takes place in republics; for the
 power of pardoning is with the few, but not of condemning, which is
 always referred [1299a] to the people at large. And thus we determine
 concerning the deliberative power in any state, and in whose hands it
 shall be.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XV
 
 
 We now proceed to consider the choice of magistrates; for this branch of
 public business contains many different Parts, as how many there shall
 be, what shall be their particular office, and with respect to time how
 long each of them shall continue in place; for some make it six months,
 others shorter, others for a year, others for a much longer time; or
 whether they should be perpetual or for a long time, or neither; for
 the same person may fill the same office several times, or he may not be
 allowed to enjoy it even twice, but only once: and also with respect to
 the appointment of magistrates, who are to be eligible, who is to choose
 them, and in what manner; for in all these particulars we ought properly
 to distinguish the different ways which may be followed; and then to
 show which of these is best suited to such and such governments.
 
 Now it is not easy to determine to whom we ought properly to give the
 name of magistrate, for a government requires many persons in office;
 but every one of those who is either chosen by vote or lot is not to be
 reckoned a magistrate. The priests, for instance, in the first place;
 for these are to be considered as very different from civil magistrates:
 to these we may add the choregi and heralds; nay, even ambassadors are
 elected: there are some civil employments which belong to the citizens;
 and these are either when they are all engaged in one thing, as when as
 soldiers they obey their general, or when part of them only are, as in
 governing the women or educating the youth; and also some economic, for
 they often elect corn-meters: others are servile, and in which, if they
 are rich, they employ slaves. But indeed they are most properly called
 magistrates, who are members of the deliberative council, or decide
 causes, or are in some command, the last more especially, for to command
 is peculiar to magistrates. But to speak truth, this question is of
 no great consequence, nor is it the province of the judges to decide
 between those who dispute about words; it may indeed be an object of
 speculative inquiry; but to inquire what officers are necessary in a
 state, and how many, and what, though not most necessary, may yet be
 advantageous in a well-established government, is a much more useful
 employment, and this with respect to all states in general, as well as
 to small cities.
 
 In extensive governments it is proper to allot one employment to one
 person, as there are many to serve the public in so numerous a society,
 where some may be passed over for a long time, and others never be in
 office but once; and indeed everything is better done which has the
 whole attention of one person, than when that [1299b] attention is
 divided amongst many; but in small states it is necessary that a few of
 the citizens should execute many employments; for their numbers are so
 small it will not be convenient to have many of them in office at the
 same time; for where shall we find others to succeed them in turn? Small
 states will sometimes want the same magistrates and the same laws as
 large ones; but the one will not want to employ them so often as the
 other; so that different charges may be intrusted to the same person
 without any inconvenience, for they will not interfere with each
 other, and for want of sufficient members in the community it will be
 necessary. If we could tell how many magistrates are necessary in every
 city, and how many, though not necessary, it is yet proper to have, we
 could then the better know how many different offices one might assign
 to one magistrate. It is also necessary to know what tribunals in
 different places should have different things under their jurisdiction,
 and also what things should always come under the cognisance of the same
 magistrate; as, for instance, decency of manners, shall the clerk of the
 market take cognisance of that if the cause arises in the market, and
 another magistrate in another place, or the same magistrate everywhere:
 or shall there be a distinction made of the fact, or the parties? as,
 for instance, in decency of manners, shall it be one cause when it
 relates to a man, another when it relates to a woman?
 
 In different states shall the magistrates be different or the same?
 I mean, whether in a democracy, an oligarchy, an aristocracy, and a
 monarchy, the same persons shall have the same power? or shall it
 vary according to the different formation of the government? as in an
 aristocracy the offices of the state are allotted to those who are well
 educated; in an oligarchy to those who are rich; in a democracy to the
 freemen? Or shall the magistrates differ as the communities differ?
 For it may happen that the very same may be sometimes proper, sometimes
 otherwise: in this state it may be necessary that the magistrate have
 great powers, in that but small. There are also certain magistrates
 peculiar to certain states--as the pre-advisers are not proper in a
 democracy, but a senate is; for one such order is necessary, whose
 business shall be to consider beforehand and prepare those bills which
 shall be brought before the people that they may have leisure to
 attend to their own affairs; and when these are few in number the state
 inclines to an oligarchy. The pre-advisers indeed must always be few
 for they are peculiar to an oligarchy: and where there are both
 these offices in the same state, the pre-adviser's is superior to
 the senator's, the one having only a democratical power, the other an
 oligarchical: and indeed the [1300a] power of the senate is lost in
 those democracies, in which the people, meeting in one public assembly,
 take all the business into their own hands; and this is likely to happen
 either when the community in general are in easy circumstances, or when
 they are paid for their attendance; for they are then at leisure often
 to meet together and determine everything for themselves. A magistrate
 whose business is to control the manners of the boys, or women, or who
 takes any department similar to this, is to be found in an aristocracy,
 not in a democracy; for who can forbid the wives of the poor from
 appearing in public? neither is such a one to be met with in an
 oligarchy; for the women there are too delicate to bear control. And
 thus much for this subject. Let us endeavour to treat at large of the
 establishment of magistrates, beginning from first principles. Now, they
 differ from each other in three ways, from which, blended together,
 all the varieties which can be imagined arise. The first of these
 differences is in those who appoint the magistrates, the second consists
 in those who are appointed, the third in the mode of appointment; and
 each of these three differ in three manners; for either all the citizens
 may appoint collectively, or some out of their whole body, or some out
 of a particular order in it, according to fortune, family, or virtue, or
 some other rule (as at Megara, where the right of election was amongst
 those who had returned together to their country, and had reinstated
 themselves by force of arms) and this either by vote or lot. Again,
 these several modes may be differently formed together, as some
 magistrates may be chosen by part of the community, others by the whole;
 some out of part, others out of the whole; some by vote, others by lot:
 and each of these different modes admit of a four-fold subdivision; for
 either all may elect all by vote or by lot; and when all elect, they may
 either proceed without any distinction, or they may elect by a certain
 division of tribes, wards, or companies, till they have gone through the
 whole community: and some magistrates may be elected one way, and others
 another. Again, if some magistrates are elected either by vote or lot
 of all the citizens, or by the vote of some and the lot of some, or
 some one way and some another; that is to say, some by the vote of all,
 others by the lot of all, there will then be twelve different methods
 of electing the magistrates, without blending the two together. Of
 these there are two adapted to a democracy; namely, to have all the
 magistrates chosen out of all the people, either by vote or lot, or
 both; that is to say, some of them by lot, some by vote. In a free state
 the whole community should not elect at the same time, but some out of
 the whole, or out of some particular rank; and this either by lot, or
 vote, or both: and they should elect either out of the whole community,
 or out of some particular persons in it, and this both by lot and vote.
 In an oligarchy it is proper to choose some magistrates out of the whole
 body of the citizens, some by vote, some by lot, others by both: by lot
 is most correspondent to that form of government. In a free aristocracy,
 some magistrates [1300b] should be chosen out of the community in
 general, others out of a particular rank, or these by choice, those
 by lot. In a pure oligarchy, the magistrates should be chosen out of
 certain ranks, and by certain persons, and some of those by lot, others
 by both methods; but to choose them out of the whole community is not
 correspondent to the nature of this government. It is proper in an
 aristocracy for the whole community to elect their magistrates out of
 particular persons, and this by vote. These then are all the different
 ways of electing of magistrates; and they have been allotted according
 to the nature of the different communities; but what mode of proceeding
 is proper for different communities, or how the offices ought to be
 established, or with what powers shall be particularly explained. I mean
 by the powers of a magistrate, what should be his particular province,
 as the management of the finances or the laws of the state; for
 different magistrates have different powers, as that of the general of
 the army differs from the clerk of the market.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVI
 
 
 Of the three parts of which a government is formed, we now come to
 consider the judicial; and this also we shall divide in the same manner
 as we did the magisterial, into three parts. Of whom the judges shall
 consist, and for what causes, and how. When I say of whom, I mean
 whether they shall be the whole people, or some particulars; by for what
 causes I mean, how many different courts shall be appointed; by how,
 whether they shall be elected by vote or lot. Let us first determine how
 many different courts there ought to be. Now these are eight. The
 first of these is the court of inspection over the behaviour of the
 magistrates when they have quitted their office; the second is to punish
 those who have injured the public; the third is to take cognisance of
 those causes in which the state is a party; the fourth is to decide
 between magistrates and private persons, who appeal from a fine laid
 upon them; the fifth is to determine disputes which may arise concerning
 contracts of great value; the sixth is to judge between foreigners, and
 of murders, of which there are different species; and these may all be
 tried by the same judges or by different ones; for there are murders
 of malice prepense and of chance-medley; there is also justifiable
 homicide, where the fact is admitted, and the legality of it disputed.
 
 There is also another court called at Athens the Court of Phreattae,
 which determines points relating to a murder committed by one who has
 run away, to decide whether he shall return; though such an affair
 happens but seldom, and in very large cities; the seventh, to determine
 causes wherein strangers are concerned, and this whether they are
 between stranger and stranger or between a stranger and a citizen. The
 eighth and last is for small actions, from one to five drachma's, or a
 little more; for these ought also to be legally determined, but not to
 be brought before the whole body of the judges. But without entering
 into any particulars concerning actions for murder, and those wherein
 strangers are the parties, let us particularly treat of those courts
 which have the jurisdiction of those matters which more particularly
 relate to the affairs of the community and which if not well conducted
 occasion seditions and commotions in the state. Now, of necessity,
 either all persons must have a right to judge of all these different
 causes, appointed for that purpose, either by vote or lot, or all of
 all, some of them by vote, and others by lot, or in some causes by vote,
 in others by lot. Thus there will be four sorts of judges. There [1301a]
 will be just the same number also if they are chosen out of part of the
 people only; for either all the judges must be chosen out of that part
 either by vote or lot, or some by lot and some by vote, or the judges in
 particular causes must be chosen some by vote, others by lot; by which
 means there will be the same number of them also as was mentioned.
 Besides, different judges may be joined together; I mean those who are
 chosen out of the whole people or part of them or both; so that all
 three may sit together in the same court, and this either by vote,
 lot, or both. And thus much for the different sorts of judges. Of these
 appointments that which admits all the community to be judges in all
 causes is most suitable to a democracy; the second, which appoints that
 certain persons shall judge all causes, to an oligarchy; the third,
 which appoints the whole community to be judges in some causes, but
 particular persons in others, to an aristocracy or free state.
 
 
 
 
 BOOK V
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I
 
 
 We have now gone through those particulars we proposed to speak of; it
 remains that we next consider from what causes and how alterations
 in government arise, and of what nature they are, and to what the
 destruction of each state is owing; and also to what form any form of
 polity is most likely to shift into, and what are the means to be
 used for the general preservation of governments, as well as what are
 applicable to any particular state; and also of the remedies which
 are to be applied either to all in general, or to any one considered
 separately, when they are in a state of corruption: and here we ought
 first to lay down this principle, that there are many governments, all
 of which approve of what is just and what is analogically equal; and yet
 have failed from attaining thereunto, as we have already mentioned; thus
 democracies have arisen from supposing that those who are equal in one
 thing are so in every other circumstance; as, because they are equal
 in liberty, they are equal in everything else; and oligarchies, from
 supposing that those who are unequal in one thing are unequal in all;
 that when men are so in point of fortune, that inequality extends to
 everything else. Hence it follows, that those who in some respects are
 equal with others think it right to endeavour to partake of an equality
 with them in everything; and those who are superior to others endeavour
 to get still more; and it is this more which is the inequality: thus
 most states, though they have some notion of what is just, yet are
 almost totally wrong; and, upon this account, when either party has not
 that share in the administration which answers to his expectations, he
 becomes seditious: but those who of all others have the greatest right
 to be so are the last that are; namely, those who excel in virtue;
 for they alone can be called generally superior. There are, too, some
 persons of distinguished families who, because they are so, disdain to
 be on an equality with others, for those esteem themselves noble who
 boast of their ancestors' merit and fortune: these, to speak truth, are
 the origin and fountain from whence seditions arise. The alterations
 which men may propose to make in governments are two; for either they
 may change the state already established into some other, as when
 they propose to erect an oligarchy where there is a democracy; or a
 democracy, or free state, where there is an oligarchy, or an aristocracy
 from these, or those from that; or else, when they have no objection
 to the established government, which they like very well, but choose to
 have the sole management in it themselves; either in the hands of a few
 or one only. They will also raise commotions concerning the degree in
 which they would have the established power; as if, for instance, the
 government is an oligarchy, to have it more purely so, and in the same
 manner if it is a democracy, or else to have it less so; and, in like
 manner, whatever may be the nature of the government, either to extend
 or contract its powers; or else to make some alterations in some parts
 of it; as to establish or abolish a particular magistracy, as some
 persons say Lysander endeavoured to abolish the kingly power in Sparta;
 and Pausanias that of the ephori. Thus in Epidamnus there was an
 alteration in one part of the constitution, for instead of the philarchi
 they established a senate. It is also necessary for all the magistrates
 at Athens; to attend in the court of the Helisea when any new magistrate
 is created: the power of the archon also in that state partakes of the
 nature of an oligarchy: inequality is always the occasion of sedition,
 but not when those who are unequal are treated in a different manner
 correspondent to that inequality. Thus kingly power is unequal when
 exercised over equals. Upon the whole, those who aim after an equality
 are the cause of seditions. Equality is twofold, either in number or
 value. Equality in number is when two things contain the same parts or
 the same quantity; equality in value is by proportion as two exceeds
 one, and three two by the same number-thus by proportion four exceeds
 two, and two one in the same degree, for two is the same part of four
 that one is of two; that is to say, half. Now, all agree in what is
 absolutely and simply just; but, as we have already said they dispute
 concerning proportionate value; for some persons, if they are equal in
 one respect, think themselves equal in all; others, if they are superior
 in one thing, think they may claim the superiority in all; from whence
 chiefly arise two sorts of governments, a democracy and an oligarchy;
 for nobility and virtue are to be found only [1302a] amongst a few;
 the contrary amongst the many; there being in no place a hundred of
 the first to be met with, but enough of the last everywhere. But to
 establish a government entirely upon either of these equalities is
 wrong, and this the example of those so established makes evident,
 for none of them have been stable; and for this reason, that it is
 impossible that whatever is wrong at the first and in its principles
 should not at last meet with a bad end: for which reason in some things
 an equality of numbers ought to take place, in others an equality in
 value. However, a democracy is safer and less liable to sedition than an
 oligarchy; for in this latter it may arise from two causes, for either
 the few in power may conspire against each other or against the
 people; but in a democracy only one; namely, against the few who aim
 at exclusive power; but there is no instance worth speaking of, of
 a sedition of the people against themselves. Moreover, a government
 composed of men of moderate fortunes comes much nearer to a democracy
 than an oligarchy, and is the safest of all such states.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II
 
 
 Since we are inquiring into the causes of seditions and revolutions
 in governments, we must begin entirely with the first principles from
 whence they arise. Now these, so to speak, are nearly three in number;
 which we must first distinguish in general from each other, and
 endeavour to show in what situation people are who begin a sedition;
 and for what causes; and thirdly, what are the beginnings of political
 troubles and mutual quarrels with each other. Now that cause which of
 all others most universally inclines men to desire to bring about a
 change in government is that which I have already mentioned; for those
 who aim at equality will be ever ready for sedition, if they see those
 whom they esteem their equals possess more than they do, as well as
 those also who are not content with equality but aim at superiority, if
 they think that while they deserve more than, they have only equal with,
 or less than, their inferiors. Now, what they aim at may be either just
 or unjust; just, when those who are inferior are seditious, that they
 may be equal; unjust, when those who are equal are so, that they may
 be superior. These, then, are the situations in which men will be
 seditious: the causes for which they will be so are profit and honour;
 and their contrary: for, to avoid dishonour or loss of fortune by
 mulcts, either on their own account or their friends, they will raise
 a commotion in the state. The original causes which dispose men to the
 things which I have mentioned are, taken in one manner, seven in number,
 in another they are more; two of which are the same with those that
 have been already mentioned: but influencing in a different manner;
 for profit and honour sharpen men against each other; not to get the
 possession of them for themselves (which was what I just now supposed),
 but when they see others, some justly, others [1302b] unjustly,
 engrossing them. The other causes are haughtiness, fear, eminence,
 contempt, disproportionate increase in some part of the state. There are
 also other things which in a different manner will occasion revolutions
 in governments; as election intrigues, neglect, want of numbers, a too
 great dissimilarity of circumstances.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III
 
 
 What influence ill-treatment and profit have for this purpose, and how
 they may be the causes of sedition, is almost self-evident; for when the
 magistrates are haughty and endeavour to make greater profits than their
 office gives them, they not only occasion seditions amongst each other,
 but against the state also who gave them their power; and this their
 avarice has two objects, either private property or the property of the
 state. What influence honours have, and how they may occasion sedition,
 is evident enough; for those who are themselves unhonoured while they
 see others honoured, will be ready for any disturbance: and these things
 are done unjustly when any one is either honoured or discarded contrary
 to their deserts, justly when they are according to them. Excessive
 honours are also a cause of sedition when one person or more are greater
 than the state and the power of the government can permit; for then
 a monarchy or a dynasty is usually established: on which account the
 ostracism was introduced in some places, as at Argos and Athens: though
 it is better to guard against such excesses in the founding of a state,
 than when they have been permitted to take place, to correct them
 afterward. Those who have been guilty of crimes will be the cause of
 sedition, through fear of punishment; as will those also who expect an
 injury, that they may prevent it; as was the case at Rhodes, when the
 nobles conspired against the people on account of the decrees they
 expected would pass against them. Contempt also is a cause of sedition
 and conspiracies; as in oligarchies, where there are many who have
 no share in the administration. The rich also even in democracies,
 despising the disorder and anarchy which will arise, hope to better
 themselves by the same means which happened at Thebes after the battle
 of Oenophyta, where, in consequence of bad administration, the democracy
 was destroyed; as it was at Megara, where the power of the people was
 lost through anarchy and disorder; the same thing happened at Syracuse
 before the tyranny of Gelon; and at Rhodes there was the same sedition
 before the popular government was overthrown. Revolutions in state will
 also arise from a disproportionate increase; for as the body consists
 of many parts, it ought to increase proportion-ably to preserve its
 symmetry, which would otherwise be destroyed; as if the foot was to
 be four cubits long, and the rest of the body but two palms; it might
 otherwise [1303a] be changed into an animal of a different form, if it
 increase beyond proportion not only in quantity, but also in disposition
 of parts; so also a city consists of parts, some of which may often
 increase without notice, as the number of poor in democracies and free
 states. They will also sometimes happen by accident, as at Tarentum, a
 little after the Median war, where so many of the nobles were killed in
 a battle by the lapygi, that from a free state the government was turned
 into a democracy; and at Argos, where so many of the citizens were
 killed by Cleomenes the Spartan, that they were obliged to admit several
 husbandmen to the freedom of the state: and at Athens, through the
 unfortunate event of the infantry battles, the number of the nobles was
 reduced by the soldiers being chosen from the list of citizens in
 the Lacedaemonian wars. Revolutions also sometimes take place in
 a democracy, though seldomer; for where the rich grow numerous or
 properties increase, they become oligarchies or dynasties. Governments
 also sometimes alter without seditions by a combination of the meaner
 people; as at Hersea: for which purpose they changed the mode of
 election from votes to lots, and thus got themselves chosen: and by
 negligence, as when the citizens admit those who are not friends to
 the constitution into the chief offices of the state, which happened
 at Orus, when the oligarchy of the archons was put an end to at the
 election of Heracleodorus, who changed that form of government into a
 democratic free state. By little and little, I mean by this, that very
 often great alterations silently take place in the form of government
 from people's overlooking small matters; as at Ambracia, where the
 census was originally small, but at last became nothing at all, as if a
 little and nothing at all were nearly or entirely alike. That state
 also is liable to seditions which is composed of different nations, till
 their differences are blended together and undistinguishable; for as a
 city cannot be composed of every multitude, so neither can it in every
 given time; for which reason all those republics which have hitherto
 been originally composed of different people or afterwards admitted
 their neighbours to the freedom of their city, have been most liable
 to revolutions; as when the Achaeans joined with the Traezenians
 in founding Sybaris; for soon after, growing more powerful than the
 Traezenians, they expelled them from the city; from whence came the
 proverb of Sybarite wickedness: and again, disputes from a like cause
 happened at Thurium between the Sybarites and those who had joined with
 them in building the city; for they assuming upon these, on account of
 the country being their own, were driven out. And at Byzantium the new
 citizens, being detected in plots against the state, were driven out of
 the city by force of arms. The Antisseans also, having taken in those
 who were banished from Chios, afterwards did the same thing; and
 also the Zancleans, after having taken in the people of Samos. The
 Appolloniats, in the Euxine Sea, having admitted their sojourners to
 the freedom of their city, were troubled with seditions: and the
 Syracusians, after the expulsion of their tyrants, having enrolled
 [1303b] strangers and mercenaries amongst their citizens, quarrelled
 with each other and came to an open rupture: and the people of
 Amphipolis, having taken in a colony of Chalcidians, were the greater
 part of them driven out of the city by them. Many persons occasion
 seditions in oligarchies because they think themselves ill-used in not
 sharing the honours of the state with their equals, as I have already
 mentioned; but in democracies the principal people do the same because
 they have not more than an equal share with others who are not equal
 to them. The situation of the place will also sometimes occasion
 disturbances in the state when the ground is not well adapted for one
 city; as at Clazomene, where the people who lived in that part of the
 town called Chytrum quarrelled with them who lived in the island, and
 the Colophonians with the Notians. At Athens too the disposition of the
 citizens is not the same, for those who live in the Piraeus are more
 attached to a popular government than those who live in the city
 properly so called; for as the interposition of a rivulet, however
 small, will occasion the line of the phalanx to fluctuate, so any
 trifling disagreement will be the cause of seditions; but they will not
 so soon flow from anything else as from the disagreement between virtue
 and vice, and next to that between poverty and riches, and so on in
 order, one cause having more influence than another; one of which that I
 last mentioned.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV
 
 
 But seditions in government do not arise for little things, but from
 them; for their immediate cause is something of moment. Now, trifling
 quarrels are attended with the greatest consequences when they arise
 between persons of the first distinction in the state, as was the
 case with the Syracusians in a remote period; for a revolution in the
 government was brought about by a quarrel between two young men who were
 in office, upon a love affair; for one of them being absent, the other
 seduced his mistress; he in his turn, offended with this, persuaded his
 friend's wife to come and live with him; and upon this the whole city
 took part either with the one or the other, and the government was
 overturned: therefore every one at the beginning of such disputes ought
 to take care to avoid the consequences; and to smother up all quarrels
 which may happen to arise amongst those in power, for the mischief lies
 in the beginning; for the beginning is said to be half of the business,
 so that what was then but a little fault will be found afterwards to
 bear its full proportion to what follows. Moreover, disputes between men
 of note involve the whole city in their consequences; in Hestiaea,
 after the Median war: two brothers having a dispute about their paternal
 estate; he who was the poorer, from the other's having concealed part
 of the effects, and some money which his father had found, engaged the
 popular party on his side, while the other, who was rich, the men of
 fashion. And at Delphos, [1304a] a quarrel about a wedding was the
 beginning of all the seditions that afterwards arose amongst them; for
 the bridegroom, being terrified by some unlucky omen upon waiting
 upon the bride, went away without marrying her; which her relations
 resenting, contrived secretly to convey some sacred money into his
 pocket while he was sacrificing, and then killed him as an impious
 person. At Mitylene also, a dispute, which arose concerning a right
 of heritage, was the beginning of great evils, and a war with the
 Athenians, in which Paches took their city, for Timophanes, a man
 of fortune, leaving two daughters, Doxander, who was circumvented in
 procuring them in marriage for his two sons, began a sedition, and
 excited the Athenians to attack them, being the host of that state.
 There was also a dispute at Phocea, concerning a right of inheritance,
 between Mnasis, the father of Mnasis, and Euthucrates, the father of
 Onomarchus, which brought on the Phoceans the sacred war. The government
 too of Epidamnus was changed from a quarrel that arose from an intended
 marriage; for a certain man having contracted his daughter in marriage,
 the father of the young person to whom she was contracted, being archon,
 punishes him, upon which account he, resenting the affront, associated
 himself with those who were excluded from any share in the government,
 and brought about a revolution. A government may be changed either into
 an oligarchy, democracy, or a free state; when the magistrates, or any
 part of the city acquire great credit, or are increased in power, as the
 court of Areopagus at Athens, having procured great credit during the
 Median war, added firmness to their administration; and, on the other
 hand, the maritime force, composed of the commonalty, having gained the
 victory at Salamis, by their power at sea, got the lead in the state,
 and strengthened the popular party: and at Argos, the nobles,
 having gained great credit by the battle of Mantinea against the
 Lacedaemonians, endeavoured to dissolve the democracy. And at Syracuse,
 the victory in their war with the Athenians being owing to the common
 people, they changed their free state into a democracy: and at Chalcis,
 the people having taken off the tyrant Phocis, together with the nobles,
 immediately seized the government: and at Ambracia also the people,
 having expelled the tyrant Periander, with his party, placed the
 supreme power in themselves. And this in general ought to be known,
 that whosoever has been the occasion of a state being powerful, whether
 private persons, or magistrates, a certain tribe, or any particular part
 of the citizens, or the multitude, be they who they will, will be the
 cause of disputes in the state. For either some persons, who envy them
 the honours they have acquired, will begin to be seditious, or they,
 on account of the dignity they have acquired, will not be content with
 their former equality. A state is also liable to commotions when those
 parts of it which seem to be opposite to each other approach to an
 [1304b] equality, as the rich and the common people; so that the part
 which is between them both is either nothing at all, or too little to be
 noticed; for if one party is so much more powerful than the other, as
 to be evidently stronger, that other will not be willing to hazard the
 danger: for which reason those who are superior in excellence and virtue
 will never be the cause of seditions; for they will be too few for that
 purpose when compared to the many. In general, the beginning and the
 causes of seditions in all states are such as I have now described, and
 revolutions therein are brought about in two ways, either by violence or
 fraud: if by violence, either at first by compelling them to submit to
 the change when it is made. It may also be brought about by fraud in
 two different ways, either when the people, being at first deceived,
 willingly consent to an alteration in their government, and are
 afterwards obliged by force to abide by it: as, for instance, when the
 four hundred imposed upon the people by telling them that the king
 of Persia would supply them with money for the war against the
 Lacedaemonians; and after they had been guilty of this falsity, they
 endeavoured to keep possession of the supreme power; or when they are
 at first persuaded and afterwards consent to be governed: and by one of
 these methods which I have mentioned are all revolutions in governments
 brought about.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V
 
 
 We ought now to inquire into those events which will arise from these
 causes in every species of government. Democracies will be most subject
 to revolutions from the dishonesty of their demagogues; for partly, by
 informing against men of property, they induce them to join together
 through self-defence, for a common fear will make the greatest enemies
 unite; and partly by setting the common people against them: and this is
 what any one may continually see practised in many states. In the island
 of Cos, for instance, the democracy was subverted by the wickedness
 of the demagogues, for the nobles entered into a combination with
 each other. And at Rhodes the demagogues, by distributing of bribes,
 prevented the people from paying the trierarchs what was owing to them,
 who were obliged by the number of actions they were harassed with to
 conspire together and destroy the popular state. The same thing was
 brought about at Heraclea, soon after the settlement of the city, by
 the same persons; for the citizens of note, being ill treated by them,
 quitted the city, but afterwards joining together they returned and
 overthrew the popular state. Just in the same manner the democracy
 was destroyed in Megara; for there the demagogues, to procure money by
 confiscations, drove out the nobles, till the number of those who were
 banished was considerable, who, [1305a] returning, got the better of the
 people in a battle, and established an oligarchy. The like happened at
 Cume, during the time of the democracy, which Thrasymachus destroyed;
 and whoever considers what has happened in other states may perceive the
 same revolutions to have arisen from the same causes. The demagogues,
 to curry favour with the people, drive the nobles to conspire together,
 either by dividing their estates, or obliging them to spend them on
 public services, or by banishing them, that they may confiscate the
 fortunes of the wealthy. In former times, when the same person was both
 demagogue and general, the democracies were changed into tyrannies; and
 indeed most of the ancient tyrannies arose from those states: a reason
 for which then subsisted, but not now; for at that time the demagogues
 were of the soldiery; for they were not then powerful by their
 eloquence; but, now the art of oratory is cultivated, the able speakers
 are at present the demagogues; but, as they are unqualified to act in
 a military capacity, they cannot impose themselves on the people as
 tyrants, if we except in one or two trifling instances. Formerly, too,
 tyrannies were more common than now, on account of the very extensive
 powers with which some magistrates were entrusted: as the prytanes at
 Miletus; for they were supreme in many things of the last consequence;
 and also because at that time the cities were not of that very great
 extent, the people in general living in the country, and being employed
 in husbandry, which gave them, who took the lead in public affairs, an
 opportunity, if they had a turn for war, to make themselves tyrants;
 which they all did when they had gained the confidence of the people;
 and this confidence was their hatred to the rich. This was the case of
 Pisistratus at Athens, when he opposed the Pediaci: and of Theagenes in
 Megara, who slaughtered the cattle belonging to the rich, after he
 had seized those who kept them by the riverside. Dionysius also, for
 accusing Daphnseus and the rich, was thought worthy of being raised to a
 tyranny, from the confidence which the people had of his being a popular
 man in consequence of these enmities. A government shall also alter from
 its ancient and approved democratic form into one entirely new, if
 there is no census to regulate the election of magistrates; for, as the
 election is with the people, the demagogues who are desirous of being in
 office, to flatter them, will endeavour with all their power to make the
 people superior even to the laws. To prevent this entirely, or at least
 in a great measure, the magistrates should be elected by the tribes, and
 not by the people at large. These are nearly the revolutions to which
 democracies are liable, and also the causes from whence they arise.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI
 
 
 There are two things which of all others most evidently occasion a
 revolution in an oligarchy; one is, when the people are ill used, for
 then every individual is ripe for [1305b] sedition; more particularly if
 one of the oligarchy should happen to be their leader; as Lygdamis, at
 Naxus, who was afterwards tyrant of that island. Seditions also which
 arise from different causes will differ from each other; for sometimes
 a revolution is brought about by the rich who have no share in the
 administration, which is in the hands of a very few indeed: and this
 happened at Massilia, Ister, Heraclea, and other cities; for those who
 had no share in the government ceased not to raise disputes till they
 were admitted to it: first the elder brothers, and then the younger
 also: for in some places the father and son are never in office at the
 same time; in others the elder and younger brother: and where this is
 observed the oligarchy partakes something of a free state. At Ister it
 was changed into a democracy; in Heraclea, instead of being in the
 hands of a few, it consisted of six hundred. At Cnidus the oligarchy
 was destroyed by the nobles quarrelling with each other, because the
 government was in the hands of so few: for there, as we have just
 mentioned, if the father was in office, the son could not; or, if there
 were many brothers, the eldest only; for the people, taking advantage of
 their disputes, elected one of the nobles for their general, and got the
 victory: for where there are seditions government is weak. And formerly
 at Erithria, during the oligarchy of the Basilides, although the state
 flourished greatly under their excellent management, yet because the
 people were displeased that the power should be in the hands of so
 few, they changed the government. Oligarchies also are subject to
 revolutions, from those who are in office therein, from the quarrels of
 the demagogues with each other. The demagogues are of two sorts; one
 who flatter the few when they are in power: for even these have their
 demagogues; such was Charicles at Athens, who had great influence over
 the thirty; and, in the same manner, Phrynichus over the four hundred.
 The others are those demagogues who have a share in the oligarchy,
 and flatter the people: such were the state-guardians at Larissa, who
 flattered the people because they were elected by them. And this will
 always happen in every oligarchy where the magistrates do not elect
 themselves, but are chosen out of men either of great fortune or certain
 ranks, by the soldiers or by the people; as was the custom at Abydos.
 And when the judicial department is not in the hands of the supreme
 power, the demagogues, favouring the people in their causes, overturn
 the government; which happened at Heraclea in Pontus: and also when
 some desire to contract the power of the oligarchy into fewer hands; for
 those who endeavour to support an equality are obliged to apply to the
 people for assistance. An oligarchy is also subject to revolutions
 when the nobility spend their fortunes by luxury; for such persons are
 desirous of innovations, and either endeavour to be tyrants themselves
 or to support others in being so, as [1306a] Hypparinus supported
 Dionysius of Syracuse. And at Amphipolis one Cleotimus collected a
 colony of Chalcidians, and when they came set them to quarrel with
 the rich: and at AEgina a certain person who brought an action against
 Chares attempted on that account to alter the government. Sometimes they
 will try to raise commotions, sometimes they will rob the public, and
 then quarrel with each other, or else fight with those who endeavour
 to detect them; which was the case at Apollonia in Pontus. But if the
 members of an oligarchy agree among themselves the state is not very
 easily destroyed without some external force. Pharsalus is a proof of
 this, where, though the place is small, yet the citizens have great
 power, from the prudent use they make of it. An oligarchy also will be
 destroyed when they create another oligarchy under it; that is, when the
 management of public affairs is in the hands of a few, and not equally,
 but when all of them do not partake of the supreme power, as happened
 once at Elis, where the supreme power in general was in the hands of a
 very few out of whom a senate was chosen, consisting but of ninety, who
 held their places for life; and their mode of election was calculated to
 preserve the power amongst each other's families, like the senators at
 Lacedaemon. An oligarchy is liable to a revolution both in time of
 war and peace; in war, because through a distrust in the citizens the
 government is obliged to employ mercenary troops, and he to whom they
 give the command of the army will very often assume the tyranny, as
 Timophanes did at Corinth; and if they appoint more than one general,
 they will very probably establish a dynasty: and sometimes, through fear
 of this, they are forced to let the people in general have some share in
 the government, because they are obliged to employ them. In peace,
 from their want of confidence in each other, they will entrust the
 guardianship of the state to mercenaries and their general, who will
 be an arbiter between them, and sometimes become master of both, which
 happened at Larissa, when Simos and the Aleuadae had the chief power.
 The same thing happened at Abydos, during the time of the political
 clubs, of which Iphiades' was one. Commotions also will happen in an
 oligarchy from one party's overbearing and insulting another, or
 from their quarrelling about their law-suits or marriages. How their
 marriages, for instance, will have that effect has been already shown:
 and in Eretria, Diagoras destroyed the oligarchy of the knights upon the
 same account. A sedition also arose at Heraclea, from a certain person
 being condemned by the court; and at Thebes, in consequence of a man's
 being guilty of adultery; [1306b] the punishment indeed which Eurytion
 suffered at Heraclea was just, yet it was illegally executed: as was
 that at Thebes upon Archias; for their enemies endeavoured to have them
 publicly bound in the pillory. Many revolutions also have been brought
 about in oligarchies by those who could not brook the despotism which
 those persons assumed who were in power, as at Cnidus and Chios. Changes
 also may happen by accident in what we call a free state and in an
 oligarchy; wheresoever the senators, judges, and magistrates are chosen
 according to a certain census; for it often happens that the highest
 census is fixed at first; so that a few only could have a share in
 the government, in an oligarchy, or in a free state those of moderate
 fortunes only; when the city grows rich, through peace or some other
 happy cause, it becomes so little that every one's fortune is equal to
 the census, so that the whole community may partake of all the honours
 of government; and this change sometimes happens by little and little,
 and insensible approaches, sometimes quicker. These are the revolutions
 and seditions that arise in oligarchies, and the causes to which they
 are owing: and indeed both democracies and oligarchies sometimes alter,
 not into governments of a contrary form, but into those of the same
 government; as, for instance, from having the supreme power in the law
 to vest it in the ruling party, or the contrariwise.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII
 
 
 Commotions also arise in aristocracies, from there being so few persons
 in power (as we have already observed they do in oligarchies, for in
 this particular an aristocracy is most near an oligarchy, for in both
 these states the administration of public affairs is in the hands of
 a few; not that this arises from the same cause in both, though herein
 they chiefly seem alike): and these will necessarily be most likely to
 happen when the generality of the people are high-spirited and think
 themselves equal to each other in merit; such were those at Lacedasmon,
 called the Partheniae (for these were, as well as others, descendants
 of citizens), who being detected in a conspiracy against the state, were
 sent to found Tarentum. They will happen also when some great men are
 disgraced by those who have received higher honours than themselves, to
 whom they are no ways inferior in abilities, as Lysander by the kings:
 or when an ambitious man cannot get into power, as Cinadon, who, in the
 reign of Agesilaus, was chief in a conspiracy against the Spartans:
 and also when some are too poor and others too rich, which will most
 frequently happen in time of war; as at Lacedaemon during the Messenian
 war, which is proved by a poem of Tyrtaeus, [1307a] called "Eunomia;"
 for some persons being reduced thereby, desired that the lands might
 be divided: and also when some person of very high rank might still be
 higher if he could rule alone, which seemed to be Pausanias's intention
 at Lacedaemon, when he was their general in the Median war, and Anno's
 at Carthage. But free states and aristocracies are mostly destroyed from
 want of a fixed administration of public affairs; the cause of which
 evil arises at first from want of a due mixture of the democratic and
 the oligarchic parts in a free state; and in an aristocracy from the
 same causes, and also from virtue not being properly joined to power;
 but chiefly from the two first, I mean the undue mixture of the
 democratic and oligarchic parts; for these two are what all free
 states endeavour to blend together, and many of those which we call
 aristocracies, in this particular these states differ from each other,
 and on this account the one of them is less stable than the other, for
 that state which inclines most to an oligarchy is called an aristocracy,
 and that which inclines most to a democracy is called a free state; on
 which account this latter is more secure than the former, for the wider
 the foundation the securer the building, and it is ever best to live
 where equality prevails. But the rich, if the community gives them rank,
 very often endeavour to insult and tyrannise over others. On the whole,
 whichever way a government inclines, in that it will settle, each party
 supporting their own. Thus a free state will become a democracy; an
 aristocracy an oligarchy; or the contrary, an aristocracy may change
 into a democracy (for the poor, if they think themselves injured,
 directly take part with the contrary side) and a free state into an
 oligarchy. The only firm state is that where every one enjoys that
 equality he has a right to and fully possesses what is his own. And what
 I have been speaking of happened to the Thurians; for the magistrates
 being elected according to a very high census, it was altered to a
 lower, and they were subdivided into more courts, but in consequence of
 the nobles possessing all the land, contrary to law; the state was too
 much of an oligarchy, which gave them an opportunity of encroaching
 greatly on the rest of the people; but these, after they had been well
 inured to war, so far got the better of their guards as to expel every
 one out of the country who possessed more than he ought. Moreover, as
 all aristocracies are free oligarchies, the nobles therein endeavour to
 have rather too much power, as at Lacedaemon, where property is now in
 the hands of a few, and the nobles have too much liberty to do as they
 please and make such alliances as they please. Thus the city of the
 Locrians was ruined from an alliance with Dionysius; which state was
 neither a democracy nor well-tempered aristocracy. But an aristocracy
 chiefly approaches to a secret change by its being destroyed by degrees,
 as we [1307b] have already said of all governments in general; and this
 happens from the cause of the alteration being trifling; for whenever
 anything which in the least regards the state is treated with contempt,
 after that something else, and this of a little more consequence, will
 be more easily altered, until the whole fabric of government is entirely
 subverted, which happened in the government of Thurium; for the law
 being that they should continue soldiers for five years, some young
 men of a martial disposition, who were in great esteem amongst their
 officers, despising those who had the management of public affairs,
 and imagining they could easily accomplish their intention, first
 endeavoured to abolish this law, with a view of having it lawful to
 continue the same person perpetually in the military, perceiving that
 the people would readily appoint them. Upon this, the magistrates who
 are called counselors first joined together with an intention to oppose
 it but were afterwards induced to agree to it, from a belief that if
 that law was not repealed they would permit the management of all other
 public affairs to remain in their hands; but afterwards, when they
 endeavoured to restrain some fresh alterations that were making, they
 found that they could do nothing, for the whole form of government was
 altered into a dynasty of those who first introduced the innovations. In
 short, all governments are liable to be destroyed either from within or
 from without; from without when they have for their neighbour a state
 whose policy is contrary to theirs, and indeed if it has great power the
 same thing will happen if it is not their neighbour; of which both
 the Athenians and the Lacedaemonians are a proof; for the one,
 when conquerors everywhere destroyed the oligarchies; the other the
 democracies. These are the chief causes of revolutions and dissensions
 in governments.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII
 
 
 We are now to consider upon what the preservation of governments in
 general and of each state in particular depends; and, in the first
 place, it is evident that if we are right in the causes we have assigned
 for their destruction, we know also the means of their preservation; for
 things contrary produce contraries: but destruction and preservation are
 contrary to each other. In well-tempered governments it requires as much
 care as anything whatsoever, that nothing be done contrary to law: and
 this ought chiefly to be attended to in matters of small consequence;
 for an illegality that approaches insensibly, approaches secretly, as in
 a family small expenses continually repeated consume a man's income;
 for the understanding is deceived thereby, as by this false argument; if
 every part is little, then the whole is little: now, this in one sense
 is true, in another is false, for the whole and all the parts together
 are large, though made up of small parts. The first therefore of
 anything is what the state ought to guard against. In the next place,
 no credit ought to be given to those who endeavour to deceive the people
 with false pretences; for they will be [1308a] confuted by facts. The
 different ways in which they will attempt to do this have been already
 mentioned. You may often perceive both aristocracies and oligarchies
 continuing firm, not from the stability of their forms of government,
 but from the wise conduct of the magistrates, both towards those who
 have a part in the management of public affairs, and those also who
 have not: towards those who have not, by never injuring them; and also
 introducing those who are of most consequence amongst them into office;
 nor disgracing those who are desirous of honour; or encroaching on the
 property of individuals; towards those who have, by behaving to each
 other upon an equality; for that equality which the favourers of a
 democracy desire to have established in the state is not only just,
 but convenient also, amongst those who are of the same rank: for which
 reason, if the administration is in the hands of many, those rules which
 are established in democracies will be very useful; as to let no one
 continue in office longer than six months: that all those who are of
 the same rank may have their turn; for between these there is a sort
 of democracy: for which reason demagogues are most likely to arise up
 amongst them, as we have already mentioned: besides, by this means both
 aristocracies and democracies will be the less liable to be corrupted
 into dynasties, because it will not be so easy for those who are
 magistrates for a little to do as much mischief as they could in a
 long time: for it is from hence that tyrannies arise in democracies
 and oligarchies; for either those who are most powerful in each state
 establish a tyranny, as the demagogues in the one, the dynasties in the
 other, or the chief magistrates who have been long in power. Governments
 are sometimes preserved not only by having the means of their corruption
 at a great distance, but also by its being very near them; for those who
 are alarmed at some impending evil keep a stricter hand over the state;
 for which reason it is necessary for those who have the guardianship of
 the constitution to be able to awaken the fears of the people, that they
 may preserve it, and not like a night-guard to be remiss in protecting
 the state, but to make the distant danger appear at hand. Great care
 ought also to be used to endeavour to restrain the quarrels and disputes
 of the nobles by laws, as well as to prevent those who are not already
 engaged in them from taking a part therein; for to perceive an evil
 at its very first approach is not the lot of every one, but of the
 politician. To prevent any alteration taking place in an oligarchy or
 free state on account of the census, if that happens to continue the
 same while the quantity of money is increased, it will be useful to take
 a general account of the whole amount of it in former times, to compare
 it with the present, and to do this every year in those cities where the
 census is yearly, [1308b] in larger communities once in three or five
 years; and if the whole should be found much larger or much less than it
 was at the time when the census was first established in the state,
 let there be a law either to extend or contract it, doing both these
 according to its increase or decrease; if it increases making the census
 larger, if it decreases smaller: and if this latter is not done in
 oligarchies and free states, you will have a dynasty arise in the one,
 an oligarchy in the other: if the former is not, free states will
 be changed into democracies, and oligarchies into free states or
 democracies. It is a general maxim in democracies, oligarchies,
 monarchies, and indeed in all governments, not to let any one acquire a
 rank far superior to the rest of the community, but rather to endeavour
 to confer moderate honours for a continuance than great ones for a short
 time; for these latter spoil men, for it is not every one who can bear
 prosperity: but if this rule is not observed, let not those honours
 which were conferred all at once be all at once taken away, but rather
 by degrees. But, above all things, let this regulation be made by the
 law, that no one shall have too much power, either by means of his
 fortune or friends; but if he has, for his excess therein, let it be
 contrived that he shall quit the country. Now, as many persons promote
 innovations, that they may enjoy their own particular manner of living,
 there ought to be a particular officer to inspect the manners of every
 one, and see that these are not contrary to the genius of the state
 in which he lives, whether it may be an oligarchy, a democracy, or any
 other form of government; and, for the same reason, those should be
 guarded against who are most prosperous in the city: the means of doing
 which is by appointing those who are otherwise to the business and the
 offices of the state. I mean, to oppose men of account to the common
 people, the poor to the rich, and to blend both these into one body, and
 to increase the numbers of those who are in the middle rank; and
 this will prevent those seditions which arise from an inequality of
 condition. But above all, in every state it is necessary, both by the
 laws and every other method possible, to prevent those who are employed
 by the public from being venal, and this particularly in an oligarchy;
 for then the people will not be so much displeased from seeing
 themselves excluded from a share in the government (nay, they will
 rather be glad to have leisure to attend their private affairs) as at
 suspecting that the officers of the state steal the public money, then
 indeed they are afflicted with double concern, both because they are
 deprived of the honours of the state, and pillaged by those who enjoy
 them. There is one method of blending together a democracy and an
 aristocracy, [1309a] if office brought no profit; by which means both
 the rich and the poor will enjoy what they desire; for to admit all to
 a share in the government is democratical; that the rich should be
 in office is aristocratical. This must be done by letting no public
 employment whatsoever be attended with any emolument; for the poor will
 not desire to be in office when they can get nothing by it, but had
 rather attend to their own affairs: but the rich will choose it, as
 they want nothing of the community. Thus the poor will increase their
 fortunes by being wholly employed in their own concerns; and the
 principal part of the people will not be governed by the lower sort.
 To prevent the exchequer from being defrauded, let all public money be
 delivered out openly in the face of the whole city, and let copies of
 the accounts be deposited in the different wards tribes, and divisions.
 But, as the magistrates are to execute their offices without any
 advantages, the law ought to provide proper honours for those who
 execute them well. In democracies also it is necessary that the rich
 should be protected, by not permitting their lands to be divided, nor
 even the produce of them, which in some states is done unperceivably. It
 would be also better if the people would prevent them when they offer to
 exhibit a number of unnecessary and yet expensive public entertainments
 of plays, music, processions, and the like. In an oligarchy it is
 necessary to take great care of the poor, and allot them public
 employments which are gainful; and, if any of the rich insult them, to
 let their punishment be severer than if they insulted one of their own
 rank; and to let estates pass by affinity, and not gift: nor to permit
 any person to have more than one; for by this means property will be
 more equally divided, and the greater part of the poor get into better
 circumstances. It is also serviceable in a democracy and an oligarchy
 to allot those who take no part in public affairs an equality or a
 preference in other things; the rich in a democracy, to the poor in an
 oligarchy: but still all the principal offices in the state to be filled
 only by those who are best qualified to discharge them.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IX
 
 
 There are three qualifications necessary for those who fill the
 first departments in government; first of all, an affection for the
 established constitution; second place, abilities every way completely
 equal to the business of their office; in the third, virtue and justice
 correspondent to the nature of that particular state they are placed in;
 for if justice is not the same in all states, it is evident that there
 must be different species thereof. There may be some doubt, when all
 these qualifications do not in the same persons, in what manner the
 choice shall be made; as for instance, suppose that one person is
 an accomplished general, but a bad man and no friend to the [1309b]
 constitution; another is just and a friend to it, which shall one
 prefer? we should then consider of two qualities, which of them the
 generality possess in a greater degree, which in a less; for which
 reason in the choice of a general we should regard his courage more than
 his virtue as the more uncommon quality; as there are fewer capable of
 conducting an army than there are good men: but, to protect the state
 or manage the finances, the contrary rule should be followed; for these
 require greater virtue than the generality are possessed of, but only
 that knowledge which is common to all. It may be asked, if a man has
 abilities equal to his appointment in the state, and is affectionate to
 the constitution, what occasion is there for being virtuous, since
 these two things alone are sufficient to enable him to be useful to
 the public? it is, because those who possess those qualities are often
 deficient in prudence; for, as they often neglect their own affairs,
 though they know them and love themselves, so nothing will prevent their
 serving the public in the same manner. In short, whatsoever the laws
 contain which we allow to be useful to the state contributes to its
 preservation: but its first and principal support is (as has been often
 insisted upon) to have the number of those who desire to preserve it
 greater than those who wish to destroy it. Above all things that ought
 not to be forgotten which many governments now corrupted neglect;
 namely, to preserve a mean. For many things seemingly favourable to a
 democracy destroy a democracy, and many things seemingly favourable to
 an oligarchy destroy an oligarchy. Those who think this the only virtue
 extend it to excess, not considering that as a nose which varies a
 little from perfect straightness, either towards a hook nose or a
 flat one, may yet be beautiful and agreeable to look at; but if this
 particularity is extended beyond measure, first of all the properties of
 the part is lost, but at last it can hardly be admitted to be a nose at
 all, on account of the excess of the rise or sinking: thus it is with
 other parts of the human body; so also the same thing is true with
 respect to states; for both an oligarchy and a democracy may something
 vary from their most perfect form and yet be well constituted; but if
 any one endeavours to extend either of them too far, at first he will
 make the government the worse for it, but at last there will be no
 government at all remaining. The lawgiver and the politician therefore
 should know well what preserves and what destroys a democracy or an
 oligarchy, for neither the one nor the other can possibly continue
 without rich and poor: but that whenever an entire equality of
 circumstances [1310a] prevails, the state must necessarily become of
 another form; so that those who destroy these laws, which authorise an
 inequality in property, destroy the government. It is also an error in
 democracies for the demagogues to endeavour to make the common people
 superior to the laws; and thus by setting them at variance with the
 rich, dividing one city into two; whereas they ought rather to speak
 in favour of the rich. In oligarchies, on the contrary, it is wrong to
 support those who are in administration against the people. The oaths
 also which they take in an oligarchy ought to be contrary to what they
 now are; for, at present, in some places they swear, "I will be adverse
 to the common people, and contrive all I can against them;" whereas they
 ought rather to suppose and pretend the contrary; expressing in their
 oaths, that they will not injure the people. But of all things which I
 have mentioned, that which contributes most to preserve the state is,
 what is now most despised, to educate your children for the state; for
 the most useful laws, and most approved by every statesman, will be of
 no service if the citizens are not accustomed to and brought up in
 the principles of the constitution; of a democracy, if that is by law
 established; of an oligarchy, if that is; for if there are bad morals
 in one man, there are in the city. But to educate a child fit for the
 state, it must not be done in the manner which would please either those
 who have the power in an oligarchy or those who desire a democracy, but
 so as they may be able to conduct either of these forms of governments.
 But now the children of the magistrates in an oligarchy are brought up
 too delicately, and the children of the poor hardy with exercise
 and labour; so that they are both desirous of and able to promote
 innovations. In democracies of the purest form they pursue a method
 which is contrary to their welfare; the reason of which is, that they
 define liberty wrong: now, there are two things which seem to be the
 objects of a democracy, that the people in general should possess the
 supreme power, and all enjoy freedom; for that which is just seems to
 be equal, and what the people think equal, that is a law: now, their
 freedom and equality consists in every one's doing what they please:
 that is in such a democracy every one may live as he likes; "as his
 inclination guides," in the words of Euripides: but this is wrong, for
 no one ought to think it slavery to live in subjection to government,
 but protection. Thus I have mentioned the causes of corruption in
 different states, and the means of their preservation.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER X
 
 
 It now remains that we speak of monarchies, their causes of corruption,
 and means of preservation; and indeed almost the same things which have
 been said of other governments happen to kingdoms and tyrannies; for a
 kingdom partakes of an aristocracy, a tyranny of the worst species of an
 oligarchy and democracy; for which reason it is the worst that man
 can submit to, as being composed of two, both of which are bad, and
 collectively retains all the corruptions and all the defects of both
 these states. These two species of monarchies arise from principles
 contrary to each other: a kingdom is formed to protect the better sort
 of people against the multitude, and kings are appointed out of those,
 who are chosen either for their superior virtue and actions flowing from
 virtuous principles, or else from their noble descent; but a tyrant is
 chosen out of the meanest populace; an enemy to the better sort, that
 the common people may not be oppressed by them. That this is true
 experience convinces us; for the generality of tyrants were indeed mere
 demagogues, who gained credit with the people by oppressing the nobles.
 Some tyrannies were established in this manner after the cities were
 considerably enlarged--others before that time, by kings who exceeded
 the power which their country allowed them, from a desire of governing
 despotically: others were founded by those who were elected to the
 superior offices in the state; for formerly the people appointed
 officers for life, who came to be at the head of civil and religious
 affairs, and these chose one out of their body in whom the supreme power
 over all the magistrates was placed. By all these means it was easy
 to establish a tyranny, if they chose it; for their power was ready at
 hand, either by their being kings, or else by enjoying the honours of
 the state; thus Phidon at Argos and other tyrants enjoyed originally the
 kingly power; Phalaris and others in Ionia, the honours of the state.
 Pansetius at Leontium, Cypselus at Corinth, Pisistratus at Athens,
 Dionysius at Syracuse, and others, acquired theirs by having been
 demagogues. A kingdom, as we have said, partakes much of the nature of
 an aristocracy, and is bestowed according to worth, as either virtue,
 family, beneficent actions, or these joined with power; for those who
 have been benefactors to cities and states, or have it in their powers
 to be so, have acquired this honour, and those who have prevented a
 people from falling into slavery by war, as Codrus, or those who have
 freed them from it, as Cyrus, or the founders of cities, or settlers of
 colonies, as the kings of Sparta, Macedon, and Molossus. A king desires
 to be the guardian of his people, that those who have property may be
 secure in the possession of it, and that the people in general meet with
 no injury; but a tyrant, as has been often said, has no regard to the
 common good, except for his own advantage; his only object is pleasure,
 but a king's is virtue: what a tyrant therefore is ambitious of
 engrossing is wealth, but a king rather honour. The guards too of a king
 are citizens, a tyrant's foreigners.
 
 That a tyranny contains all that is bad both in a democracy and an
 oligarchy is evident; with an oligarchy it has for its end gain, as the
 only means of providing the tyrant with guards and the luxuries of life;
 like that it places no confidence in the people; and therefore deprives
 them of the use of arms: it is also common to them both to persecute the
 populace, to drive them out of the city and their own habitations. With
 a democracy it quarrels with the nobles, and destroys them both
 publicly and privately, or drives them into banishment, as rivals and
 an impediment to the government; hence naturally arise conspiracies
 both amongst those who desire to govern and those who desire not to be
 slaves; hence arose Periander's advice to Thrasybulus to take off the
 tallest stalks, hinting thereby, that it was necessary to make away with
 the eminent citizens. We ought then in reason, as has been already
 said, to account for the changes which arise in a monarchy from the
 same causes which produce them in other states: for, through injustice
 received, fear, and contempt, many of those who are under a monarchical
 government conspire against it; but of all species of injustice,
 injurious contempt has most influence on them for that purpose:
 sometimes it is owing to their being deprived of their private fortunes.
 The dissolution too of a kingdom and a tyranny are generally the same;
 for monarchs abound in wealth and honour, which all are desirous to
 obtain. Of plots: some aim at the life of those who govern, others at
 their government; the first arises from hatred to their persons; which
 hatred may be owing to many causes, either of which will be sufficient
 to excite their anger, and the generality of those who are under the
 influence of that passion will join in a conspiracy, not for the sake
 of their own advancement, but for revenge. Thus the plot against
 the children of Pisistratus arose from their injurious treatment of
 Harmodius's sister, and insulting him also; for Harmodius resenting the
 injury done to his sister, and Aristogiton the injury done to Harmodius.
 Periander the tyrant of Ambracia also lost his life by a conspiracy, for
 some improper liberties he took with a boy in his cups: and Philip was
 slain by Pausanias for neglecting to revenge him of the affront he had
 received from Attains; as was Amintas the Little by Darda, for insulting
 him on account of his age; and the eunuch by Evagoras the Cyprian in
 revenge for having taken his son's wife away from him....
 
 Many also who have had their bodies scourged with stripes have, through
 resentment, either killed those who caused them to be inflicted or
 conspired against them, even when they had kingly power, as at Mitylene
 Megacles, joining with his friends, killed the Penthelidee, who used
 to go about striking those they met with clubs. Thus, in later times,
 Smendes killed Penthilus for whipping him and dragging him away from
 his wife. Decamnichus also was the chief cause of the conspiracy against
 Archelaus, for he urged others on: the occasion of his resentment was
 his having delivered him to Euripides the poet to be scourged; for
 Euripides was greatly offended with him for having said something of the
 foulness of his breath. And many others have been killed or conspired
 against on the same account. Fear too is a cause which produces the
 same effects, as well in monarchies as in other states: thus Artabanes
 conspired against Xerxes through fear of punishment for having hanged
 Darius according to his orders, whom he supposed he intended to pardon,
 as the order was given at supper-time. Some kings also have been [1312a]
 dethroned and killed in consequence of the contempt they were held in by
 the people; as some one conspired against Sardanapalus, having seen him
 spinning with his wife, if what is related of him is true, or if not of
 him, it may very probably be true of some one else. Dion also conspired
 against Dionysius the Younger, seeing his subjects desirous of a
 conspiracy, and that he himself was always drunk: and even a man's
 friends will do this if they despise him; for from the confidence he
 places in them, they think that they shall not be found out. Those
 also who think they shall gain his throne will conspire against a king
 through contempt; for as they are powerful themselves, and despise the
 danger, on account of their own strength, they will readily attempt it.
 Thus a general at the head of his army will endeavour to dethrone the
 monarch, as Cyrus did Astyages, despising both his manner of life and
 his forces; his forces for want of action, his life for its effeminacy:
 thus Suthes, the Thracian, who was general to Amadocus, conspired
 against him. Sometimes more than one of these causes will excite men
 to enter into conspiracies, as contempt and desire of gain; as in the
 instance of Mithridates against Ariobarzanes. Those also who are of a
 bold disposition, and have gained military honours amongst kings, will
 of all others be most like to engage in sedition; for strength and
 courage united inspire great bravery: whenever, therefore, these join
 in one person, he will be very ready for conspiracies, as he will easily
 conquer. Those who conspire against a tyrant through love of glory
 and honour have a different motive in view from what I have already
 mentioned; for, like all others who embrace danger, they have only glory
 and honour in view, and think, not as some do, of the wealth and pomp
 they may acquire, but engage in this as they would in any other noble
 action, that they may be illustrious and distinguished, and destroy a
 tyrant, not to succeed in his tyranny, but to acquire renown. No doubt
 but the number of those who act upon this principle is small, for we
 must suppose they regard their own safety as nothing in case they should
 not succeed, and must embrace the opinion of Dion (which few can do)
 when he made war upon Dionysius with a very few troops; for he said,
 that let the advantage he made be ever so little it would satisfy him to
 have gained it; and that, should it be his lot to die the moment he had
 gained footing in his country, he should think his death sufficiently
 glorious. A tyranny also is exposed to the same destruction as all other
 states are, from too powerful neighbours: for it is evident, that an
 opposition of principles will make them desirous of subverting it;
 and what they desire, all who can, do: and there is a principle of
 opposition in one state to another, as a democracy against a tyranny, as
 says Hesiod, "a potter against a potter;" for the extreme of a democracy
 is a tyranny; a kingly power against an aristocracy, from their
 different forms of government--for which reason the Lacedaemonians
 destroyed many tyrannies; as did the Syracusians during the prosperity
 of their state. Nor are they only destroyed from without, but also
 from within, when those who have no share in the power bring about a
 revolution, as happened to Gelon, and lately to Dionysius; to the first,
 by means of Thrasybulus, the brother of Hiero, who nattered Gelon's
 son, and induced him to lead a life of pleasure, that he himself might
 govern; but the family joined together and endeavoured to support the
 tyranny and expel Thrasybulus; but those whom they made of their party
 seized the opportunity and expelled the whole family. Dion made war
 against his relation Dionysius, and being assisted by the people, first
 expelled and then killed him. As there are two causes which chiefly
 induce men to conspire against tyrants, hatred and contempt, one of
 these, namely hatred, seems inseparable from them. Contempt also is
 often the cause of their destruction: for though, for instance, those
 who raised themselves to the supreme power generally preserved it; but
 those who received it from them have, to speak truth, almost immediately
 all of them lost it; for, falling into an effeminate way of life, they
 soon grew despicable, and generally fell victims to conspiracies. Part
 of their hatred may be very fitly ascribed to anger; for in some cases
 this is their motive to action: for it is often a cause which impels
 them to act more powerfully than hatred, and they proceed with greater
 obstinacy against those whom they attack, as this passion is not under
 the direction of reason. Many persons also indulge this passion through
 contempt; which occasioned the fall of the Pisistratidae and many
 others. But hatred is more powerful than anger; for anger is accompanied
 with grief, which prevents the entrance of reason; but hatred is free
 from it. In short, whatever causes may be assigned as the destruction
 of a pure oligarchy unmixed with any other government and an extreme
 democracy, the same may be applied to a tyranny; for these are divided
 tyrannies.
 
 Kingdoms are seldom destroyed by any outward attack; for which reason
 they are generally very stable; but they have many causes of subversion
 within; of which two are the principal; one is when those who are
 in power [1313a] excite a sedition, the other when they endeavour to
 establish a tyranny by assuming greater power than the law gives them.
 A kingdom, indeed, is not what we ever see erected in our times, but
 rather monarchies and tyrannies; for a kingly government is one that
 is voluntarily submitted to, and its supreme power admitted upon great
 occasions: but where many are equal, and there are none in any respect
 so much better than another as to be qualified for the greatness and
 dignity of government over them, then these equals will not willingly
 submit to be commanded; but if any one assumes the government, either by
 force or fraud, this is a tyranny. To what we have already said we shall
 add, the causes of revolutions in an hereditary kingdom. One of these
 is, that many of those who enjoy it are naturally proper objects of
 contempt only: another is, that they are insolent while their power is
 not despotic; but they possess kingly honours only. Such a state is soon
 destroyed; for a king exists but while the people are willing to obey,
 as their submission to him is voluntary, but to a tyrant involuntary.
 These and such-like are the causes of the destruction of monarchies.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XI
 
 
 Monarchies, in a word, are preserved by means contrary to what I have
 already mentioned as the cause of their destruction; but to speak to
 each separately: the stability of a kingdom will depend upon the power
 of the king's being kept within moderate bounds; for by how much the
 less extensive his power is, by so much the longer will his government
 continue; for he will be less despotic and more upon an equality of
 condition with those he governs; who, on that account, will envy him the
 less.
 
 It was on this account that the kingdom of the Molossi continued so
 long; and the Lacedaemonians from their government's being from the
 beginning divided into two parts, and also by the moderation introduced
 into the other parts of it by Theopompus, and his establishment of the
 ephori; for by taking something from the power he increased the duration
 of the kingdom, so that in some measure he made it not less, but bigger;
 as they say he replied to his wife, who asked him if he was not ashamed
 to deliver down his kingdom to his children reduced from what he
 received it from his ancestors? No, says he, I give it him more lasting.
 Tyrannies are preserved two ways most opposite to each other, one of
 which is when the power is delegated from one to the other, and in this
 manner many tyrants govern in their states. Report says that Periander
 founded many of these. There are also many of them to be met with
 amongst the Persians. What has been already mentioned is as conducive
 as anything can be to preserve a tyranny; namely, to keep down those who
 are of an aspiring disposition, to take off those who will not submit,
 to allow no public meals, no clubs, no education, nothing at all, but
 to guard against everything that gives rise to high spirits or mutual
 confidence; nor to suffer the learned meetings of those who are at
 leisure to hold conversation with each other; and to endeavour by every
 means possible to keep all the people strangers to each other; for
 knowledge increases mutual confidence; and to oblige all strangers to
 appear in public, and to live near the city-gate, that all their actions
 may be sufficiently seen; for those who are kept like slaves seldom
 entertain any noble thoughts: in short, to imitate everything which the
 Persians and barbarians do, for they all contribute to support slavery;
 and to endeavour to know what every one who is under their power does
 and says; and for this purpose to employ spies: such were those women
 whom the Syracusians called potagogides Hiero also used to send out
 listeners wherever there was any meeting or conversation; for the people
 dare not speak with freedom for fear of such persons; and if any one
 does, there is the less chance of its being concealed; and to endeavour
 that the whole community should mutually accuse and come to blows with
 each other, friend with friend, the commons with the nobles, and the
 rich with each other. It is also advantageous for a tyranny that all
 those who are under it should be oppressed with poverty, that they may
 not be able to compose a guard; and that, being employed in procuring
 their daily bread, they may have no leisure to conspire against their
 tyrants. The Pyramids of Egypt are a proof of this, and the votive
 edifices of the Cyposelidse, and the temple of Jupiter Olympus, built by
 the Pisistratidae, and the works of Polycrates at Samos; for all these
 produced one end, the keeping the people poor. It is necessary also to
 multiply taxes, as at Syracuse; where Dionysius in the space of five
 years collected all the private property of his subjects into his own
 coffers. A tyrant also should endeavour to engage his subjects in a war,
 that they may have employment and continually depend upon their general.
 A king is preserved by his friends, but a tyrant is of all persons the
 man who can place no confidence in friends, as every one has it in his
 desire and these chiefly in their power to destroy him. All these things
 also which are done in an extreme democracy should be done in a tyranny,
 as permitting great licentiousness to the women in the house, that they
 may reveal their husbands' secrets; and showing great indulgence to
 slaves also for the same reason; for slaves and women conspire not
 against tyrants: but when they are treated with kindness, both of them
 are abettors of tyrants, and extreme democracies also; and the people
 too in such a state desire to be despotic. For which reason flatterers
 are in repute in both these: the demagogue in the democracy, for he is
 the proper flatterer of the people; among tyrants, he who will servilely
 adapt himself to their humours; for this is the business of [1314a]
 flatterers. And for this reason tyrants always love the worst of
 wretches, for they rejoice in being flattered, which no man of a liberal
 spirit will submit to; for they love the virtuous, but flatter none. Bad
 men too are fit for bad purposes; "like to like," as the proverb says. A
 tyrant also should show no favour to a man of worth or a freeman; for he
 should think, that no one deserved to be thought these but himself; for
 he who supports his dignity, and is a friend to freedom, encroaches upon
 the superiority and the despotism of the tyrant: such men, therefore,
 they naturally hate, as destructive to their government. A tyrant
 also should rather admit strangers to his table and familiarity than
 citizens, as these are his enemies, but the others have no design
 against him. These and such-like are the supports of a tyranny, for
 it comprehends whatsoever is wicked. But all these things may be
 comprehended in three divisions, for there are three objects which a
 tyranny has in view; one of which is, that the citizens should be of
 poor abject dispositions; for such men never propose to conspire against
 any one. The second is, that they should have no confidence in each
 other; for while they have not this, the tyrant is safe enough from
 destruction. For which reason they are always at enmity with those of
 merit, as hurtful to their government; not only as they scorn to be
 governed despotically, but also because they can rely upon each other's
 fidelity, and others can rely upon theirs, and because they will not
 inform against their associates, nor any one else. The third is, that
 they shall be totally without the means of doing anything; for no one
 undertakes what is impossible for him to perform: so that without power
 a tyranny can never be destroyed. These, then, are the three objects
 which the inclinations of tyrants desire to see accomplished; for all
 their tyrannical plans tend to promote one of these three ends, that
 their people may neither have mutual confidence, power, nor spirit.
 This, then, is one of the two methods of preserving tyrannies: the other
 proceeds in a way quite contrary to what has been already described,
 and which may be discerned from considering to what the destruction of
 a kingdom is owing; for as one cause of that is, making the government
 approach near to a tyranny, so the safety of a tyranny consists in
 making the government nearly kingly; preserving only one thing, namely
 power, that not only the willing, but the unwilling also, must be
 obliged to submit; for if this is once lost, the tyranny is at an end.
 This, then, as the foundation, must be preserved: in other particulars
 carefully do and affect to seem like a king; first, appear to pay a
 great attention [1314b] to what belongs to the public; nor make such
 profuse presents as will offend the people; while they are to supply
 the money out of the hard labour of their own hands, and see it given
 in profusion to mistresses, foreigners, and fiddlers; keeping an exact
 account both of what you receive and pay; which is a practice some
 tyrants do actually follow, by which means they seem rather fathers of
 families than tyrants: nor need you ever fear the want of money while
 you have the supreme power of the state in your own hands. It is also
 much better for those tyrants who quit their kingdom to do this than to
 leave behind them money they have hoarded up; for their regents will
 be much less desirous of making innovations, and they are more to be
 dreaded by absent tyrants than the citizens; for such of them as he
 suspects he takes with him, but these regents must be left behind. He
 should also endeavour to appear to collect such taxes and require such
 services as the exigencies of the state demand, that whenever they are
 wanted they may be ready in time of war; and particularly to take care
 that he appear to collect and keep them not as his own property, but the
 public's. His appearance also should not be severe, but respectable, so
 that he should inspire those who approach him with veneration and not
 fear; but this will not be easily accomplished if he is despised. If,
 therefore, he will not take the pains to acquire any other, he ought to
 endeavour to be a man of political abilities, and to fix that opinion of
 himself in the judgment of his subjects. He should also take care not to
 appear to be guilty of the least offence against modesty, nor to suffer
 it in those under him: nor to permit the women of his family to treat
 others haughtily; for the haughtiness of women has been the ruin of many
 tyrants. With respect to the pleasures of sense, he ought to do directly
 contrary to the practice of some tyrants at present; for they do not
 only continually indulge themselves in them for many days together, but
 they seem also to desire to have other witnesses of it, that they may
 wonder at their happiness; whereas he ought really to be moderate in
 these, and, if not, to appear to others to avoid them-for it is not the
 sober man who is exposed either to plots or contempt, but the drunkard;
 not the early riser, but the sluggard. His conduct in general should
 also be contrary to what is reported of former tyrants; for he ought to
 improve and adorn his city, so as to seem a guardian and not a tyrant;
 and, moreover., always to [1315a] seem particularly attentive to the
 worship of the gods; for from persons of such a character men entertain
 less fears of suffering anything illegal while they suppose that he who
 governs them is religious and reverences the gods; and they will be less
 inclined to raise insinuations against such a one, as being peculiarly
 under their protection: but this must be so done as to give no occasion
 for any suspicion of hypocrisy. He should also take care to show such
 respect to men of merit in every particular, that they should not think
 they could be treated with greater distinction by their fellow-citizens
 in a free state. He should also let all honours flow immediately from
 himself, but every censure from his subordinate officers and judges. It
 is also a common protection of all monarchies not to make one person too
 great, or, certainly, not many; for they will support each other: but,
 if it is necessary to entrust any large powers to one person, to take
 care that it is not one of an ardent spirit; for this disposition is
 upon every opportunity most ready for a revolution: and, if it should
 seem necessary to deprive any one of his power, to do it by degrees,
 and not reduce him all at once. It is also necessary to abstain from all
 kinds of insolence; more particularly from corporal punishment; which
 you must be most cautious never to exercise over those who have a
 delicate sense of honour; for, as those who love money are touched to
 the quick when anything affects their property, so are men of honour and
 principle when they receive any disgrace: therefore, either never employ
 personal punishment, or, if you do, let it be only in the manner in
 which a father would correct his son, and not with contempt; and, upon
 the whole, make amends for any seeming disgrace by bestowing greater
 honours. But of all persons who are most likely to entertain designs
 against the person of a tyrant, those are chiefly to be feared and
 guarded against who regard as nothing the loss of their own lives, so
 that they can but accomplish their purpose: be very careful therefore
 of those who either think themselves affronted, or those who are dear
 to them; for those who are excited by anger to revenge regard as nothing
 their own persons: for, as Heraclitus says, it is dangerous to fight
 with an angry man who will purchase with his life the thing he aims at.
 As all cities are composed of two sorts of persons, the rich and the
 poor, it is necessary that both these should find equal protection from
 him who governs them, and that the one party should not have it in their
 power to injure the other; but that the tyrant should attach to himself
 that party which is the most powerful; which, if he does, he will have
 no occasion either to make his slaves free, or to deprive citizens of
 their arms; for the strength of either of the parties added to his
 own forces will render him superior to any conspiracy. It would be
 superfluous to go through all particulars; for the rule of conduct which
 the tyrant ought to pursue is evident enough, and that is, to affect to
 appear not the tyrant, but the king; the guardian of those he governs,
 not their plunderer, [1315b] but their protector, and to affect
 the middle rank in life, not one superior to all others: he should,
 therefore, associate his nobles with him and soothe his people; for his
 government will not only be necessarily more honourable and worthy of
 imitation, as it will be over men of worth, and not abject wretches who
 perpetually both hate and fear him; but it will be also more durable.
 Let him also frame his life so that his manners may be consentaneous
 to virtue, or at least let half of them be so, that he may not be
 altogether wicked, but only so in part.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XII
 
 
 Indeed an oligarchy and a tyranny are of all governments of the shortest
 duration. The tyranny of Orthagoras and his family at Sicyon, it is
 true, continued longer than any other: the reason for which was, that
 they used their power with moderation, and were in many particulars
 obedient to the laws; and, as Clisthenes was an able general, he never
 fell into contempt, and by the care he took that in many particulars his
 government should be popular. He is reported also to have presented a
 person with a crown who adjudged the victory to another; and some say
 that it is the statue of that judge which is placed in the forum.
 
 They say also, that Pisistratus submitted to be summoned into the court
 of the Areopagites. The second that we shall mention is the tyranny of
 the Cypselidse, at Corinth, which continued seventy-seven years and
 six months; for Cypselus was tyrant there thirty years, Periander
 forty-four, and Psammetichus, the son of Georgias, three years; the
 reason for which was, that Cypselus was a popular man, and governed
 without guards. Periander indeed ruled like a tyrant, but then he was an
 able general. The third was that of the Pisistradidae at Athens; but it
 was not continual: for Pisistratus himself was twice expelled; so that
 out of thirty-three years he was only fifteen in power, and his son
 eighteen; so that the whole time was thirty-three years. Of the rest
 we shall mention that of Hiero, and Gelo at Syracuse; and this did not
 continue long, for both their reigns were only eighteen years; for
 Gelo died in the eighth year of his tyranny, and Hiero in his tenth.
 Thrasybulus fell in his eleventh month, and many other tyrannies have
 continued a very short time. We have now gone through the general cases
 of corruption and [1316a] means of preservation both in free states and
 monarchies. In Plato's Republic, Socrates is introduced treating upon
 the changes which different governments are liable to: but his discourse
 is faulty; for he does not particularly mention what changes the best
 and first governments are liable to; for he only assigns the general
 cause, of nothing being immutable, but that in time everything will
 alter [***tr.: text is unintelligible here***] he conceives that nature
 will then produce bad men, who will not submit to education, and in
 this, probably, he is not wrong; for it is certain that there are some
 persons whom it is impossible by any education to make good men; but
 why should this change be more peculiar to what he calls the best-formed
 government, than to all other forms, and indeed to all other things
 that exist? and in respect to his assigned time, as the cause of the
 alteration of all things, we find that those which did not begin
 to exist at the same time cease to be at the same time; so that, if
 anything came into beginning the day before the solstice, it must alter
 at the same time. Besides, why should such a form of government be
 changed into the Lacedaemonian? for, in general, when governments alter,
 they alter into the contrary species to what they before were, and
 not into one like their former. And this reasoning holds true of other
 changes; for he says, that from the Lacedaemonian form it changes into
 an oligarchy, and from thence into a democracy, and from a democracy
 into a tyranny: and sometimes a contrary change takes place, as from a
 democracy into an oligarchy, rather than into a monarchy. With respect
 to a tyranny he neither says whether there will be any change in it; or
 if not, to what cause it will be owing; or if there is, into what other
 state it will alter: but the reason of this is, that a tyranny is an
 indeterminate government; and, according to him, every state ought to
 alter into the first, and most perfect, thus the continuity and circle
 would be preserved. But one tyranny often changed into another; as
 at Syria, from Myron's to Clisthenes'; or into an oligarchy, as was
 Antileo's at Chalcas; or into a democracy, as was Gelo's at Syracuse; or
 into an aristocracy, as was Charilaus's at Lacedaemon, and at Carthage.
 An oligarchy is also changed into a tyranny; such was the rise of most
 of the ancient tyrannies in Sicily; at Leontini, into the tyranny of
 Panaetius; at Gela, into that of Cleander; at Rhegium into that of
 Anaxilaus; and the like in many other cities. It is absurd also to
 suppose, that a state is changed into an oligarchy because those who are
 in power are avaricious and greedy of money, and not because those who
 are by far richer than their fellow citizens think it unfair that those
 who have nothing should have an equal share in the rule of the state
 with themselves, who possess so much-for in many oligarchies it is not
 allowable to be employed in money-getting, and there are many laws to
 prevent it. But in Carthage, which is a democracy, money-getting is
 creditable, and yet their form of government remains unaltered. It is
 also absurd to say, that in an oligarchy there are two cities, one of
 the poor and another of the rich; for why should this happen to them
 more than to the Lacedaemonians, or any other state where all possess
 not equal property, or where all are not equally good? for though no
 one member of the community should be poorer than he was before, yet
 a democracy might nevertheless change into an oligarchy; if the rich
 should be more powerful than the poor, and the one too negligent, and
 the other attentive: and though these changes are owing to many causes,
 yet he mentions but one only, that the citizens become poor by luxury,
 and paying interest-money; as if at first they were all rich, or the
 greater part of them: but this is not so, but when some of those who
 have the principal management of public affairs lose their fortunes,
 they will endeavour to bring about a revolution; but when others do,
 nothing of consequence will follow, nor when such states do alter is
 there any more reason for their altering into a democracy than any
 other. Besides, though some of the members of the community may not have
 spent their fortunes, yet if they share not in the honours of the state,
 or if they are ill-used and insulted, they will endeavour to raise
 seditions, and bring about a revolution, that they may be allowed to do
 as they like; which, Plato says, arises from too much liberty. Although
 there are many oligarchies and democracies, yet Socrates, when he is
 treating of the changes they may undergo, speaks of them as if there was
 but one of each sort.
 
 
 
 
 BOOK VI
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I
 
 
 We have already shown what is the nature of the supreme council in the
 state, and wherein one may differ from another, and how the different
 magistrates should be regulated; and also the judicial department, and
 what is best suited to what state; and also to what causes both the
 destruction and preservation of governments are owing.
 
 As there are very many species of democracies, as well as of other
 states, it will not be amiss to consider at the same time anything which
 we may have omitted to mention concerning either of them, and to allot
 to each that mode of conduct which is peculiar to and advantageous for
 them; and also to inquire into the combinations of all these different
 modes of government which we [1317a] have mentioned; for as these are
 blended together the government is altered, as from an aristocracy to
 be an oligarchy, and from a free state to be a democracy. Now, I mean
 by those combinations of government (which I ought to examine into, but
 have not yet done), namely, whether the deliberative department and the
 election of magistrates is regulated in a manner correspondent to an
 oligarchy, or the judicial to an aristocracy, or the deliberative part
 only to an oligarchy, and the election of magistrates to an aristocracy,
 or whether, in any other manner, everything is not regulated according
 to the nature of the government. But we will first consider what
 particular sort of democracy is fitted to a particular city, and also
 what particular oligarchy to a particular people; and of other states,
 what is advantageous to what. It is also necessary to show clearly, not
 only which of these governments is best for a state, but also how
 it ought to be established there, and other things we will treat of
 briefly.
 
 And first, we will speak of a democracy; and this will at the same
 time show clearly the nature of its opposite which some persons call
 an oligarchy; and in doing this we must examine into all the parts of
 a democracy, and everything that is connected therewith; for from the
 manner in which these are compounded together different species of
 democracies arise: and hence it is that they are more than one, and of
 various natures. Now, there are two causes which occasion there being so
 many democracies; one of which is that which we have already mentioned;
 namely, there being different sorts of people; for in one country the
 majority are husbandmen, in another mechanics, and hired servants; if
 the first of these is added to the second, and the third to both of
 them, the democracy will not only differ in the particular of better or
 worse, but in this, that it will be no longer the same government; the
 other is that which we will now speak of. The different things which are
 connected with democracies and seem to make part of these states, do,
 from their being joined to them, render them different from others: this
 attending a few, that more, and another all. It is necessary that he who
 would found any state which he may happen to approve of, or correct one,
 should be acquainted with all these particulars. All founders of states
 endeavour to comprehend within their own plan everything of nearly the
 same kind with it; but in doing this they err, in the manner I have
 already described in treating of the preservation and destruction of
 governments. I will now speak of these first principles and manners, and
 whatever else a democratical state requires.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II
 
 
 Now the foundation of a democratical state is liberty, and people have
 been accustomed to say this as if here only liberty was to be found; for
 they affirm that this is the end proposed by every democracy. But one
 part of liberty is to govern and be governed alternately; for, according
 to democratical justice, equality is measured by numbers, and not by
 worth: and this being just, it is necessary that the supreme power
 should be vested in the people at large; and that what the majority
 determine should be final: so that in a democracy the poor ought to have
 more power than the rich, as being the greater number; for this is one
 mark of liberty which all framers of a democracy lay down as a criterion
 of that state; another is, to live as every one likes; for this, they
 say, is a right which liberty gives, since he is a slave who must live
 as he likes not. This, then, is another criterion of a democracy. Hence
 arises the claim to be under no command whatsoever to any one, upon any
 account, any otherwise than by rotation, and that just as far only as
 that person is, in his turn, under his also. This also is conducive to
 that equality which liberty demands. These things being premised, and
 such being the government, it follows that such rules as the following
 should be observed in it, that all the magistrates should be chosen out
 of all the people, and all to command each, and each in his turn all:
 that all the magistrates should be chosen by lot, except to those
 offices only which required some particular knowledge and skill: that no
 census, or a very small one, should be required to qualify a man for any
 office: that none should be in the same employment twice, or very few,
 and very seldom, except in the army: that all their appointments should
 be limited to a very short time, or at least as many as possible:
 that the whole community should be qualified to judge in all causes
 whatsoever, let the object be ever so extensive, ever so interesting, or
 of ever so high a nature; as at Athens, where the people at large judge
 the magistrates when they come out of office, and decide concerning
 public affairs as well as private contracts: that the supreme power
 should be in the public assembly; and that no magistrate should be
 allowed any discretionary power but in a few instances, and of no
 consequence to public business. Of all magistrates a senate is best
 suited to a democracy, where the whole community is not paid for giving
 their attendance; for in that case it loses its power; for then the
 people will bring all causes before them, by appeal, as we have
 already mentioned in a former book. In the next place, there should, if
 possible, be a fund to pay all the citizens--who have any share in the
 management of public affairs, either as members of the assembly, judges,
 and magistrates; but if this cannot be done, at least the magistrates,
 the judges the senators, and members of the supreme assembly, and also
 those officers who are obliged to eat at a common table ought to be
 paid. Moreover, as an oligarchy is said to be a government of men of
 family, fortune, and education; so, on the contrary, a democracy is a
 government in the hands of men of no birth, indigent circumstances, and
 mechanical employments. In this state also no office [1318a] should be
 for life; and, if any such should remain after the government has been
 long changed into a democracy, they should endeavour by degrees to
 diminish the power; and also elect by lot instead of vote. These things,
 then, appertain to all democracies; namely, to be established on that
 principle of justice which is homogeneous to those governments; that is,
 that all the members of the state, by number, should enjoy an equality,
 which seems chiefly to constitute a democracy, or government of the
 people: for it seems perfectly equal that the rich should have no more
 share in the government than the poor, nor be alone in power; but that
 all should be equal, according to number; for thus, they think, the
 equality and liberty of the state best preserved.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III
 
 
 In the next place we must inquire how this equality is to be procured.
 Shall the qualifications be divided so that five hundred rich should be
 equal to a thousand poor, or shall the thousand have equal power with
 the five hundred? or shall we not establish our equality in this manner?
 but divide indeed thus, and afterwards taking an equal number both out
 of the five hundred and the thousand, invest them with the power of
 creating the magistrates and judges. Is this state then established
 according to perfect democratical justice, or rather that which is
 guided by numbers only? For the defenders of a democracy say, that that
 is just which the majority approve of: but the favourers of an oligarchy
 say, that that is just which those who have most approve of; and that we
 ought to be directed by the value of property. Both the propositions are
 unjust; for if we agree with what the few propose we erect a tyranny:
 for if it should happen that an individual should have more than the
 rest who are rich, according to oligarchical justice, this man alone
 has a right to the supreme power; but if superiority of numbers is to
 prevail, injustice will then be done by confiscating the property of the
 rich, who are few, as we have already said. What then that equality is,
 which both parties will admit, must be collected from the definition
 of right which is common to them both; for they both say that what the
 majority of the state approves of ought to be established. Be it so; but
 not entirely: but since a city happens to be made up of two different
 ranks of people, the rich and the poor, let that be established which
 is approved of by both these, or the greater part: but should there be
 opposite sentiments, let that be established which shall be approved
 of by the greater part: but let this be according to the census; for
 instance, if there should be ten of the rich and twenty of the poor, and
 six of the first and fifteen of the last should agree upon any measure,
 and the remaining four of the rich should join with the remaining five
 of the poor in opposing it, that party whose census when added together
 should determine which opinion should be law, and should these happen
 to be equal, it should be regarded as a case similar to an assembly or
 court of justice dividing equally upon any question that comes before
 them, who either determine it by lot or some such method. But although,
 with [1318b] respect to what is equal and just, it may be very difficult
 to establish the truth, yet it is much easier to do than to persuade
 those who have it in their power to encroach upon others to be guided
 thereby; for the weak always desire what is equal and just, but the
 powerful pay no regard thereunto.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV
 
 
 There are four kinds of democracies. The best is that which is composed
 of those first in order, as we have already said, and this also is the
 most ancient of any. I call that the first which every one would place
 so, was he to divide the people; for the best part of these are the
 husbandmen. We see, then, that a democracy may be framed where the
 majority live by tillage or pasturage; for, as their property is
 but small, they will not be at leisure perpetually to hold public
 assemblies, but will be continually employed in following their own
 business, not having otherwise the means of living; nor will they be
 desirous of what another enjoys, but will rather like to follow their
 own business than meddle with state affairs and accept the offices of
 government, which will be attended with no great profit; for the major
 part of mankind are rather desirous of riches than honour (a proof of
 this is, that they submitted to the tyrannies in ancient times, and do
 now submit to the oligarchies, if no one hinders them in their usual
 occupations, or deprives them of their property; for some of them soon
 get rich, others are removed from poverty); besides, their having the
 right of election and calling their magistrates to account for their
 conduct when they come out of office, will satisfy their desire of
 honours, if any of them entertain that passion: for in some states,
 though the commonalty have not the right of electing the magistrates,
 yet it is vested in part of that body chosen to represent them: and it
 is sufficient for the people at large to possess the deliberative power:
 and this ought to be considered as a species of democracy; such was that
 formerly at Mantinsea: for which reason it is proper for the democracy
 we have been now treating of to have a power (and it has been usual for
 them to have it) of censuring their magistrates when out of office,
 and sitting in judgment upon all causes: but that the chief magistrates
 should be elected, and according to a certain census, which should vary
 with the rank of their office, or else not by a census, but according
 to their abilities for their respective appointments. A state thus
 constituted must be well constituted; for the magistracies will be
 always filled with the best men with the approbation of the people;
 who will not envy their superiors: and these and the nobles should
 be content with this part in the administration; for they will not be
 governed by their inferiors. They will be also careful to use their
 power with moderation, as there are others to whom full power is
 delegated to censure their conduct; for it is very serviceable to the
 state to have them dependent upon others, and not to be permitted to do
 whatsoever they choose; for with such a liberty there would be no check
 to that evil particle there is in every one: therefore it is [1319a]
 necessary and most for the benefit of the state that the offices thereof
 should be filled by the principal persons in it, whose characters are
 unblemished, and that the people are not oppressed. It is now evident
 that this is the best species of democracy, and on what account; because
 the people are such and have such powers as they ought to have. To
 establish a democracy of husbandmen some of those laws which were
 observed in many ancient states are universally useful; as, for
 instance, on no account to permit any one to possess more than a certain
 quantity of land, or within a certain distance from the city. Formerly
 also, in some states, no one was allowed to sell their original lot of
 land. They also mention a law of one Oxylus, which forbade any one to
 add to their patrimony by usury. We ought also to follow the law of
 the Aphutaeans, as useful to direct us in this particular we are now
 speaking of; for they having but very little ground, while they were
 a numerous people, and at the same time were all husbandmen, did not
 include all their lands within the census, but divided them in such a
 manner that, according to the census, the poor had more power than
 the rich. Next to the commonalty of husbandmen is one of shepherds and
 herdsmen; for they have many things in common with them, and, by their
 way of life, are excellently qualified to make good soldiers, stout in
 body, and able to continue in the open air all night. The generality of
 the people of whom other democracies are composed are much worse than
 these; for their lives are wretched nor have they any business with
 virtue in anything they do; these are your mechanics, your exchange-men,
 and hired servants; as all these sorts of men frequent the exchange and
 the citadel, they can readily attend the public assembly; whereas the
 husbandmen, being more dispersed in the country, cannot so easily meet
 together; nor are they equally desirous of doing it with these others!
 When a country happens to be so situated that a great part of the land
 lies at a distance from the city, there it is easy to establish a good
 democracy or a free state for the people in general will be obliged to
 live in the country; so that it will be necessary in such a democracy,
 though there may be an exchange-mob at hand, never to allow a legal
 assembly without the inhabitants of the country attend. We have shown in
 what manner the first and best democracy ought to be established, and it
 will be equally evident as to the rest, for from these we [1319b] should
 proceed as a guide, and always separate the meanest of the people from
 the rest. But the last and worst, which gives to every citizen without
 distinction a share in every part of the administration, is what few
 citizens can bear, nor is it easy to preserve for any long time, unless
 well supported by laws and manners. We have already noticed almost every
 cause that can destroy either this or any other state. Those who have
 taken the lead in such a democracy have endeavoured to support it, and
 make the people powerful by collecting together as many persons as they
 could and giving them their freedom, not only legitimately but naturally
 born, and also if either of their parents were citizens, that is to say,
 if either their father or mother; and this method is better suited to
 this state than any other: and thus the demagogues have usually managed.
 They ought, however, to take care, and do this no longer than the common
 people are superior to the nobles and those of the middle rank, and
 then stop; for, if they proceed still further, they will make the
 state disorderly, and the nobles will ill brook the power of the common
 people, and be full of resentment against it; which was the cause of
 an insurrection at Cyrene: for a little evil is overlooked, but when it
 becomes a great one it strikes the eye. It is, moreover, very-useful in
 such a state to do as Clisthenes did at Athens, when he was desirous of
 increasing the power of the people, and as those did who established the
 democracy in Cyrene; that is, to institute many tribes and fraternities,
 and to make the religious rites of private persons few, and those
 common; and every means is to be contrived to associate and blend the
 people together as much as possible; and that all former customs be
 broken through. Moreover, whatsoever is practised in a tyranny
 seems adapted to a democracy of this species; as, for instance, the
 licentiousness of the slaves, the women, and the children; for this to
 a certain degree is useful in such a state; and also to overlook every
 one's living as they choose; for many will support such a government:
 for it is more agreeable to many to live without any control than as
 prudence would direct.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V
 
 
 It is also the business of the legislator and all those who would
 support a government of this sort not to make it too great a work, or
 too perfect; but to aim only to render it stable: for, let a state be
 constituted ever so badly, there is no difficulty in its continuing a
 few days: they should therefore endeavour to procure its safety by
 all those ways which we have described in assigning the causes of the
 preservation and destruction of governments; avoiding what is hurtful,
 and by framing such laws, written and unwritten, as contain those things
 which chiefly tend to the preservation of the state; nor to suppose that
 that is useful either for a democratic or [1320a] an oligarchic form of
 government which contributes to make them more purely so, but what will
 contribute to their duration: but our demagogues at present, to flatter
 the people, occasion frequent confiscations in the courts; for which
 reason those who have the welfare of the state really at heart should
 act directly opposite to what they do, and enact a law to prevent
 forfeitures from being divided amongst the people or paid into the
 treasury, but to have them set apart for sacred uses: for those who
 are of a bad disposition would not then be the less cautious, as their
 punishment would be the same; and the community would not be so ready to
 condemn those whom they sat in judgment on when they were to get nothing
 by it: they should also take care that the causes which are brought
 before the public should be as few as possible, and punish with the
 utmost severity those who rashly brought an action against any one; for
 it is not the commons but the nobles who are generally prosecuted: for
 in all things the citizens of the same state ought to be affectionate to
 each other, at least not to treat those who have the chief power in
 it as their enemies. Now, as the democracies which have been lately
 established are very numerous, and it is difficult to get the common
 people to attend the public assemblies without they are paid for it,
 this, when there is not a sufficient public revenue, is fatal to the
 nobles; for the deficiencies therein must be necessarily made up by
 taxes, confiscations, and fines imposed by corrupt courts of justice:
 which things have already destroyed many democracies. Whenever, then,
 the revenues of the state are small, there should be but few public
 assemblies and but few courts of justice: these, however, should have
 very extensive jurisdictions, but should continue sitting a few days
 only, for by this means the rich would not fear the expense, although
 they should receive nothing for their attendance, though the poor did;
 and judgment also would be given much better; for the rich will not
 choose to be long absent from their own affairs, but will willingly
 be so for a short time: and, when there are sufficient revenues, a
 different conduct ought to be pursued from what the demagogues at
 present follow; for now they divide the surplus of the public money
 amongst the poor; these receive it and again want the same supply, while
 the giving it is like pouring water into a sieve: but the true patriot
 in a democracy ought to take care that the majority of the community are
 not too poor, for this is the cause of rapacity in that government; he
 therefore should endeavour that they may enjoy perpetual plenty; and
 as this also is advantageous to the rich, what can be saved out of the
 public money should be put by, and then divided at once amongst the
 poor, if possible, in such a quantity as may enable every one of them to
 purchase a little field, and, if that cannot be done, at least to give
 each of them enough to procure the implements [1320b] of trade and
 husbandry; and if there is not enough for all to receive so much at
 once, then to divide it according to tribes or any other allotment. In
 the meantime let the rich pay them for necessary services, but not be
 obliged to find them in useless amusements. And something like this
 was the manner in which they managed at Carthage, and preserved the
 affections of the people; for by continually sending some of their
 community into colonies they procured plenty. It is also worthy of a
 sensible and generous nobility to divide the poor amongst them, and
 supplying them with what is necessary, induce them to work; or to
 imitate the conduct of the people at Tarentum: for they, permitting the
 poor to partake in common of everything which is needful for them, gain
 the affections of the commonalty. They have also two different ways of
 electing their magistrates; for some are chosen by vote, others by
 lot; by the last, that the people at large may have some share in the
 administration; by the former, that the state may be well governed: the
 same may be accomplished if of the same magistrates you choose some by
 vote, others by lot. And thus much for the manner in which democracies
 ought to be established.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI
 
 
 What has been already said will almost of itself sufficiently show how
 an oligarchy ought to be founded; for he who would frame such a state
 should have in his view a democracy to oppose it; for every species of
 oligarchy should be founded on principles diametrically opposite to some
 species of democracy.
 
 The first and best-framed oligarchy is that which approaches near to
 what we call a free state; in which there ought to be two different
 census, the one high, the other low: from those who are within the
 latter the ordinary officers of the state ought to be chosen; from the
 former the supreme magistrates: nor should any one be excluded from a
 part of the administration who was within the census; which should be
 so regulated that the commonalty who are included in it should by means
 thereof be superior to those who have no share in the government; for
 those who are to have the management of public affairs ought always to
 be chosen out of the better sort of the people. Much in the same manner
 ought that oligarchy to be established which is next in order: but as to
 that which is most opposite to a pure democracy, and approaches nearest
 to a dynasty and a tyranny, as it is of all others the worst, so it
 requires the greatest care and caution to preserve it: for as bodies of
 sound and healthy constitutions and ships which are well manned and
 well found for sailing can bear many injuries without perishing, while
 a diseased body or a leaky ship with an indifferent crew cannot support
 the [1321a] least shock; so the worst-established governments want most
 looking after. A number of citizens is the preservation of a democracy;
 for these are opposed to those rights which are founded in rank: on
 the contrary, the preservation of an oligarchy depends upon the due
 regulation of the different orders in the society.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII
 
 
 As the greater part of the community are divided into four sorts of
 people; husbandmen, mechanics, traders, and hired servants; and as those
 who are employed in war may likewise be divided into four; the horsemen,
 the heavy-armed soldier, the light-armed, and the sailor, where the
 nature of the country can admit a great number of horse; there a
 powerful oligarchy may be easily established: for the safety of the
 inhabitants depends upon a force of that sort; but those who can support
 the expense of horsemen must be persons of some considerable fortune.
 Where the troops are chiefly heavy-armed, there an oligarchy, inferior
 in power to the other, may be established; for the heavy-armed are
 rather made up of men of substance than the poor: but the light-armed
 and the sailors always contribute to support a democracy: but where the
 number of these is very great and a sedition arises, the other parts of
 the community fight at a disadvantage; but a remedy for this evil is
 to be learned from skilful generals, who always mix a proper number of
 light-armed soldiers with their horse and heavy-armed: for it is with
 those that the populace get the better of the men of fortune in an
 insurrection; for these being lighter are easily a match for the horse
 and the heavy-armed: so that for an oligarchy to form a body of troops
 from these is to form it against itself: but as a city is composed of
 persons of different ages, some young and some old, the fathers should
 teach their sons, while they were very young, a light and easy exercise;
 but, when they are grown up, they should be perfect in every warlike
 exercise. Now, the admission of the people to any share in the
 government should either be (as I said before) regulated by a census, or
 else, as at Thebes, allowed to those who for a certain time have ceased
 from any mechanic employment, or as at Massalia, where they are chosen
 according to their worth, whether citizens or foreigners. With respect
 to the magistrates of the highest rank which it may be necessary to
 have in a state, the services they are bound to do the public should be
 expressly laid down, to prevent the common people from being desirous
 of accepting their employments, and also to induce them to regard their
 magistrates with favour when they know what a price they pay for their
 honours. It is also necessary that the magistrates, upon entering into
 their offices, should make magnificent sacrifices and erect some public
 structure, that the people partaking of the entertainment, and seeing
 the city ornamented with votive gifts in their temples and public
 structures, may see with pleasure the stability of the government: add
 to this also, that the nobles will have their generosity recorded: but
 now this is not the conduct which those who are at present at the head
 of an oligarchy pursue, but the contrary; for they are not more desirous
 of honour than of gain; for which reason such oligarchies may more
 properly be called little democracies. Thus [1321b] we have explained on
 what principles a democracy and an oligarchy ought to be established.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII
 
 
 After what has been said I proceed next to treat particularly of the
 magistrates; of what nature they should be, how many, and for what
 purpose, as I have already mentioned: for without necessary magistrates
 no state can exist, nor without those which contribute to its dignity
 and good order can exist happily: now it is necessary that in small
 states the magistrates should be few; in a large one, many: also to
 know well what offices may be joined together, and what ought to be
 separated. The first thing necessary is to establish proper regulators
 in the markets; for which purpose a certain magistrate should be
 appointed to inspect their contracts and preserve good order; for of
 necessity, in almost every city there must be both buyers and sellers to
 supply each other's mutual wants: and this is what is most productive
 of the comforts of life; for the sake of which men seem to have joined
 together in one community. A second care, and nearly related to the
 first, is to have an eye both to the public and private edifices in
 the city, that they may be an ornament; and also to take care of all
 buildings which are likely to fall: and to see that the highways are
 kept in proper repair; and also that the landmarks between different
 estates are preserved, that there may be no disputes on that account;
 and all other business of the same nature. Now, this business may be
 divided into several branches, over each of which in populous cities
 they appoint a separate person; one to inspect the buildings, another
 the fountains, another the harbours; and they are called the inspectors
 of the city. A third, which is very like the last, and conversant nearly
 about the same objects, only in the country, is to take care of what
 is done out of the city. The officers who have this employment we call
 inspectors of the lands, or inspectors of the woods; but the business
 of all three of them is the same. There must also be other officers
 appointed to receive the public revenue and to deliver it out to those
 who are in the different departments of the state: these are called
 receivers or quaestors. There must also be another, before whom all
 private contracts and sentences of courts should be enrolled, as well
 as proceedings and declarations. Sometimes this employment is divided
 amongst many, but there is one supreme over the rest; these are called
 proctors, notaries, and the like. Next to these is an officer whose
 business is of all others the most necessary, and yet most difficult;
 namely, to take care that sentence is executed upon those who are
 condemned; and that every one pays the fines laid on him; and also to
 have the charge of those who are in prison. [1322a] This office is very
 disagreeable on account of the odium attending it, so that no one will
 engage therein without it is made very profitable, or, if they do,
 will they be willing to execute it according to law; but it is most
 necessary, as it is of no service to pass judgment in any cause without
 that judgment is carried into execution: for without this human society
 could not subsist: for which reason it is best that this office should
 not be executed by one person, but by some of the magistrates of the
 other courts. In like manner, the taking care that those fines which
 are ordered by the judges are levied should be divided amongst different
 persons. And as different magistrates judge different causes, let the
 causes of the young be heard by the young: and as to those which are
 already brought to a hearing, let one person pass sentence, and another
 see it executed: as, for instance, let the magistrates who have the care
 of the public buildings execute the sentence which the inspectors of
 the markets have passed, and the like in other cases: for by so much the
 less odium attends those who carry the laws into execution, by so much
 the easier will they be properly put in force: therefore for the same
 persons to pass the sentence and to execute it will subject them to
 general hatred; and if they pass it upon all, they will be considered
 as the enemies of all. Thus one person has often the custody of the
 prisoner's body, while another sees the sentence against him executed,
 as the eleven did at Athens: for which reason it is prudent to separate
 these offices, and to give great attention thereunto as equally
 necessary with anything we have already mentioned; for it will certainly
 happen that men of character will decline accepting this office, and
 worthless persons cannot properly be entrusted with it, as having
 themselves rather an occasion for a guard than being qualified to guard
 others. This, therefore, ought by no means to be a separate office from
 others; nor should it be continually allotted to any individuals, but
 the young men; where there is a city-guard, the youths ought in turns
 to take these offices upon them. These, then, as the most necessary
 magistrates, ought to be first mentioned: next to these are others no
 less necessary, but of much higher rank, for they ought to be men of
 great skill and fidelity. These are they who have the guard of the city,
 and provide everything that is necessary for war; whose business it is,
 both in war and peace, to defend the walls and the gates, and to take
 care to muster and marshal the citizens. Over all these there are
 sometimes more officers, sometimes fewer: thus in little cities there is
 only one whom they call either general or polemarch; but where there are
 horse and light-armed troops, and bowmen, and sailors, they sometimes
 put distinct commanders over each of these; who again have others under
 them, according to their different divisions; all of which join together
 to make one military body: and thus much for this department. Since some
 of the magistrates, if not all, have business with the public money,
 it is necessary that there should be other officers, whose employment
 should be nothing else than to take an account of what they have, and
 correct any mismanagement therein. But besides all these magistrates
 there is one who is supreme over them all, who very often has in his own
 power the disposal of the public revenue and taxes; who presides over
 the people when the supreme power is in them; for there must be some
 magistrate who has a power to summon them together, and to preside as
 head of the state. These are sometimes called preadvisers; but where
 there are many, more properly a council. These are nearly the civil
 magistrates which are requisite to a government: but there are other
 persons whose business is confined to religion; as the priests, and
 those who are to take care of the temples, that they are kept in proper
 repair, or, if they fall down, that they may be rebuilt; and whatever
 else belongs to public worship. This charge is sometimes entrusted to
 one person, as in very small cities: in others it is delegated to many,
 and these distinct from the priesthood, as the builders or keepers of
 holy places, and officers of the sacred revenue. Next to these are
 those who are appointed to have the general care of all those public
 sacrifices to the tutelar god of the state, which the laws do not
 entrust to the priests: and these in different states have different
 appellations. To enumerate in few words the different departments of
 all those magistrates who are necessary: these are either religion,
 war, taxes, expenditures, markets, public buildings, harbours, highways.
 Belonging to the courts of justice there are scribes to enroll private
 contracts; and there must also be guards set over the prisoners, others
 to see the law is executed, council on either side, and also others to
 watch over the conduct of those who are to decide the causes. Amongst
 the magistrates also may finally be reckoned those who are to give their
 advice in public affairs. But separate states, who are peculiarly happy
 and have leisure to attend to more minute particulars, and are very
 attentive to good order, require particular magistrates for themselves;
 such as those who have the government of the women; who are to see the
 laws are executed; who take care of the boys and preside over their
 education. To these may be added those who have the care of their
 gymnastic exercises, [1323a] their theatres, and every other public
 spectacle which there may happen to be. Some of these, however, are not
 of general use; as the governors of the women: for the poor are obliged
 to employ their wives and children in servile offices for want of
 slaves. As there are three magistrates to whom some states entrust the
 supreme power; namely, guardians of the laws, preadvisers, and senators;
 guardians of the laws suit best to an aristocracy, preadvisers to an
 oligarchy, and a senate to a democracy. And thus much briefly concerning
 all magistrates.
 
 
 
 
 BOOK VII
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I
 
 
 He who proposes to make that inquiry which is necessary concerning what
 government is best, ought first to determine what manner of living is
 most eligible; for while this remains uncertain it will also be equally
 uncertain what government is best: for, provided no unexpected accidents
 interfere, it is highly probable, that those who enjoy the best
 government will live the most happily according to their circumstances;
 he ought, therefore, first to know what manner of life is most desirable
 for all; and afterwards whether this life is the same to the man and
 the citizen, or different. As I imagine that I have already sufficiently
 shown what sort of life is best in my popular discourses on that
 subject, I think I may very properly repeat the same here; as most
 certainly no one ever called in question the propriety of one of the
 divisions; namely, that as what is good, relative to man, may be divided
 into three sorts, what is external, what appertains to the body, and
 what to the soul, it is evident that all these must conspire to make
 a man happy: for no one would say that a man was happy who had no
 fortitude, no temperance, no justice, no prudence; but was afraid of the
 flies that flew round him: nor would abstain from the meanest theft if
 he was either hungry or dry, or would murder his dearest friend for
 a farthing; and also was in every particular as wanting in his
 understanding as an infant or an idiot. These truths are so evident that
 all must agree to them; though some may dispute about the quantity and
 the degree: for they may think, that a very little virtue is sufficient
 for happiness; but for riches, property, power, honour, and all such
 things, they endeavour to increase them without bounds: but to such we
 reply, that it is easy to prove from what experience teaches us in these
 cases, that these external goods produce not virtue, but virtue them.
 As to a happy life, whether it is to be found in pleasure or virtue or
 both, certain it is, that those whose morals are most pure, and whose
 understandings are best cultivated, will enjoy more of it, although
 their fortune is but moderate than those do who own an exuberance of
 wealth, are deficient in those; and this utility any one who reflects
 may easily convince himself of; for whatsoever is external has its
 boundary, as a machine, and whatsoever is useful in its excess is either
 necessarily hurtful, or at best useless to the possessor; but every good
 quality of the soul the higher it is in degree, so much the more useful
 it is, if it is permitted on this subject to use the word useful as well
 as noble. It is also very evident, that the accidents of each subject
 take place of each other, as the subjects themselves, of which we allow
 they are accidents, differ from each other in value; so that if the soul
 is more noble than any outward possession, as the body, both in itself
 and with respect to us, it must be admitted of course that the best
 accidents of each must follow the same analogy. Besides, it is for the
 sake of the soul that these things are desirable; and it is on this
 account that wise men should desire them, not the soul for them. Let us
 therefore be well assured, that every one enjoys as much happiness as he
 possesses virtue and wisdom, and acts according to their dictates; since
 for this we have the example of GOD Himself, _who is completely happy,
 not from any external good, but in Himself, and because such is His
 nature_. For good fortune is something different from happiness, as every
 good which depends not on the mind is owing to chance or fortune; but
 it is not from fortune that any one is wise and just: hence it follows,
 that that city is happiest which is the best and acts best: for no one
 can do well who acts not well; nor can the deeds either of man or city
 be praiseworthy without virtue and wisdom; for whatsoever is just, or
 wise, or prudent in a man, the same things are just, wise, and prudent
 in a city.
 
 Thus much by way of introduction; for I could not but just touch upon
 this subject, though I could not go through a complete investigation
 of it, as it properly belongs to another question: let us at present
 suppose so much, that a man's happiest life, both as an individual and
 as a citizen, is a life of virtue, accompanied with those enjoyments
 which virtue usually procures. If [1324a] there are any who are not
 convinced by what I have said, their doubts shall be answered hereafter,
 at present we shall proceed according to our intended method.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II
 
 
 It now remains for us to say whether the happiness of any individual
 man and the city is the same or different: but this also is evident; for
 whosoever supposes that riches will make a person happy, must place the
 happiness of the city in riches if it possesses them; those who prefer a
 life which enjoys a tyrannic power over others will also think, that the
 city which has many others under its command is most happy: thus also
 if any one approves a man for his virtue, he will think the most worthy
 city the happiest: but here there are two particulars which require
 consideration, one of which is, whether it is the most eligible life
 to be a member of the community and enjoy the rights of a citizen, or
 whether to live as a stranger, without interfering in public affairs;
 and also what form of government is to be preferred, and what
 disposition of the state is best; whether the whole community should be
 eligible to a share in the administration, or only the greater part, and
 some only: as this, therefore, is a subject of political examination
 and speculation, and not what concerns the individual, and the first of
 these is what we are at present engaged in, the one of these I am not
 obliged to speak to, the other is the proper business of my present
 design. It is evident that government must be the best which is so
 established, that every one therein may have it in his power to act
 virtuously and live happily: but some, who admit that a life of virtue
 is most eligible, still doubt which is preferable a public life of
 active virtue, or one entirely disengaged from what is without and
 spent in contemplation; which some say is the only one worthy of a
 philosopher; and one of these two different modes of life both now
 and formerly seem to have been chosen by all those who were the most
 virtuous men; I mean the public or philosophic. And yet it is of no
 little consequence on which side the truth lies; for a man of sense
 must naturally incline to the better choice; both as an individual and a
 citizen. Some think that a tyrannic government over those near us is
 the greatest injustice; but that a political one is not unjust: but that
 still is a restraint on the pleasures and tranquillity of life. Others
 hold the quite contrary opinion, and think that a public and active life
 is the only life for man: for that private persons have no opportunity
 of practising any one virtue, more than they have who are engaged
 in public life the management of the [1324b] state. These are their
 sentiments; others say, that a tyrannical and despotical mode of
 government is the only happy one; for even amongst some free states the
 object of their laws seems to be to tyrannise over their neighbours: so
 that the generality of political institutions, wheresoever dispersed,
 if they have any one common object in view, have all of them this,
 to conquer and govern. It is evident, both from the laws of the
 Lacedaemonians and Cretans, as well as by the manner in which they
 educated their children, that all which they had in view was to make
 them soldiers: besides, among all nations, those who have power enough
 and reduce others to servitude are honoured on that account; as were the
 Scythians, Persians, Thracians, and Gauls: with some there are laws to
 heighten the virtue of courage; thus they tell us that at Carthage they
 allowed every person to wear as many rings for distinction as he had
 served campaigns. There was also a law in Macedonia, that a man who had
 not himself killed an enemy should be obliged to wear a halter; among
 the Scythians, at a festival, none were permitted to drink out of
 the cup was carried about who had not done the same thing. Among the
 Iberians, a warlike nation, they fixed as many columns upon a man's tomb
 as he had slain enemies: and among different nations different things
 of this sort prevail, some of them established by law, others by custom.
 Probably it may seem too absurd to those who are willing to take this
 subject into their consideration to inquire whether it is the business
 of a legislator to be able to point out by what means a state may govern
 and tyrannise over its neighbours, whether they will, or will not: for
 how can that belong either to the politician or legislator which is
 unlawful? for that cannot be lawful which is done not only justly, but
 unjustly also: for a conquest may be unjustly made. But we see nothing
 of this in the arts: for it is the business neither of the physician nor
 the pilot to use either persuasion or force, the one to his patients,
 the other to his passengers: and yet many seem to think a despotic
 government is a political one, and what they would not allow to be just
 or proper, if exercised over themselves, they will not blush to exercise
 over others; for they endeavour to be wisely governed themselves, but
 think it of no consequence whether others are so or not: but a despotic
 power is absurd, except only where nature has framed the one party for
 dominion, the other for subordination; and therefore no one ought to
 assume it over all in general, but those only which are the proper
 objects thereof: thus no one should hunt men either for food or
 sacrifice, but what is fit for those purposes, and these are wild
 animals which are eatable.
 
 Now a city which is well governed might be very [1325a] happy in itself
 while it enjoyed a good system of laws, although it should happen to be
 so situated as to have no connection with any other state, though its
 constitution should not be framed for war or conquest; for it would then
 have no occasion for these. It is evident therefore that the business of
 war is to be considered as commendable, not as a final end, but as the
 means of procuring it. It is the duty of a good legislator to examine
 carefully into his state; and the nature of the people, and how they may
 partake of every intercourse, of a good life, and of the happiness which
 results from it: and in this respect some laws and customs differ from
 others. It is also the duty of a legislator, if he has any neighbouring
 states to consider in what manner he shall oppose each of them, or what
 good offices he shall show them. But what should be the final end of the
 best governments will be considered hereafter.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III
 
 
 We will now speak to those who, while they agree that a life of virtue
 is most eligible, yet differ in the use of it addressing ourselves to
 both these parties; for there are some who disapprove of all political
 governments, and think that the life of one who is really free is
 different from the life of a citizen, and of all others most eligible:
 others again think that the citizen is the best; and that it is
 impossible for him who does nothing to be well employed; but that
 virtuous activity and happiness are the same thing. Now both parties in
 some particulars say what is right, in others what is wrong, thus, that
 the life of a freeman is better than the life of a slave is true, for
 a slave, as a slave, is employed in nothing honourable; for the common
 servile employments which he is commanded to perform have nothing
 virtuous in them; but, on the other hand, it is not true that a
 submission to all sorts of governments is slavery; for the government of
 freemen differs not more from the government of slaves than slavery and
 freedom differ from each other in their nature; and how they do has been
 already mentioned. To prefer doing of nothing to virtuous activity is
 also wrong, for happiness consists in action, and many noble ends are
 produced by the actions of the just and wise. From what we have already
 determined on this subject, some one probably may think, that supreme
 power is of all things best, as that will enable a man to command very
 many useful services from others; so that he who can obtain this ought
 not to give it up to another, but rather to seize it: and, for this
 purpose, the father should have no attention or regard for the son, or
 the son for the father, or friend for friend; for what is best is most
 eligible: but to be a member of the community and be in felicity is
 best. What these persons advance might probably be true, if the supreme
 good was certainly theirs who plunder and use violence to others: but
 it is [1325b] most unlikely that it should be so; for it is a mere
 supposition: for it does not follow that their actions are honourable
 who thus assume the supreme power over others, without they were by
 nature as superior to them as a man to a woman, a father to a child, a
 master to a slave: so that he who so far forsakes the paths of virtue
 can never return back from whence he departed from them: for amongst
 equals whatever is fair and just ought to be reciprocal; for this is
 equal and right; but that equals should not partake of what is equal, or
 like to like, is contrary to nature: but whatever is contrary to nature
 is not right; therefore, if there is any one superior to the rest of the
 community in virtue and abilities for active life, him it is proper to
 follow, him it is right to obey, but the one alone will not do, but must
 be joined to the other also: and, if we are right in what we have now
 said, it follows that happiness consists in virtuous activity, and that
 both with respect to the community as well as the individual an active
 life is the happiest: not that an active life must necessarily refer to
 other persons, as some think, or that those studies alone are practical
 which are pursued to teach others what to do; for those are much more
 so whose final object is in themselves, and to improve the judgment and
 understanding of the man; for virtuous activity has an end, therefore
 is something practical; nay, those who contrive the plan which others
 follow are more particularly said to act, and are superior to the
 workmen who execute their designs. But it is not necessary that states
 which choose to have no intercourse with others should remain inactive;
 for the several members thereof may have mutual intercourse with each
 other; for there are many opportunities for this among the different
 citizens; the same thing is true of every individual: for, was it
 otherwise, neither could the Deity nor the universe be perfect; to
 neither of whom can anything external separately exist. Hence it is
 evident that that very same life which is happy for each individual is
 happy also for the state and every member of it.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV
 
 
 As I have now finished what was introductory to this subject, and
 considered at large the nature of other states, it now remains that I
 should first say what ought to be the establishment of a city which one
 should form according to one's wish; for no good state can exist without
 a moderate proportion of what is necessary. Many things therefore
 ought to be forethought of as desirable, but none of them such as are
 impossible: I mean relative to the number of citizens and the extent
 of the territory: for as other artificers, such as the weaver and the
 shipwright, ought to have such materials as are fit for their work,
 since so much the better they are, by so much [1326a] superior will the
 work itself necessarily be; so also ought the legislator and politician
 endeavour to procure proper materials for the business they have in
 hand. Now the first and principal instrument of the politician is the
 number of the people; he should therefore know how many, and what they
 naturally ought to be: in like manner the country, how large, and what
 it is. Most persons think that it is necessary for a city to be large to
 be happy: but, should this be true, they cannot tell what is a large one
 and what a small one; for according to the multitude of the inhabitants
 they estimate the greatness of it; but they ought rather to consider its
 strength than its numbers; for a state has a certain object in view, and
 from the power which it has in itself of accomplishing it, its greatness
 ought to be estimated; as a person might say, that Hippocrates was a
 greater physician, though not a greater man, than one that exceeded him
 in the size of his body: but if it was proper to determine the strength
 of the city from the number of the inhabitants, it should never be
 collected from the multitude in general who may happen to be in it;
 for in a city there must necessarily be many slaves, sojourners, and
 foreigners; but from those who are really part of the city and properly
 constitute its members; a multitude of these is indeed a proof of a
 large city, but in a state where a large number of mechanics inhabit,
 and but few soldiers, such a state cannot be great; for the greatness of
 the city, and the number of men in it, are not the same thing. This too
 is evident from fact, that it is very difficult, if not impossible, to
 govern properly a very numerous body of men; for of all the states which
 appear well governed we find not one where the rights of a citizen are
 open to an indiscriminate multitude. And this is also evident from the
 nature of the thing; for as law is a certain order, so good law is of
 course a certain good order: but too large a multitude are incapable of
 this, unless under the government of that DIVINE POWER which comprehends
 the universe. Not but that, as quantity and variety are usually
 essential to beauty, the perfection of a city consists in the largeness
 of it as far as that largeness is consistent with that order already
 mentioned: but still there is a determinate size to all cities, as well
 as everything else, whether animals, plants, or machines, for each of
 these, if they are neither too little nor too big, have their
 proper powers; but when they have not their due growth, or are badly
 constructed, as a ship a span long is not properly a ship, nor one of
 two furlongs length, but when it is of a fit size; for either from its
 smallness or from its largeness it may be quite useless: so is it with
 a city; one that is too small has not [1326b] in itself the power of
 self-defence, but this is essential to a city: one that is too large is
 capable of self-defence in what is necessary; but then it is a nation
 and not a city: for it will be very difficult to accommodate a form
 of government to it: for who would choose to be the general of such
 an unwieldy multitude, or who could be their herald but a stentor? The
 first thing therefore necessary is, that a city should consist of such
 numbers as will be sufficient to enable the inhabitants to live
 happily in their political community: and it follows, that the more the
 inhabitants exceed that necessary number the greater will the city be:
 but this must not be, as we have already said, without bounds; but what
 is its proper limit experience will easily show, and this experience is
 to be collected from the actions both of the governors and the governed.
 Now, as it belongs to the first to direct the inferior magistrates and
 to act as judges, it follows that they can neither determine causes
 with justice nor issue their orders with propriety without they know the
 characters of their fellow-citizens: so that whenever this happens not
 to be done in these two particulars, the state must of necessity be
 badly managed; for in both of them it is not right to determine too
 hastily and without proper knowledge, which must evidently be the case
 where the number of the citizens is too many: besides, it is more easy
 for strangers and sojourners to assume the rights of citizens, as they
 will easily escape detection in so great a multitude. It is evident,
 then, that the best boundary for a city is that wherein the numbers are
 the greatest possible, that they may be the better able to be sufficient
 in themselves, while at the same time they are not too large to be under
 the eye and government of the magistrates. And thus let us determine the
 extent of a city.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V
 
 
 What we have said concerning a city may nearly be applied to a country;
 for as to what soil it should be, every one evidently will commend it
 if it is such as is sufficient in itself to furnish what will make the
 inhabitants happy; for which purpose it must be able to supply them
 with all the necessaries of life; for it is the having these in plenty,
 without any want, which makes them content. As to its extent, it should
 be such as may enable the inhabitants to live at their ease with freedom
 and temperance. Whether we have done right or wrong in fixing this limit
 to the territory shall be considered more minutely hereafter, when
 we come particularly to inquire into property, and what fortune is
 requisite for a man to live on, and how and in what manner they ought
 to employ it; for there are many doubts upon this question, while each
 party insists upon their own plan of life being carried to an excess,
 the one of severity, the other of indulgence. What the situation of the
 country should be it is not difficult to determine, in some particulars
 respecting that we ought to be advised by those who are skilful in
 military affairs. It should be difficult of access to an enemy, but
 easy to the inhabitants: and as we said, that the number of [1327a]
 inhabitants ought to be such as can come under the eye of the
 magistrate, so should it be with the country; for then it is easily
 defended. As to the position of the city, if one could place it to one's
 wish, it is convenient to fix it on the seaside: with respect to
 the country, one situation which it ought to have has been already
 mentioned, namely, that it should be so placed as easily to give
 assistance to all places, and also to receive the necessaries of life
 from all parts, and also wood, or any other materials which may happen
 to be in the country.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI
 
 
 But with respect to placing a city in the neighbourhood of the sea,
 there are some who have many doubts whether it is serviceable or hurtful
 to a well-regulated state; for they say, that the resort of persons
 brought up under a different system of government is disserviceable
 to the state, as well by impeding the laws as by their numbers; for a
 multitude of merchants must necessarily arise from their trafficking
 backward and forward upon the seas, which will hinder the well-governing
 of the city: but if this inconvenience should not arise, it is evident
 that it is better, both on account of safety and also for the easier
 acquisition of the necessaries of life, that both the city and the
 country should be near the sea; for it is necessary that those who are
 to sustain the attack of the enemy should be ready with their assistance
 both by land and by sea, and to oppose any inroad, both ways if possible
 but if not, at least where they are most powerful, which they may
 do while they possess both. A maritime situation is also useful for
 receiving from others what your own country will not produce, and
 exporting those necessaries of your own growth which are more than you
 have occasion for; but a city ought to traffic to supply its own wants,
 and not the wants of others; for those who themselves furnish an open
 market for every one, do it for the sake of gain; which it is not proper
 for a well-established state to do, neither should they encourage such
 a commerce. Now, as we see that many places and cities have docks and
 harbours lying very convenient for the city, while those who frequent
 them have no communication with the citadel, and yet they are not too
 far off, but are surrounded by walls and such-like fortifications, it is
 evident, that if any good arises from such an intercourse the city will
 receive it, but if anything hurtful, it will be easy to restrain it by
 a law declaring and deputing whom the state will allow to have an
 intercourse with each other, and whom not. As to a naval power, it is by
 no means doubtful that it is necessary to have one to a certain degree;
 and this not only for the sake of the [1327b] city itself, but also
 because it may be necessary to appear formidable to some of the
 neighbouring states, or to be able to assist them as well by sea as
 by land; but to know how great that force should be, the health of the
 state should be inquired into, and if that appears vigorous and enables
 her to take the lead of other communities, it is necessary that her
 force should correspond with her actions. As for that multitude of
 people which a maritime power creates, they are by no means necessary to
 a state, nor ought they to make a part of the citizens; for the mariners
 and infantry, who have the command, are freemen, and upon these depends
 a naval engagement: but when there are many servants and husbandmen,
 there they will always have a number of sailors, as we now see happens
 to some states, as in Heraclea, where they man many triremes, though
 the extent of their city is much inferior to some others. And thus we
 determine concerning the country, the port, the city, the sea, and a
 maritime power: as to the number of the citizens, what that ought to be
 we have already said.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII
 
 
 We now proceed to point out what natural disposition the members of the
 community ought to be of: but this any one will easily perceive who
 will cast his eye over the states of Greece, of all others the most
 celebrated, and also the other different nations of this habitable
 world. Those who live in cold countries, as the north of Europe, are
 full of courage, but wanting in understanding and the arts: therefore
 they are very tenacious of their liberty; but, not being politicians,
 they cannot reduce their neighbours under their power: but the Asiatics,
 whose understandings are quick, and who are conversant in the arts, are
 deficient in courage; and therefore are always conquered and the
 slaves of others: but the Grecians, placed as it were between these
 two boundaries, so partake of them both as to be at the same time both
 courageous and sensible; for which reason Greece continues free, and
 governed in the best manner possible, and capable of commanding the
 whole world, could they agree upon one system of policy. Now this is the
 difference between the Grecians and other nations, that the latter have
 but one of these qualities, whereas in the former they are both happily
 blended together. Hence it is evident, that those persons ought to be
 both sensible and courageous who will readily obey a legislator, the
 object of whose laws is virtue. As to what some persons say, that the
 military must be mild and tender to those they know, but severe and
 cruel to those they know not, it is courage which [1328a] makes any one
 lovely; for that is the faculty of the soul which we most admire: as
 a proof of this, our resentment rises higher against our friends and
 acquaintance than against those we know not: for which reason Archilaus
 accusing his friends says very properly to himself, Shall my friends
 insult me? The spirit of freedom and command also is what all inherit
 who are of this disposition for courage is commanding and invincible. It
 also is not right for any one to say, that you should be severe to those
 you know not; for this behaviour is proper for no one: nor are those who
 are of a noble disposition harsh in their manners, excepting only to the
 wicked; and when they are particularly so, it is, as has been already
 said, against their friends, when they think they have injured them;
 which is agreeable to reason: for when those who think they ought to
 receive a favour from any one do not receive it, beside the injury done
 them, they consider what they are deprived of: hence the saying, "Cruel
 are the wars of brothers;" and this, "Those who have greatly loved
 do greatly hate." And thus we have nearly determined how many the
 inhabitants of a city ought to be, and what their natural disposition,
 and also the country how large, and of what sort is necessary; I say
 nearly, because it is needless to endeavour at as great accuracy in
 those things which are the objects of the senses as in those which are
 inquired into by the understanding only.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII
 
 
 As in natural bodies those things are not admitted to be parts of them
 without which the whole would not exist, so also it is evident that in
 a political state everything that is necessary thereunto is not to be
 considered as a part of it, nor any other community from whence one
 whole is made; for one thing ought to be common and the same to the
 community, whether they partake of it equally or unequally, as, for
 instance, food, land, or the like; but when one thing is for the benefit
 of one person, and another for the benefit of another, in this there is
 nothing like a community, excepting that one makes it and the other
 uses it; as, for instance, between any instrument employed in making any
 work, and the workmen, as there is nothing common between the house and
 the builder, but the art of the builder is employed on the house. Thus
 property is necessary for states, but property is no part of the state,
 though many species of it have life; but a city is a community of
 equals, for the purpose of enjoying the best life possible: but the
 happiest life is the best which consists in the perfect practice of
 virtuous energies: as therefore some persons have great, others little
 or no opportunity of being employed in these, it is evident that this
 is the cause of the difference there is between the different cities and
 communities there are to be found; for while each of these endeavour to
 acquire what is best by various and different means, they give [1328b]
 rise to different modes of living and different forms of government. We
 are now to consider what those things are without which a city cannot
 possibly exist; for what we call parts of the city must of necessity
 inhere in it: and this we shall plainly understand, if we know the
 number of things necessary to a city: first, the inhabitants must
 have food: secondly, arts, for many instruments are necessary in life:
 thirdly, arms, for it is necessary that the community should have an
 armed force within themselves, both to support their government against
 those of their own body who might refuse obedience to it, and also
 to defend it from those who might attempt to attack it from without:
 fourthly, a certain revenue, as well for the internal necessities of
 the state as for the business of war: fifthly, which is indeed the chief
 concern, a religious establishment: sixthly in order, but first of all
 in necessity, a court to determine both criminal and civil causes. These
 things are absolutely necessary, so to speak, in every state; for a city
 is a number of people not accidentally met together, but with a purpose
 of ensuring to themselves sufficient independency and self-protection;
 and if anything necessary for these purposes is wanting, it is
 impossible that in such a situation these ends can be obtained. It is
 necessary therefore that a city should be capable of acquiring all these
 things: for this purpose a proper number of husbandmen are necessary to
 procure food, also artificers and soldiers, and rich men, and priests
 and judges, to determine what is right and proper.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IX
 
 
 Having determined thus far, it remains that we consider whether all
 these different employments shall be open to all; for it is possible
 to continue the same persons always husbandmen, artificers, judges,
 or counsellors; or shall we appoint different persons to each of those
 employments which we have already mentioned; or shall some of them be
 appropriated to particulars, and others of course common to all? but
 this does not take place in every state, for, as we have already said,
 it is possible that all may be common to all, or not, but only common to
 some; and this is the difference between one government and another:
 for in democracies the whole community partakes of everything, but in
 oligarchies it is different.
 
 Since we are inquiring what is the best government possible, and it is
 admitted to be that in which the citizens are happy; and that, as we
 have already said, it is impossible to obtain happiness without virtue;
 it follows, that in the best-governed states, where the citizens are
 really men of intrinsic and not relative goodness, none of them should
 be permitted to exercise any mechanic employment or follow merchandise,
 as being ignoble and destructive to virtue; neither should they be
 husband-[1329a] men, that they may be at leisure to improve in virtue
 and perform the duty they owe to the state. With respect to the
 employments of a soldier, a senator, and a judge, which are evidently
 necessary to the community, shall they be allotted to different persons,
 or shall the same person execute both? This question, too, is easily
 answered: for in some cases the same persons may execute them, in
 others they should be different, where the different employments require
 different abilities, as when courage is wanting for one, judgment for
 the other, there they should be allotted to different persons; but when
 it is evident, that it is impossible to oblige those who have arms
 in their hands, and can insist on their own terms, to be always under
 command; there these different employments should be trusted to one
 person; for those who have arms in their hands have it in their option
 whether they will or will not assume the supreme power: to these two
 (namely, those who have courage and judgment) the government must be
 entrusted; but not in the same manner, but as nature directs; what
 requires courage to the young, what requires judgment to the old; for
 with the young is courage, with the old is wisdom: thus each will be
 allotted the part they are fit for according to their different merits.
 It is also necessary that the landed property should belong to these
 men; for it is necessary that the citizens should be rich, and these are
 the men proper for citizens; for no mechanic ought to be admitted to the
 rights of a citizen, nor any other sort of people whose employment is
 not entirely noble, honourable, and virtuous; this is evident from the
 principle we at first set out with; for to be happy it is necessary
 to be virtuous; and no one should say that a city is happy while he
 considers only one part of its citizens, but for that purpose he ought
 to examine into all of them. It is evident, therefore, that the landed
 property should belong to these, though it may be necessary for them to
 have husbandmen, either slaves, barbarians, or servants. There remains
 of the different classes of the people whom we have enumerated, the
 priests, for these evidently compose a rank by themselves; for neither
 are they to be reckoned amongst the husbandmen nor the mechanics; for
 reverence to the gods is highly becoming every state: and since the
 citizens have been divided into orders, the military and the council,
 and it is proper to offer due worship to the gods, and since it is
 necessary that those who are employed in their service should have
 nothing else to do, let the business of the priesthood be allotted
 to those who are in years. We have now shown what is necessary to the
 existence of a city, and of what parts it consists, and that husbandmen,
 mechanic, and mercenary servants are necessary to a city; but that
 the parts of it are soldiers and sailors, and that these are always
 different from those, but from each other only occasionally.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER X
 
 
 It seems neither now nor very lately to have been known [1329b] to those
 philosophers who have made politics their study, that a city ought to
 be divided by families into different orders of men; and that the
 husbandmen and soldiers should be kept separate from each other;
 which custom is even to this day preserved in Egypt and in Crete; also
 Sesostris having founded it in Egypt, Minos in Crete. Common meals seem
 also to have been an ancient regulation, and to have been established
 in Crete during the reign of Minos, and in a still more remote period
 in Italy; for those who are the best judges in that country say that
 one Italus being king of AEnotria., from whom the people, changing their
 names, were called Italians instead of AEnotrians, and that part of
 Europe was called Italy which is bounded by the Scylletic Gulf on the
 one side and the Lametic on the other, the distance between which
 is about half a day's journey. This Italus, they relate, made the
 AEnotrians, who were formerly shepherds, husbandmen, and gave them
 different laws from what they had before, and to have been the first who
 established common meals, for which reason some of his descendants still
 use them, and observe some of his laws. The Opici inhabit that part
 which lies towards the Tyrrhenian Sea, who both now are and formerly
 were called Ausonians. The Chones inhabited the part toward Iapigia and
 the Ionian Sea which is called Syrtis. These Chones were descended
 from the AEnotrians. Hence arose the custom of common meals, but the
 separation of the citizens into different families from Egypt: for the
 reign of Sesostris is of much higher antiquity than that of Minos. As
 we ought to think that most other things were found out in a long, nay,
 even in a boundless time (reason teaching us that want would make us
 first invent that which was necessary, and, when that was obtained, then
 those things which were requisite for the conveniences and ornament of
 life), so should we conclude the same with respect to a political state;
 now everything in Egypt bears the marks of the most remote antiquity,
 for these people seem to be the most ancient of all others, and to have
 acquired laws and political order; we should therefore make a proper
 use of what is told us of them, and endeavour to find out what they have
 omitted. We have already said, that the landed property ought to belong
 to the military and those who partake of the government of the state;
 and that therefore the husbandmen should be a separate order of people;
 and how large and of what nature the country ought to be: we will first
 treat of the division of the land, and of the husbandmen, how many and
 of what sort they ought to be; since we by no means hold that property
 ought to be common, as some persons have said, only thus far, in
 friendship, it [1330a] should be their custom to let no citizen want
 subsistence. As to common meals, it is in general agreed that they are
 proper in well-regulated cities; my reasons for approving of them shall
 be mentioned hereafter: they are what all the citizens ought to partake
 of; but it will not be easy for the poor, out of what is their own, to
 furnish as much as they are ordered to do, and supply their own house
 besides. The expense also of religious worship should be defrayed by the
 whole state. Of necessity therefore the land ought to be divided into
 two parts, one of which should belong to the community in general, the
 other to the individuals separately; and each of these parts should
 again be subdivided into two: half of that which belongs to the public
 should be appropriated to maintain the worship of the gods, the other
 half to support the common meals. Half of that which belongs to the
 individuals should be at the extremity of the country, the other half
 near the city, so that these two portions being allotted to each person,
 all would partake of land in both places, which would be both equal and
 right; and induce them to act in concert with greater harmony in any war
 with their neighbours: for when the land is not divided in this manner,
 one party neglects the inroads of the enemy on the borders, the other
 makes it a matter of too much consequence and more than is necessary;
 for which reason in some places there is a law which forbids the
 inhabitants of the borders to have any vote in the council when they are
 debating upon a war which is made against them as their private interest
 might prevent their voting impartially. Thus therefore the country ought
 to be divided and for the reasons before mentioned. Could one have one's
 choice, the husbandmen should by all means be slaves, not of the same
 nation, or men of any spirit; for thus they would be laborious in
 their business, and safe from attempting any novelties: next to these
 barbarian servants are to be preferred, similar in natural disposition
 to these we have already mentioned. Of these, let those who are
 to cultivate the private property of the individual belong to that
 individual, and those who are to cultivate the public territory belong
 to the public. In what manner these slaves ought to be used, and for
 what reason it is very proper that they should have the promise of their
 liberty made them, as a reward for their services, shall be mentioned
 hereafter.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XI
 
 
 We have already mentioned, that both the city and all the country should
 communicate both with the sea and the continent as much as possible.
 There are these four things which we should be particularly desirous of
 in the position of the city with respect to itself: in the first place,
 health is to be consulted as the first thing necessary: now a city
 which fronts the east and receives the winds which blow from thence is
 esteemed most healthful; next to this that which has a northern position
 is to be preferred, as best in winter. It should next be contrived that
 it may have a proper situation for the business of government and for
 defence in war: that in war the citizens may [1330b] have easy access
 to it; but that it may be difficult of access to, and hardly to be taken
 by, the enemy. In the next place particularly, that there may be plenty
 of water, and rivers near at hand: but if those cannot be found, very
 large cisterns must be prepared to save rain-water, so that there may
 be no want of it in case they should be driven into the town in time of
 war. And as great care should be taken of the health of the inhabitants,
 the first thing to be attended to is, that the city should have a good
 situation and a good position; the second is, that they may have good
 water to drink; and this not be negligently taken care of; for what
 we chiefly and most frequently use for the support of the body must
 principally influence the health of it; and this influence is what the
 air and water naturally have: for which reason in all wise governments
 the waters ought to be appropriated to different purposes, and if they
 are not equally good, and if there is not a plenty of necessary water,
 that which is to drink should be separated from that which is for other
 uses. As to fortified places, what is proper for some governments is
 not proper for all; as, for instance, a lofty citadel is proper for a
 monarchy and an oligarchy; a city built upon a plain suits a democracy;
 neither of these for an aristocracy, but rather many strong places. As
 to the form of private houses, those are thought to be best and most
 useful for their different purposes which are distinct and separate
 from each other, and built in the modern manner, after the plan of
 Hippodamus: but for safety in time of war, on the contrary, they should
 be built as they formerly were; for they were such that strangers could
 not easily find their way out of them, and the method of access to
 them such as an enemy could with difficulty find out if he proposed
 to besiege them. A city therefore should have both these sorts of
 buildings, which may easily be contrived if any one will so regulate
 them as the planters do their rows of vines; not that the buildings
 throughout the city should be detached from each other, only in some
 parts of it; thus elegance and safety will be equally consulted. With
 respect to walls, those who say that a courageous people ought not to
 have any, pay too much respect to obsolete notions; particularly as
 we may see those who pride themselves therein continually confuted by
 facts. It is indeed disreputable for those who are equal, or nearly so,
 to the enemy, to endeavour to take refuge within their walls--but since
 it very often happens, that those who make the attack are too powerful
 for the bravery and courage of those few who oppose them to resist,
 if you would not suffer the calamities of war and the insolence of the
 enemy, it must be thought the part of a good soldier to seek for safety
 under the shelter and protection of walls more especially since so many
 missile weapons and machines have been most ingeniously invented to
 besiege cities with. Indeed to neglect surrounding a city with a wall
 would be similar to choosing a country which is easy of access to an
 enemy, or levelling the eminences of it; or as if an individual should
 not have a wall to his house lest it should be thought that the owner
 of it was a coward: nor should this be left unconsidered, that those who
 have a city surrounded with walls may act both ways, either as if it had
 or as if it had not; but where it has not they cannot do this. If this
 is true, it is not only necessary to have walls, but care must be taken
 that they may be a proper ornament to the city, as well as a defence
 in time of war; not only according to the old methods, but the modern
 improvements also: for as those who make offensive war endeavour by
 every way possible to gain advantages over their adversaries, so should
 those who are upon the defensive employ all the means already known, and
 such new ones as philosophy can invent, to defend themselves: for those
 who are well prepared are seldom first attacked.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XII
 
 
 As the citizens in general are to eat at public tables in certain
 companies, and it is necessary that the walls should have bulwarks and
 towers in proper places and at proper distances, it is evident that
 it will be very necessary to have some of these in the towers; let the
 buildings for this purpose be made the ornaments of the walls. As to
 temples for public worship, and the hall for the public tables of
 the chief magistrates, they ought to be built in proper places, and
 contiguous to each other, except those temples which the law or the
 oracle orders to be separate from all other buildings; and let these be
 in such a conspicuous eminence, that they may have every advantage of
 situation, and in the neighbourhood of that part of the city which
 is best fortified. Adjoining to this place there ought to be a large
 square, like that which they call in Thessaly The Square of Freedom, in
 which nothing is permitted to be bought or sold; into which no mechanic
 nor husbandman, nor any such person, should be permitted to enter,
 unless commanded by the magistrates. It will also be an ornament to this
 place if the gymnastic exercises of the elders are performed in it. It
 is also proper, that for performing these exercises the citizens should
 be divided into distinct classes, according to their ages, and that the
 young persons should have proper officers to be with them, and that the
 seniors should be with the magistrates; for having them before their
 eyes would greatly inspire true modesty and ingenuous fear. There ought
 to be another square [1331b] separate from this for buying and selling,
 which should be so situated as to be commodious for the reception
 of goods both by sea and land. As the citizens may be divided into
 magistrates and priests, it is proper that the public tables of
 the priests should be in buildings near the temples. Those of the
 magistrates who preside over contracts, indictments, and such-like, and
 also over the markets, and the public streets near the square, or some
 public way, I mean the square where things are bought and sold; for I
 intended the other for those who are at leisure, and this for necessary
 business. The same order which I have directed here should be observed
 also in the country; for there also their magistrates such as the
 surveyors of the woods and overseers of the grounds, must necessarily
 have their common tables and their towers, for the purpose of protection
 against an enemy. There ought also to be temples erected at proper
 places, both to the gods and the heroes; but it is unnecessary to dwell
 longer and most minutely on these particulars--for it is by no means
 difficult to plan these things, it is rather so to carry them into
 execution; for the theory is the child of our wishes, but the practical
 part must depend upon fortune; for which reason we shall decline saying
 anything farther upon these subjects.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIII
 
 
 We will now show of what numbers and of what sort of people a government
 ought to consist, that the state may be happy and well administered.
 As there are two particulars on which the excellence and perfection of
 everything depend, one of these is, that the object and end proposed
 should be proper; the other, that the means to accomplish it should be
 adapted to that purpose; for it may happen that these may either agree
 or disagree with each other; for the end we propose may be good, but in
 taking the means to obtain it we may err; at other times we may have
 the right and proper means in our power, but the end may be bad,
 and sometimes we may mistake in both; as in the art of medicine the
 physician does not sometimes know in what situation the body ought to
 be, to be healthy; nor what to do to procure the end he aims at. In
 every art and science, therefore, we should be master of this knowledge,
 namely, the proper end, and the means to obtain it. Now it is evident
 that all persons are desirous to live well and be happy; but that some
 have the means thereof in their own power, others not; and this either
 through nature [1332a] or fortune; for many ingredients are necessary to
 a happy life; but fewer to those who are of a good than to those who are
 of a bad disposition. There are others who continually have the means
 of happiness in their own power, but do not rightly apply them. Since
 we propose to inquire what government is best, namely, that by which
 a state may be best administered, and that state is best administered
 where the people are the happiest, it is evident that happiness is a
 thing we should not be unacquainted with. Now, I have already said in
 my treatise on Morals (if I may here make any use of what I have there
 shown), that happiness consists in the energy and perfect practice of
 virtue; and this not relatively, but simply; I mean by relatively, what
 is necessary in some certain circumstances; by simply, what is good and
 fair in itself: of the first sort are just punishments, and restraints
 in a just cause; for they arise from virtue and are necessary, and on
 that account are virtuous; though it is more desirable that neither any
 state nor any individual should stand in need of them; but those actions
 which are intended either to procure honour or wealth are simply good;
 the others eligible only to remove an evil; these, on the contrary, are
 the foundation and means of relative good. A worthy man indeed will bear
 poverty, disease, and other unfortunate accidents with a noble mind;
 but happiness consists in the contrary to these (now we have already
 determined in our treatise on Morals, that he is a man of worth who
 considers what is good because it is virtuous as what is simply good; it
 is evident, therefore, that all the actions of such a one must be worthy
 and simply good): this has led some persons to conclude, that the cause
 of happiness was external goods; which would be as if any one should
 suppose that the playing well upon the lyre was owing to the instrument,
 and not to the art. It necessarily follows from what has been said,
 that some things should be ready at hand and others procured by the
 legislator; for which reason in founding a city we earnestly wish that
 there may be plenty of those things which are supposed to be under the
 dominion of fortune (for some things we admit her to be mistress over);
 but for a state to be worthy and great is not only the work of fortune
 but of knowledge and judgment also. But for a state to be worthy it is
 necessary that those citizens which are in the administration should
 be worthy also; but as in our city every citizen is to be so, we must
 consider how this may be accomplished; for if this is what every one
 could be, and not some individuals only, it would be more desirable; for
 then it would follow, that what might be done by one might be done
 by all. Men are worthy and good three ways; by nature, by custom, by
 reason. In the first place, a man ought to be born a man, and not any
 other animal; that is to say, he ought to have both a body and soul; but
 it avails not to be only born [1332b] with some things, for custom
 makes great alterations; for there are some things in nature capable of
 alteration either way which are fixed by custom, either for the better
 or the worse. Now, other animals live chiefly a life of nature; and in
 very few things according to custom; but man lives according to reason
 also, which he alone is endowed with; wherefore he ought to make all
 these accord with each other; for if men followed reason, and were
 persuaded that it was best to obey her, they would act in many respects
 contrary to nature and custom. What men ought naturally to be, to make
 good members of a community, I have already determined; the rest of
 this discourse therefore shall be upon education; for some things are
 acquired by habit, others by hearing them.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIV
 
 
 As every political community consists of those who govern and of those
 who are governed, let us consider whether during the continuance of
 their lives they ought to be the same persons or different; for it
 is evident that the mode of education should be adapted to this
 distinction. Now, if one man differed from another as much, as we
 believe, the gods and heroes differ from men: in the first place, being
 far their superiors in body; and, secondly, in the soul: so that the
 superiority of the governors over the governed might be evident beyond
 a doubt, it is certain that it would be better for the one always to
 govern, the other always to be governed: but, as this is not easy to
 obtain, and kings are not so superior to those they govern as Scylax
 informs us they are in India, it is evident that for many reasons it is
 necessary that all in their turns should both govern and be governed:
 for it is just that those who are equal should have everything alike;
 and it is difficult for a state to continue which is founded in
 injustice; for all those in the country who are desirous of innovation
 will apply themselves to those who are under the government of the rest,
 and such will be their numbers in the state, that it will be impossible
 for the magistrates to get the better of them. But that the governors
 ought to excel the governed is beyond a doubt; the legislator therefore
 ought to consider how this shall be, and how it may be contrived that
 all shall have their equal share in the administration. Now, with
 respect to this it will be first said, that nature herself has directed
 us in our choice, laying down the selfsame thing when she has made some
 young, others old: the first of whom it becomes to obey, the latter
 to command; for no one when he is young is offended at his being under
 government, or thinks himself too good for it; more especially when he
 considers that he himself shall receive the same honours which he
 pays when he shall arrive at a proper age. In some respects it must be
 acknowledged that the governors and the governed are the same, in others
 they are different; it is therefore necessary that their education
 should be in [1333a] some respect the same, in others different: as they
 say, that he will be a good governor who has first learnt to obey. Now
 of governments, as we have already said, some are instituted for the
 sake of him who commands; others for him who obeys: of the first sort is
 that of the master over the servant; of the latter, that of freemen over
 each other. Now some things which are commanded differ from others; not
 in the business, but in the end proposed thereby: for which reason many
 works, even of a servile nature, are not disgraceful for young freemen
 to perform; for many things which are ordered to be done are not
 honourable or dishonourable so much in their own nature as in the end
 which is proposed, and the reason for which they are undertaken. Since
 then we have determined, that the virtue of a good citizen and good
 governor is the same as of a good man; and that every one before he
 commands should have first obeyed, it is the business of the legislator
 to consider how his citizens may be good men, what education is
 necessary to that purpose, and what is the final object of a good life.
 The soul of man may be divided into two parts; that which has reason in
 itself, and that which hath not, but is capable of obeying its dictates:
 and according to the virtues of these two parts a man is said to be
 good: but of those virtues which are the ends, it will not be difficult
 for those to determine who adopt the division I have already given; for
 the inferior is always for the sake of the superior; and this is equally
 evident both in the works of art as well as in those of nature; but that
 is superior which has reason. Reason itself also is divided into
 two parts, in the manner we usually divide it; the theoretic and the
 practical; which division therefore seems necessary for this part also:
 the same analogy holds good with respect to actions; of which those
 which are of a superior nature ought always to be chosen by those who
 have it in their power; for that is always most eligible to every one
 which will procure the best ends. Now life is divided into labour and
 rest, war and peace; and of what we do the objects are partly necessary
 and useful, partly noble: and we should give the same preference to
 these that we do to the different parts of the soul and its actions,
 as war to procure peace; labour, rest; and the useful, the noble. The
 politician, therefore, who composes a body of laws ought to extend his
 views to everything; the different parts of the soul and their actions;
 more particularly to those things which are of a superior nature and
 ends; and, in the same manner, to the lives of men and their different
 actions.
 
 They ought to be fitted both for labour and war, but rather [1333b] for
 rest and peace; and also to do what is necessary and useful, but rather
 what is fair and noble. It is to those objects that the education of the
 children ought to tend, and of all the youths who want instruction. All
 the Grecian states which now seem best governed, and the legislators who
 founded those states, appear not to have framed their polity with a view
 to the best end, or to every virtue, in their laws and education; but
 eagerly to have attended to what is useful and productive of gain: and
 nearly of the same opinion with these are some persons who have written
 lately, who, by praising the Lacedaemonian state, show they approve of
 the intention of the legislator in making war and victory the end of
 his government. But how contrary to reason this is, is easily proved by
 argument, and has already been proved by facts (but as the generality of
 men desire to have an extensive command, that they may have everything
 desirable in the greater abundance; so Thibron and others who have
 written on that state seem to approve of their legislator for having
 procured them an extensive command by continually enuring them to
 all sorts of dangers and hardships): for it is evident, since the
 Lacedemonians have now no hope that the supreme power will be in their
 own hand, that neither are they happy nor was their legislator wise.
 This also is ridiculous, that while they preserved an obedience to their
 laws, and no one opposed their being governed by them, they lost the
 means of being honourable: but these people understand not rightly
 what sort of government it is which ought to reflect honour on the
 legislator; for a government of freemen is nobler than despotic power,
 and more consonant to virtue. Moreover, neither should a city be thought
 happy, nor should a legislator be commended, because he has so trained
 the people as to conquer their neighbours; for in this there is a
 great inconvenience: since it is evident that upon this principle every
 citizen who can will endeavour to procure the supreme power in his own
 city; which crime the Lacedaemonians accuse Pausanias of, though he
 enjoyed such great honours.
 
 Such reasoning and such laws are neither political, useful nor true: but
 a legislator ought to instil those laws on the minds of men which are
 most useful for them, both in their public and private capacities. The
 rendering a people fit for war, that they may enslave their inferiors
 ought not to be the care of the legislator; but that they may not
 themselves be reduced to slavery by others. In [1334a] the next place,
 he should take care that the object of his government is the safety
 of those who are under it, and not a despotism over all: in the third
 place, that those only are slaves who are fit to be only so. Reason
 indeed concurs with experience in showing that all the attention which
 the legislator pays to the business of war, and all other rules which
 he lays down, should have for their object rest and peace; since most
 of those states (which we usually see) are preserved by war; but, after
 they have acquired a supreme power over those around them, are ruined;
 for during peace, like a sword, they lose their brightness: the fault of
 which lies in the legislator, who never taught them how to be at rest.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XV
 
 
 As there is one end common to a man both as an individual and a citizen,
 it is evident that a good man and a good citizen must have the same
 object in view; it is evident that all the virtues which lead to rest
 are necessary; for, as we have often said, the end of war is peace, of
 labour, rest; but those virtues whose object is rest, and those also
 whose object is labour, are necessary for a liberal life and rest; for
 we want a supply of many necessary things that we may be at rest. A city
 therefore ought to be temperate, brave, and patient; for, according to
 the proverb, "Rest is not for slaves;" but those who cannot bravely face
 danger are the slaves of those who attack them. Bravery, therefore, and
 patience are necessary for labour, philosophy for rest, and temperance
 and justice in both; but these chiefly in time of peace and rest; for
 war obliges men to be just and temperate; but the enjoyment of pleasure,
 with the rest of peace, is more apt to produce insolence; those indeed
 who are easy in their circumstances, and enjoy everything that can
 make them happy, have great occasion for the virtues of temperance and
 justice. Thus if there are, as the poets tell us, any inhabitants in
 the happy isles, to these a higher degree of philosophy, temperance, and
 justice will be necessary, as they live at their ease in the full plenty
 of every sensual pleasure. It is evident, therefore, that these virtues
 are necessary in every state that would be happy or worthy; for he who
 is worthless can never enjoy real good, much less is he qualified to
 be at rest; but can appear good only by labour and being at war, but
 in peace and at rest the meanest of creatures. For which reason virtue
 should not be cultivated as the Lacedaemonians did; for they did not
 differ from others in their opinion concerning the supreme good, but in
 [1334b] imagining this good was to be procured by a particular virtue;
 but since there are greater goods than those of war, it is evident
 that the enjoyment of those which are valuable in themselves should be
 desired, rather than those virtues which are useful in war; but how and
 by what means this is to be acquired is now to be considered. We have
 already assigned three causes on which it will depend; nature, custom,
 and reason, arid shown what sort of men nature must produce for this
 purpose; it remains then that we determine which we shall first begin by
 in education, reason or custom, for these ought always to preserve the
 most entire harmony with each other; for it may happen that reason may
 err from the end proposed, and be corrected by custom. In the first
 place, it is evident that in this as in other things, its beginning
 or production arises from some principle, and its end also arises from
 another principle, which is itself an end. Now, with us, reason and
 intelligence are the end of nature; our production, therefore, and our
 manners ought to be accommodated to both these. In the next place, as
 the soul and the body are two distinct things, so also we see that the
 soul is divided into two parts, the reasoning and not-reasoning, with
 their habits which are two in number, one belonging to each, namely
 appetite and intelligence; and as the body is in production before the
 soul, so is the not-reasoning part of the soul before the reasoning; and
 this is evident; for anger, will and desire are to be seen in children
 nearly as soon as they are born; but reason and intelligence spring up
 as they grow to maturity. The body, therefore, necessarily demands our
 care before the soul; next the appetites for the sake of the mind; the
 body for the sake of the soul.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVI
 
 
 If then the legislator ought to take care that the bodies of the
 children are as perfect as possible, his first attention ought to be
 given to matrimony; at what time and in what situation it is proper that
 the citizens should engage in the nuptial contract. Now, with respect
 to this alliance, the legislator ought both to consider the parties and
 their time of life, that they may grow old at the same part of time, and
 that their bodily powers may not be different; that is to say, the man
 being able to have children, but the woman too old to bear them; or, on
 the contrary, the woman be young enough to produce children, but the man
 too old to be a father; for from such a situation discords and disputes
 continually arise. In the next place, with respect to the succession of
 children, there ought not to be too great an interval of time between
 them and their parents; for when there is, the parent can receive no
 benefit from his child's affection, or the child any advantage from his
 father's protection; [1335a] neither should the difference in years be
 too little, as great inconveniences may arise from it; as it prevents
 that proper reverence being shown to a father by a boy who considers him
 as nearly his equal in age, and also from the disputes it occasions in
 the economy of the family. But, to return from this digression, care
 ought to be taken that the bodies of the children may be such as will
 answer the expectations of the legislator; this also will be affected
 by the same means. Since season for the production of children is
 determined (not exactly, but to speak in general), namely, for the man
 till seventy years, and the woman till fifty, the entering into the
 marriage state, as far as time is concerned, should be regulated by
 these periods. It is extremely bad for the children when the father
 is too young; for in all animals whatsoever the parts of the young are
 imperfect, and are more likely to be productive of females than males,
 and diminutive also in size; the same thing of course necessarily holds
 true in men; as a proof of this you may see in those cities where the
 men and women usually marry very young, the people in general are very
 small and ill framed; in child-birth also the women suffer more, and
 many of them die. And thus some persons tell us the oracle of Traezenium
 should be explained, as if it referred to the many women who were
 destroyed by too early marriages, and not their gathering their fruits
 too soon. It is also conducive to temperance not to marry too soon; for
 women who do so are apt to be intemperate. It also prevents the bodies
 of men from acquiring their full size if they marry before their growth
 is completed; for this is the determinate period, which prevents any
 further increase; for which reason the proper time for a woman to marry
 is eighteen, for a man thirty-seven, a little more or less; for when
 they marry at that time their bodies are in perfection, and they will
 also cease to have children at a proper time; and moreover with respect
 to the succession of the children, if they have them at the time which
 may reasonably be expected, they will be just arriving into perfection
 when their parents are sinking down under the load of seventy years.
 And thus much for the time which is proper for marriage; but moreover
 a proper season of the year should be observed, as many persons do now,
 and appropriate the winter for this business. The married couple ought
 also to regard the precepts of physicians and naturalists, each of whom
 have treated on these [1335b] subjects. What is the fit disposition of
 the body will be better mentioned when we come to speak of the education
 of the child; we will just slightly mention a few particulars. Now,
 there is no occasion that any one should have the habit of body of a
 wrestler to be either a good citizen, or to enjoy a good constitution,
 or to be the father of healthy children; neither should he be infirm or
 too much dispirited by misfortunes, but between both these. He ought to
 have a habit of labour, but not of too violent labour; nor should that
 be confined to one object only, as the wrestler's is; but to such things
 as are proper for freemen. These things are equally necessary both for
 men and women. Women with child should also take care that their diet is
 not too sparing, and that they use sufficient exercise; which it will be
 easy for the legislator to effect if he commands them once every day
 to repair to the worship of the gods who are supposed to preside over
 matrimony. But, contrary to what is proper for the body, the mind ought
 to be kept as tranquil as possible; for as plants partake of the nature
 of the soil, so does the child receive much of the disposition of the
 mother. With respect to the exposing or bringing up of children, let
 it be a law, that nothing imperfect or maimed shall be brought
 up,.......... As the proper time has been pointed out for a man and a
 woman to enter into the marriage state, so also let us determine
 how long it is advantageous for the community that they should have
 children; for as the children of those who are too young are imperfect
 both in body and mind, so also those whose parents are too old are weak
 in both: while therefore the body continues in perfection, which (as
 some poets say, who reckon the different periods of life by sevens)
 is till fifty years, or four or five more, the children may be equally
 perfect; but when the parents are past that age it is better they should
 have no more. With respect to any connection between a man and a woman,
 or a woman and a man, when either of the parties are betrothed, let
 it be held in utter detestation [1336a] on any pretext whatsoever;
 but should any one be guilty of such a thing after the marriage is
 consummated, let his infamy be as great as his guilt deserves.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVII
 
 
 When a child is born it must be supposed that the strength of its body
 will depend greatly upon the quality of its food. Now whoever will
 examine into the nature of animals, and also observe those people who
 are very desirous their children should acquire a warlike habit, will
 find that they feed them chiefly with milk, as being best accommodated
 to their bodies, but without wine, to prevent any distempers: those
 motions also which are natural to their age are very serviceable; and
 to prevent any of their limbs from being crooked, on account of their
 extreme ductility, some people even now use particular machines that
 their bodies may not be distorted. It is also useful to enure them to
 the cold when they are very little; for this is very serviceable for
 their health; and also to enure them to the business of war; for which
 reason it is customary with many of the barbarians to dip their children
 in rivers when the water is cold; with others to clothe them very
 slightly, as among the Celts; for whatever it is possible to accustom
 children to, it is best to accustom them to it at first, but to do it
 by degrees: besides, boys have naturally a habit of loving the cold, on
 account of the heat. These, then, and such-like things ought to be the
 first object of our attention: the next age to this continues till
 the child is five years old; during which time it is best to teach him
 nothing at all, not even necessary labour, lest it should hinder his
 growth; but he should be accustomed to use so much motion as not to
 acquire a lazy habit of body; which he will get by various means and by
 play also: his play also ought to be neither illiberal nor too laborious
 nor lazy. Their governors and preceptors also should take care what sort
 of tales and stories it may be proper for them to hear; for all these
 ought to pave the way for their future instruction: for which reason
 the generality of their play should be imitations of what they are
 afterwards to do seriously. They too do wrong who forbid by laws
 the disputes between boys and their quarrels, for they contribute to
 increase their growth--as they are a sort of exercise to the body:
 for the struggles of the heart and the compression of the spirits give
 strength to those who labour, which happens to boys in their disputes.
 The preceptors also ought to have an eye upon their manner of life, and
 those with whom they converse; and to take care that they are never
 in the company of slaves. At this time and till they are seven [1336b]
 years old it is necessary that they should be educated at home. It
 is also very proper to banish, both from their hearing and sight,
 everything which is illiberal and the like. Indeed it is as much the
 business of the legislator as anything else, to banish every indecent
 expression out of the state: for from a permission to speak whatever is
 shameful, very quickly arises the doing it, and this particularly with
 young people: for which reason let them never speak nor hear any such
 thing: but if it appears that any freeman has done or said anything that
 is forbidden before he is of age to be thought fit to partake of the
 common meals, let him be punished by disgrace and stripes; but if a
 person above that age does so, let him be treated as you would a
 slave, on account of his being infamous. Since we forbid his speaking
 everything which is forbidden, it is necessary that he neither sees
 obscene stories nor pictures; the magistrates therefore are to take care
 that there are no statues or pictures of anything of this nature, except
 only to those gods to whom the law permits them, and to which the law
 allows persons of a certain age to pay their devotions, for themselves,
 their wives, and children. It should also be illegal for young persons
 to be present either at iambics or comedies before they are arrived at
 that age when they are allowed to partake of the pleasures of the table:
 indeed a good education will preserve them from all the evils which
 attend on these things. We have at present just touched upon this
 subject; it will be our business hereafter, when we properly come to
 it, to determine whether this care of children is unnecessary, or,
 if necessary, in what manner it must be done; at present we have only
 mentioned it as necessary. Probably the saying of Theodoras, the tragic
 actor, was not a bad one: That he would permit no one, not even the
 meanest actor, to go upon the stage before him, that he might first
 engage the ear of the audience. The same thing happens both in our
 connections with men and things: what we meet with first pleases best;
 for which reason children should be kept strangers to everything which
 is bad, more particularly whatsoever is loose and offensive to good
 manners. When five years are accomplished, the two next may be very
 properly employed in being spectators of those exercises they will
 afterwards have to learn. There are two periods into which education
 ought to be divided, according to the age of the child; the one is from
 his being seven years of age to the time of puberty; the other from
 thence till he is one-and-twenty: for those who divide ages by the
 number seven [1337a] are in general wrong: it is much better to follow
 the division of nature; for every art and every instruction is intended
 to complete what nature has left defective: we must first consider if
 any regulation whatsoever is requisite for children; in the next place,
 if it is advantageous to make it a common care, or that every one should
 act therein as he pleases, which is the general practice in most cities;
 in the third place, what it ought to be.
 
 
 
 
 BOOK VIII
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I
 
 
 No one can doubt that the magistrate ought greatly to interest himself
 in the care of youth; for where it is neglected it is hurtful to the
 city, for every state ought to be governed according to its particular
 nature; for the form and manners of each government are peculiar to
 itself; and these, as they originally established it, so they usually
 still preserve it. For instance, democratic forms and manners a
 democracy; oligarchic, an oligarchy: but, universally, the best manners
 produce the best government. Besides, as in every business and art there
 are some things which men are to learn first and be made accustomed to,
 which are necessary to perform their several works; so it is evident
 that the same thing is necessary in the practice of virtue. As there is
 one end in view in every city, it is evident that education ought to be
 one and the same in each; and that this should be a common care, and
 not the individual's, as it now is, when every one takes care of his own
 children separately; and their instructions are particular also, each
 person teaching them as they please; but what ought to be engaged in
 ought to be common to all. Besides, no one ought to think that any
 citizen belongs to him in particular, but to the state in general; for
 each one is a part of the state, and it is the natural duty of each part
 to regard the good of the whole: and for this the Lacedaemonians may be
 praised; for they give the greatest attention to education, and make
 it public. It is evident, then, that there should be laws concerning
 education, and that it should be public.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II
 
 
 What education is, and how children ought to be instructed, is what
 should be well known; for there are doubts concerning the business of
 it, as all people do not agree in those things they would have a child
 taught, both with respect to their improvement in virtue and a happy
 life: nor is it clear whether the object of it should be to improve
 the reason or rectify the morals. From the present mode of education
 we cannot determine with certainty to which men incline, whether to
 instruct a child in what will be useful to him in life; or what tends to
 virtue, and what is excellent: for all these things have their separate
 defenders. As to virtue, there is no particular [1337b] in which they
 all agree: for as all do not equally esteem all virtues, it reasonably
 follows that they will not cultivate the same. It is evident that what
 is necessary ought to be taught to all: but that which is necessary
 for one is not necessary for all; for there ought to be a distinction
 between the employment of a freeman and a slave. The first of these
 should be taught everything useful which will not make those who know
 it mean. Every work is to be esteemed mean, and every art and every
 discipline which renders the body, the mind, or the understanding of
 freemen unfit for the habit and practice of virtue: for which reason all
 those arts which tend to deform the body are called mean, and all those
 employments which are exercised for gain; for they take off from the
 freedom of the mind and render it sordid. There are also some liberal
 arts which are not improper for freemen to apply to in a certain degree;
 but to endeavour to acquire a perfect skill in them is exposed to the
 faults I have just mentioned; for there is a great deal of difference
 in the reason for which any one does or learns anything: for it is not
 illiberal to engage in it for one's self, one's friend, or in the cause
 of virtue; while, at the same time, to do it for the sake of another
 may seem to be acting the part of a servant and a slave. The mode of
 instruction which now prevails seems to partake of both parts.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III
 
 
 There are four things which it is usual to teach children--reading,
 gymnastic exercises, and music, to which (in the fourth place) some add
 painting. Reading and painting are both of them of singular use in life,
 and gymnastic exercises, as productive of courage. As to music, some
 persons may doubt, as most persons now use it for the sake of pleasure:
 but those who originally made it part of education did it because,
 as has been already said, nature requires that we should not only be
 properly employed, but to be able to enjoy leisure honourably: for this
 (to repeat what I have already said) is of all things the principal.
 But, though both labour and rest are necessary, yet the latter is
 preferable to the first; and by all means we ought to learn what we
 should do when at rest: for we ought not to employ that time at play;
 for then play would be the necessary business of our lives. But if this
 cannot be, play is more necessary for those who labour than those who
 are at rest: for he who labours requires relaxation; which play will
 supply: for as labour is attended with pain and continued exertion, it
 is necessary that play should be introduced, under proper regulations,
 as a medicine: for such an employment of the mind is a relaxation to
 it, and eases with pleasure. [1338a] Now rest itself seems to partake of
 pleasure, of happiness, and an agreeable life: but this cannot be theirs
 who labour, but theirs who are at rest; for he who labours, labours for
 the sake of some end which he has not: but happiness is an end which
 all persons think is attended with pleasure and not with pain: but all
 persons do not agree in making this pleasure consist in the same thing;
 for each one has his particular standard, correspondent to his own
 habits; but the best man proposes the best pleasure, and that which
 arises from the noblest actions. But it is evident, that to live a life
 of rest there are some things which a man must learn and be instructed
 in; and that the object of this learning and this instruction centres in
 their acquisition: but the learning and instruction which is given for
 labour has for its object other things; for which reason the ancients
 made music a part of education; not as a thing necessary, for it is not
 of that nature, nor as a thing useful, as reading, in the common course
 of life, or for managing of a family, or for learning anything as useful
 in public life. Painting also seems useful to enable a man to judge
 more accurately of the productions of the finer arts: nor is it like
 the gymnastic exercises, which contribute to health and strength; for
 neither of these things do we see produced by music; there remains for
 it then to be the employment of our rest, which they had in view who
 introduced it; and, thinking it a proper employment for freemen, to them
 they allotted it; as Homer sings:
 
    "How right to call Thalia to the feast:" 
 
 and of some others he says:
 
    "The bard was call'd, to ravish every ear:"
 
 and, in another place, he makes Ulysses say the happiest part of man's
 life is
 
    "When at the festal board, in order plac'd, They hear the song."
 
 It is evident, then, that there is a certain education in which a child
 may be instructed, not as useful nor as necessary, but as noble and
 liberal: but whether this is one or more than one, and of what sort they
 are, and how to be taught, shall be considered hereafter: we are now got
 so far on our way as to show that we have the testimony of the ancients
 in our favour, by what they have delivered down upon education--for
 music makes this plain. Moreover, it is necessary to instruct children
 in what is useful, not only on account of its being useful in itself,
 as, for instance, to learn to read, but also as the means of acquiring
 other different sorts of instruction: thus they should be instructed
 in painting, not only to prevent their being mistaken in purchasing
 pictures, or in buying or selling of vases, but rather as it makes
 [1338b] them judges of the beauties of the human form; for to be always
 hunting after the profitable ill agrees with great and freeborn
 souls. As it is evident whether a boy should be first taught morals or
 reasoning, and whether his body or his understanding should be first
 cultivated, it is plain that boys should be first put under the care of
 the different masters of the gymnastic arts, both to form their bodies
 and teach them their exercises.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV
 
 
 Now those states which seem to take the greatest care of their
 children's education, bestow their chief attention on wrestling, though
 it both prevents the increase of the body and hurts the form of it. This
 fault the Lacedaemonians did not fall into, for they made their children
 fierce by painful labour, as chiefly useful to inspire them with
 courage: though, as we have already often said, this is neither the
 only thing nor the principal thing necessary to attend to; and even with
 respect to this they may not thus attain their end; for we do not find
 either in other animals, or other nations, that courage necessarily
 attends the most cruel, but rather the milder, and those who have the
 dispositions of lions: for there are many people who are eager both
 to kill men and to devour human flesh, as the Achaeans and Heniochi in
 Pontus, and many others in Asia, some of whom are as bad, others worse
 than these, who indeed live by tyranny, but are men of no courage. Nay,
 we know that the Lacedaemonians themselves, while they continued those
 painful labours, and were superior to all others (though now they are
 inferior to many, both in war and gymnastic exercises), did not acquire
 their superiority by training their youth to these exercises,
 but because those who were disciplined opposed those who were not
 disciplined at all. What is fair and honourable ought then to take place
 in education of what is fierce and cruel: for it is not a wolf, nor any
 other wild beast, which will brave any noble danger, but rather a good
 man. So that those who permit boys to engage too earnestly in these
 exercises, while they do not take care to instruct them in what is
 necessary to do, to speak the real truth, render them mean and vile,
 accomplished only in one duty of a citizen, and in every other respect,
 as reason evinces, good for nothing. Nor should we form our judgments
 from past events, but from what we see at present: for now they have
 rivals in their mode of education, whereas formerly they had not. That
 gymnastic exercises are useful, and in what manner, is admitted; for
 during youth it is very proper to go through a course of those which
 are most gentle, omitting that violent diet and those painful exercises
 which are prescribed as necessary; that they may not prevent the growth
 of the body: and it is no small proof that they have this effect, that
 amongst the Olympic candidates we can scarce find two or three who have
 gained a victory both when boys and men: because the necessary exercises
 they went through when young deprived them of their strength. When they
 have allotted three years from the time of puberty to other parts of
 education, they are then of a proper age to submit to labour and a
 regulated diet; for it is impossible for the mind and body both to
 labour at the same time, as they are productive of contrary evils to
 each other; the labour of the body preventing the progress of the mind,
 and the mind of the body.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V
 
 
 With respect to music we have already spoken a little in a doubtful
 manner upon this subject. It will be proper to go over again more
 particularly what we then said, which may serve as an introduction to
 what any other person may choose to offer thereon; for it is no easy
 matter to distinctly point out what power it has, nor on what accounts
 one should apply it, whether as an amusement and refreshment, as sleep
 or wine; as these are nothing serious, but pleasing, and the killers of
 care, as Euripides says; for which reason they class in the same order
 and use for the same purpose all these, namely, sleep, wine, and music,
 to which some add dancing; or shall we rather suppose that music tends
 to be productive of virtue, having a power, as the gymnastic exercises
 have to form the body in a certain way, to influence the manners so as
 to accustom its professors to rejoice rightly? or shall we say, that it
 is of any service in the conduct of life, and an assistant to prudence?
 for this also is a third property which has been attributed to it. Now
 that boys are not to be instructed in it as play is evident; for those
 who learn don't play, for to learn is rather troublesome; neither is
 it proper to permit boys at their age to enjoy perfect leisure; for to
 cease to improve is by no means fit for what is as yet imperfect; but it
 may be thought that the earnest attention of boys in this art is for
 the sake of that amusement they will enjoy when they come to be men and
 completely formed; but, if this is the case, why are they themselves
 to learn it, and not follow the practice of the kings of the Medes and
 Persians, who enjoy the pleasure of music by hearing others play, and
 being shown its beauties by them; for of necessity those must be
 better skilled therein who make this science their particular study
 and business, than those who have only spent so much time at it as was
 sufficient just to learn the principles of it. But if this is a reason
 for a child's being taught anything, they ought also to learn the art of
 cookery, but this is absurd. The same doubt occurs if music has a power
 of improving the manners; for why should they on this account themselves
 learn it, and not reap every advantage of regulating the passions or
 forming a judgment [1339b] on the merits of the performance by hearing
 others, as the Lacedaemonians; for they, without having ever learnt
 music, are yet able to judge accurately what is good and what is
 bad; the same reasoning may be applied if music is supposed to be the
 amusement of those who live an elegant and easy life, why should they
 learn themselves, and not rather enjoy the benefit of others' skill.
 Let us here consider what is our belief of the immortal gods in this
 particular. Now we find the poets never represent Jupiter himself as
 singing and playing; nay, we ourselves treat the professors of these
 arts as mean people, and say that no one would practise them but a
 drunkard or a buffoon. But probably we may consider this subject more
 at large hereafter. The first question is, whether music is or is not
 to make a part of education? and of those three things which have
 been assigned as its proper employment, which is the right? Is it to
 instruct, to amuse, or to employ the vacant hours of those who live at
 rest? or may not all three be properly allotted to it? for it appears
 to partake of them all; for play is necessary for relaxation, and
 relaxation pleasant, as it is a medicine for that uneasiness which
 arises from labour. It is admitted also that a happy life must be an
 honourable one, and a pleasant one too, since happiness consists in both
 these; and we all agree that music is one of the most pleasing things,
 whether alone or accompanied with a voice; as Musseus says, "Music's the
 sweetest joy of man;" for which reason it is justly admitted into every
 company and every happy life, as having the power of inspiring joy.
 So that from this any one may suppose that it is necessary to instruct
 young persons in it; for all those pleasures which are harmless are not
 only conducive to the final end of life, but serve also as relaxations;
 and, as men are but rarely in the attainment of that final end, they
 often cease from their labour and apply to amusement, with no further
 view than to acquire the pleasure attending it. It is therefore useful
 to enjoy such pleasures as these. There are some persons who make play
 and amusement their end, and probably that end has some pleasure annexed
 to it, but not what should be; but while men seek the one they accept
 the other for it; because there is some likeness in human actions to the
 end; for the end is pursued for the sake of nothing else that attends
 it; but for itself only; and pleasures like these are sought for, not
 on account of what follows them, but on account of what has gone before
 them, as labour and grief; for which reason they seek for happiness in
 these sort of pleasures; and that this is the reason any one may easily
 perceive. That music should be pursued, not on this account only, but
 also as it is very serviceable during the hours of relaxation from
 labour, probably no [1340a] one doubts; we should also inquire whether
 besides this use it may not also have another of nobler nature--and we
 ought not only to partake of the common pleasure arising from it (which
 all have the sensation of, for music naturally gives pleasure, therefore
 the use of it is agreeable to all ages and all dispositions); but also
 to examine if it tends anything to improve our manners and our souls.
 And this will be easily known if we feel our dispositions any way
 influenced thereby; and that they are so is evident from many other
 instances, as well as the music at the Olympic games; and this
 confessedly fills the soul with enthusiasm; but enthusiasm is an
 affection of the soul which strongly agitates the disposition. Besides,
 all those who hear any imitations sympathise therewith; and this when
 they are conveyed even without rhythm or verse. Moreover, as music is
 one of those things which are pleasant, and as virtue itself consists in
 rightly enjoying, loving, and hating, it is evident that we ought not
 to learn or accustom ourselves to anything so much as to judge right and
 rejoice in honourable manners and noble actions. But anger and mildness,
 courage and modesty, and their contraries, as well as all other
 dispositions of the mind, are most naturally imitated by music and
 poetry; which is plain by experience, for when we hear these our very
 soul is altered; and he who is affected either with joy or grief by the
 imitation of any objects, is in very nearly the same situation as if he
 was affected by the objects themselves; thus, if any person is pleased
 with seeing a statue of any one on no other account but its beauty, it
 is evident that the sight of the original from whence it was taken
 would also be pleasing; now it happens in the other senses there is no
 imitation of manners; that is to say, in the touch and the taste; in the
 objects of sight, a very little; for these are merely representations of
 things, and the perceptions which they excite are in a manner common
 to all. Besides, statues and paintings are not properly imitations of
 manners, but rather signs and marks which show the body is affected by
 some passion. However, the difference is not great, yet young men ought
 not to view the paintings of Pauso, but of Polygnotus, or any other
 painter or statuary who expresses manners. But in poetry and music there
 are imitations of manners; and this is evident, for different harmonies
 differ from each other so much by nature, that those who hear them are
 differently affected, and are not in the same disposition of mind when
 one is performed as when another is; the one, for instance, occasions
 grief 13406 and contracts the soul, as the mixed Lydian: others soften
 the mind, and as it were dissolve the heart: others fix it in a firm
 and settled state, such is the power of the Doric music only; while the
 Phrygian fills the soul with enthusiasm, as has been well described by
 those who have written philosophically upon this part of education; for
 they bring examples of what they advance from the things themselves. The
 same holds true with respect to rhythm; some fix the disposition, others
 occasion a change in it; some act more violently, others more liberally.
 From what has been said it is evident what an influence music has over
 the disposition of the mind, and how variously it can fascinate it:
 and if it can do this, most certainly it is what youth ought to be
 instructed in. And indeed the learning of music is particularly adapted
 to their disposition; for at their time of life they do not willingly
 attend to anything which is not agreeable; but music is naturally one
 of the most agreeable things; and there seems to be a certain connection
 between harmony and rhythm; for which reason some wise men held the soul
 itself to be harmony; others, that it contains it.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI
 
 
 We will now determine whether it is proper that children should be
 taught to sing, and play upon any instrument, which we have before made
 a matter of doubt. Now, it is well known that it makes a great deal of
 difference when you would qualify any one in any art, for the person
 himself to learn the practical part of it; for it is a thing very
 difficult, if not impossible, for a man to be a good judge of what he
 himself cannot do. It is also very necessary that children should have
 some employment which will amuse them; for which reason the rattle of
 Archytas seems well contrived, which they give children to play with,
 to prevent their breaking those things which are about the house; for
 at their age they cannot sit still: this therefore is well adapted to
 infants, as instruction ought to be their rattle as they grow up; hence
 it is evident that they should be so taught music as to be able to
 practise it. Nor is it difficult to say what is becoming or unbecoming
 of their age, or to answer the objections which some make to this
 employment as mean and low. In the first place, it is necessary for them
 to practise, that they may be judges of the art: for which reason this
 should be done when they are young; but when they are grown older the
 practical part may be dropped; while they will still continue judges of
 what is excellent in the art, and take a proper pleasure therein, from
 the knowledge they acquired of it in their youth. As to the censure
 which some persons throw upon music, as something mean and low, it is
 not difficult to answer that, if we will but consider how far we propose
 those who are to be educated so as to become good citizens should be
 instructed in this art, [1341a] and what music and what rhythms they
 should be acquainted with; and also what instruments they should play
 upon; for in these there is probably a difference. Such then is the
 proper answer to that censure: for it must be admitted, that in some
 cases nothing can prevent music being attended, to a certain degree,
 with the bad effects which are ascribed to it; it is therefore clear
 that the learning of it should never prevent the business of riper
 years; nor render the body effeminate, and unfit for the business of war
 or the state; but it should be practised by the young, judged of by the
 old. That children may learn music properly, it is necessary that they
 should not be employed in those parts of it which are the objects of
 dispute between the masters in that science; nor should they perform
 such pieces as are wondered at from the difficulty of their execution;
 and which, from being first exhibited in the public games, are now
 become a part of education; but let them learn so much of it as to be
 able to receive proper pleasure from excellent music and rhythms; and
 not that only which music must make all animals feel, and also slaves
 and boys, but more. It is therefore plain what instruments they should
 use; thus, they should never be taught to play upon the flute, or any
 other instrument which requires great skill, as the harp or the like,
 but on such as will make them good judges of music, or any other
 instruction: besides, the flute is not a moral instrument, but rather
 one that will inflame the passions, and is therefore rather to be used
 when the soul is to be animated than when instruction is intended. Let
 me add also, that there is something therein which is quite contrary to
 what education requires; as the player on the flute is prevented from
 speaking: for which reason our forefathers very properly forbade the use
 of it to youth and freemen, though they themselves at first used it; for
 when their riches procured them greater leisure, they grew more animated
 in the cause of virtue; and both before and after the Median war their
 noble actions so exalted their minds that they attended to every part of
 education; selecting no one in particular, but endeavouring to collect
 the whole: for which reason they introduced the flute also, as one
 of the instruments they were to learn to play on. At Lacedaemon the
 choregus himself played on the flute; and it was so common at Athens
 that almost every freeman understood it, as is evident from the tablet
 which Thrasippus dedicated when he was choregus; but afterwards they
 rejected it as dangerous; having become better judges of what tended to
 promote virtue and what did not. For the same reason many of the ancient
 instruments were thrown aside, as the dulcimer and the lyre; as also
 those which were to inspire those who played on them with pleasure, and
 which required a nice finger and great skill to play well on. What the
 ancients tell us, by way of fable, of the flute is indeed very rational;
 namely, that after Minerva had found it, she threw it away: nor are they
 wrong who say that the goddess disliked it for deforming the face of him
 who played thereon: not but that it is more probable that she rejected
 it as the knowledge thereof contributed nothing to the improvement of
 the mind. Now, we regard Minerva as the inventress of arts and sciences.
 As we disapprove of a child's being taught to understand instruments,
 and to play like a master (which we would have confined to those who are
 candidates for the prize in that science; for they play not to improve
 themselves in virtue, but to please those who hear them, and gratify
 their importunity); therefore we think the practice of it unfit for
 freemen; but then it should be confined to those who are paid for doing
 it; for it usually gives people sordid notions, for the end they have
 in view is bad: for the impertinent spectator is accustomed to make them
 change their music; so that the artists who attend to him regulate their
 bodies according to his motions.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII
 
 
 We are now to enter into an inquiry concerning harmony and rhythm;
 whether all sorts of these are to be employed in education, or whether
 some peculiar ones are to be selected; and also whether we should
 give the same directions to those who are engaged in music as part of
 education, or whether there is something different from these two.
 Now, as all music consists in melody and rhythm, we ought not to be
 unacquainted with the power which each of these has in education; and
 whether we should rather choose music in which melody prevails, or
 rhythm: but when I consider how many things have been well written upon
 these subjects, not only by some musicians of the present age, but also
 by some philosophers who are perfectly skilled in that part of music
 which belongs to education; we will refer those who desire a very
 particular knowledge therein to those writers, and shall only treat
 of it in general terms, without descending to particulars. Melody is
 divided by some philosophers, whose notions we approve of, into moral,
 practical, and that which fills the mind with enthusiasm: they also
 allot to each of these a particular kind of harmony which naturally
 corresponds therewith: and we say that music should not be applied to
 one purpose only, but many; both for instruction and purifying the soul
 (now I use the word purifying at present without any explanation, but
 shall speak more at large of it in my Poetics); and, in the third place,
 as an agreeable manner of spending the time and a relaxation from the
 uneasiness of the mind. [1342a] It is evident that all harmonies are to
 be used; but not for all purposes; but the most moral in education: but
 to please the ear, when others play, the most active and enthusiastic;
 for that passion which is to be found very strong in some souls is to be
 met with also in all; but the difference in different persons consists
 in its being in a less or greater degree, as pity, fear, and enthusiasm
 also; which latter is so powerful in some as to overpower the soul: and
 yet we see those persons, by the application of sacred music to soothe
 their mind, rendered as sedate and composed as if they had employed
 the art of the physician: and this must necessarily happen to the
 compassionate, the fearful, and all those who are subdued by their
 passions: nay, all persons, as far as they are affected with those
 passions, admit of the same cure, and are restored to tranquillity with
 pleasure. In the same manner, all music which has the power of purifying
 the soul affords a harmless pleasure to man. Such, therefore, should be
 the harmony and such the music which those who contend with each other
 in the theatre should exhibit: but as the audience is composed of two
 sorts of people, the free and the well-instructed, the rude the mean
 mechanics, and hired servants, and a long collection of the like, there
 must be some music and some spectacles to please and soothe them; for as
 their minds are as it were perverted from their natural habits, so
 also is there an unnatural harmony, and overcharged music which is
 accommodated to their taste: but what is according to nature gives
 pleasure to every one, therefore those who are to contend upon the
 theatre should be allowed to use this species of music. But in education
 ethic melody and ethic harmony should be used, which is the Doric, as we
 have already said, or any other which those philosophers who are skilful
 in that music which is to be employed in education shall approve of.
 But Socrates, in Plato's Republic, is very wrong when he [1342b] permits
 only the Phrygian music to be used as well as the Doric, particularly as
 amongst other instruments he banishes the flute; for the Phrygian music
 has the same power in harmony as the flute has amongst the instruments;
 for they are both pathetic and raise the mind: and this the practice
 of the poets proves; for in their bacchanal songs, or whenever they
 describe any violent emotions of the mind, the flute is the instrument
 they chiefly use: and the Phrygian harmony is most suitable to these
 subjects. Now, that the dithyrambic measure is Phrygian is allowed by
 general consent; and those who are conversant in studies of this sort
 bring many proofs of it; as, for instance, when Philoxenus endeavoured
 to compose dithyrambic music for Doric harmony, he naturally fell back
 again into Phrygian, as being fittest for that purpose; as every one
 indeed agrees, that the Doric music is most serious, and fittest to
 inspire courage: and, as we always commend the middle as being between
 the two extremes, and the Doric has this relation with respect to other
 harmonies, it is evident that is what the youth ought to be instructed
 in. There are two things to be taken into consideration, both what is
 possible and what is proper; every one then should chiefly endeavour to
 attain those things which contain both these qualities: but this is to
 be regulated by different times of life; for instance, it is not easy
 for those who are advanced in years to sing such pieces of music as
 require very high notes, for nature points out to them those which are
 gentle and require little strength of voice (for which reason some who
 are skilful in music justly find fault with Socrates for forbidding the
 youth to be instructed in gentle harmony; as if, like wine, it would
 make them drunk, whereas the effect of that is to render men bacchanals,
 and not make them languid): these therefore are what should employ those
 who are grown old. Moreover, if there is any harmony which is proper for
 a child's age, as being at the same time elegant and instructive, as the
 Lydian of all others seems chiefly to be-These then are as it were the
 three boundaries of education, moderation, possibility, and decorum.
 
 
 
 
 
 INDEX
 
 
   ACHILLES, 76
 
   Act of the city, what, 69
 
   Actions, their original spring, i
 
   Administration, 76;
       whether to be shared by the whole community, 203
 
   AEsumnetes, 96
 
   AEthiopia, in what manner the power of the state is there regulated, 112
 
   Alterations in government, whence they arise, 142;
       what they are, 143
 
   Ambractia, the government of, changed, 151
 
   Andromadas Reginus, a lawgiver to the Thracian Calcidians, 65
 
   Animals, their different provisions by nature, 14;
       intended by nature for the benefit of man, 14;
       what constitutes their different species, 113
 
   Animals, tame, why better than wild, 8
 
   Arbitrator and judge, their difference, 49
 
   Architas his rattle, 248
 
   Areopagus, senate of, 63
 
   Argonauts refuse to take Hercules with them, 93
 
   Aristocracies, causes of commotions in them, 157;
       chief cause of their alteration, 158;
       may degenerate into an oligarchy, 79
 
   Aristocracy, what, 78;
       treated of, 120;
       its object, 121
 
   Art, works of, which most excellent, 20
 
   Artificers and slaves, their difference, 24
 
   Assemblies, public, advantageous to a democracy, 134
 
   Assembly, public, its proper business, 133
 
   Athens, different dispositions of the citizens of, 149
 
   Barter, its original, 15
 
   Being, what the nature of every one is, 3
 
   Beings, why some command, others obey, 2
 
   Body by nature to be governed, 8;
       requires our care before the soul, 232
 
   Calchis, the government of, changed, 151
 
   Calcidians, 65
 
   Carthaginian government described, 60
 
   Census in a free state should be as extensive as possible, 131;
       how to be altered, 162
 
   Charondas supposed to be the scholar of Zaleucus, 64
 
   Child, how to be managed when first born, 235;
       should be taught nothing till he is five years old, 235;
       how then to be educated, 236
 
   Children, the proper government of, 22;
       what their proper virtues, 23;
       what they are usually taught, 240
 
   Cities, how governed at first, 3;
       what, 3;
       the work of nature, 3;
       prior in contemplation to a family, or an individual, 4
 
   Citizen, who is one? 66, 68;
       should know both how to command and obey, 73
 
   Citizens must have some things in common, 26;
       should be exempted from servile labour, 51;
       privileges different in different governments, 68;
       if illegally made, whether illegal, 69;
       who admitted to be, 75;
       in the best states ought not to follow merchandise, 216
 
   City, may be too much one, 27, 35;
       what, 66, 82;
       when it continues the same, 70;
       for whose sake established, 76;
       its end, 83;
       of what parts made up, 113;
       best composed of equals, 126
 
   City of the best form, what its establishment ought to be, 149;
       wherein its greatness consists, 149;
       may be either too large or too small, 209;
       what should be its situation, 211;
       whether proper near the sea, 211;
       ought to be divided by families into different sorts of men, 218
 
   City and confederacy, their difference, 37;
       wherein it should be one, 27
 
   Command amongst equals should be in rotation, 101
 
   Common meals not well established at Lacedaemon-well at Crete, 56;
       the model from whence the Lacedaemonian was taken, 56;
       inferior to it in some respects, 56
 
   Community, its recommendations deceitful, 34;
       into what people it may be divided, 194
 
   Community of children, 29, 30;
       inconveniences attending it, 31
 
   Community of goods, its inconveniences, 28;
       destructive of modesty and liberality, 34
 
   Community of wives, its inconveniences, 27
 
   Contempt a cause of sedition, 146
 
   Courage of a man different from a woman's, 74
 
   Courts, how many there ought to be, 140
 
   Courts of justice should be few in a small state, 192
 
   Cretan customs similar to the Lacedasmonian, 57;
       assembly open to every citizen, 58
 
   Cretans, their power, 58;
       their public meals, how conducted 58
 
   Crete, the government of, 57;
       description of the island of 57
 
   Customs at Carthage, Lacedaemon, and amongst the Scythians and
   Iberians, concerning those who had killed an enemy, 204, 205
 
   Dadalus's statues, 6.
 
   Delphos, an account of a sedition there, 150
 
   Demagogues, their influence in a democracy, 116.
 
   Democracies, arose out of tyrannies, 100;
       whence they arose, 142;
       when changed into tyrannies, 153;
       their different sorts, 184, 188;
       general rules for their establishment, 185;
       should not be made too perfect, 191
 
   Democracy, what, 79, 80;
       its definition, 112, 113;
       different sorts of, 115, 118;
       its object, 122;
       how subverted in the Isle of Cos, 152
 
   Democracy and aristocracy, how they may be blended together, 163
 
   Democratical state, its foundation, 184
 
   Despotic power absurd, 205
 
   Dion, his noble resolution, 171
 
   Dionysius, his taxes, 175
 
   Dissolution of kingdoms and tyrannies, 169
 
   Domestic employments of men and women different, 74
 
   Domestic government, its object, 77
 
   Domestic society the first, 3
 
   Draco, 65
 
   Dyrrachium, government of, 101
 
   Economy and money-getting, difference, 17
 
   Education necessary for the happiness of the city, 90;
       of all things most necessary to preserve the state, 166;
       what it ought to be, 166;
       the objects of it, 228, 229;
       should be taken care of by the magistrate, and correspond to
           the nature of government, 238;
       should be a common care, and regulated by laws, 238
 
   Employment, one to be allotted to one person in an extensive government, 136
 
   Employments in the state, how to be disposed of, 88-90;
       whether all should be open to all, 216
 
   Ephialtes abridges the power of the senate of Areopagus, 63
 
   Ephori, at Sparta, their power too great, 54;
       improperly chosen, 54;
       flattered by their kings, 54;
       the supreme judges, 55;
       manner of life too indulgent, 55
 
   Epidamnus, an account of a revolution there, 150
 
   Equality, how twofold, 143;
       in a democracy, how to be procured, 186
 
   Euripides quoted, 72
 
   Family government, of what it consists, 5
 
   Father should not be too young, 232
 
   Females and slaves, wherein they differ, 2;
       why upon a level amongst barbarians, 3
 
   Forfeitures, how to be applied, 192
 
   Fortune improper pretension for power, 91
 
   Freemen in general, what power they ought to have, 86
 
   Free state treated of, 121;
       how it arises out of a democracy and oligarchy, 122, 123
 
   Friendship weakened by a community of children, 31
 
   General, the office of, how to be disposed of, 98
 
   Gods, why supposed subject to kingly government, 3
 
   Good, relative to man, how divided, 201
 
   Good and evil, the perception of, necessary to form a family and a city, 4
 
   Good fortune something different from happiness, 202
 
   Government should continue as much as possible in the same hands, 28;
       in what manner it should be in rotation, 28;
       what, 66;
       which best, of a good man or good laws, 98;
       good, to what it should owe its preservation, 124;
       what the best, 225
 
   Government of the master over the slave sometimes reciprocally useful, ii
 
   Governments, how different from each other, 67;
       whether more than one form should be established, 76;
       should endeavour to prevent others from being too powerful--
       instances of it, 93;
       how compared to music, in;
       in general, to what they owe their preservation, 160
 
   Governments, political, regal, family, and servile, their difference
   from each other, i
 
   Governors and governed, whether their virtues are the same or different, 23;
       whether they should be the same persons or different, 227
 
   Grecians, their superiority over other people, 213
 
   Guards of a king natives, 96,168;
       of a tyrant foreigners, 96, 168
 
   Gymnastic exercises, when to be performed, 223;
       how far they should be made a part of education, 242, 243
 
   Happiness, wherein it consists, 207
 
   Happy life, where most likely to be found, 202
 
   Harmony, whether all kinds of it are to be used in education, 251
 
   Helots troublesome to the Lacedaemonians, 87
 
   Herdsmen compose the second-best democracy, 189
 
   Hippodamus, an account of, 46;
       his plan of government, 46, 47:
       objected to, 47, 48
 
   Homer quoted, 95, 116
 
   Honours, an inequality of, occasions seditions, 44
 
   Horse most suitable to an oligarchy, 195
 
   Houses, private, their best form, 221
 
   Human flesh devoured by some nations, 242
 
   Husbandmen compose the best democracy, 189;
       will choose to govern according to law, 118
 
   Husbandry, art of, whether part of money-getting, 13
 
   Instruments, their difference from each other, 6;
       wherein they differ from possessions, 6
 
   Italy, its ancient boundary, 218
 
   Jason's declaration, 72
 
   Judge should not act as an arbitrator, 48, 49;
       which is best for an individual, or the people in general, 98, 99
 
   Judges, many better than one, 102;
       of whom to consist, 102;
       how many different sorts are necessary, 141
 
   Judicial part of government, how to be divided, 140
 
   Jurymen, particular powers sometimes appointed to that office, 68
 
   Justice, what, 88;
       the course of, impeded in Crete, 59;
       different in different situations, 74
 
   King, from whom to be chosen 60;
       the guardian of his people 168
 
   King's children, what to be done with, 100
 
   King's power, what it should be 100;
       when unequal, 143
 
   Kingdom, what, 78
 
   Kingdoms, their object, 167;
       how bestowed, 168;
       causes of their dissolution, 173;
       how preserved, 173
 
   Kingly government in the heroic times, what, 96
 
   Kingly power regulated by the laws at Sparta in peace, 95;
       absolute in war, 95
 
   Kings formerly in Crete, 58;
       their power afterwards devolved to the kosmoi, 58;
       method of electing them at Carthage, 60
 
   Knowledge of the master and slave different from each other, ii
 
   Kosmoi, the power of, 58;
       their number, 58;
       wherein inferior to the ephori, 58;
       allowed to resign their office before their time is elapsed, 59
 
   Lacedamonian customs similar to the Cretan, 57
 
   Lacedaemonian government much esteemed, 41;
       the faults of it, 53-56;
       calculated only for war, 56;
       how composed of a democracy and oligarchy, 124
 
   Lacedaemonian revenue badly raised, 56, 57
 
   Lacedaemonians, wherein they admit things to be common, 33
 
   Land should be divided into two parts, 219
 
   Law makes one man a slave, another free, 6;
       whether just or not, 9;
       at Thebes respecting tradesmen, 75;
       nothing should be done contrary to it, 160
 
   Law and government, their difference, 107, 108
 
   Laws, when advantageous
   to alter them, 49,50, 52;
       of every state will be like the state, 88;
       whom they should be calculated for, 92;
       decide better than men, 101;
       moral preferable to written, 102;
       must sometimes bend to ancient customs, 117;
       should be framed to the state, 107;
       the same suit not all governments, 108
 
   Legislator ought to know not only what is best, but what is practical, n
 
   Legislators should fix a proper medium in property, 46
 
   Liberty, wherein it partly consists, 184, 185
 
   Life, happy, owing to a course of virtue, 125;
       how divided, 228
 
   Locrians forbid men to sell their property, 43
 
   Lycophron's account of law, 82
 
   Lycurgus gave over reducing the women to obedience, 53;
       made it infamous for any one to sell his possessions, 53;
       some of his laws censured, 54;
       spent much time at Crete, 57;
       supposed to be the scholar of Thales, 64
 
   Lysander wanted to abolish the kingly power in Sparta, 143
 
   Magistrate, to whom that name is properly given, 136
 
   Magistrates, when they make the state incline to an oligarchy, 61;
       when to an aristocracy, 61;
       at Athens, from whom to be chosen, 64;
       to determine those causes which the law cannot be applied to, 88;
       whether their power is to be the same, or different
           in different communities, 137;
       how they differ from each other, 138;
           in those who appoint them, 138;
       should be continued but a short time in democracies, 161;
       how to be chosen in a democracy, 185;
       different sorts and employments, 196
 
   Making and using, their difference, 6
 
   Malienses, their form of government, 131
 
   Man proved to be a political animal, 4;
       has alone a perception of good and evil, 4;
       without law and justice the worst of beings, 5
 
   Master, power of, whence it arises, as some think, 5
 
   Matrimony, when to be engaged in, 232
 
   Meals, common, established in Crete and Italy, 218;
       expense of, should be defrayed by the whole state, 219
 
   Mechanic employments useful for citizens, 73
 
   Mechanics, whether they should be allowed to be citizens, 74, 75;
       cannot acquire the practice of virtue, 75;
       admitted to be citizens in an oligarchy, 75
 
   Medium of circumstances best, 126
 
   Members of the community, their different pretences to the employments
   of the state, 90;
       what natural dispositions they ought to be of, 213
 
   Men, some distinguished by nature for governors, others to be governed, 7;
       their different modes of living, 13;
       worthy three ways, 226
 
   Merchandise, three different ways of carrying it on, 20
 
   Middle rank of men make the best citizens, 127;
       most conducive to the preservation of the state, 128;
       should be particularly attended to by the legislators, 130
 
   Military, how divided, 194
 
   Mitylene, an account of a dispute there, 150
 
   Monarch, absolute, 100
 
   Monarchies, their nature, 95, 96;
       sometimes elective, 95;
       sometimes hereditary, 95;
       whence they sometimes arise, 146;
       causes of corruption in them, 167;
       how preserved, 173
 
   Money, how it made its way into commerce, 16;
       first weighed, 16;
       afterwards stamped, 16;
       its value dependent on agreement, 16;
       how gained by exchange, 19
 
   Money--getting considered at large, 17, 18
 
   Monopolising gainful, 21; sometimes practised by cities, 21
 
   Monopoly of iron in Sicily, a remarkable instance of the profit of it, 21
 
   Music, how many species of it, in;
       why a part of education, 240;
       how far it should be taught, 242, 243;
       professors of it considered as mean people, 244;
       imitates the disposition of the mind, 246;
       improves our manners, 246;
       Lydian, softens the mind, 247;
       pieces of, difficult in their execution, not to be taught to children, 249
 
   Nature requires equality amongst equals, 101
 
   Naval power should be regulated by the strength of the city, 212
 
   Necessary parts of a city, what, 215
 
   Nobles, the difference between them, no;
       should take care of the poor, 193
 
   Oath, an improper one in an oligarchy, 166
 
   Officers of state, who they ought to be, 135;
       how long to continue, 135;
       who to choose them, 136
 
   Offices, distinction between them, 67;
       when subversive of the rights of the people, 130
 
   Offspring, an instance of the likeness of, to the sire, 30
 
   Oligarchies arise where the strength of the state consists in horse, no;
       whence they arose, 142
 
   Oligarchy admits not hired servants to be citizens, 75;
       its object, 79;
       what, 79, 81;
       its definition, 112;
       different sorts of, 117, 119;
       its object, 122;
       how it ought to be founded, 195
 
   Onomacritus supposed to have drawn up laws, 64
 
   Ostracism, why established, 93, 146;
       its power, 93;
       a weapon in the hand of sedition, 94
 
   Painting, why it should be made a part of education, 241
 
   Particulars, five, in which the rights of the people will be undermined, 130
 
   Pausanias wanted to abolish the ephori, 143
 
   People, how they should be made one, 35;
       of Athens assume upon their victory over the Medes, 64;
       what best to submit to a kingly government, 104;
       to an aristocratic, 104;
       to a free state, 104;
       should be allowed the power of pardoning, not of condemning, 135
 
   Periander's advice to Thrasy-bulus, 93, 169
 
   Pericles introduces the paying of those who attended the court of justice, 64
 
   Philolaus, a Theban legislator, quits his native country, 64
 
   Phocea, an account of a dispute there, 150
 
   Physician, his business, 86
 
   Physicians, their mode of practice in Egypt, 98;
       when ill consult others, 102
 
   Pittacus, 65
 
   Plato censured, 180
 
   Poor excused from bearing arms and from gymnastic exercises in
   an oligarchy, 131;
       paid for attending the public assemblies in a democracy, 131
 
   Power of the master, its object, 77
 
   Power, supreme, where it ought to be lodged, 84;
       why with the many, 85, 87
 
   Powers of a state, different methods of delegating them to the citizens,
   132-134
 
   Preadvisers, court of, 135
 
   Priesthood, to whom to be allotted, 217
 
   Prisoners of war, whether they may be justly made slaves, 9
 
   Private property not regulated the source of sedition, 42;
       Phaleas would have it equal, 42;
       how Phaleas would correct the irregularities of it, 43;
       Plato would allow a certain difference in it, 43
 
   Property, its nature, 12;
       how it should be regulated, 32, 33;
       the advantages of having it private, 34;
       what quantity the public ought to have, 44;
       ought not to be common, 219
 
   Public assemblies, when subversive of the liberties of the people, 130
 
   Public money, how to be divided, 193
 
   Qualifications necessary for those who are to fill the first departments
   in government, 164
 
   Quality of a city, what meant by it, 129
 
   Quantity, 129
 
   Rest and peace the proper objects of the legislator, 230
 
   Revolutions in a democracy, whence they arise, 152;
       in an oligarchy, 156
 
   Rich fined in an oligarchy for not bearing arms and attending the
   gymnastic exercises, 131;
       receive nothing for attending the public assemblies in a democracy, 131
 
   Rights of a citizen, whether advantageous or not, 203
 
   Seditions sometimes prevented by equality, 45;
       their causes, 144-146;
       how to be prevented, 163
 
   Senate suits a democracy, 185
 
   Shepherds compose the second-best democracy, 189
 
   Slave, his nature and use, 6;
       a chattel, 7;
       by law, how, 9
 
   Slavery not founded in nature but law, as some think, 6
 
   Slaves, an inquiry into the virtues they are capable of, 23;
       difficult to manage properly, 51;
       their different sorts, 73
 
   Society necessary to man, 77
 
   Society, civil, the greatest blessing to man, 4;
       different from a commercial intercourse, 82
 
   Socrates, his mistakes on government, Book II. passim;
       his division of the inhabitants, 38;
       would have the women go to war, 38;
       Aristotle's opinion of his discourses, 38;
       his city would require a country of immeasurable extent, 39;
       his comparison of the human species to different kinds of metals, 40;
       his account of the different orders of men in a city imperfect, 3
 
   Sojourners, their situation, 66
 
   Solon's opinion of riches, 14;
       law for restraining property, 43;
       alters the Athenian government, 63
 
   Soul by nature the governor over the body, and in what manner, 8;
       of man how divided, 228, 231
 
   Speech a proof that man was formed for society, 4
 
   State, each, consists of a great number of parts, 109;
       its disproportionate increase the cause of revolutions, 147;
       firm, what, 159
 
   Stealing, how to be prevented, 44
 
   Submission to government, when it is slavery, 206
 
   Supreme power should be ultimately vested in the laws, 101
 
   Syracuse, the government of, languid, 151
 
   Temperance in a man different from a woman, 74
 
   Temples, how to be built, 223
 
   Thales, his contrivance to get money, 21;
       supposed to be the companion of Onomacritus, 64
 
   Things necessary to be known for the management of domestic affairs, 19, 20;
       necessary in the position of a city, 220
 
   Tribunals, what different things they should have under their
   jurisdictions, 137
 
   Tyrannies, how established, 168;
       how preserved, 174, 176;
       of short duration, 180;
       instances thereof, 180
 
   Tyranny, what, 79;
       not natural, 103;
       whence it arises, 108;
       treated of, 124;
       contains all that is bad in all governments, 125
 
   Tyrant, from whom usually chosen, 167;
       his object, 168;
       his guards, 168
 
   Tyrants, many of them originally enjoyed only kingly power, 168;
       the causes of their being conspired against, 169, 170;
       always love the worst of men, 175
 
   Uses of possessions, two, 15
 
   Usury detested, 19
 
   Venality to be guarded against, IDS
 
   Village, what, 3
 
   Virtue of a citizen has reference to the state, 71;
       different in different governments, 71
 
   Virtues different in different persons, 23, 24;
       whether the same constitute a good man and a valuable citizen, 71
 
   Walls necessary for a city, 222
 
   War, what is gained by it in some degree a natural acquisition, 14;
       not a final end, 205, 229
 
   Wife, the proper government of, 22
 
   Women, what their proper virtue, 23;
       not to be indulged in improper liberties, 52;
       had great influence at Lacedaemon, 52;
       of great disservice to the Lacedemonians, 52;
       why indulged by them, 53;
       their proper time of marrying, 233;
       how to be managed when with child, 234
 
   Zaleucus, legislator of the Western Locrians, 64;
       supposed to be the scholar of Thales, 64
 
 
 
 
 
